AIP 197. Academic Internship Program (4, 8, 12)
Individual placements for traditional field learning. Must be integrated with an academic discipline. A written contract involving all parties will include learning objectives, a paper/project outline, and means of supervision and progress evaluation. Consent of faculty adviser and program chair required. Prerequisites: ninety units completed; 2.5 minimum cumulative GPA; departmental stamp.

AIP 197F. Academic Internship Program—Foreign (4, 8, 12)   
Individual placements for field learning opportunities abroad. Must be integrated with an academic discipline. A written contract involving all parties will include learning objectives, a paper/project outline, and means of supervision and progress evaluation. Consent of faculty adviser and program chair required. Prerequisites: ninety units completed; 2.5 minimum cumulative GPA; departmental stamp.

AIP 197P. Public Service Minor Internship (4)   
Individual placements for field learning in nonprofit organizations dedicated to providing services in the areas of education, government, social research, and health. Three quarter sequence integrated with academic programs. A written contract involving all parties will include learning objectives, a paper/project outline, and means of supervision and progress evaluation. Consent of faculty adviser and program chair required. Prerequisites: ninety units completed; 2.5 minimum cumulative GPA; departmental stamp.

AIP 197T. Academic Internship Program—Special Programs
Individual placements for field learning associated with UC San Diego partnerships and special programs. A written contract involving all parties will include learning objectives, a paper/project outline, and means of supervision and progress evaluation. Consent of faculty adviser and program chair required. Prerequisites: ninety units minimum completed; 2.5 minimum cumulative GPA; departmental stamp.

AAS 10. Introduction to African American Studies (4)
This course will cover the experiences of peoples of African descent in the U.S. and broader African Diaspora from the vantage points of cultural production, political practice, socioeconomic conditions, and the overall struggle for social justice along intersecting lines of race, gender, and class. Topics reviewed include: slavery (and slave rebellion), Reconstruction, Jim Crow apartheid, the Great Migration and Harlem Renaissance, and the Civil Rights and Black Power Movements.

AAS 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to 15-20 students. Enrollment priority will be given to freshmen. Seminars are open to sophomores, juniors and seniors on a space available basis. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit four times.

AAS 198. Directed Group Study in African American Studies (2 or 4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing unless otherwise authorized. Completion of 90 units of undergraduate study, completion and approval of the Special Studies Form.

AAS 199. Independent Study in African American Studies (2 or 4)
Individual research and study on a particular subject related to African American studies by special arrangement with and under the direction of a faculty member. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Enrollment via the faculty director of the African American Studies Minor only.

ANTH 1. Introduction to Culture (4)
An introduction to the anthropological approach to understanding human behavior, with an examination of data from a selection of societies and cultures.

ANTH 2. Human Origins (4)
An introduction to human evolution from the perspective of physical anthropology, including evolutionary theory and the evolution of the primates, hominids, and modern humans. Emphasis is placed on evidence from fossil remains and behavioral studies of living primates. Prerequisite for upper-division biological anthropology courses.

ANTH 3. World Prehistory (4)
This course examines theories and methods used by archaeologists to investigate the origins of human culture. A variety of case studies from around the world are examined. Recommended for many upper-division archaeology courses.

ANTH 4. Words and Worlds: Introduction to the Anthropology of Language (4)
How does one’s language mutually interact with the social, cultural, and conceptual worlds one inhabits and mutually constructs with others? This course will introduce the comparative study of social life through the lens of the uniquely human capacity for language.

ANTH 5. Introduction to the Human Skeleton (4)
Introduction to the bones of your body. Learn how the skeleton supports our mode of locomotion, the differences between men and women and across populations, and how nutrition and disease can affect bones. Course examines each bone and functional area.

ANTH 20. Professional Talk: An Anthropological Approach to Language (4)
The practices of law, medicine, education, and others throughout the cultures of the world are mediated by talk: between disputants, between the healthy and the sick, or between learners and teachers. This course introduces the comparative study of language in such professional contexts.

ANTH 21. Race and Racisms (4)
Why does racism still matter? How is racism experienced in the U.S. and across the globe? With insights from the biology of human variation, archaeology, colonial history, and sociocultural anthropology, we examine how notions of race and ethnicity structure contemporary societies.

ANTH 23. Debating Multiculturalism: Race, Ethnicity, and Class in American Societies (4)
This course focuses on the debate about multiculturalism in American society. It examines the interaction of race, ethnicity, and class, historically and comparatively, and considers the problem of citizenship in relation to the growing polarization of multiple social identities.

ANTH 42. Primates in a Human-Dominated World (4)
Major primate field studies will be studied to illustrate common features of primate behavior and behavioral diversity. Topics will include communication, female hierarchies, protocultural behavior, social learning and tool use, play, cognition, and self-awareness.

ANTH 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

ANTH 101. Foundations of Social Complexity (4)
Course examines archaeological evidence for three key “tipping points” in the human career: (1) the origins of modern human social behaviors, (2) the beginnings of agriculture and village life, and (3) the emergence of cities and states. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. (Required for all majors in anthropology.)

ANTH 102. Humans Are Cultural Animals (4)
This class examines humans from a comparative perspective; if we ignore culture, what’s left? How do culture and biology interact? And how does biology inform cultural debates over race, sex, marriage, war, peace, etc.? Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANTH 103. Sociocultural Anthropology (4)
A systematic analysis of social anthropology and of the concepts and constructs required for cross-cultural and comparative study of human societies. Required for all majors in anthropology. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANTH 147. Understanding the Human Social Order: Anthropology and the Long-Term (4)
This course explores the nature of human social systems over the long term. Returning to the original project of anthropology in the broadest sense, we examine the origins and reproduction of the state, social classes, multiethnic configurations, and political economies. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANTH 187B. Intern Seminar in Ethnography and Archaeology  (2)
Seminar complements students’ research in the Academic Internship Program in ethnography and archaeology at the Museum of Man. Readings and discussions focus on problems in the analysis of material culture and classifications of artifacts and site excavations. Research paper required. Prerequisites: ANSC 124 and simultaneous enrollment in AIP 197, Ethnography Archaeology-Museum of Man. Department approval required. (P/NP grades only.)

ANTH 192. Senior Seminar in Anthropology (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in anthropology (at the upper-division level). Senior Seminars may be offered in all campus departments. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and consent of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

ANTH 195. Instructional Apprenticeship in Anthropology (4)
Course gives students experience in teaching of anthropology at the lower-division level. Students, under direction of instructor, lead discussion sections, attend lectures, review course readings, and meet regularly to prepare course materials and to evaluate examinations and papers. Course not counted toward minor or major. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor and department stamp. Received grade of A in course to be taught or equivalent. Student will need to apply for the Undergraduate Instructional Apprentice position through ASES, fulfill the Academic Senate Regulations, and receive the approval of the department, instructor, department chair, and Academic Senate.

ANTH 196A. Honors Studies in Anthropology (4)
Seminar to explore student research interests and methodologies needed to complete Honors Thesis in ANTH 196B. Students will be admitted to the Honors Program by invitation of the department in the spring of their sophomore year. Completion of this course with a grade of at least B+ is a prerequisite to ANTH 196B. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ANTH 196B. Honors Studies in Anthropology (4)
Independent preparation of a senior thesis under the supervision of a faculty member. Students begin two-quarter sequence in fall quarter. Prerequisites: completion of ANTH 196A with grade of B+ or better.

ANTH 196C. Thesis Research (4)
A weekly research seminar where students share, read, and discuss in-depth research findings resulting from ANTH 196A and 196B along with selected background literature used in each individual thesis. Students are also taught how to turn their theses into brief presentations for both specialized and broader audiences. Students will be offered opportunities to present their findings at campus events and outreach events during the quarter. Prerequisites: ANTH 196A-B.

ANTH 197. Field Studies (4)
Individually arranged field studies giving practical experience outside the university. Student may take this course twice for credit. Please note: Majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. Please contact the department for a list of courses you may take on a P/NP basis and apply toward the major or minor. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and upper-division standing with minimum GPA of 2.5, and completed and approved Special Studies form. Department approval required. (Formerly known as ANPR 197.)

ANTH 198. Directed Group Study (2–4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular departmental curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. Student may take this course twice for credit. Please note: Majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. Please contact the department for a list of courses you may take on a P/NP basis and apply toward the major or minor. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and upper-division standing with minimum GPA of 2.5, and completed and approved Special Studies form. Department approval required. (Formerly known as ANPR 198.)

ANTH 199. Independent Study (2–4)
Independent study and research under the direction of a member of the faculty. Student may take this course twice for credit. Please note: majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. Please contact the department for a list of courses you may take on a P/NP basis and apply toward the major or minor. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and upper-division standing with minimum GPA of 2.5, and completed and approved Special Studies form. Department approval required. (Formerly known as ANPR 199.)

ANAR 100. Special Topics in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
Course will vary in title and content. When offered, the current description and title is found in the current Schedule of Classes and the Department of Anthropology website. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANAR 103. Archaeology in the Holy Land (4)
The Holy Land (Israel, Jordan, Palestinian territories) represents a land bridge between Africa and Southwest Asia. Here we explore human foundations from the Paleolithic (ca. 2 million years BP) to the rise of Early Bronze Age cities (ca. 3000 BCE). Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANAR 111. Foundations of Archaeology (4)
As part of the broad discipline of anthropology, archaeology provides the long chronological record needed for investigating human and social evolution. The theories and methods used in this field are examined. (Archaeology core sequence course.) Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 112. Ancient Urbanism (4)
The origins and development of early cities in the Old and New Worlds are compared and contrasted from an archaeological anthropological perspective. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 118. Archaeology of the UC San Diego Campus (4)
Our campus houses some of the earliest human settlements in North America. This course reviews the archaeology, climate, and environment of the sites and outlines research aimed at understanding the lives of these early peoples. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANAR 119S. Archaeological Field and Lab Class (8)
The archaeological field and laboratory class will take place at Moquegua, Peru. It is an introduction to the research design of interdisciplinary projects, the technique of data collections, the methods of excavation and postexcavation lab work. Course materials fee may apply. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANAR 121A. Digital Archaeology/GIS Foundations (4)
Concerns modern archaeological data with Geographic Information Systems (GIS) and performing spatial analysis. Lectures and lab exercises—learn spatio-temporal analysis techniques with interactive online computer mapping. Hands-on skills with ArcView, GIS, and several ArcView extensions. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 125. Weapons and Warfare in the Ancient Near East (4)
Warfare has been a central part of human culture and society from earliest times, and the ample archaeological and textual materials from the ancient Near East enable us to understand the development of sociocultural and technological aspects related to warfare from late prehistoric cultures and onward. Here we present relevant issues on weapons, warfare, and related facets from the late Prehistoric, Bronze, and Iron Ages of the ancient Near East, including Egypt, the Levant, Mesopotamia, and beyond. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 138. Mesopotamia: The Emergence of Civilization (4)
This course explores in detail the rise of the world's earliest cities and states in Mesopotamia and the ancient Near East during the fourth millennium B.C. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 140: The Foundation for Social Complexity in the Near East (4)
This course critically examines the theoretical models and archaeological evidence of nascent social complexity and inequality in the Near East. The time period under consideration encompasses the shift from generalized hunting and gathering through complex hunter-gatherers to large-scale agricultural communities. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 141. Prehistory of the Holy Land (4)
Israel is a land-bridge between Africa and Asia. Course highlights the prehistory of the Levant and its interconnections from the Paleolithic to the rise of the earliest cities in anthropological perspective. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 142. The Rise and Fall of Ancient Israel (4)
The emergence and consolidation of the state in ancient Israel is explored by using archaeological data, biblical texts, and anthropological theories. The social and economic processes responsible for the rise and collapse of ancient Israel are investigated. Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 143. Archaeology, Anthropology, and the Bible (4)
The relationship between archaeological data, historical research, the Hebrew Bible, and anthropological theory are explored along with new methods and current debates in Levantine archaeology. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 144. Pharaohs, Mummies, and Pyramids: Introduction to Egyptology (4)
An introductory survey of the archaeology, history, art, and architecture of ancient Egypt that focuses on the men and women who shaped Western civilization. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and ANTH 3.

ANAR 145S. Study Abroad: Egypt of the Pharaohs (4)
Introduction to the archaeology, history, art, architecture, and hieroglyphs of ancient Egypt. Taught in the field through visits to important temples, pyramids, palaces, and museums in Egypt. Complementary to ANAR 144. Course/program fee may apply. Prerequisites: consent of instructor only.

ANAR 153. The Mysterious Maya (4)
The archaeology, anthropology, and history of the Maya civilization, which thrived in Mexico and Central America from 1000 BC, until the Spanish conquest. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 154. The Aztecs and their Ancestors (4)
Introduction to the archaeology of the ancient culture of Mexico from the early Olmec culture through the Postclassic Aztec, Tarascan, Zapotec, and Mixtec states. Agriculture; trade and exchange; political and social organization; kinship networks; religious system, ideology, and worldviews. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 155S. Study Abroad: Ancient Mesoamerica (4)
Introduction to archaeology of Mesoamerica, taught through visits to important ancient cities and museums of Mexico and Central America. Complementary to ANAR 154. Itinerary and subject will vary, so course may be taken more than once. Course/program fee may apply. Prerequisites: consent of instructor only. (Formerly known as ANRG 106.) Credit not allowed for both ANRG 106 and ANAR 155S.

ANAR 156. The Archaeology of South America (4)
This course will examine archaeological evidence for the development of societies in the South American continent. From the initial arrival of populations through to the Inca period and the arrival of the Spaniards. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 157. Early Empires of the Andes: The Middle Horizon (4)
The civilizations of Wari and Tiwanaku built the first empires of Andean South America long before the Inca. Middle Horizon (AD 500–1000) mythohistory, urbanism, state origins, art, technology, agriculture, colonization, trade, and conquest are explored using ethnohistory and archaeological sources. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANRG 127.) Credit not allowed for both ANRG 127 and ANAR 157.

ANAR 157S. Early Empires of the Andes: The Middle Horizon (4)
The civilizations of Wari and Tiwanaku built the first empires of Andean South America long before the Inca. Middle Horizon (AD 500–1000) mythohistory, urbanism, state origins, art, technology, agriculture, colonization, trade, and conquest are explored using ethnohistory and archaeological sources. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANAR 158. The Inca: Empire of the Andes (4)
The history and culture of the Inca Empire of South America and its fatal encounter with the West. Archaeological excavations, accounts from the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, and ethnographies of present-day peoples of the Andes are explored. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANAR 160. Ancient Maya: Archaeological Problems and Perspectives (4)
This course considers in detail a particular region or archaeological site within the Maya area. Content will cover primary literature on Maya archaeology, epigraphy, and art history. Course content will vary based on the specific region/site. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and ANAR 153. Graduate students wishing to enroll should have already taken ANTH 202.

ANAR 163. Evolution of Technology (4)
While not really existing outside the social order, technological systems are basic to civilization. This course examines their growth across six millennia—complex, largely indeterminate, and marked by irregular spurts of acceleration. While comparative, it concentrates on England and America. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 170. Research Design in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
This course trains students to design, implement, and conduct research in anthropological archaeology. Writing and presenting work in progress will take place in a seminar-like forum. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 180. Archaeology Workshop (4)
This course examines the ways in which archaeologists study ancient artifacts, contexts, and their distribution in time and space to interpret ancient cultures. It will cover basic techniques of collections and field research with particular concentration on the quantitative contextual, spatial, stylistic, and technological analyses of artifacts and ecofacts from ongoing UC San Diego field projects in archaeology. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ANAR 181. The Archaeology of Hunters-Gatherers (4)
Course examines current theoretical issues in the field of hunter-gatherer archaeology. Considerable emphasis is given to ethnographic and ethno-archaeological sources for understanding such topics as prehistoric hunter-gatherer adaptations, culture change, social organization, and intergroup interaction. Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 182. Origins of Agriculture and Sedentism (4)
Varying theoretical models and available archaeological evidence are examined to illuminate the socio-evolutionary transition from nomadic hunter-gathering groups to fully sedentary agricultural societies in the Old and New Worlds. Archaeology concentration course. Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 183. Chiefdoms, States, and the Emergence of Civilizations (4)
The course focuses on theoretical models for the evolution of complex societies and on archaeological evidence for the development of various pre- and protohistoric states in selected areas of the Old and New Worlds. Archaeology concentration course. Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 184. The Political Economy of Early Empires (4)
Archaeological and textual evidence for selected early empires of pre-Columbian America and the ancient Near East will be used to illuminate cross-cultural similarities and differences in the ways complex precapitalistic societies acquired, produced, exchanged, and distributed wealth. Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 185. Middle East Desert Cultural Ecology (4)
Field study in Jordan. Examines how cultural systems interact with deserts by examining technology, economic organization, kinship and religion in relation to environmental variables through time. Program fee may apply. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

ANAR 186. The Human Era: The Archaeology of the Anthropocene (4)
The course uses a comparative perspective to examine changes in how human societies organized themselves after the end of the last Ice Age across the world and the impact that those changes had on the planet’s natural environment. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANAR 190. Middle East Archaeological Field School (12)
The archaeological field school will take place in Jordan. It is an introduction to the design of research projects, the techniques of data collection, and the methods of excavation. Includes post-excavation lab work, study trips, and field journal. Program fee may apply. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANPR 190.) Credit not allowed for both ANPR 190 and ANAR 190.

ANAR 191. Advanced Cyber-Archaeology Field School (12)
Students learn advanced field methods in cyber-archaeology and excavation. Includes 3-D data capture tools and processing, digital photography, construction of research designs, cyber-infrastructure. Takes place in Jordan and/or Israel. Program fee may apply. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, for advanced students who have taken ANAR 190 or consent of instructor.

ANBI 100. Special Topics in Biological Anthropology (4)
Course usually taught by visiting faculty in biological anthropology. Course will vary in title and content. When offered, the current description and title is found in the current Scheduleof Classes and the Department of Anthropology website. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 109. Brain Mind Workshop (2)
A weekly forum for presentation and discussion of work in anthropology and cognitive neuroscience by faculty, students, and guest speakers. P/NP only. Please note: Majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 111. Advanced Principles of Human Evolution (4)
Major stages of human evolution including the fossil evidence for biological and cultural changes through time. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, ANTH 2 (or equivalent).

ANBI 112. Methods in Human Comparative Neuroscience (4)
Cytoarchitecture reveals the fundamental structural organization of the human brain and stereology extracts quantitative information in a three dimensional space. Students will learn the principles of both fields and their applications. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, ANBI 140, and consent of instructor.

ANBI 114. Methods in Primate Conservation (4)
Primate (and other vertebrate) conservation involves a variety of methods: field (e.g., population and habitat assessment), computer (e.g. population genetic models), and increasingly the web (e.g. interactive GIS and databases). Course takes problem-solving approach to learning some of these methods. Recommended preparation: ANBI 132/BIEB 176. Prerequisites: ANTH 42 or equivalent; upper-division standing.

ANBI 116. Human Sexuality in an Evolutionary Perspective (4)
This course examines how human sexuality evolved and how it is similar/dissimilar to that of other primates. The topics include the evolution of mating strategies and parenting strategies including the role of sexual selection and how hormones control these behaviors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 120. The Immortal Life of Henrietta Lacks and Other Ethical Dilemmas (4)
All human endeavors are subject to human biases. We’ll cover several issues that are subject to such biases: “race” concept; transfer of human remains to Native American tribal members; nonhuman primate testing; and use of human materials, including cell lines. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and ANTH 2.

ANBI 130. Biology of Inequality (4)
Biological and health consequences of racial and social inequalities. Psychosocial stress and measurement of health impact. Effects on disease and precursors to disease, including measures of molecular biology (e.g., epigenetics, gene expression), and biomarkers of inflammation, cardiometabolic health, and immune function. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 131. Biology and Culture of Race (4)
This course examines conceptions of race from both evolutionary and sociocultural perspectives. We will examine current patterns of human genetic variation and critically determine how these patterns map onto current and historic conceptions of race in the United States, and abroad. We will also explore the social construction of race throughout US history, the use of racial categories in biomedicine today, and consequences of racism and discrimination on health. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 132. Conservation and the Human Predicament (4)
(Same as BIEB 176.) Interdisciplinary discussion of the human predicament, biodiversity crisis, and importance of biological conservation. Examines issues from biological, cultural, historical, economic, social, political, and ethical perspectives emphasizing new approaches and new techniques for safeguarding the future of humans and other biosphere inhabitants. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, ANTH 2 or BILD 3, or consent of instructor.

ANBI 133.  Planet of the Apes: Evolution and Ecology of the Great Ape (4)
The great apes are our closest living relatives and their ecology and evolution provide insights for human evolutionary history and perhaps ideas about how to coexist with them. The course examines the natural history, behavior, ecology, and life history of each of the great apes including: orangutans, gorillas, bonobos, and chimpanzees. We will also consider conservation issues facing wild great apes, the welfare of apes in captivity, and ethical debates on ape “personhood.” Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 140. The Evolution of the Human Brain (4)
Introduction to the organization of the brain of humans and apes. Overview of the theoretical perspectives on the evolution of the primate cortex and limbic system. Exposure to contemporary techniques applied to the comparative study of the hominoid brain. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 141. The Evolution of Human Diet (4)
The genotype of our ancestors had no agriculture or animal domestication, or rudimentary technology. Our modern diet contributes to heart disease, cancers, and diabetes. This course will outline the natural diet of primates and compare it with early human diets. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 142. The Primate Skeleton (4)
This course will compare long bones, head, and torso shape in tree-living and ground-living primates. The emphasis is on correlating locomotion with bone shapes. Prerequisites: ANTH 42 and upper-division standing.

ANBI 143. The Human Skeleton (4)
Learn the bones of your body; how bone pairs differ even within the body, between men, women, ethnic groups; and how nutrition and disease affect them. Course examines each bone and its relation with other bones and muscles that allow your movements. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 144. Human Anatomy (4)
This course will introduce students to the internal structure of the human body through dissection tutorials on CD-ROM. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 145. Bioarchaeology (4)
How are skeletal remains used to reconstruct human livelihoods throughout prehistory? The effects of growth, use, and pathology on morphology and the ways that skeletal remains are understood and interpreted by contemporary schools of thought. Recommend related course in human anatomy. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 146. Stable Isotopes in Ecology (4)
The stable isotopes of carbon, nitrogen, oxygen, and hydrogen in animal tissues, plant tissues, and soils indicate aspects of diet and ecology. The course will introduce students to this approach for reconstructing paleo-diet, paleo-ecology, and paleo-climate. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 148. Not by Genes Alone: Evolution, Behavior, and Ecology (4)
The course examines various behaviors (e.g., group formation, dispersal, parenting, coalition formation) from a comparative and evolutionary perspective. Observational methodology and analytical methods will also be discussed. Attendance in lab sections is required. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 150. The Human Machine: The Skeleton Within (4)
The course will provide an introduction to bones as a tissue, to different bones in the body, and the ligaments and muscles surrounding major joints. You will learn how the skeleton, ligaments, and muscles support our mode of locomotion; the differences between male and female skeletons; and the differences across human populations. You will see how nutrition and disease can affect bones. Course examines functional areas within the body. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 159. Biological and Cultural Perspectives on Intelligence (4)
Attitudes toward other individuals (and species) are often shaped by their apparent “intelligence.” This course discusses the significance of brain size/complexity, I.Q. tests, communication in marine mammals and apes, complex behavioral tactics, and the evolution of intelligence. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, any one of the following: ANTH 2, or ANTH 42, or BILD 3, or consent of instructor.

ANBI 173. How Monkeys See the World (4)
The last divide between humans and other animals is in the area of cognition. A comparative perspective to explore recent radical reinterpretations of the cognitive abilities of different primate species, including humans and their implications for the construction of evolutionary scenarios. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 175. Paleofantasy: The Evidence for Our Early Ancestors (4)
Models of human evolution combine science and myth. This course examines methods used in reconstructions of human evolution. Models such as “man the hunter” and “woman the gatherer” are examined in light of underlying assumptions, and cultural ideals. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANBI 187A. Intern Seminar in Physical Anthropology (2)
Seminar complements students’ research in the Academic Internship Program in physical anthropology at the Museum of Man. Readings and discussions focus on anatomy, pathology, and classification and X-ray analysis of skeletal remains. Research paper required. Prerequisites: ANTH 2 (or equivalent) and 3.3 GPA, simultaneous enrollment in AIP 197, Physical Anthropology-Museum of Man. Department approval required. (P/NP grades only.)

ANBI 187C. Intern Seminar in Ethology (2)
Seminar complements students’ research in the Academic Internship Program at the San Diego Zoo Safari Park and/or Zoo. Focus on problems of analysis in observational study of animal behavior and conservation in relation to ethological studies. Research paper required. Prerequisites: ANTH 2 (or equivalent) and any of the following: ANBI 116, 148, 159, 175; BIEB 164, 165, 166, 167. Upper-division standing and minimum 3.3 GPA. Simultaneous enrollment in AIP 197, Ethology Zoo. Department approval required. (P/NP grades only.)

ANSC 100. Special Topics in Sociocultural Anthropology (4)
Course usually taught by visiting faculty in sociocultural anthropology. Course will vary in title and content. When offered, the current description and title is found in the current Schedule of Classes and the anthropology department website. (Can be taken a total of four times as topics vary.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGN 100.)

ANSC 101. Aging: Culture and Health in Late Life Human Development (4)
Examines aging as process of human development, from local and global perspectives. Focuses on the interrelationships of social, cultural, psychological, and health factors that shape the experience and well-being of aging populations. Students explore the challenges and wisdom of aging. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 102. The Anthropology of Work (4)
This course examines how work gives shape to our lives: how having a job relates to our sense of self, how it organizes our time and space, and how it affects our relationships with family and friends. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 103. Photography and Visual Culture (4)
This course considers how people in different cultures define and practice sight. We give special attention to photography, and we ask how different definitions of social relations are reflected and created in ways humans organize their visual worlds. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 105. Global Health and Inequality (4)
Why is there variation of health outcomes across the world? We will discuss health and illness in context of culture and address concerns in cross-national health variations by comparing healthcare systems in developed, underdeveloped, and developing countries. Study the role of socioeconomic and political change in determining health outcomes and examine social health determinants in contemporary global health problems: multidrug resistance to antibiotics, gender violence, human trafficking, etc. Prerequisites: Freshmen and sophomores cannot enroll without consent of the instructor.

ANSC 105S. Global Health and Inequality–Study Abroad (4)
Why is there variation of health outcomes across the world? We will discuss health and illness in context of culture and address concerns in cross-national health variations by comparing healthcare systems in developed, underdeveloped, and developing countries. Study the role of socioeconomic and political change in determining health outcomes and examine social health determinants in contemporary global health problems: multidrug resistance to antibiotics, gender violence, and human trafficking, etc. Prerequisites: ANTH 21 or ANTH 23. Students must apply to the Study Abroad Program online at anthro.ucsd.edu.

ANSC 106. Global Health: Indigenous Medicines in Latin America (4)
Drawing on medical anthropology ethnography, students will explore a variety of forms of healing among rural and urban indigenous communities. A particular focus on intercultural health will allow the students to analyze contemporary medical landscapes where patients encounter indigenous and Western medicine. Students will learn about the complexities of urban and rural indigenous healing settings and their sociopolitical significance in contexts of state biomedical interventions. Prerequisites: ANTH 21 or ANTH 23. Freshmen and sophomores cannot enroll without consent of the instructor.

ANSC 106S. Global Health: Indigenous Medicines in Latin America—Study Abroad (4)
Drawing on medical anthropology ethnography, students will explore a variety of forms of healing among rural and urban indigenous communities. A particular focus on intercultural health will allow the students to analyze contemporary medical landscapes where patients encounter indigenous and Western medicine. Students will learn about the complexities of urban and rural indigenous healing settings and their sociopolitical significance in contexts of state biomedical interventions. Prerequisites: ANTH 21 or ANTH 23. Students must apply to the Study Abroad Program online at anthro.ucsd.edu.

ANSC 107. Meaning and Symbols in Social Life (4)
This course examines anthropological work that understands human individual and collective life to consist centrally of processes of signification, or the making and shaping of meanings. Traditions considered include structuralism, symbolic anthropology, and linguistic/semiotic anthropology (applied beyond language alone). Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 108. Tourism and Global Culture (4)
This course examines structures of interaction between tourists and communities they visit. Topics addressed include authenticity, commodification, primitivism, photography, travel writing, television, stereotypes that tourists and visited peoples hold about each other, and tourism’s links to sociocultural conditions of modernity. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 109. Jokes, Monsters, and Strangers: Otherness within Cultures (4)
This course looks cross-culturally at jokes, monsters, and other actions or relations in which people make otherness central to their lives. We ask how these phenomena relate to anthropological understandings of culture as collective norms of communication and evaluation. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 111. The Chinese Heritage in Taiwan (4)
This course will provide an anthropological perspective on Chinese culture in Taiwan from its earliest settlement to the present, including distinctive Taiwanese variants of traditional Chinese marriage and family life, institutions, festivals, agricultural practices, etc. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 112. Linguistic Anthropology Workshop (2)
A weekly forum for presentation and discussion of work in linguistic anthropology by faculty, students, and guest speakers. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Note: Majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 113. Language, Style, and Youth Identities (4)
Young people draw on language as well as clothing and music to display identities in contemporary societies. We examine the relation of language to race, class, gender, and ethnicity in youth identity construction, especially in multilingual and multiracial societies. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 116. Languages of the Americas: Mayan (4)
An introduction to the languages and cultures of speakers of the Mayan family of languages, with emphasis on linguistic structures, ethnography, and the social history of the region. The course will concentrate on linguistic and ethnographic literature of a single language or sub-branch, emphasizing commonalities with the family and region as a whole. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 117GS. Language and (Multi)Culture (4)
A critical introduction to the study of cultural patterns of thought, action, and expression, in relation to language. Topics include semiotics and structuralism, cognition and categorization, universal vs. particulars, and ethnopoetics. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 118. Language and Culture (4)
An introduction to the study of cultural patterns of thought, action, and expression, in relation to language. We consider comparatively semiotics and structuralism, cognition and categorization, universals versus particulars, ideologies of stasis and change, cultural reconstruction, and ethnopoetics. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 119. Gesture, Communication, and the Body (4)
The course is an introduction to a flourishing area of research that connects linguistic communication to alternate and complementary modalities—manual gesticulation, the face, the body, and aspects of the “lived environment” (spaces, tools, artifacts). Prerequisites: upper-division standing. (Credit not allowed for both ANSC 119GS and ANSC 119.)

ANSC 119GS. Gesture, Communication, and the Body (4)
A critical examination of research connecting language to alternate complementary modalities—the hands, face, body, and aspects of "lived environments" (spaces, tools, artifacts). Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. Students must apply and be accepted to the Global Seminar Program.

ANSC 120. Anthropology of Religion (4)
Explores religious life in various cultures. Topics addressed include the problem of religious meaning, psychocultural aspects of religious experience, religious conversion and revitalization, contrasts between traditional and world religions, religion and social change. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 121. Psychological Anthropology (4)
Interrelationships of aspects of individual personality and various aspects of sociocultural systems are considered. Relations of sociocultural contexts to motives, values, cognition, personal adjustment, stress and pathology, and qualities of personal experience are emphasized. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 122. Language in Society (4)
After a brief introduction to linguistic concepts, the course covers the relations between culture and language, how languages reflect culture, how languages change, language and social life, language and political policy. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 123. Political Anthropology (4)
Humans are goal seekers, some with public goals. Course considers ways goals are pursued, which are desirable, and how this pursuit is carried out at the local level with attention to the parts played by legitimacy and coercion. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 124. Cultural Anthropology (4)
This course introduces the concept of culture and the debates surrounding it. Cultural anthropology asks how people create meaning and order in society, how culture intersects with power, and how national and global forces impact local meanings and practices. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 125. Gender, Sexuality, and Society (4)
How are gender and sexuality shaped by cultural ideologies, social institutions, and social change? We explore their connections to such dimensions of society as kinship and family, the state, religion, and popular culture. We also examine alternative genders/sexualities cross-culturally. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 126. Childhood and Adolescence (4)
This course examines the diversity of practices of child-rearing, socialization, and enculturation across cultures, and the role of culture in the development of personality, morality, spirituality, sexuality, emotion, and cognition. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 127. Discourse, Interaction, and Social Life (4)
The course considers how social life is constituted and negotiated through language and interaction. How do people establish, maintain, and alter social relationships through face-to-face talk, and how do different modalities of interaction (including discourse and gesture) affect social life? Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 128. Culture and Emotion (4)
This course examines the diversity of emotional experience in human societies and the contribution of the study of emotion to understanding culture and human nature. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 129. Meaning and Healing (4)
This course examines the nature of healing across cultures, with special emphasis on religious and ritual healing. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 130. Hinduism (4)
An anthropological introduction to Hinduism, focusing on basic religious concepts and practices. Topics include myth, ritual, and symbolism; forms of worship; gods and goddesses; the roles of priest and renouncer; pilgrimages and festivals; the life cycle; popular Hinduism, Tantrism. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 131. Language, Law, and Social Justice (4)
Legal systems are central in (re)organizing social institutions, international arrangements, (in)equalities, and are an arena where linguistic practices predominate and define outcomes. With an anthropological approach to language, examine languages of the law, legal conceptions of language, and most importantly, the nature and structure of talk in a range of legal institutions and activities. Students will engage in direct anthropological fieldwork in local contexts involving the legal bureaucracy. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 133. Peoples and Cultures of the Middle East (4)
This course explores the living structures, family and gender relations, economy, and religion in the Middle East. We will especially focus on how people come to terms with recent transformations such as nationalism, literacy, globalism, and Islamism. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 134. Global Islam (4)
Course aims to understand the diverse ways in which Muslims give meaning to their religion and use it as a framework to understand the world. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 135. Indigenous Peoples of Latin America (4)
Indigenous peoples in the Americas have long been dominated and exploited. They have also resisted and reworked the powerful forces affecting them. This course will trace this centuries-long contestation, focusing on ways anthropological representations have affected those struggles. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 136. Traditional Chinese Society (4)
Course examines major institutions and culture patterns of traditional China, especially as studied through ethnographic sources. Topics include familism, religion, agriculture, social mobility, and personality. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 137. Chinese Popular Religion (4)
The religious world of ordinary precommunist times, with some reference to major Chinese religious traditions. Recommended preparation: background in premodern Chinese history. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 138. The Cultural Design Practicum: Using Anthropology to Solve Human Problems (4)
Explores anthropological approaches to finding solutions to human problems. Using cultural analysis and ethnographic approaches, students conduct supervised field projects to assess real-world problems and then design, evaluate, and communicate possible solutions. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 140. Human Rights II: Contemporary Issues (4)
(Same as HMNR 101.) Interdisciplinary discussion that outlines the structure and functioning of the contemporary human rights regime, and then delves into the relationship between selected human rights protections—against genocide, torture, enslavement, political persecution, etc.—and their violation, from the early Cold War to the present. Prerequisites: CAT1 or CAT2 or CAT3 or CAT125 or DOC1 or DOC2 or DOC3 or HUM1 or HUM2 or HUM3 or HUM4 or HUM5 or MCWP40 or MCWP41 or MCWP50 or MCWP125 or MMW11 or MMW12 or MMW13 or MMW14 or MMW15 or MMW21 or MMW22 or WCWP10A or WCWP10B.

ANSC 141. Language, Politics, and Identity (4)
This course explores the interrelationships of language, politics, and identity in the United States: the ways that language mediates politics and identity, the ways that the connection between identity and language is inherently political, and the ways that political language inevitably draws on identity in both subtle and explicit ways. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 142. Anthropology of Latin America (4)
This course will examine the overarching legacies of colonialism, the persistence of indigenous peoples and cultures, the importance of class and land reform, the effects of neoliberalism, and citizens’ efforts to promote social change in contemporary democracies. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 143. Mental Health as Global Health Priority (4)
Why is mental health a global concern? This anthropological course reviews globalization, culture, and mental health. We examine issues of social suffering, stigma, and economic burden associated with mental illness, gender inequality, political violence, "global security," pharmaceutical and illegal drugs. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 144. Immigrant and Refugee Health (4)
Examines physical and mental health sequaelae of internal and transnational movement of individuals and populations due to warfare, political violence, natural disaster, religious persecution, poverty and struggle for economic survival, and social suffering of communities abandoned by migrants and refugees. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 145. Indigenous Peoples of North America (4)
This course addresses: 1) Diversity among traditional Native American cultures with respect to social organization, religion, environmental adaptation, subsistence, and reaction to colonial conquest and domination; and, 2) Contemporary social issues including tribal sovereignty, religious freedom, health, education, gambling, and repatriation of artifacts/remains. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 146. A Global Health Perspective on HIV (4)
An introductory course on HIV taught through a medical student format, with emphasis on research and experiential learning, including observation of physicians providing care for patients from diverse socioeconomic and cultural backgrounds, some of whom may be underinsured/uninsured, homeless, and/or immigrants. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 147. Global Health and the Environment (4)
Examines interactions of culture, health, and environment. Rural and urban human ecologies, their energy foundations, sociocultural systems, and characteristic health and environmental problems are explored. The role of culture and human values in designing solutions will be investigated. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 148. Global Health and Cultural Diversity (4)
Introduction to global health from the perspective of medical anthropology on disease and illness, cultural conceptions of health, doctor-patient interaction, illness experience, medical science and technology, mental health, infectious disease, and health-care inequalities by ethnicity, gender, and socioeconomic status. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 150. Culture and Mental Health (4)
This course reviews mental health cross-culturally and transnationally. Issues examined are cultural shaping of the interpretation, experience, symptoms, treatment, course, and recovery of mental illness. World Health Organization findings of better outcome in non-European and North American countries are explored. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 151. U.S.-Mexico Border Ethnographies (4)
This course examines ethnographies of the US-Mexican borderlands to understand how the binational relationship shapes social life on both sides of the border. Topics discussed will include the maquiladora industry, drug trafficking, militarization, migration, tourism, missionary work, feminicide, and prostitution. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 152. Political Correctness (4)
This course will focus on the way subjective experience is transformed in situations related to rapid social change and how cultural creativity is reconfigured in a way that generates a family of phenomena of which political correctness is a prime example. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 154. Gender and Religion (4)
How and why is gender important to religious practices, doctrines, and ideologies? Focusing on modern Islam, Christianity, and Judaism, we will look at women's involvement in religious movements as well as religious debates over issues of gender, sexuality, and marriage. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 155. Humanitarian Aid: What Is It Good For? (4)
This course examines the intended and unintended consequences of humanitarian aid. How do organizations negotiate principles of equality with the reality of limited resources? What role does medicine play in aid efforts? In spaces where multiple vulnerabilities coexist, how do we decide whom we should help first? While the need for aid, charity, and giving in the face of suffering is often taken as a commonsensical good, this course reveals the complexities underpinning humanitarian aid. Prerequisites: ANTH 101, ANSC 123, ANSC 148, and upper-division standing.

ANSC 156. Mad Films: Cultural Studies of Mental Illness in Cinema (4)
This course examines historical and cultural dimensions of madness as depicted in iconic and popular films such as “One Flew Over the Cuckoo’s Nest,” “Girl Interrupted,” “Silver Linings Playbook,” along with ethnographic and artistic films that utilize anthropological approaches. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 157. Imagining City and Community in Modern Europe (4)
The peoples of Europe are in a process of social and political integration with global implications. This course will introduce students to the anthropological study of Europe by considering the social experience, and the built environment, of the European city. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 158. Comparative Anthropology of Crisis (4)
Starting at the crisis of 2008, but with beginnings in the early 1980s, the theme of this course is the dynamic mechanisms that lead to crisis, systemic and otherwise. It will deal with historical and archaeological discussions of particular cases of breakdowns, collapses, and transformations. It also deals extensively with crisis misrecognition and its causes from moral dramas, witchcraft epidemics, intimate violence, overt conflict, ethnicity, etc. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 159. The Anthropology of Marriage (4)
What can we learn by looking at a society's ideas about marriage, intimate relationships, and family? Why do these “private” institutions draw so much public scrutiny and debate? How are they linked to concepts of national progress, individualism, religion, status, or morality? We will explore these questions in Western and non-Western contexts through such topics as polygamy, same-sex marriage, transnational marriage, and the global impact of Western ideas of love and companionate marriage. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 160. Nature, Culture, and Environmentalism (4)
Course examines theories concerning the relation of nature and culture. Particular attention is paid to explanations of differing ways cultures conceptualize nature. Along with examples from non-Western societies, the course examines the Western environmental ideas embedded in contemporary environmentalism. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 162. Language, Identity, and Community (4)
This course examines the use of language difference in negotiating identity in bilingual and bidialectal communities, and in structuring interethnic relations. It addresses social tensions around language variation and the social significance of language choices in several societies. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 163. Culture and Communication in Education (4)
The ways in which language and culture influence educational goals and processes. Cultural and sociolinguistic explanations of school successes and failures are examined. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 164. Introduction to Medical Anthropology (4)
Basic concepts and theory of medical anthropology are introduced and applied to comparison of medical systems including indigenous and biomedical, taking into account cross-cultural variation in causal explanation, diagnosis, perception, management, and treatment of illness and disease. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 165. Contemporary South Asia (4)
This course explores contemporary cultural life in South Asia by examining selected works of literature, film, and ethnography. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 166. Film and Culture in Asia (4)
Explores films from China, India, Japan and other Asian countries. Popular, documentary, and ethnographic films are examined for what they reveal about family life, gender, politics, religion, social change and everyday experience in South Asia. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 167. Rituals and Celebrations (4)
Explores the nature and significance of ritual. The course will examine religious rituals, civic festivals, and popular celebrations. Topics include ritual symbolism, social and psychological aspects of ritual, life cycle rites, urban festivals, ritual theory. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 168. The Human Condition (4)
This course explores experiences of the human life cycle—birth, death, love, family relations, coming of age, suffering, the quest for identity, the need for meaning—from diverse cultural perspectives. Examines anthropological thought concerning what it means to be human. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 169. Culture and Environment: Research Seminar and Practicum (4)
Examines the role of culture in the way people perceive and interact with the natural environment. Combines reading of select anthropological studies with training in ethnographic research methods. Students develop a research project and analyze data. Limit: fifteen students. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 170. Modernity and Human Experience (4)
What is modernity? How does it shape human experience? Using selected works of art, film, literature, anthropology, philosophy and social theory, the course explores conceptions of self, identity, and culture that characterize modernity. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 171. Multimodal Methods in Ethnography (4)
Examines methods for employing iconic recording techniques into ethnographic field research, with an emphasis on digital audio and video recording technologies and analysis. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 172. Life-History Seminar and Practicum (4)
Examines life-history research as a method for understanding the cultural and psychological experience of people. Combines reading of life-histories with training in life-history research methods. Students develop a life-history project, conduct interviews, and analyze data. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 173. Ethnography in Practice (4)
This practicum course will explore anthropology's traditional methodology, ethnography, through texts, films, and literature, and give students practical experience through a quarter-long case study. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 174. Sex and Money: The Anthropology of Sex Work (4)
This course examines ideologies surrounding intersections of sex and money as well as ethnographies of sex workers in diverse contexts throughout the world. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ANSC 175. Money, Work, and Nature: The Anthropology of Capitalism (4)
Chart a new kind of economic anthropology focused on the current trajectory of capitalism, including its changing margins and centers, across varied contexts and scales worldwide. Introduction to new economic anthropology of capitalism and situates it within the historical development of the field since the late nineteenth century. Focuses on new research into money, finances, and digital communication as well as the growing body of scholarship on material concerns of water, energy, food, and shelter. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 176. Critical Military Studies (4)
Examines interdisciplinary field of Critical Military Studies (CMS), led by sociocultural anthropologist research on aspects of militarism and on specific military forces in varied geographical and historical context. Focuses on changing strategies and doctrines into specific forms of military practice in regards to the way past conflicts inform current approaches and tactics. Also looks at field research conducted by social scientists on behalf of the US military, drawing on local experts in San Diego. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 177. Step Into Anthrohistory: The Past and Its Hold on the Future (4)
Course aims to explore the ways in which historicity can be turned to a critical field of inquiry and reflection. Shows how the past isn't something that “has happened,” but that actively lingers and invades the present, both inviting and constraining possible futures. Challenges the assumptions and practices of each modern discipline, affecting key concepts, methods, modes of analysis, and narrative forms that both anthropologists and historians have used. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 178. Brain, Mind, Culture, and History (4)
Students will learn firsthand a new transdisciplinary effort to understand the intersection of individual and society at all levels of analysis. This course introduces students to a remarkable convergence led by transdisciplinary scholars at UC San Diego (anthropology, cognitive science, psychology, history, philosophy, the arts, etc.), based on the recognition that individual neurological, cognitive, emotional, and behavioral capacities are reciprocally related to aggregate social, cultural, and historical processes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 179. The New Economic Anthropology: Producing, Consuming, and Exchanging Stuff Worldwide (4)
This course introduces students to the field of economic anthropology and situates it within the historical development of the discipline since the late nineteenth century. In particular, this course focuses on new research into money, finance, and digital communication as well as the growing body of scholarship on the material concerns of water, energy, and shelter. We also address capitalism's limits and alternatives. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 180. Labor’s Relations (4)
This course examines how work gives shape to our lives: how having a job relates to our sense of self, our gender, our racial identity, how it organizes our time and space, and how it affects our relationships with family and friends. Credit is not allowed for both ANSC 180 and CGS 180. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 181. Animal Affairs (4)
We humans are animals. How do our relations with other animals—how we rely on them, how we struggle against them, how we live among them—shape our own worlds? In this course, we examine, through ethnography and speculative fiction, the boundary between human and other animals. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANSC 189. The Anthropology of the End of the World: Millenarian Movements Across Cultures (4)
Course focuses on historical and contemporary millenarian movements in the Western and non-Western world. Topics addressed include origins, role of prophets, conceptions of time, relation to politics, and influence on social change. Examples include Christian and non-Christian movements. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ANTH 201. Special Topics in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
Course usually taught by visiting faculty in anthropological archaeology. Course will vary in title and content. When offered, the current description and title is found in the current Schedule of Classes on TritonLink, and the Department of Anthropology website. (Can be taken a total of four times as topics vary.) (Formerly known as ANGR 201.)

ANTH 202. Olmec and Maya Archaeology (4)
Course examines the birth of Olmec and Maya civilizations in the Formative period, the rise of city states during the Early Classic, the decline of the Classic Maya, and the resurgence of the Postclassic period. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 202.)

ANTH 204. Contemporary Anthropology (4)
This course, intended for first-year anthropology graduate students, examines the contemporary practice of anthropology. We discuss the construction of a multiple-year research project including how to differentiate theory and evidence, the contours of anthropological interest, the question of audience, and rhetorical style. We analyze nine recent ethnographies as possible models for our own practice. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 206. Race, Ethnicity, and Citizenship (4)
This graduate seminar examines how racial and ethnic categories are constructed, how contemporary societies manage difference through multicultural policies, and how discourses and institutions of citizenship can act as sites of contestation over inclusion and exclusion. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 207. Eastern Mediterranean Archaeology—New Perspectives (4)
This graduate seminar examines the archaeology of the Eastern Mediterranean world from the Neolithic through Ottoman times. The seminar is thematically organized examining current methods and theories that apply to state-of-the-art research in one of the "foundational" culture-historical regions in the world. Topics may include: archaeometry, archaeometallurgy, colonization, dating methods, settlement patterns and survey methodology, paleoclimate reconstruction, and geoarchaeology. Students may not receive credit for HIGR 234 and ANTH 207. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 210. Religion and Globalization (4)
Examines the worldwide resurgence of religion in the context of migration, missionization, the media, postcolonialism, and personal mobility in contemporary global culture. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 211. Psychoanalysis and Religion (4)
With special attention to the relationship between theory and data, this course deals with psychoanalytic approaches to the study of religion through a close examination of key ethnographic and historical studies of religious systems and experience. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 212. Advanced Topics in Biological Anthropology (4)
A critical exploration of timely and/or controversial topics in biological anthropology. Course will vary in title and content. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 212.)

ANTH 213. Anthropology and Mental Health (4)
This seminar examines intersection of anthropology and psychiatry. Topics include cultural conceptions and social determinants of anxiety, depression, trauma, and psychosis, corporeal experience and manifestation of illness, transnational variation in course and outcome, global circulation of psychiatric knowledge/practice and pharmaceuticals. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 214. Kin, Land, and Labor-Cultivating Relations (4)
This seminar considers three major tropes for cultivating human relations—being together, living together, and working together. In examining recent inquiries into kinship, environment, and labor, we explore each of these tropes as concrete channels of human relation along which such qualities as love, attachment, stigma, and threat might travel. How do people consider themselves related, and what are the potentials of those relations? Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 215. Advanced Topics in Sociocultural Anthropology (4)
A critical exploration of timely and/or controversial topics in sociocultural anthropology. Course will vary in title and content. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 216. Global Pentecostalism (4)
Pentecostal and charismatic Christianity have recently expanded around the globe. This course explores the cultural and social processes facilitating their spread and examines how these kinds of Christianity shape social life, politics, gender relations, and economic practices in convert societies. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 217. Materiality (4)
The opposition between materiality and ideology structures our practice as social scientists and as neoliberal citizens. This course explores the underpinnings of this division, its current manifestations, and attempts to trouble it analytically, methodologically, and politically. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 218. Anthropology of the State and Governance (4)
This seminar deals with recent developments in the anthropology of the political: contemporary forms of power and governance; the formation of the subject; imperial regimes and colonial/postcolonial orders; “governmentality”; global process and the contemporary transformations of the state and governance. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 219. Seminar in Political Anthropology (4)
The focus here is “politics,” broadly constructed, in various societies. Analysis is from the perspective of the recourses deployed by all involved, including but not limited to power, with emphasis on the role of culture and social structure. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 219.)

ANTH 220. The Human Body in Discourse and Experience (4)
This is an interdisciplinary seminar examining the place of the body and embodiment in contemporary culture and culture theory. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 221. Phenomenology of Perception (4)
This seminar will focus on a close and intensive reading of Maurice Merleau-Ponty’s masterwork, The Phenomenology of Perception. Emphasis will be placed on the relevance of this work for theory, method, and practice in the social sciences. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 222. Anthropological Studies of Subjectivity (4)
The study of subjectivity has emerged as an anthropological focal point for theorizing the interconnections among culture, experience, and power. This seminar explores the shaping of the lived experience and structures of knowledge that reciprocally produce forms of subjectivity. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 223. Anthropological Interviewing (4)
The course teaches techniques of long-term, intensive interviewing in fieldwork settings with an emphasis on psychodynamic inference and its usefulness in different cultural settings. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 223.)

ANTH 224. Advanced Topics in the Anthropology of Gender (4)
A critical analysis of ethnographic and theoretical texts focusing on the sociocultural study of gender. We will also draw on studies of gender and feminist theory from other disciplines (e.g., history, philosophy) to illuminate issues relevant to anthropology. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 224.)

ANTH 226. Ethnography of Christianity (4)
Directed to graduate students planning ethnographic work in Christian societies, this course explores variations in the interpretation and expression of Christianity using historical and ethnographic sources. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 226.)

ANTH 229. Religion and Healing (4)
This seminar is an in-depth analysis of cultural meaning, personal experience, and therapeutic process in ritual healing, emphasizing performative/persuasive aspects of the relation between religion and health in comparative, cross-cultural perspective. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 230. Department Colloquium (1)
A forum to present work by faculty, students, and guests. Course will be offered quarterly. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (S/U grades only.) (Formerly known as ANGR 230.)

ANTH 232. Labor and Semiotics (4)
Indexing a social identity is an achievement; it takes work. But what kind? This course examines Peircean semiotics as a theory of labor, putting it into conversation with traditional Marxist and practice-based conceptualizations of labor. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 233. Critical Studies of Capitalism (4)
This seminar takes up Marx's varied critiques of capitalist forms, categories, doctrines, practices, and tendencies and brings them to bear on contemporary conditions. In particular, the seminar examines what may be understood as Marx's ontology, epistemology, and ethico-political stance. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 234. Dynamics of Culture (4)
Examination of the actual operation of culture with attention to the importance of cultural products and social structures. Course goal is to develop skill in understanding the influence, direct and indirect, of culture and behavior. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 234.)

ANTH 239. Contemporary Religious Movements (4)
Recent decades have witnessed the dramatic rise of religious movements worldwide, posing challenges to secular models of modernity. We will study the sociocultural and political implications of this phenomenon comparatively, focusing especially on new forms of Islamic and Christian practice. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 240. Culture and Politics in Southeast Asia (4)
This seminar will focus on classic and contemporary studies of Southeast Asia, concentrating on Thailand, Indonesia, and the Philippines. Particular attention will be paid to the impact of the state and global forces on Southeast Asian cultural and social dynamics. Formerly known as ANGR 240. Students may not receive credit for both ANGR 240 and ANTH 240. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ANTH 242. Anthropology of Latin America (4)
This course will examine the overarching legacies of colonialism, the persistence of indigenous peoples and cultures, the importance of class and land reform, the effects of neoliberalism, and citizens' efforts to promote social change in contemporary democracies. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 243. Mental Health as Global Health Priority (4)
Why is mental health a global concern? This anthropological course reviews globalization, culture, and mental health. We examine issues of social suffering, stigma, and economic burden associated with mental illness, gender inequality, political violence, "global security," pharmaceutical and illegal drugs. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 244. Andean Prehistory: Origins of Chiefdoms and States (4)
This seminar examines the prehistory of the Andean region from the peopling of the New World through the formation of Archaic, Preceramic, and Initial periods; the Chavin Horizon; and the Nasca and Moche States of the Early Intermediate Period. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 245. The Middle Horizon (4)
This seminar compares the distinct urban and expansive state phenomenae of the highland Wari and Tiwanaku cultures (AD 500–1000) with emphasis on their formative origins and the ideological, agrarian, and technological foundations of Middle Horizon political development. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 246. The Inca and the Late Horizon (4)
This seminar considers the ethnohistory, ethnography, and archaeology of the Inca Empire Tawantinsuyu, with emphasis on the economic, social, and ideological foundations of the Cusco Inca state and the dynamics of Inca imperial expansion throughout Andean South America. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 247. Multimodal Interaction (4)
Human society evolved in the context of face-to-face interaction. The course will examine methods and theoretical approaches to different modalities of interaction—especially speech, gesture, and gaze—their mutual integration, and their relevance to ethnography. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology or consent of instructor.

ANTH 248. Global Health and Cultural Diversity (4)
This seminar investigates global health from the perspective of medical anthropology on disease and illness; cultural conceptions of health; doctor-patient interaction; illness experience; medical science and technology; mental health; infectious disease; and health-care inequalities by ethnicity, gender, and socioeconomic status. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 249. Gender and Mental Health (4)
This course examines gender and mental health by considering social, cultural, and biological explanations for problems such as depression, trauma, anxiety, drugs/alcohol use. Cross-cultural similarities and differences of gender are considered with respect to etiology, epidemiology, symptomatology, treatment, and recovery. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 250. The Anthropology of Human Rights (4)
This graduate seminar will explore the theories and critiques of the contemporary human rights framework, through history and ethnography. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 251. The Ethnography of Modernity (4)
How is the idea of modernity experienced in diverse cultural and historical settings? This seminar focuses on ethnographic representations of modernity, exploring such topics as globalization, mass media, consumerism, gender and modernity, modern religious movements, and theories of modernity. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ANTH 252. Interrogating Neoliberalism (4)
This seminar will consider the theoretical constructions and deployments of neoliberalism, which has produced an assemblage of capitalist restructuring, transformed governance, and newly produced subjectivities. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 253. Who Cares? Sympathy and the Conduct of Liberalism (4)
This course pulls on classical Western social theory as well as recent ethnographies to examine the role of sympathetic engagement in liberal governance. We also interrogate the role anthropology has played as liberalism's witness in this regard. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 254. Dissertation Practicum (4)
Students writing their dissertations present work-in-progress and receive structured peer and mentor feedback. Supervising or coparticipating faculty lead workshops about doctoral completion, publication, and other professionalization processes. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit six times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 255. Understanding the Human Social Order (4)
This course explores the nature of human social systems over the long term. Returning to the original project of anthropology in the broadest sense, we examine the origins and reproduction of the state, social classes, multiethnic configurations, and political economies. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 256. Seminar on Brain Evolution (4)
We will review the neural basis of cognition in humans and other primates. Neurobiological findings will be related to contributions from various subfields of anthropology. Brain/mind associations will be explored in the context of hominid evolution. Prerequisites: graduate student in anthropology or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 256.)

ANTH 257. Mind, Self, and Identity (4)
This seminar critically examines social, cultural, and psychological theories of the person, and their relationship to conceptions of the person found in moral political and religious discourses. It explores the role of concepts of the person in ethnographic research. Formerly known as ANGR 257. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology.

ANTH 258. Analytical Methods in Archaeology (4)
Specialized scientific techniques are increasingly important to archaeology. This seminar examines chronometric date techniques, site-formation processes, and geoarchaeology and pedology, chemical analyses of soils, zooarchaeology, palaeoethnobotany, and how land-use strategies can be inferred from archaeological remains. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 258.)

ANTH 259. Gender and Mental Health (4)
This seminar in psychological/psychiatric anthropology takes a comparative approach to the study of gender and mental health. Culture and feminist theory is employed to address questions of gender in relation to various problems, such as depression, anxiety, and eating disorders. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 260. Seminar in Medical and Psychological Anthropology (4)
This seminar examines medical, psychological, and psychiatric anthropology through reading, discussion, and presentation of work 1) essential to the development of and 2) exemplifying the state of the art in these related fields. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 261. Audio and Video Methods in Ethnography (4)
A seminar exploration, both theoretical and practical, of iconic recording tools in ethnography, focusing on graphic images, photography, and audio and video recording in both natural and semiexperimental settings, with special critical attention to epistemological and theoretical bases of ethnographic representations. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology (AN 75, AN 77) or consent of instructor.

ANTH 262. New Directions in Culture, Politics, and History (4)
Anthropology has long analyzed the relations between culture, economics, and politics. This seminar will examine these issues through ethnographic and historical accounts, engaging contemporary theory and debates. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 274. Debates in Anthropology (4)
This seminar will review a series of current or recent significant debates in anthropology. The debates will be examined in the light of their substantive, theoretical, and epistemological implications, with some attention to the rhetorical elements of the arguments themselves. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology. (Formerly known as ANGR 274.)

ANTH 279. Special Topics in Language and Society (4)
Selected topics in the anthropology of language, such as linguistic ideology, language and identity, multilingualism, discourse analysis. Topics will vary from year to year, and the course may be repeated with instructor’s permission. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 279.)

ANTH 280A. Core Seminar in Social Anthropology (4)
Core seminar focuses on individual action and social institutions. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 280A.)

ANTH 280B. Core Seminar in Cultural Anthropology (4)
Core seminar focuses on personal consciousness and cultural experience. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 280B.)

ANTH 280C. Core Seminar in Psychological Anthropology (4)
Core seminar focuses on motives, values, cognition, and qualities of personal experience. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 280C.)

ANTH 280D. Core Seminar in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
Seminar focuses on the development of archaeological theory. Required of archaeological and biological anthropology graduate students, sociocultural students may take this course to fulfill core distribution requirement. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 280D.)

ANTH 280E. Core Seminar in Biological Anthropology (4)
This seminar will examine the central problems and concepts of biological anthropology, laying the foundation for first-year graduate students in Biological Anthropology as well as providing an overview of the field for graduate students in other areas of anthropology. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 280E.)

ANTH 280F. Core Seminar in Linguistic Anthropology (4)
Examines the theoretical and methodological foundations and principal research questions of linguistic anthropology, providing the fundamentals for graduate study in this area. Required for students specializing in linguistic anthropology and open to other students. Course formerly numbered as ANTH 263. Students will not receive credit for both ANTH 263 and ANTH 280F. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 281A. Introductory Seminar (1)
These seminars are held in the first two quarters of the first year of graduate study. Faculty members will present an account of their current research and interests. When appropriate a short preliminary reading list will be given for the particular lecture. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: first-year graduate standing in anthropology.

ANTH 281B. Introductory Seminar (1)
Continuation of seminars held in the first two quarters of the first year of graduate study. Faculty members will present an account of their current research and interests. When appropriate a short preliminary reading list will be given for the particular lecture. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: first-year graduate standing in anthropology.

ANTH 283A. Fieldwork Seminar (4)
A seminar given to acquaint students with the techniques and problems of fieldwork. Students carry out ethnographic field research in a local community group under faculty supervision. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 283A.)

ANTH 284. Master Writing Practicum (4)
This workshop is designed for second year students writing their MA theses. It includes study of thesis and article writing styles, standards of documentation, and argumentation. Students will be expected to share their work with each other. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 285. Grants Writing Practicum (4)
This workshop is designed for third and fourth year students writing grant proposals for dissertation research. Students will learn grant writing, research methods, ethics, and budgets. Students will be expected to share their work with each other. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ANTH 286. Topics in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
Seminar examines the central problems and concepts of archaeological anthropology, laying the foundation for first-year graduate students. Also provides an overview of the field in other areas of archaeology. Entire anthropological archaeology faculty and graduate students participate. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 286.)

ANTH 288. Archaeology Practicum (12)
Field and laboratory training for graduate students in archaeology. Students will design and implement archaeological fieldwork or analyze data collected in the field. Prerequisites: consent of the instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 288.)

ANTH 289S. Tanzania Anthropogeny Study Tour (1–4)
Graduate students will visit key sites representing the three major approaches to studying human origins: fossils evidence, comparison with nonhumans, and study of human foragers. Visits will be combined with lectures, discussion, and brief training in conducting relevant field research. Prerequisites: graduate standing; department authorization required.

ANTH 291. Archaeology of Highland Mexico (4)
Survey of Mesoamerican archaeology focusing on highland Mexico. Topics covered: settling of Mesoamerica, agricultural origins, development of social complexity, rise of cities, emergence of large-scale states. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 291.)

ANTH 292. Social Evolution/Iron Age Levant (4)
The Iron Age (ca. 1200–586 BCE) represents the rise of small secondary states throughout the southern Levant. Seminar explores these archaic states through ideology, technology, subsistence, trade and social organization based on archaeological data, historical texts, and anthropological models. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 292.)

ANTH 293. Primate Socioecology (4)
Course examines theories for the causes of sociality in primates. Implications for our understanding of human evolution are considered. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANGR 293.)

ANTH 295. Master’s Thesis Preparation (1–12)
The student will work on the master’s thesis under the direction of the departmental committee chair. The course will be taken in the student’s second year. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate student in anthropology and consent of master’s thesis chair. (Formerly known as ANGR 295.)

ANTH 296. Dissertation Fieldwork Proposal Preparation (4)
The student will work in cooperation with his or her departmental committee to develop a research proposal for the doctoral research project. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing in anthropology and consent of departmental committee chair. (Formerly known as ANGR 296A/296B.)

ANTH 297. Research Practicum (1–4)
Supervised advanced research studies with individual topics to be selected according to the student’s special interests. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: for anthropology graduate students who have returned from their field research.

ANTH 298. Independent Study (1–4)
Supervised study of individually selected anthropological topics under the direction of a member of the faculty. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Formerly known as ANGR 298.)

ANTH 299. Dissertation Research (1–12)
S/U grades only. Prerequisites: PhD candidacy in anthropology. (Formerly known as ANGR 299.)

ANTH 500. Apprentice Teaching (4)
Anthropology graduate students participate in the undergraduate teaching program during one quarter anytime in the first four years of residence. Teaching may be in the anthropology department or other departments or programs on campus. Equivalent to duties expected of a 50 percent TA. Enrollment in four units documents the PhD requirement. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate student in anthropology. (Formerly known as ANGR 500.)

AUD 236. Preceptorship in Neuro-Otology (2)
Observations in UC San Diego Otology clinic. Learn about procedures for taking histories and performing clinical examinations, patient treatment, and patient education from otologists. Prerequisites: second-year AuD student or consent of instructor.

AUD 255. Anatomy and Physiology of the Auditory and Vestibular Systems (4)
Detailed anatomy of the auditory and vestibular systems, including the ultra-structure, histology, and neuronal connections of the systems. In addition, physiological responses that underlie the actions of each system are described, from the cellular to the systems levels. Prerequisites: second-year AuD student or consent of instructor.

AUD 256. Pathophysiology of the Auditory and Vestibular Systems (4)
Physiological and anatomical substrates of auditory and vestibular disorders including influences of neurological disorders. Topics include peripheral and central disorders, congenital disorders due to infections, as well as acquired ototoxic, noise-induced, infective, autoimmune, age-associated disorders, and traumatic disorders. Prerequisites: AUD 255 or consent of instructor.

AUD 257. Ear Diseases and Treatment (3)
Differential diagnosis and treatment of auditory and vestibular disorders, audiological components of neuro-otology, as well as interactions between the audiologist and neuro-otologist in a clinical setting. Prerequisites: second-year AuD student or consent of instructor.

AUD 263. Physiological and Behavioral Tests of Vestibular Function (4)
Clinical evaluation of vestibular function, using techniques such as caloric and rotational electronystagmography and posturography. The interpretation of clinical findings and implications for rehabilitative strategies will be covered. The course will include observation of testing in otology clinic settings. Prerequisites: second-year AuD student or consent of instructor.

AUD 264. Auditory and Vestibular Development and Genetics (3)
Embryology and functional development of the auditory and vestibular systems, from their initial appearance to adult function. Inherited disorders of these two sensory systems are also addressed, including phenotypic description and genetic basis. Genetic counseling and the potential for gene therapy are also discussed. Prerequisites: second- or third-year AuD student or consent of instructor.

AUD 270. Newborn Hearing Screening and Management (3)
This course describes procedures and requirements for newborn hearing screening, and the detection and clinical management of congenital auditory disorders. Observations of newborn screening in a neonatal ICU environment. Prerequisites: second- or third-year AuD student or consent of instructor.

AUD 271. Temporal Bone Anatomy (3)
Detailed anatomy of the temporal bone, cranial nerves and basic neurophysiology for audiologists. Radiographic and magnetic resonance imaging of the temporal bone will be discussed. Prerequisites: second- or third-year AuD student or consent of instructor.

AUD 272. Central Auditory Processing Assessment and Management (4)
Central auditory processing assessment and management for pediatrics and adults. Focus on behavioral tests assessing dichotic listening, temporal processes, pattern recognition, performance with competing and degraded signals. Prerequisites: course restricted to AuD students.

AUD 274. Advanced Technical Aspects of Hearing Amplification (4)
Advanced technical aspects of assessing and fitting amplification devices for the hearing impaired. Intensive hands-on training to develop skills necessary for audiology clinical placement. Prerequisites: course restricted to AuD students or consent of instructor.

AUD 275. Intraoperative Monitoring (3)
Methods and procedures required for monitoring of evoked auditory responses in the operating room. The indications for the use of intraoperative monitoring and difficulties unique to this setting. The course will include the opportunity to observe auditory potential monitoring in the operating room. Prerequisites: second- or third-year AuD student or consent of instructor.

AUD 276. Cochlear Implants and Other Implantable Sensory Aids (3)
Theory and practice of cochlear implantation with focus on audiological management of patients after implantation. Current concepts regarding the activation of primary auditory neurons by electrical stimulation and indications for cochlear implantation and surgical procedures are described. Prerequisites: second- or third-year AuD student or consent of instructor.

AUD 284. Clinical Practice in Audiology II (1-4)
Applications of clinical procedures to patient assessment. Includes clinical observation, interaction with otologists, and supervised patient care involving diagnostics and hearing-aid evaluations in the UC San Diego audiology clinics. This course may be taken more than once. Prerequisites: open to second- or third-year doctoral students or consent of instructor. One quarter unit represents three to four hours per week. Must also be concurrently enrolled in AUD 291.

AUD 291. Clinical Case Studies/Staffing (1)
Presentations and discussion of clinical cases and issues related to clinical practice. Students’ clinical experiences are discussed relative to medical and audiological assessment and management. This course may be taken more than once. Prerequisites: second- or third-year AuD student or consent of instructor. Must be taken more than once.

AUD 296. Research Practicum (3)
Participation in specific faculty research activities. Become familiar with research methods and objectives of a faculty’s research project. Participate in data collection and analysis at the discretion of the faculty investigator. Prerequisites: second- or third-year AuD student and consent of instructor.

AUD 298. Independent Research (3)
Independent research on topics relevant to audiology, consisting of literature review, data collection. Faculty supervision and mentoring on practical elements of research design and methodology. The course will consist of laboratory experience, focused on practical elements of research and design and methodology. Prerequisites: consent of AuD program adviser and consent of faculty mentor.

AUD 299. Doctoral Project (3)
Individual investigation and preparation of the doctoral project for the AuD degree will be performed under the supervision of an experienced research mentor. Prerequisites: advancement to candidacy in the AuD program.

BNFO 281. Seminar in Bioinformatics and Systems Biology (1)
Weekly seminars by faculty and visiting bioinformaticists presenting their research. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit nine times.

BNFO 283. Bioinformatics Student Research Talks (1)
Weekly presentations by bioinformatics and systems biology students about research projects that are proposed or completed. Faculty mentors are present to contribute critiques and suggestions. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit nine times. Prerequisites: bioinformatics and systems biology program graduate students only.

BNFO 284. Nonlinear Dynamics in Quantitative Biology (4)
Qualitative, analytical and computational mathematical modeling techniques applied to regulatory networks and signaling networks. Stability, bifurcations, oscillations, multistability, hysteresis, multiple time-scales, and chaos. Introduction to experimental data analysis and control techniques. Applications to synthetic biology, cellular population dynamics, ad canonical signaling networks (inflammation, tumor suppression, metabolism). Letter grades only. Prerequisites: bioinformatics and systems biology graduate students only.

BNFO 285. Statistical Learning in Bioinformatics (4)
A hallmark of bioinformatics is the computational analysis of complex data. The combination of statistics and algorithms produce statistical learning methods that automate the analysis of complex data. Such machine learning methods are widely used in systems biology and bioinformatics. This course provides an introduction to statistical learning and assumes familiarity with key statistical methods. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: Math 283.

BNFO 298. Research Rotation (4–8)
Laboratory research of special topics under the direction of a program faculty member. The purpose is to train students in specific research methodologies and identify a laboratory in which to pursue doctoral dissertation research. Three quarters are required for PhD candidates. May be taken for credit six times. Prerequisites: bioinformatics graduate students and consent of instructor and program.

BNFO 299. Graduate Research (1–12)
Independent work by graduate students engaged in research and writing theses. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit fifteen times. Prerequisites: bioinformatics and systems biology graduate students and consent of instructor.

BNFO 500. Teaching Assistantship (2–4)
Teaching experience in an appropriate bioinformatics undergraduate or graduate course under direction of the faculty member in charge of the course. Each PhD candidate must complete two academic quarters of experience for S/U grade only. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of instructor (department stamp). (F,W,S)

BILD 1. The Cell (4)
An introduction to cellular structure and function, to biological molecules, bioenergetics, to the genetics of both prokaryotic and eukaryotic organisms, and to the elements of molecular biology. Prerequisites: Chem 6A; Chem 6B may be taken concurrently.

BILD 2. Multicellular Life (4)
An introduction to the development and the physiological processes of plants and animals. Included are treatments of reproduction, nutrition, respiration, transport systems, regulation of the internal environment, the nervous system, and behavior. Prerequisites: BILD 1.

BILD 3. Organismic and Evolutionary Biology (4)
The first principles of evolutionary theory, classification, ecology, and behavior; a phylogenetic synopsis of the major groups of organisms from viruses to primates. Prerequisites: none. (Note: EBE majors should complete this course during their first year at UC San Diego.)

BILD 4. Introductory Biology Lab (2)
Students gain hands-on experience and learn the theoretical basis of lab techniques common to a variety of biological disciplines such as biochemistry, molecular biology, cell biology, and bioinformatics. Students will work in groups, learning how to collect, analyze, and present data while using the scientific method to conduct inquiry-based laboratory experiments. Material lab fee will apply.

BILD 7. The Beginning of Life (4)
An introduction to the basic principles of plant and animal development, emphasizing the similar strategies by which diverse organisms develop. Practical applications of developmental principles as well as ethical considerations arising from these technologies will be discussed. Prerequisites: none.

BILD 10. Fundamental Concepts of Modern Biology (4)
An introduction to the biochemistry and genetics of cells and organisms; illustrations are drawn from microbiology and human biology. This course is designed for nonbiology students and does not satisfy a lower-division requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36. Note: Students may not receive credit for BILD 10 after receiving credit for BILD 1.

BILD 12. Neurobiology and Behavior (4)
Introduction to the organization and functions of the nervous system; topics include molecular, cellular, developmental, systems, and behavioral neurobiology. This course is designed for nonbiology students and does not satisfy a lower-division requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36.

BILD 18. Human Impact on the Environment (4)
Course will focus on issues such as global warming, species extinction, and human impact on the oceans and forests. History and scientific projections will be examined in relation to these events. Possible solutions to these worldwide processes and a critical assessment of their causes and consequences will be covered. Prerequisites: none.

BILD 20. Human Genetics in Modern Society (4)
Fundamentals of human genetics and introduction to modern genetic technology such as gene cloning and DNA finger printing. Applications of these techniques, such as forensic genetics, genetic screening, and genetic engineering. Social impacts and ethical implications of these applications. This course is designed for nonbiology students and does not satisfy a lower-division requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36. Note: Students may not receive credit for BILD 20 after receiving credit for BICD 100.

BILD 22. Human Nutrition (4)
A survey of our understanding of the basic chemistry and biology of human nutrition; discussions of all aspects of food: nutritional value, diet, nutritional diseases, public health, and public policy. This course is designed for nonbiology students and does not satisfy a lower-division requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36. Note: Students may not receive credit for BILD 22 after receiving credit for BIBC 120.

BILD 26. Human Physiology (4)
Introduction to the elements of human physiology and the functioning of the various organ systems. The course presents a broad, yet detailed, analysis of human physiology, with particular emphasis toward understanding disease processes. This course is designed for nonbiology students and does not satisfy a lower-division requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36. Note: Students may not receive credit for BILD 26 after receiving credit for BIPN 100.

BILD 36. AIDS Science and Society (4)
An introduction to all aspects of the AIDS epidemic. Topics will include the epidemiology, biology, and clinical aspects of HIV infection; HIV testing; education and approaches to therapy; and the social, political, and legal impacts of AIDS on the individual and society. This course is designed for nonbiology students and does not satisfy a lower-division requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36. Note: Students may not receive credit for BILD 36 after receiving credit for BICD 136.

BILD 38. Dementia, Science, and Society (4)
Introduction to basic human neuroscience leading to a discussion of brain diseases classified under the rubric Dementia. Topics include basic brain structure and function, diseases of the aging brain and their economic, social, political and ethical impacts on society.

BILD 40. Introduction to Biomedical Research (2)
Course introduces students to some of the research approaches employed by physicians and scientists at the UC San Diego School of Medicine to investigate the etiology, biology, prevention and treatment of human diseases, including cancer, diabetes, and others. P/NP grades only.

BILD 51. Quantitative Biology Project Lab (4)
Course covers two important aspects: (1) interdisciplinary and research-based education and (2) teaching fundamental experimental and computational skills in quantitative studies of living systems. Participation by application only. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: department approval required.    

BILD 60. Biology and Diversity: Use and Misuse of Science to Justify Bias, Inequity, Exclusion, and Prejudice (4)
This course will examine diversity, equity, and inclusion beginning with a biological framework. Focus will be on how underlying biological differences have been used to support bias and prejudice against particular groups such as women, African Americans, and Latinos. P/NP grades only. This course is approved to meet the campus Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI) requirement. Prerequisites: BILD 1 and BILD 2 or 3.

BILD 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

BILD 91. Biology Freshmen: Strategies for Success (1)
Course is designed to assist new freshmen in making a smooth and informed transition from high school. Lectures focus on study skills, academic planning and using divisional and campus resources to help achieve academic, personal and professional goals. Exercises and practicums will develop the problems solving skills needed to succeed in biology. Attention will be given to research possibilities. Intended for new freshmen.

BILD 92. Professional Development Topics in the Biological Sciences (1)
Seminars will introduce students to various professional development topics in the biological sciences. Emphasis may include current research in academe and industry, using campus and community resources to help achieve academic, personal and professional goals, and career exploration. Activities may include presentations by faculty, alumni, and practicing professional biologists, as well as panel discussions with professionals from industry.

BILD 95. Undergraduate Workshops (1)
The workshops will be restricted to lower-division undergraduates. The course will introduce students to the methods of scientific research and to a variety of research topics in the biological/biomedical sciences. Examples of topics are: Introduction to Scientific Research, AIDS, Medical and Social Aspects, Is the Mind the Same as the Brain, Wildlife Conservation.

BILD 96. Biology: Honors Seminar (2)
Weekly seminar providing Biological Sciences Scholars Program students with the opportunity to learn more about research and scholarly activities available to them, and acquaints them with UC San Diego faculty members. The course will promote student’s participation in research and other scholarly activities on campus. Departmental approval only (department will preauthorize students to enroll).

BILD 99. Independent Research (2 or 4)
Independent research by special arrangement with a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Students must have an overall UC San Diego GPA of at least 3.0 and a minimum of thirty units complete. Students must complete a Special Studies form and a Division of Biological Sciences Research Plan. Credit may not be received for a course numbered 99 subsequent to receiving credit for a course numbered 199.

BIBC 100. Structural Biochemistry (4)
The structure and function of biomolecules. Includes protein conformation, dynamics, and function; enzymatic catalysis, enzyme kinetics, and allosteric regulation; lipids and membranes; sugars and polysaccharides; and nucleic acids. Prerequisites: Chem 140A and Chem 140B. (Note: Students may not receive credit for both BIBC 100 and Chem 114A.)

BIBC 102. Metabolic Biochemistry (4)
Energy-producing pathways–glycolysis, the TCA cycle, oxidative phosphorylation, photosynthesis, and fatty acid oxidation; and biosynthetic pathways–gluconeogenesis, glycogen synthesis, and fatty acid biosynthesis. Nitrogen metabolism, urea cycle, amino acid metabolism, nucleotide metabolism, and metabolism of macromolecules. Prerequisites: Chem 140A and Chem 140B. (Note: Students may not receive credit for both BIBC 102 and Chem 114B.)

BIBC 103. Biochemical Techniques (4)
Introductory laboratory course in current principles and techniques applicable to research problems in biochemistry and molecular biology. Techniques include protein and nucleic acid purification; identification methods such as centrifugation, chromatography, and electrophoresis; immunological, spectrophotometric, and enzymatic methods. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: BILD 1. Students may not receive credit for BIBC 103 after taking Chem 112A (renumbered to Chem 108). Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student’s being dropped from the course roster.

BIBC 120. Nutrition (4)
Elaborates the relationship between diet and human metabolism, physiology, health, and disease. Covers the functions of carbohydrates, lipids, proteins, vitamins, and minerals, and discusses dietary influences on cardiovascular disease, diabetes, obesity, and cancer. Prerequisites: BIBC 102.

BIBC 140. Our Energy Future—Sustainable Energy Solutions (4)
Course will provide an overview of energy production and utilization and the consequences of this on the economy and environment. The course will introduce renewable energy technologies including biofuels, and explores the social, economic, and political aspects of energy use. Prerequisites: BILD 1.

BIBC 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Biochemistry (2)
Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current descriptions and subtitles may be found on the Schedule of Classes and the Division of Biological Sciences website. Students may receive credit in 194 courses a total of four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic. Prerequisites: BIBC 100 or BIBC 102.

BICD 100. Genetics (4)
An introduction to the principles of heredity emphasizing diploid organisms. Topics include Mendelian inheritance and deviations from classical Mendelian ratios, pedigree analysis, gene interactions, gene mutation, linkage and gene mapping, reverse genetics, population genetics, and quantitative genetics. Prerequisites: BILD 1.

BICD 101. Eucaryotic Genetics Laboratory (4)
Course implements key concepts in genetics and genomics such as performing and interpreting results of genetic crosses, analyzing mutations and their phenotypic consequences, analyzing the genetic basis of quantitative traits, and analyzing genome sequences in relation to phenotypic variation. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student being dropped from the course roster. Recommended preparation: BICD 100 is highly recommended and may be taken concurrently. Prerequisites: BILD 1. 

BICD 110. Cell Biology (4)
The structure and function of cells and cell organelles, cell growth and division, motility, cell differentiation and specialization. Prerequisites: BIBC 100 or BIBC 102.

BICD 112. Stem Cells and Regeneration (4)
Stem cells maintain homeostasis of nearly all organ systems and the regenerative capacity of certain organisms. Course explores the paradigm of the tissue-specific stem cell, the cellular mechanisms of tissue regeneration, the evolution of stem cells and regenerative capacity over time, the basis of induced pluripotency, and how these basic processes can inform new approaches to human health. Prerequisites: BIMM 100.

BICD 120. Molecular Basis of Plant Development (4)
Introduction to the biology of plants with a particular focus on the underlying genetic and molecular mechanisms controlling plant development. Topics include the role of plant hormones and stem cells in the formation of embryos, roots, flowers, and fruit. Prerequisites: BILD 1.

BICD 123. Plant Molecular Genetics and Biotechnology Laboratory (4)
Techniques in plant cell and tissue culture, plant transformation, genetic selection and screening of mutants, host pathogen interactions, gene regulation, organelle isolation, membrane transport. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student being dropped from the course roster. Recommended preparation: BICD 120 is recommended. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

BICD 124. Plant Innate Immunity (4)
Plant immunity protects against pathogens and enables symbioses. This course explores the agents of plant disease, the genetics of inherited immunity, mechanisms of pathogenesis and defense, the coordination of plant immunity by plant hormones, and the regulation of symbioses. Prerequisites: BICD 100.

BICD 130. Embryos, Genes, and Development (4)
Developmental biology of animals at the tissue, cellular, and molecular levels. Basic processes of embryogenesis in a variety of invertebrate and vertebrate organisms. Cellular and molecular mechanisms that underlie cell fate determination and cell differentiation. More advanced topics such as pattern formation and sex determination are discussed. Open to upper-division students only. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; BICD 100; BIBC 100 or BIBC 102; BICD 110 strongly recommended, BIMM 100 strongly recommended.

BICD 136. AIDS Science and Society (4)
An introduction to all aspects of the AIDS epidemic. Topics will include the epidemiology, biology, and clinical aspects of HIV infection, HIV testing, education and approaches to therapy, and the social, political, and legal impacts of AIDS on the individual and society. In order to count for their major, biology majors must take the upper-division course, BICD 136. Prerequisites: BILD 1, BILD 2 recommended.

BICD 140. Immunology (4)
Formation and function of the mammalian immune system, molecular and cellular basis of the immune response, infectious diseases and autoimmunity. Prerequisites: BICD 100, BIMM 100. BIBC 100 recommended.

BICD 145. Laboratory in Molecular Medicine (4)
This course focuses upon a molecular and immunological approach to study problems in modern medical research. The emphasis will be on novel approaches in medicine, including lymphocyte biology, cancer biology, and gene transfer. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: BIMM 100.

BICD 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Cellular Development (2)
Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current descriptions and subtitles may be found on the Schedule of Classes and the Division of Biological Sciences website. Students may receive credit in 194 courses a total of four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic. Prerequisites: BICD 110.

BIEB 100. Biostatistics (4)
An interactive introduction to estimation, hypothesis testing, and statistical reasoning. Emphasis on the conceptual and logical basis of statistical ideas. Focus on randomization rather than parametric techniques. Topics include describing data, sampling, bootstrapping, and significance. Mandatory one-hour weekly section. Students may not receive credit for both BIEB 100 and SIO 187. Prerequisites: BILD 3 and Math 10A or 20A and Math 10B or 20B. Students may not receive credit for both BIEB 100 and SIO 187.

BIEB 102. Introductory Ecology-Organisms and Habitat (4)
This course emphasizes principles shaping organisms, habitats, and ecosystems. Topics covered include population regulation, physiological ecology, competition, predation, and human exploitation. This will be an empirical look at general principles in ecology and conservation with emphasis on the unique organisms and habitats of California. Prerequisites: BILD 3 or equivalent.

BIEB 121. Ecology Laboratory (4)
A laboratory course to familiarize students with ecological problem solving and methods. Students will perform outdoor fieldwork and use a computer for data exploration and analysis. Fieldwork can be expected in this course. Associated travel may be required and students are responsible for their own transportation. Students may need to provide and use their own laptop. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: BIEB 100.

BIEB 126. Plant Ecology (4)
This course begins with an introduction to plant population biology including whole-plant growth and physiology. We then focus on three classes of ecological interactions: plant-plant competition, plant-herbivore coevolution, and plant reproductive ecology including animal pollination and seed dispersal. Prerequisites: BILD 3.

BIEB 128. Insect Diversity (4)
Course begins with a survey of insect diversity and phylogenetic relationships. Course then addresses issues such as population dynamics (including outbreaks), movement and migration, competition, predation, herbivory, parasitism, insect defense, mimicry complexes, and sociality. Course also includes discussions of pest management, evolution of insecticide resistance, insect-borne diseases, and how insects are responding to global change. Prerequisites: BILD 3.

BIEB 130. Marine Conservation Biology (4)
Course integrates principles of ecology and marine biology to examine marine biodiversity loss resulting from over-exploitation, habitat loss, invasion, climate change, and pollution. Course examines consequences of biodiversity loss to marine ecosystems and discusses the efficacy of various management regimes. Conservation problems facing the world’s oceans with an emphasis on issues important for coastal California will be discussed. Prerequisites: BILD 3.

BIEB 131. Marine Invertebrate Ecology Lab (4)
A laboratory course introducing students to coastal marine ecology. Students will participate in outdoor fieldwork and work in the laboratory gathering and analyzing ecological data. We will focus on ecological communities from a variety of coastal habitats and use them to learn about basic ecological processes as well as issues related to sustainability and conservation of biodiversity. Fieldwork is expected in this course. Associated travel in the San Diego area is required and students are responsible for their own transportation. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: BILD 3 and BIEB 100.

BIEB 135. Aquatic Ecology Lab (4)
Course provides overview of physical, chemical, and biological processes that characterize inland waters (lakes and rivers), estuaries, and near-shore environments. Dominant biota of lakes, rivers, and streams, and how they are related to physical and chemical processes of the systems in which they reside will be covered. Methods will be introduced for assessing the chemical composition of water and detecting organisms that affect drinking water quality and coastal water quality management. Course requires field studies. Students should expect to fully participate in field trips; transportation not provided by the university. Students must comply with all risk management policies/procedures. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: BILD 3.

BIEB 140. Biodiversity (4)
An introduction to the patterns of geographic distribution and natural history of plants and animals living in terrestrial and marine ecosystems. We will explore: ecological and evolutionary processes responsible for generating and maintaining biological diversity; and the nature of extinction both in past and present ecosystem. Prerequisites: BILD 3.

BIEB 143. Computer Modeling in Evolution and Ecology (4)
An introduction to computer modeling in evolution and ecology. Students will use the computer language 'R' to write code to analyze ecological and evolutionary processes. Topics include natural selection, genetic drift, community ecology, game theory, and chaos. Students will use their own laptop computers. Prerequisites: BIEB 100 or BIEB 150.

BIEB 150. Evolution (4)
Evolutionary processes are discussed in their genetic, historical, and ecological contexts. Population genetics, agents of evolution, microevolution, speciation, macroevolution. Prerequisites: BILD 3 and BILD 1 or BIEB 143.

BIEB 152. Evolution of Infectious Diseases (4)
Treating infectious diseases is a uniquely difficult problem since pathogens often evolve, rendering today's therapies useless tomorrow. This course will provide a review of concepts and methods in evolutionary medicine, with an emphasis on microbial genomics and molecular evolution. Prerequisites: BILD 3.

BIEB 166. Animal Behavior and Communication (4)
An integrated approach to animal behavior focusing on mechanisms of acoustic, visual, and olfactory communication. Course covers ethology and the genetics and neurobiology of behavior; orientation and navigation; and signal origins, properties, design, and evolution. Prerequisites: BILD 3 and Physics 1A or 2A.

BIEB 167. Animal Communication Lab (4)
Laboratory exercises will introduce students to quantitative methods of visual, auditory, and olfactory signal analysis and to lab and field studies of animal signaling. Prerequisites: BIEB 100 and BIEB 166. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student’s being dropped from the course roster. Material fee will apply.

BIEB 174. Ecosystems and Global Change (4)
Course will teach the principles of terrestrial ecosystem ecology, and will use examples from recent research to help students understand how global environmental changes are altering processes from leaf-level ecophysiology to global cycling of carbon, water, and nutrients. Fieldwork may be required. Prerequisites: BILD 3.

BIEB 176. Conservation and the Human Predicament (4)
Interdisciplinary discussion of the human predicament, the biodiversity crisis, and the importance of biological conservation. Examines issues from biological, cultural, historical, economic, social, political, and ethical perspectives emphasizing new approaches and new techniques for safeguarding the future of humans and other biosphere inhabitants. Prerequisites: BILD 3 or ANTH 2 or consent of instructor.

BIEB 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Ecology, Behavior, Evolution (2)
Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current descriptions and subtitles may be found on the Schedule of Classes and the Division of Biological Sciences website. Students may receive credit in 194 courses a total of four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic. Prerequisites: BIEB 102.

BIMM 100. Molecular Biology (4)
Molecular basis of biological processes, emphasizing gene action in context of entire genome. Chromosomes and DNA metabolism: chromatin, DNA replication, repair, mutation, recombination, transposition. Transcription, protein synthesis, regulation of gene activity. Procaryotes and eukaryotes. Students will not receive credit for both BIMM 100 and Chem 114C. Prerequisites: BILD 1 and BIBC 100 or BIBC 102.

BIMM 101. Recombinant DNA Techniques (4)
Theory and practice of recombinant DNA and molecular biology techniques. Includes construction and screening of DNA libraries, DNA sequencing, PCR and its applications, bioinformatics, and RNA analysis. Nonattendance will result in the student’s being dropped from the course roster. Recommended preparation: BIMM 100. Students may not enroll in or receive credit for both BIMM 101 and BIEB 123, or BIMM 101 and Chem 109 (formerly Chem 112B). Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: BILD 1.

BIMM 110. Molecular Basis of Human Disease (4)
An examination of the molecular basis of human diseases. Course emphasizes inherited human disorders, and some important diseases caused by viruses. Focus on the application of genetic, biochemical, and molecular biological principles to an understanding of the diseases. Course restricted to upper-division biology majors. Prerequisites: BICD 100; BIBC 100 or BIBC 102; BIMM 100.

BIMM 112.Regulation of Eukaryotic Gene Expressions (4)
This course explores the mechanisms by which gene activity is regulated in eukaryotes, with an emphasis on transcriptional regulation and chromatin. Topics will include chromatin structure, histone modifications, chromatin dynamics, transcription factors, transcriptional elongation, enhancers, CpG methylation, heterochromatin, and epigenetics. Prerequisites: BIMM 100.

BIMM 114. Virology (4)
An introduction to eukaryotic virology, with emphasis on animal virus systems. Topics discussed include the molecular structure of viruses; the multiplication strategies of the major virus families; and viral latency, persistence, and oncology. Prerequisites: BIMM 100.

BIMM 116. Circadian Rhythms—Biological Clocks (4)
(Cross-listed with Psych 133; however, biology majors must take the course as BIMM 116.) This interdisciplinary course provides an overview of the fundamental properties of daily biological clocks of diverse species, from humans to microbes. Emphasis is placed on the relevance of internal time keeping in wide-ranging contexts including human performance, health, and industry. Prerequisites: BILD 1 or PSYC 2 or PSYC 106.

BIMM 116B. BioClock Studio (4)
The BioClock Studio is an innovative course in which a team of undergraduate students, drawn from diverse disciplines, will work collaboratively to develop their scientific and communicative skills to produce creative educational materials that will enhance understanding of circadian biology. Students are expected to attend the annual Circadian Biology Symposium held each winter, to the extent course schedules allow, to conduct interviews with prominent scientists. BIMM 116 is not a prerequisite to enroll in BIMM 116B. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: department approval required. Students will be required to formally apply to participate via an online application form and selected students will work in small teams with intensive mentoring to execute projects. 

BIMM 118. Pharmacology (4)
Basics of pharmacology such as drug absorption, distribution, metabolism, and elimination. Concepts in toxicology and pharmacognosy are used to survey the major drug categories. Prerequisites: BIBC 100 or BIBC 102; BIPN 100.

BIMM 120. Microbiology (4)
A discussion of the structure, growth, physiology, molecular genetics, genomics, and ecology of prokaryotic microorganisms, with emphasis on the genetic and metabolic diversity of bacteria and Archaea and their interactions with hosts and the environment. Prerequisites: BILD 1 and BIBC 100 or BIBC 102.

BIMM 121. Laboratory in Microbiology (6)
Course emphasizes fundamental principles of microbiology, including comparative bacterial morphology and physiology, pure culture techniques, and bacterial growth. Additional studies include bacteriophage interactions, antibiotics, the use of bio-assays, natural microbial communities through metagenomics and enrichment, and bacteria in biotechnology. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student being dropped from the course roster. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: BILD 1 and BIBC 100 or BIBC 102.

BIMM 122. Microbial Genetics (4)
Course will consider the organization and function of prokaryotic genomes including content, DNA supercoiling, histone-like proteins, chromosomal dynamics (short-term and long-term), extrachromosomal elements, bacterial sex, transduction, transformation, mobile elements (transposon), epigenetic change, adaptive and directed mutation, transcription and its regulation, sensory transduction, bacterial differentiation, symbiosis, and pathogenesis. Prerequisites: BIMM 100.

BIMM 124. Medical Microbiology (4)
Encompasses the increasingly important areas of viral, bacterial, and parasitic diseases and understanding the complex interaction between humans and infectious agents. Covers human-pathogen interactions, mechanisms and molecular principles of infectious diseases, immune responses, countermeasures by pathogens and hosts, epidemiology, and cutting-edge approaches to therapy. Prerequisites: BIBC 100 or BIBC 102.

BIMM 130. Microbial Physiology (4)
Prokaryotic cell biology will be discussed primarily from physiological and biochemical standpoints with a focus on conceptual understanding, integration, and mechanism. Topics will vary from year to year but will include the following themes: bioenergetics, cell polarity, cell adhesion, the molecular basis of morphogenesis and differentiation, prokaryotic motility and behavior, rotary and linear molecular machines, bacterial organelles, pheromones and messengers, circadian rhythms, biological warfare, and bioremediation. Prerequisites: BIBC 100 or BIBC 102.

BIMM 134. Biology of Cancer (4)
This course covers basic processes of transformation and tumor formation in a two-part format. The first section is focused on molecular and cellular mechanisms of carcinogenesis. The second section discusses tumor pathology and metastasis. Open to upper-division students only. Prerequisites: BICD 110 and BIMM 100.

BIMM 140. Quantitative Principles in Biology (4)
Course considers problems in biology that were solved using quantitative biology approaches. Problems will range from the molecular to the population level. Students will learn about the scientific method and process, and how to apply it. Prerequisites: BILD 1.

BIMM 149. Computation for Biologists (4)
Course will provide students with the computational tools and problem-solving skills that are increasingly important to the biosciences. Students learn to program in a modern general-purpose programming language and write their own programs to explore a variety of applications in biology including simulations, sequence analysis, phylogenetics, among others. Students will use their own laptop computers. Prerequisites: BILD 1 and BILD 2.

BIMM 162. 3D Electron Microscopy of Macromolecules (4)
Biological macromolecules and supramolecular complexes, organelles, and small cells are being examined in three-dimensions by modern electron cryomicroscopy and image reconstruction techniques. The basic principles of transmission electron microscopy and 3D image reconstruction are discussed. Prerequisites: Chem 114A or BIBC 100 or BIBC 110 and Physics 1C or 2C or 2D; upper-division standing.

BIMM 164. Structural Biology of Viruses (4)
An introduction to virus structures, how they are determined, and how they facilitate the various stages of the viral life cycle from host recognition and entry to replication, assembly, release, and transmission to uninfected host cells. Prerequisites: BIBC 100 or Chem 114A; upper-division standing.

BIMM 171. Genomics Research Initiative (1)
This class will examine the theoretical and practical basis of modern genomics research. Students will learn the theoretical basis of genomics and tools used for the sequencing and annotation of genomic DNA, and computational and molecular methods for the study of evolution. Prerequisites: department approval required (department will preauthorize students to enroll). Restricted to students participating in the National Genomics Research Initiative Program.

BIMM 171A. Genomics Research Initiative Laboratory I (4)
Students will isolate bacterial viruses or other organisms from the environment and characterize them by methods including electron microscopy and nucleic acid analysis. The genomic DNA will be purified, and sent for sequencing. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: department approval required. Restricted to students participating in the National Genomics Research Initiative Program.

BIMM 171B. Genomics Research Initiative Laboratory II (4)
Students will characterize the genomic sequence of the organisms isolated in BIMM 171A and use molecular and computational tools to resolve ambiguities and close gaps. They will then annotate the DNA sequence to identify protein and RNA coding regions. Prerequisites: BIMM 171 and BIMM 171A.

BIMM 181. Molecular Sequence Analysis (4)
This course covers the analysis of nucleic acid and protein sequences, with an emphasis on the application of algorithms to biological problems. Topics include sequence alignments, database searching, comparative genomics, and phylogenetic and clustering analyses. Pairwise alignment, multiple alignment, DNA sequencing, scoring functions, fast database search, comparative genomics, clustering, phylogenetic trees, gene finding/DNA statistics. This course open to bioinformatics majors only. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176, CSE 101 or Math 188, BIMM 100 or Chem 114C.

BIMM 182. Biological Databases (4)
This course provides an introduction to the features of biological data, how that data are organized efficiently in databases, and how existing data resources can be utilized to solve a variety of biological problems. Object-oriented databases, data modeling and description, survey of current biological database with respect to above, implementation of database focused on a biological topic. This course open to bioinformatics majors only. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176.

BIMM 184. Computational Molecular Biology (4)
This advanced course covers the application of machine learning and modeling techniques to biological systems. Topics include gene structure, recognition of DNA and protein sequence patterns, classification, and protein structure prediction. Pattern discovery, hidden Markov models/support vector machines/neural network/profiles, protein structure prediction, functional characterization of proteins, functional genomics/proteomics, metabolic pathways/gene networks. Prerequisites: BIMM 181 or BENG 181 or CSE 181, BIMM 182 or BENG 182 or CSE 182 or Chem 182.

BIMM 185. Bioinformatics Laboratory (Advanced) (4)
This course emphasizes the hands-on application of bioinformatics methods to biological problems. Students will gain experience in the application of existing software, as well as in combining approaches to answer specific biological questions. Sequence alignment, fast database search, profiles and motifs, comparative genomics, gene finding, phylogenetic trees, protein structure, functional characterization of proteins, expression analysis, computational proteomics. This course open to bioinformatics majors only. Prerequisites: two courses out of BIMM 181 or BENG 181 or CSE 181, BIMM 182 or BENG 182 or CSE 182, BENG 183, BIMM 184 or BENG 184 or CSE 184. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student’s being dropped from the course roster.

BIMM 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Molecular Biology (2)
Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current descriptions and subtitles may be found on the Schedule of Classes and the Division of Biological Sciences website. Students may receive credit in 194 courses a total of four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic. Prerequisites: BIMM 100.

BIPN 100. Human Physiology I (4)
Course introduces the concepts of physiological regulation, controlled and integrated by the nervous and endocrine systems. Course then examines the muscular, cardiovascular, and renal systems in detail and considers their control through the interaction of nervous activity and hormones. Students may not receive credit for both BIPN 100 and BENG 140A. Prerequisites: BILD 1 and BILD 2.

BIPN 102. Human Physiology II (4)
Course completes a survey of organ systems begun in BIPN 100 by considering the respiratory and gastrointestinal systems. Consideration is given to interactions of these systems in weight and temperature regulation, exercise physiology, stress, and pregnancy and reproduction. Students may not receive credit for both BIPN 102 and BENG 140B. Prerequisites: BIPN 100.

BIPN 105. Animal Physiology Lab (6)
Experiments are performed on membrane physiology, nerve and muscle function, hormone actions, cardiovascular physiology, and renal function. Subjects include experimental animals. Students will perform a research project and present their results in a symposium at the end of the quarter. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student being dropped from the course roster. Material lab fee will apply. Prerequisites: BIPN 100.

BIPN 106. Comparative Physiology (4)
This course examines the physiological adaptation of animals, invertebrates and vertebrates, to their particular environmental and behavioral niches. Structural, functional, and molecular adaptations of the basic organ systems are discussed. Prerequisites: BILD 2, Chem 6A-B-C. BILD 3 is recommended.

BIPN 108. Biology and Medicine of Exercise (4)
Course addresses the human body’s response to exercise, addressing energy metabolism and the effects of both acute and chronic exercise on function in several important organ systems. Designing training regimes and the role of exercise in health will be considered. Recommended preparation: completion of BIPN 102 and BIBC 102 recommended. Prerequisites: BIPN 100.

BIPN 120. Endocrinology (4)
Normal function and diseases of the major hormone systems of the body including the hypothalamus/pituitary axis, the thyroid gland, reproduction and sexual development, metabolism and the pancreas, bone and calcium metabolism, and the adrenal glands. Students may not receive credit for both BIPN 120 and BICD 150. Prerequisites: BIPN 100. 

BIPN 134. Human Reproduction (4)
Course focuses on physiological aspects of the human reproductive systems. Emphasis will be on cellular and systems physiology. Topics will include: reproductive endocrinology, gametogenesis, fertilization and implantation, pregnancy and parturition, development of reproductive systems, and reproductive pathologies. Students may not receive credit for both BIPN 134 and BICD 134. Prerequisites: BIPN 100. 

BIPN 140. Cellular Neurobiology (4)
This course covers the biophysics of the resting and active membranes of nerve cells. It also covers the mechanisms of sensory transduction and neuromodulation, as well as the molecular basis of nerve cell function. Recommended preparation: completion of BIBC 100 or 102. Prerequisites: BILD 1, 2.

BIPN 142. Systems Neurobiology (4)
Course will cover integrated networks of nerve cells, including simple circuits like those involved in spinal reflexes. Course will study how information and motor output is integrated and processed in the brain. Course will also discuss higher-level neural processing. Prerequisites: BIPN 100 or BIPN 140.

BIPN 144. Developmental Neurobiology (4)
Molecular basis of neuronal cell fate determination, axon pathfinding, synaptogenesis experience-based refinement of connections, and learning in the brain will be examined. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

BIPN 146. Computational Neurobiology (4)
An exploration of computational brain models, including biophysical models of single neurons, small neural circuits, and larger scale network models. Prerequisites: BILD 12 or BIPN 140 or Psych 106 or Cog Sci 107 recommended.

BIPN 148. Cellular Basis of Learning and Memory (4)
Course will explore cellular and molecular mechanisms that underlie learning and memory. Topics will include synapse formation and synaptic plasticity, neurotransmitter systems and their receptors, mechanisms of synaptic modification, and effect of experience on neuronal connectivity, and gene expression. Prerequisites: BIPN 100.

BIPN 150. Diseases of the Nervous System (4)
Course will be taught from a research perspective, highlighting the biological pathways impacted by different neurological diseases. Each disease covered will be used to illustrate a key molecular/cellular pathway involved in proper neurological function. Prerequisites: BIBC 102 and BICD 100.

BIPN 152. The Healthy and Diseased Brain (4)
Coverage of the history of research, diagnosis, and treatment of common neuropsychiatric disorders. Comparisons will be made between primary research data and existing treatments, and on developing skills to digest scientific literature aimed at understanding the neuroscience of disease. Prerequisites: BILD 1 and BILD 2.

BIPN 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Physiology and Neuroscience (2)
Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current descriptions and subtitles may be found on the Schedule of Classes and the Division of Biological Sciences website. Students may receive credit in 194 courses a total of four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic. Prerequisites: BIPN 100 or BIPN 140.

BISP 170. Bioscholars Seminar: From Bench to Bedside and Beyond (2)
Course will examine different aspects of a recent topic in biology. Seminar will begin with an examination of the scientific foundation of the chosen theme (bench) and proceed to address the relevant applications of the subject in the medical field (bedside) and current key societal challenges of global dimensions (beyond), all of which will be framed within a consideration of diverse perspectives. Prerequisites: BILD 1 and BILD 2.

BISP 191. Biology Transfers: Strategies for Success (1)
Course is designed to assist new transfers in making a smooth and informed transition from community college. Lectures focus on study skills, academic planning and using divisional and campus resources to help achieve academic, personal and professional goals. Exercises and practicums will develop the problem solving skills needed to succeed in biology. Attention will be given to research possibilities. Intended for new transfers. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

BISP 192. Senior Seminar in Biology (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in biology (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

BISP 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology (2)
Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current descriptions and subtitles may be found on the Schedule of Classes and the Division of Biological Sciences website. Students may receive credit in 194 courses a total of four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic. Prerequisites: BICD 100; upper-division standing.

BISP 195. Undergraduate Instructional Apprenticeship in Biological Sciences (4)
Under the supervision of an instructor, student apprentices will assist in the instruction of a biology course. The purpose of the apprenticeship is to learn the methodology of teaching biology, at the college level, through theory and actual practice in a regularly scheduled course. Limited to upper-division students with a 3.0 GPA or higher. Students must apply the quarter preceding the quarter in which BISP 195 will be completed. Applications are reviewed by instructors, and assignments are made based on divisional need. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: divisional approval required. (Note: Students must apply to the division as an undergraduate instructional apprentice and be reviewed by instructors via the online system). This course may be counted as one of the upper-division electives for a biology major.

BISP 196. Honors Thesis in Biological Sciences (4)
Course for student participants in the senior Honors thesis research program. Students complete individual research on a problem by special arrangement with, and under the direction of, a faculty member. Projects are expected to involve primary, experimental/analytical approaches that augment training in basic biology and that echo the curricular focus of the Division of Biological Sciences. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Research to be approved by Honors thesis faculty adviser via application. Note: Students must apply to the division via the online system. For complete details, applications, and deadlines, please consult the Division of Biological Sciences website. Application deadlines are strictly enforced. Prerequisites: students must have senior standing; 3.6 overall and major GPA or above. Research must be approved by Honors thesis faculty adviser. Enrollment in this course is for those students participating in the Honors Program in Biological Sciences and is via departmental approval only.

BISP 197. Biology Internship Program (4)
Individual research on a problem by special arrangement with, and under the direction of, a UC San Diego faculty member and a selected researcher in industry or at a research institution. Projects are expected to involve primary, experimental/analytical approaches that augment training in basic biology and that echo the curricular focus of the Division of Biological Sciences. Application deadlines are strictly enforced. Consult the Division of Biological Sciences website for deadlines. Students must comply with all risk management policies/procedures. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: department approval required. Students must complete at least ninety units of credit and have a minimum GPA of 2.5. A completed and approved Division of Biological Sciences application/research plan is required for enrollment.

BISP 199. Individual Research for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
Individual research on a problem by special arrangement with, and under the direction of, a faculty member. Projects are expected to involve primary, experimental/analytical approaches that augment training in basic biology and that echo the curricular focus of the Division of Biological Sciences. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit five times. Note: Students must apply to the division via the online system. For complete details, applications, and deadlines, please consult the Division of Biological Sciences website. Application deadlines are strictly enforced. Prerequisites: department approval required. Students must complete at least ninety units of credit and have a minimum GPA of 2.5.

BGGN 200. Graduate School Fundamentals: Introduction to Graduate Studies in the Division of Biological Sciences (2)
Course will cover fundamental issues in academia, including campus resources, research design, ethical issues in research, scientific publishing and review, grant preparation, etc. Required of all first year PhD students in the Division of Biological Sciences. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate (PhD) standing only; for students in the following major code BI77, or consent of instructor. (F)

BGGN 201. Methods in Computational Neuroscience (3)
Introduction to the computational methods most frequently used in neuroscience research. Aimed at first year graduate students in neuroscience and related disciplines. Minimal quantitative background will be assumed. Topics include Poisson processes, Markov Chains, auto- and cross-correlation analysis, Fourier/Spectral analysis, principal components/linear algebra, signal detection theory, information theory, Bayes Theorem, hypothesis testing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

BGGN 202. Professional Development for Biologists (2)
Discussions cover professional preparation for future scientists. Topics include: how to read/write/publish papers, to write grant and fellowship proposals, to give oral presentations, and how to apply for research positions. Behind-the-scenes look at reviewing papers, grant and fellowship proposals. Discussions of career options in biological sciences will be included. Scientific content is in the area of eukaryotic gene expression, but knowledge is applicable to all areas of biology. Undergraduate students with senior standing may enroll with consent of instructor.

BGGN 203. Topics in Ecology, Behavior, and Evolution (3)
The course teaches different topics on theory and key concepts in ecology, behavior, and evolution. Students will read materials in depth, attend weekly discussions, and explore relevant topics, theories, and models with advanced analytical tools. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary.

BGGN 204. Topics in Community and Population Ecology (3)
This course teaches a different topic each quarter on the theoretical or conceptual side of community and population ecology. Students will read materials in depth, attend weekly discussions, and explore theories and models with statistical, analytical, and algorithmic tools of the trade. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BGGN 205. Communicating Science to the Public (2)
Learn effective ways of communicating science to nonscientists. Develop an understanding of how people’s views of science and background knowledge can influence their learning, and develop methods to tailor communication for different audiences. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

BGGN 207. Scientific Ethics (1)
(Cross-listed with SOMI 226.) Lectures, reading, and discussions about the responsible conduct and reporting of research, working with others in science, and social responsibilities; the course is designed as an option for meeting current federal regulations. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: medical students, graduate students, or consent of instructor.

BGGN 208. Biological Sciences Graduate Boot Camp (4)
Intensive lecture-, seminar-, and laboratory-based course for incoming first year students in the biological sciences PhD program. Topics covered: evolution and quantitative biology, including biostatistics, image analysis, bioinformatics, genomics, evolution, analysis of DNA proteins. During the first two weeks in September, students commit to ten to fifteen hours per day. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate (PhD) standing only; for students in the following major code BI77.

BGGN 210. Neurobiology Boot Camp (4)
For incoming doctoral students in neurobiology, computational neurobiology, and neurosciences. During first two weeks in September, students commit to ten to fifteen hours per day in lectures and laboratories in electrophysiology, cellular anatomy, molecular biology, optical imaging, and computational neurobiology. Students also attend weekly seminars during fall quarter. Prerequisites: graduate standing; major codes BI77, BI79, NE75.

BGGN 211. Recent Advances and Experimental Approaches in Modern Biology (4)
Introduces students to advanced concepts of modern biology (e.g. molecular and cell biology, biochemistry, genomics, and epigenomics, etc.). Current experimental approaches (including high-throughput sequencing, microarray technology, RNAi, proteomic technologies, ChIP-seq) are discussed using primary research papers. The course provides training in critical analysis of scientific papers, data interpretation, scientific writing, and experimental design. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: for MS students only in the following major code BI77.

BGGN 214. Introduction to Q-Biology (4)
The course goal is to discuss and work through examples where quantitative biology approaches were necessary to yield novel biological insights. Problems will be presented with a historic perspective to instill a philosophy for when, how, and why q-bio approaches are most effective. The course may also appeal to physics and engineering graduate students. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BGGN 216. Graduate Biostatistics (4)
Fundamentals behind and practical application of biostatistics, including central tendency and variability, hypothesis testing, inferential techniques (parametric and nonparametric), correlation and regression. Practice examples taken from the laboratory bench and primary literature. Training in the use of biostatistical software. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BGGN 220. Graduate Molecular Biology (6)
Provides a broad, advanced-level coverage of modern molecular biology for first-year graduate students. Topics include prokaryotic and eukaryotic gene structure and regulation, chromatin structure, DNA replication, translation, mechanisms of transcription, and an introduction to viruses. Open only to students enrolled in a graduate degree program. Letter grades only.

BGGN 220D. Chromatin Structure and Transcriptional Regulation (2)
The course covers chromatin structure and dynamics as well as the regulation of transcription initiation by RNA polymerase II. The format includes lectures and discussion of selected papers.

BGGN 220E. Post-Transcriptional Gene Regulation (2)
The course covers mechanisms of gene regulation at the post-transcriptional level, including RNA processing, translation, and mRNA turnover. The format includes lectures and discussion of selected papers.

BGGN 220F. Shaping Cellular Function through Post-Translational Regulation (2)
The course will cover post-translational control mechanisms governing cellular activity. The course will traverse molecular and systems-level approaches aimed at understanding the governing principles of post-translation regulation and the consequences of improper regulation. The format includes lectures and discussion of selected papers.

BGGN 222. Graduate Cell Biology (6)
Provides coverage of modern cell biology for first year graduate students. There is an up-to-date discussion of topics such as: structure and function of membranes; ion pumps, ion channels, transmembrane signaling; receptor mediated endocytosis; protein targeting; the role of RER and Golgi apparatus; the biosynthesis of intracellular organelles in animal and plant cells; the cytoskeleton, motility, molecular motors, cell-cell interactions, mitosis; and the control of cell division. Also included are extensive coverage of cell signaling mechanisms and discussions on molecular approaches to cell biology. Prerequisites: BGGN 220; open only to students enrolled in a doctoral degree program. Letter grades only.

BGGN 223. Graduate Genetics (6)
Provides a broad and extensive advanced-level coverage of molecular and formal aspects of genetics for first-year graduate students. Topics covered include: bacterial genetics, recombination in prokaryotes and eukaryotes, mammalian somatic-cell genetics, developmental genetics, sex determination, dosage compensation, and immunogenetics. Extensive coverage of the use of model systems like Drosophila and C. elegans is included. General and specific aspects of cellular signaling mechanisms will be covered. Prerequisites: BGGN 220; open only to students enrolled in a doctoral degree program. Letter grades only.

BGGN 224. Graduate Neurobiology (4)
Course covers modern molecular, cellular, developmental, and physiological aspects of neurobiology. Extensive discussion of original research articles will be included. Prerequisites: BGGN 220 and 221; open only to students enrolled in a graduate degree program. Letter grades only.

BGGN 225. Graduate Immunology (4)
The course is devoted to immunology and is organized as a combined lecture-tutorial course stressing classical as well as current literature. Each week will compose an independent section. Topics will include cellular interactions involved in the immune response and the molecular biology unique to lymphoid factor and receptors. Prerequisites: BGGN 220; open only to students enrolled in a graduate degree program. Letter grades only.

BGGN 226. Graduate Animal Virology (4)
This course consists of a review of fundamental concepts together with an in-depth analysis of the structure, genetics, multiplication and oncogenicity of animal viruses. Particular emphasis will be given to the DNA and RNA tumor viruses. The format of this section includes lectures and discussion of selected papers. Prerequisites: BGGN 220; open only to students enrolled in a graduate degree program. Letter grades only.

BGGN 227. Graduate Topics in Plant Biology (4)
This course covers advanced topics in plant biology in the areas of molecular genetic developmental, and physiological biology. We will discuss plant-microbe interactions, transposable elements, protein trafficking, ion transport, and organ development. The format of this section includes lectures and discussion of selected papers. Prerequisites: BGGN 220; open only to students enrolled in a graduate degree program. Letter grades only.

BGGN 228. Graduate Developmental Biology (4)
This course covers graduate level lectures on developmental biology, emphasizing the use of genetically tractable model systems. Discussion of recent research articles is an integral aspect of this course. Students are introduced to classical experiments and given detailed coverage of recent fundamental findings in developmental biology. Prerequisites: BGGN 220; open only to students enrolled in a graduate degree program. Letter grades only.

BGGN 230. Graduate Signal Transduction (4)
The course will introduce students to a variety of signal transduction pathways and their function in the regulation of cellular processes. Special emphasis will be given to signaling cascades regulating immunological responses and alterations of signaling pathways during oncogenesis. Open only to students enrolled in a graduate degree program. Letter grades only.

BGGN 231. Current Concepts in Stem Cell Biology (4)
Research papers from all aspects of stem cell biology will be read, presented, and discussed. Papers will range from landmark to current studies, spanning many developmental organisms and cell types. Students will present one paper, provide relevant background, and lead discussions. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BGGN 232. Innate Immunity (4)
The course will discuss the current understanding of innate immunity, including in organisms such as plants and invertebrates. Through readings and weekly presentations, students will learn the basic concepts of innate immunity including how immunity can be disrupted by pathogen effectors. Recent findings in these rapidly advancing fields will be covered. The course will include weekly seminar-style presentations in which each student will present once during the quarter.

BGGN 234. Practical Histopathology and Mouse Models of Human Disease (2)
(Cross-listed with PATH 234, MED 234, BIOM 238.) This course is designed to train those who need to analyze mouse models of human disease that are an essential part of their research. Sessions will include hematology, chemistry, histology, and immunohistochemistry methods used in the phenotyping assays. (Quarter offered varies and course is not offered every year.) Prerequisites: standard undergraduate biology courses.

BGGN 236. Advanced Glycobiology (4)
(Cross-listed with BIOM 222, CMM 225, MED 225, Chem 237.) Advanced elective for graduate/medical students who have had core courses in cell biology or biochemistry. Expert faculty will present a coordinated overview of the field of glycobiology, which explores the structure, synthesis, and functions of sugar chains in biological systems. 

BGGN 237. Quantitative Methods in Genetics (4)
(Cross-listed with BIOM 262, CMM 262.) This advanced problem-oriented course will examine experimental design, laboratory methods, and quantitative analytical tools used in genetic and genomic research. Students will analyze supplied data using a variety of software packages.  Prerequisites: BGGN 223, or BIOM 252 and BIOM 272, or equivalent. 

BGGN 238A. Integrative Microbiology I (4)
To introduce students with structural and functional properties of microorganisms and with the role of microbes in the world. Course will emphasize the integrative aspects of microbiology. First course in series. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

BGGN 238B. Integrative Microbiology II (4)
To introduce students with structural and functional properties of microorganisms and with the role of microbes in the world. Course will emphasize the integrative aspects of microbiology. Second course in series. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

BGGN 245. Advanced Topics in Cancer Research and Therapy (2)
Lectures on basic and advanced concepts in cancer biology, will include defining outstanding contemporary questions and cutting-edge basic and translational research. Will rely on participants reading assigned literature prior to lectures. For PhD or MS students. Course will be held at the Salk Institute. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BGGN 246A. Computational Neurobiology (2)
Students read classic and modern papers that form the basis of the undergraduate lectures (BIPN 146), which they are encouraged to attend. Students present these papers at weekly discussion sessions. The focus of 246A is cellular neuronal properties. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BGGN 248. Molecular Mechanisms of Neural Development (4)
This course will cover the cellular and molecular basis of neural development. Focus is on primary research papers and topics include neural induction and neurogenesis, cell patterning, neuronal and glial differentiation, neuronal migration, axon pathfinding, synapogenesis, neuronal cell death, regeneration, activity-dependent events, topographic maps, invertebrate and vertebrate model systems. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BGGN 249A-B-C. Basic Neuroscience (4-4-4)
(Cross-listed with NEU 200A-B-C.) These courses are designed for graduate students in the neurosciences and other departments that are part of the interdisciplinary program (i.e., Biology, Cog Sci). These courses have been designed to cover as much basic neuroscience as possible in three quarters of study. These are required courses for all first-year neurosciences graduate students. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BGGN 260. Neurodynamics (4)
Introduction to the nonlinear dynamics of neurons and simple neural systems through nonlinear dynamics, bifurcation theory, and chaotic motions. The dynamics of single cells is considered at different levels of abstraction, e.g., biophysical and “reduced” models for analysis of regularly spiking and bursting cells, their dynamical properties, and their representation in phase space. Laboratory exercises will accompany the lectures. Duplicate credit not allowed for cross-listed courses: BGGN 260, BENG 260, and PHYS 279. Prerequisites: graduate level or consent of instructor.

BGGN 262. 3D Electron Microscopy Macromolecules (4)
(Cross-listed with Chem 265.) Biological macromolecules and supramolecular complexes as well as organelles, and small cells are being examined in three dimensions by modern electron cryomicroscopy and image reconstruction techniques. The basic principles of transmission electron microscopy and 3D image reconstruction are discussed. Chem 265/BGGN 262 students will be required to complete an additional oral presentation or paper or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 165/BIMM 162.

BGGN 264. Structural Biology of Viruses (4)
(Cross-listed with Chem 264.) An introduction of virus structures, how they are determined, and how they facilitate the various stages of the viral life cycle from host recognition and entry to replication, assembly, release, and transmission to uninfected host cells. Students will be required to complete a term paper. (May not be offered every year.) Recommended preparation: elementary biochemistry as treated in Chem 114A or BIBC 100 and a basic course in cell biology or consent of the instructor. 

BGGN 266. Advanced Laboratory in Biophysical Techniques (6)
Experiments that emphasize biophysical principles through hands-on experience, with an emphasis on the blending of physical measurements with a clearly identified biological problem. Exercises include the use of optical tweezers to measure viscous forces at the level of cellular organelles, the characterization of sensorimotor control in the fly during visually guided flight, and the use of microscopic imaging techniques to characterize cell motility and organelle transport. Includes instruction in LabView. Students are encouraged to attend the Phys 173 undergraduate lectures. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Phys 120A, BILD 1, and Chem 6CL for undergraduates.

BGGN 271. Advanced Experimental Methods in Biology (4–12)
Advanced laboratory and/or field experience in contemporary biological methodology. Open only to students enrolled in the integrated Bachelor’s/Master’s Degree Program. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and approval of division chair.

BGGN 290. Advances in Cellular and Molecular Mechanisms
Students present and discuss papers on recent discoveries involving basic mechanistic research into biological phenomena. Papers are selected by instructors from visiting seminar speaker’s research from the biological sciences and biochemistry seminar series. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate (PhD) standing only; for students in the following major code BI77, or consent of instructor.

BGGN 292. Professional Pathways in Biological Sciences (1)
Students meet experienced science professionals from a wide variety of backgrounds, including academia, science industry, and allied roles. Through discussions with these professionals, students will refine and improve their professional skills, including communication and presentation expertise, and develop a personal career action plan. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate (PhD) standing only; for students in the following major code BI77; or consent of instructor.

BGGN 293. Scientific Writing in Biology (2)
This course offers training in writing about students’ own research; presenting the background to their thesis, preparing a figure, analyzing, and discussing data in a written form. Using published literature on scientific writing, students will practice revising their own writing and providing constructive feedback to their peers. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: for master’s students only in the following major: BI77.

BGGN 295. Scientific Presentation in Biology (2)
Students learn effective ways of presenting their research to biologists and to the general public. Examples of posters and research talks will be analyzed and discussed. Students will practice short and extended oral presentations of their research. As a final project, students will prepare and present a poster of their research in the biological sciences Student Research Showcase. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: for master’s students only in the following major: BI77.

BGGN 297. Research Conference (1–3)
Group and individual discussion of research activities and of current literature. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

BGGN 298. Laboratory Projects in Biology (3–12)
An introduction to contemporary laboratory techniques and research interests through independent, original projects under the direction of individual faculty members. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

BGGN 299. Thesis Research in Biology (1–12)
Directed research on dissertation topic. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

BGGN 500. Graduate Student Apprentice Teaching (4)
Introduction to scholarly teaching at the college level. Students will be introduced to the theory and practice of college-level biology teaching. Under the supervision and mentorship of a course instructor, graduate student apprentices will assist in the instruction of laboratory and lecture biology courses, and the development and implementation of effective teaching practices. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit six times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

BGJC 207. Journal Club in Neurobiology (1)
Weekly presentations and discussions pertaining to research results reported in recently published literature. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BGJC 208. Journal Club in Plant Molecular Biology (1)
Weekly presentations and discussions pertaining to research results reported in recently published literature. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199.  

BGJC 213. Journal Club in Computational Neurobiology (1)
Weekly presentations and discussions pertaining to research results reported in recently published literature. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199. 

BGRD 205. Research Discussion in Plant Membrane Biology (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199.   

BGRD 207. Research Discussion in Neuronal Pattern Generation (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199. 

BGRD 210. Research Discussion in Virology (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199.   

BGRD 211. Research Discussion in Developmental Cellular Neurobiology (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199. 

BGRD 212. Research Discussion in Behavior and Development of Simple Nervous Systems (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199.   

BGRD 213. Research Discussion in Golgi Structure and Function (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199.   

BGRD 216. Research Discussion in Molecular and Cell Biology (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199.   

BGRD 218. Research Discussion in Plant Molecular Genetics (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199.  

BGRD 221. Research Discussion in Behavioral Ecology (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199. 

BGRD 222. Research Discussion in Evolutionary Molecular Ecology (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199.   

BGRD 230. Research Discussion in Cell Signaling Pathways (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199. 

BGRD 231. Research Discussion in Nuclear Transport and Function (1)
Presentations of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199. 

BGRD 234. Research Discussion in Cell Signaling in Drosophila (3)
Presentation of new research results and discussions of closely related published reports. All students are expected to report on their own research findings each quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199.   

BGSE 200. Seminar in Biology (1)
Invited speakers from the United States and abroad, who are leaders in various aspects of biological research, describe their current research. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit sixteen times. Prerequisites: none for graduate students. Undergraduates must be seniors or enrolled in BISP 199. 

BGSE 205. Graduate Research Seminar (1)
Discussions of recent research in various aspects of biological research conducted by third- and fourth-year doctoral students in the Division of Biological Sciences. S/U grades only.

BIOM 200A. Molecules to Organisms: Concepts (6)
This course provides a systematic approach to current biomedical research, using analysis of selected topics to focus on the process of research discovery and its critical evaluation. The course progresses through five thematic modules that cover genes, building a cell, cellular responses, organogenesis, and the processes that allow survival in the world. Prerequisites: limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 200B. Molecules to Organisms: Approaches (2)
Students will critically evaluate classic and current research papers in biomedical research, in addition to being exposed to state-of-the-art technologies in research. Prerequisites: limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 201. Seminars in Biomedical Research (4)
This course includes attendance at seminars in the biomedical sciences and is designed to provoke critical discussion of the presented findings and scientific approaches in a small-group setting. Prerequisites: limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 209. Lipid Cell Signaling Genomics, Proteomics, and Metabolomics (2)
Overview of new systems biology “omics” approaches to lipid metabolism and cell signaling including interrogating gene and lipid databases, techniques for lipidomics, and implications for profiling and biomarker discovery in blood and tissues relevant to inflammatory and other human diseases. Recommended: one quarter of undergraduate biochemistry. Prerequisites: none.

BIOM 218. Current Topics in Anthropogeny (1)
Participation in the symposia held by CARTA three times a year. Students shadow one of the speakers during public and private symposia. Students meet after each symposium and each writes a summary of the speaker’s presentation and ensuring discussion. Prerequisites: graduate standing required.

BIOM 219. Ethics in Scientific Research (1)
Overview of ethical issues in scientific research, conflicts of interest; national, statewide and campus issues and requirement; ethical issues in publications; authorship; retention of research records; tracing of research records; attribution; plagiarism; copyright considerations; primary, archival and meeting summary publications; ethical procedures and policies; NIH, NSF, California and UC San Diego; case studies and precedents in ethics. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

BIOM 222. Essentials of Glycobiology (2)
Advanced elective for graduate/medical students who have had core courses in cell biology or biochemistry. Expert faculty will present a coordinated overview of the field of glycobiology, which explores the structure, synthesis, and functions of sugar chains in biological systems.

BIOM 224. Topics in Cancer Research (2)
Each quarter will focus on an important area of cancer research such as immunology (fall), growth regulation (winter), and cancer genetics (spring). One-hour lecture coordinated with a one-hour seminar with the opportunity to meet with the invited speaker. Prerequisites: limited to senior undergraduates, graduate students, and medical students. (W, S)

BIOM 225. Introduction to Anthropogeny (2)
An overview of the current state of research into human origins with illustration of the spatial and temporal scales: from million-year-old phylogenies to millisecond physiological processes, and from human societies dispersed across continents to cells and molecules. Prerequisites: graduate standing required.

BIOM 226. Hormone Action (3)
The course covers recent advances in research into hormone action, molecular endocrinology, lipid, lipoprotein, and carbohydrate metabolism, and reproductive medicine. Prerequisites: BIOM 200, 201. Limited to BMS graduate students, except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 227. Mouse Models of Human Disease (2)
This course provides an overview of the use of mouse models in biomedical research. Sessions will cover general mouse biology, genetics, technologies for generating mutant mice and will focus on model selection, methodological approaches, data interpretation, experimental design, and ethics of animal research. Student participation and discussion will be encouraged. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BIOM 228. Modern Drug Discovery Technologies (2)
Drug discovery is an emerging science available to academic investigators. This course provides an overview of these drug discovery techniques, including high through-put screening, cell-based screening, computational methods of lead compound discovery, and chemical methods of optimization. Prerequisites: graduate student status or consent of graduate program director.

BIOM 229. Advanced Anthropogeny (2)
Advanced discussions following on Introduction to Anthropogeny. Online “Museum of Comparative Anthropogeny (MOCA)” will serve as major scaffold for this in-depth course. MOCA (http://carta.anthropogeny.org/content/about-moca) has over five hundred topics addressing uniquely human traits across twenty-four domains of knowledge and scientific disciplines. Prerequisites: BIOM 225.

BIOM 231. Contemporary Topics in Pharmacology (2)
A selection of short courses in the biomedical and pharmacological sciences offered by resident experts. Topics will vary annually. Each short course will last one to two weeks, meeting five hours a week. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F, W, S)

BIOM 232. In vivo Cellular and Molecular Imaging (1)
Strategies such as positron emission tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, and ultrasound for nondestructively imaging molecular and cell biological events inside living animals and eventually human patients. Emphasis on detecting angiogenesis, apoptosis, and expression of tumor-specific genes. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate courses in molecular and cell biology.

BIOM 233. Structural Biology in Cell Signaling and Drug Discovery (2)
This class is taught by SBMRI program faculty, whose laboratories are actively involved in determining the three-dimensional structure of complex biological entities. The course covers basic principles of crystallization, cryo-electron microscopy, and NMR, and modern techniques for Ab-initio-structural analysis. Prerequisites: graduate standing status or consent of graduate program director.

BIOM 234. Practical Histopathology and Mouse Models of Human Diseases (2)
The course is designed to introduce or reintroduce histology and histopathology of the various organ systems to those who need to analyze mouse tissues as an essential part of their research. Prerequisites: standard undergraduate biology courses.

BIOM 235. Pharmacogenomics (3)
This course provides an understanding of the evolving area of human genomics and correlation between an individual’s or subpopulation’s genetic makeup and their response to drugs. The information provides the student the basis for select prescribing and/or targeting drug development to improve drug therapy outcomes and reduce adverse drug responses. Prerequisites: admission to Skaggs School of Pharmacy and Pharmaceutical Sciences or BMS Program (Major Code BS75) or consent of instructor.

BIOM 240. Critical Reading in Cell Biology (3)
This course will focus on critical reading and understanding current areas in cell and molecular biology. The exact topic will vary, but will include such topics as protein trafficking, cell division, intracellular movement, cell interaction, and cell cycle.

BIOM 242. Seminar in Genetics (1)
Intended for graduate students interested in principles of classical and molecular genetics. Will attend weekly genetics seminar and participate in didactic/discussion preparatory session. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

BIOM 246. Current Literature in Glycobiology (1)
Informal presentations on topics of current interest in glycobiology as represented in the current scientific literature. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

BIOM 252. Genetics and Genomics (3)
This course will examine the basic principles of genetics and genomics. We will focus on classic discoveries and examples of approaches to current experimental problems. Emphasis areas will vary but general topics include Mendelian inheritance, imprinting, cytogenetics, genome structure, genetic variation, linkage and recombination, complex traits, statistical genetics, population genetics, genomic tools and methodology, medical genetics, model organisms. Prerequisites: BIOM 200, 201. Limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 253. Pathogens and Host Defense (3)
This course will examine the innate and adaptive immune responses of humans to microbial infection. In parallel, we will explore the virulence mechanisms through which certain medically important viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites subvert host defense to produce infectious disease. Emphasis will be placed on basic molecular genetic and cellular approaches to understanding microbial pathogenesis and host susceptibility, including progress toward novel antibiotic and immune stimulatory therapies. Prerequisites: BIOM 200, 201.

BIOM 254. Molecular and Cell Biology (3)
This course will examine the basic principles of molecular and cellular biology and their impact on medicine focusing on classic discoveries and examples of approaches to current experimental problems. Emphasis areas will vary but will include genes and genomics, chromosome biology and nuclear structure, transcriptional regulation, RNA processing, cell cycle control, cell growth and death, cell differentiation and stem cell biology, molecular motors and motility, membrane trafficking and signaling. Prerequisites: BIOM 200, 201. Limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 255. Molecular Basis of Drug Action and Disease Therapy (3)
Molecular basis of drug action; basis of disease; drug invention. Topics may include: basic principles, autonomic nervous system; CV, pulmonary, diabetes, cancer therapy, pharmacotherapy of CNS disease (depression, etc.) pain, infections (bacterial, viral, malarial). Students that have taken both 255A and 255B cannot take 255 for credit. Prerequisites: BIOM 200A-B, 201. Limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor (BS 75, BS 77).

BIOM 256. Molecular Pathology of Cancer (3)
This course outlines a current understanding of genetic mechanisms that underlie carcinogenesis and their impact on cell proliferation, differentiation, angiogenesis, metastasis, and survival. The topics of tumor histopathology, the tumor stem cell phenotype, and cancer drug design are also addressed. Prerequisites: restricted to BMS graduate students with major codes BS75/BS77 or by department approval.

BIOM 262. Quantitative Methods in Genetics (4)
This advanced problem-oriented course will examine experimental design, laboratory methods, and quantitative analytical tools used in genetic and genomic research. Students will analyze supplied data using a variety of software packages. Prerequisites: BGGN 223, or BIOM 252 and BIOM 272, or equivalent.

BIOM 264. Molecular and Cellular Basis of Disease (2)
Lectures on the molecular and cellular mechanisms of pathogenesis. Topics will include Alzheimer’s disease, cell surface and unclear receptors in disease, signal transduction by oncogenes in cancer cells, AIDS, human diseases affecting glycosylation pathways, rheumatoid arthritis, and arteriosclerosis. Prerequisites: graduate students. (W)

BIOM 266. Environmental and Molecular Toxicology (4)
Molecular and cellular mechanisms underlie the actions of environmental toxicants. This course will investigate approaches to study the impact of environmental toxicants on human health. Other modern approaches that are being implemented to detect and remediate environmental toxicants will also be examined. BGGN 256, BIOM 266 and Chem 266 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 166 and BIMM 166. Prerequisites: Chem 114A and 114B required for Chem 166 and BIBC 100 and BIBC 102 required for BIMM 166. (S)

BIOM 267. Drug Discovery, Development, and Commercialization (3)
This elective is designed to increase knowledge of the drug discovery, development, regulatory, and commercialization process. Students will have an increased understanding of how an investigational agent eventually becomes an approved drug for patient use. Lectures and a student group project will be conducted for this elective. Prerequisites: open to SSPPS, SOM, graduate Biomedical Sciences Program students and Rady School of Management graduate students.

BIOM 272. Seminars in Genetics (2)
This course includes attendance at seminars in genetics and is designed to provoke critical discussion of the presented findings and scientific approaches in a small group setting. Prerequisites: limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 273. Seminars in Microbiology (2)
This course includes attendance at seminars in microbiology and is designed to provoke critical discussion of the presented findings and scientific approaches in a small group setting. Prerequisites: limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 274. Seminars in Molecular and Cell Biology (2)
This course includes attendance at seminars in molecular and cell biology and is designed to provoke critical discussion of the presented findings and scientific approaches in a small group setting. Prerequisites: limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 275. Seminars in Pharmacology (2)
This course includes attendance at seminars in pharmacology and is designed to provoke critical discussion of the presented findings and the scientific approaches in a small group setting. Prerequisites: limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 276. Seminars in Physiology (2)
This course includes attendance at seminars in physiology and is designed to provoke critical discussion of the presented findings and scientific approaches in a small group setting. Prerequisites: limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 277. Seminars in Molecular Pathology (2)
This course presents developments in cellular and molecular pathology research ongoing in the molecular pathology division of BMS. Each session comprises three fifteen-minute presentations from different faculty members. Discussion questions are fielded during or after each presentation. Prerequisites: limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.

BIOM 283. Supramolecular Structure Determination Laboratory (4)
A laboratory course combining hands-on mass spectrometry and bioinformatics tools to explore the relationship between structure and function in macromolecules. Tools for peptide sequencing, analysis of post-translational modification, and fragmentation analysis by mass spectrometry are examples of experiments students will run. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

BIOM 285. Statistical Inference in the Medical Sciences (2)
An introduction to basic techniques used in biomedical literature: t tests, ANOVA, chi-square, linear and nonlinear regression. Emphasis will be on understanding the appropriate use and interpretation of the tests, rather than on the calculations.

BIOM 287. Tissue Engineering Laboratory (4)
Students will learn to conduct tissue engineering and developmental biology experiments, microfabricate cell culture systems, engineer biopolymer materials, and develop and analyze quantitative models of transport, cell fate, and growth mechanics. The understanding and manipulation of multicellular processes that comprise development and growth involves specialized areas of biomechanics, developmental biology, biomaterials, and the tools of molecular biology, as well as the integration of theory and experiment. To fabricate functional tissues, it is important to establish underlying molecular and physical mechanisms, and then control and integrate these. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

BIOM 294. Pharmacology and Molecular Biology Journal Club (0–1)
Current literature in molecular pharmacology and molecular biology is reviewed. Two papers are chosen per week for oral presentation by students. Faculty critique the student presentations. Prerequisites: enrollment in PhD program at year two and above. (F,W,S)

BIOM 295. Pharmacology Research Discussions (0–1)
Student, faculty, and fellow discussion groups on research projects. Students are expected to present research findings to fellows, other PhD students, and faculty.

BIOM 296. Directed Reading (1–4)
Reading of special topics under the direction of a faculty member. Exact subject matter to be arranged in individual cases. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

BIOM 297. Progress in Signal Transduction (1)
Papers describing recent progress in signal transduction from the cell-surface to the nucleus will be chosen from recent research literature. Two papers will be discussed and criticized in detail each week for one hour. Prerequisites: graduate-level biochemistry, cell biology, and molecular biology; registered as second-year and above graduate student in biomedical sciences, biology, or chemistry. (F,W,S)

BIOM 298. Directed Study (1–12)
Reading and laboratory study of special topics under the direction of a faculty member. Exact subject matter to be arranged in individual cases. (F,W,S)

BIOM 299. Independent Study or Research (1–12)
Independent study or research. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

CHEM 4. Basic Chemistry (4)
Offers less-well prepared science majors the fundamental skills necessary to succeed in Chem 6. Emphasizes quantitative problems. Topics include nomenclature, stoichiometry, basic reactions, bonding, and the periodic table. May not receive credit for both Chem 4 and Chem 11. Includes a laboratory/discussion each week. Recommended: concurrent enrollment in Math 3C, 4C or 10A or higher. (F)

CHEM 6A. General Chemistry I (4)
First quarter of a three-quarter sequence intended for science and engineering majors. Topics include: atomic theory, bonding, molecular geometry, stoichiometry, types of reactions, and thermochemistry. May not be taken for credit after Chem 6AH. Recommended: proficiency in high school chemistry and/or physics; concurrent or prior enrollment in Math 10A or 20A. (F,W,S)

CHEM 6AH. Honors General Chemistry I (4)
First quarter of a three-quarter honors sequence intended for well-prepared science and engineering majors. Topics include quantum mechanics, molecular orbital theory, and bonding. An understanding of nomenclature, stoichiometry, and other fundamentals is assumed. Students completing 6AH may not subsequently take 6A for credit. Recommended: completion of a high school physics course strongly recommended. Concurrent enrollment in Math 20A or higher. (F)

CHEM 6B. General Chemistry II (4)
Second quarter of a three-quarter sequence intended for science and engineering majors. Topics include: covalent bonding, gases, liquids, and solids, colligative properties, physical and chemical equilibria, acids and bases, solubility. May not be taken for credit after Chem 6BH. Prerequisites: Chem 6A or 6AH and Math 10A or 20A. Recommended: concurrent or prior enrollment in Math 10B or 20B. (F,W,S)

CHEM 6BH. Honors General Chemistry II (4)
Second quarter of a three-quarter honors sequence intended for well-prepared science and engineering majors. Topics include: colligative properties, bulk material properties, chemical equilibrium, acids and bases, and thermodynamics. Three hours lecture and one hour recitation. Students completing 6BH may not subsequently take 6B for credit. Prerequisites: Chem 6AH and Math 20A. Recommended: concurrent or prior enrollment in Math 20B. (W)

CHEM 6C. General Chemistry III (4)
Third quarter of a three-quarter sequence intended for science and engineering majors. Topics include: thermodynamics, kinetics, electrochemistry, coordination chemistry, and introductions to nuclear, main group organic, and biochemistry. May not be taken for credit after Chem 6CH. Prerequisites: Chem 6B or 6BH. Recommended: completion of Math 10B or 20B. (F,W,S)

CHEM 6CH. Honors General Chemistry III (4)
Third quarter of a three-quarter honors sequence intended for well-prepared science and engineering majors. Topics are similar to those in 6C but are taught at a higher level and faster pace. Students completing 6CH may not subsequently take 6C for credit. Prerequisites: Chem 6BH and Math 20B. (S)

CHEM 7L. General Chemistry Laboratory (4)
Condenses a year of introductory training in analytical, inorganic, physical, and synthetic techniques into one intensive quarter. A materials fee is required. A mandatory safety exam must be passed. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 7L and Chem 7LM. Prerequisites: Chem 6B or Chem 6BH. (F,W,S)

CHEM 7LM. General Chemistry Laboratory for Majors (4)
Condenses a year of introductory training in analytical, inorganic, physical, and synthetic techniques into one intensive quarter. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 7L and Chem 7LM. A materials fee is required. A safety exam must be passed. Enrollment preference given to chemistry and biochemistry majors, followed by other science/engineering majors. Prerequisites: Chem 6B or Chem 6BH. Enrollment is limited to majors in the Department of Chemistry and Biochemistry, unless space is available. (F,W,S)

CHEM 11. The Periodic Table (4)
Introduction to the material world of atoms and small inorganic molecules. Intended for nonscience majors. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 4 and Chem 11. (F,S)

CHEM 12. Molecules and Reactions (4)
Introduction to molecular bonding and structure and chemical reactions, including organic molecules and synthetic polymers. Intended for nonscience majors. Prerequisites: Chem 11 or good knowledge of high school chemistry. Cannot be taken for credit after any organic chemistry course. (W)

CHEM 13. Chemistry of Life (4)
Introduction to biochemistry for nonscience majors. Topics include carbohydrates, lipids, amino acids and proteins, with an introduction to metabolic pathways in human physiology. Prerequisites: Chem 12. (S)

CHEM 15. Chemistry of the Universe (4)
This is a one-quarter, nonmathematical chemistry course for nonscience majors covering the origin of the universe, the elements, and the formation of the solar system. The evolution of the Earth’s atmosphere, hydrosphere, geosphere, and biosphere will be covered, as well as contemporary problems in environmental chemistry. Cannot be taken for credit after any other chemistry course.

CHEM 87. Freshman Seminar in Chemistry and Biochemistry (1)
This seminar will present topics in chemistry at a level appropriate for first-year students.

CHEM 92. Undergraduate Pharmacology Seminar (1)
Selected topics in pharmacology and toxicology. (S)

CHEM 96. Introduction to Teaching Science (2)
(Cross-listed with EDS 31.) Explores routine challenges and exceptional difficulties students often have in learning science. Prepares students to make meaningful observations of how K–12 teachers deal with difficulties. Explores strategies that teachers may use to pose problems that stimulate students’ intellectual curiosity.

CHEM 99. Independent Study (2 or 4)
Independent literature or laboratory research by arrangement with and under the direction of a member of the Department of Chemistry and Biochemistry faculty. Students must register on a P/NP basis. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, 3.0 minimum UC San Diego GPA, consent of instructor and department, completion of thirty units of undergraduate study at UC San Diego, completed and approved Special Studies form.

CHEM 99R. Independent Study (1)
Independent study or research under the direction of a member of the faculty. Prerequisites: student must be of first-year standing and a Regent’s Scholar; approved Special Studies form.

CHEM 100A. Analytical Chemistry Laboratory (4)
Laboratory course emphasizing classical quantitative chemical analysis techniques, including separation and gravimetric methods, as well as an introduction to instrumental analysis. Prerequisites: Chem 6C or 6CH and Chem 6BL or 7L. Recommended: Phys 2CL or 2BL. Program or material fee may apply. (F,W,S)

CHEM 100B. Instrumental Chemistry Laboratory (5)
Hands-on laboratory course focuses on development of correct laboratory work habits and methodologies for the operation of modern analytical instrumentation. Gas chromatography, mass spectrometry, high performance liquid chromatography, ion chromatography, atomic absorption spectroscopy, fluorescence spectrometry, infrared spectrometry. Lecture focuses on fundamental theoretical principles, applications, and limitations of instrumentation used for qualitative and quantitative analysis. A materials fee is required. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 100B and Chem 101. Prerequisites: Chem 100A and Phys 2C or 2D and Phys 2CL or 2DL. (F,W,S)

CHEM 105A. Physical Chemistry Laboratory (4)
Laboratory course in experimental physical chemistry. Prerequisites: one or more of Chem 126, 127, 131, 133 and Chem 100A, and Phys 2CL. A materials fee is required for this course. (F,W,S)

CHEM 105B. Physical Chemistry Laboratory (4)
Laboratory course in experimental physical chemistry. Prerequisites: Chem 105A. A materials fee is required for this course. (F,W,S)

CHEM 108. Protein Biochemistry Laboratory (6)
The application of techniques to study protein structure and function, including electrophoresis, protein purification, column chromatography, enzyme kinetics, and immunochemistry. Prerequisites: Chem 143A and Chem 114A. (Note: formerly Chem 112A. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 108 and BIBC 103.) A materials fee may be required for this course. (F,W)

CHEM 109. Recombinant DNA Laboratory (6)
This laboratory will introduce students to the tools of molecular biology and will involve experiments with recombinant DNA techniques. Prerequisites: Chem 143A and Chem 114A. (Note: formerly Chem 112B. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 109 and BIMM 101.) A materials fee may be required for this course. (S)

CHEM 113. Physical Chemistry of Biological Macromolecules (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 213.) A discussion of the physical principles governing biological macromolecular structure and function, and the physicochemical experiments used to probe their structure and function. Chem 213 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 113. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH; and Chem 127 or 131 (113); or graduate standing (213).

CHEM 114A. Biochemical Structure and Function (4)
Introduction to biochemistry from a structural and functional viewpoint. Prerequisites: Chem 140A. (Note: Students may not receive credit for both Chem 114A and BIBC 100.) (F,W)

CHEM 114B. Biochemical Energetics and Metabolism (4)
This course is an introduction to the metabolic reactions in the cell which produce and utilize energy. The course material will include energy-producing pathways: glycolysis, Krebs cycle, oxidative phosphorylation, fatty-acid oxidation. Biosynthesis of amino acids, lipids, carbohydrates, purines, pyrimidines, proteins, nucleic acids. Prerequisites: Chem 114A or BIBC 100 and Chem 140B. (Note: Students may not receive credit for both Chem 114B and BIBC 102.) (W)

CHEM 114C. Biosynthesis of Macromolecules (4)
Mechanisms of biosynthesis of macromolecules—particularly proteins and nucleic acids. Emphasis is on how these processes are controlled and integrated with metabolism of the cell. Prerequisites: Chem 114A or BIBC 100. (Note: students may not receive credit for both Chem 114C and BIMM 100.) (S)

CHEM 114D. Molecular and Cellular Biochemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 214.) This course represents a continuation of 114C, or an introductory course for first- and second-year graduate students, and covers topics in molecular and cellular biochemistry. Emphasis will be placed on contemporary approaches to the isolation and characterization of mammalian genes and proteins, and molecular genetic approaches to understanding eukaryotic development and human disease. Chem 214 students will be required to complete additional course work beyond that expected of students in Chem 114D. Prerequisites: Chem 114A-C or consent of instructor. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 116. Chemistry of Enzyme Catalyzed Reactions (4)
A discussion of the chemistry of representative enzyme catalyzed reactions is presented. Enzyme reaction mechanisms and their relation to enzyme structure are emphasized. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH, and Chem 114A. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 118. Pharmacology and Toxicology (4)
A survey of the biochemical action of drugs and toxins as well as their absorption and excretion. Prerequisites: Chem 114A. Priority will be given to Pharmacological Chemistry majors. (S)

CHEM 120A. Inorganic Chemistry I (4)
The chemistry of the main group elements in terms of atomic structure, ionic and covalent bonding. Structural theory involving s, p, and unfilled d orbitals. Thermodynamic and spectroscopic criteria for structure and stability of compounds and chemical reactions of main group elements in terms of molecular structure and reactivity. Prerequisites: Chem 6C or 6CH and Chem 140A. (F,S)

CHEM 120B. Inorganic Chemistry II (4)
A continuation of the discussion of structure, bonding, and reactivity with emphasis on transition metals and other elements using filled d orbitals to form bonds. Coordination chemistry in terms of valence bond, crystal field, and molecular orbital theory. The properties and reactivities of transition metal complexes including organometallic compounds. Prerequisites: Chem 120A. (W)

CHEM 123. Advanced Inorganic Chemistry Laboratory (4)
Synthesis, analysis, and physical characterization of inorganic chemical compounds. A materials fee is required for this course. Prerequisites: Chem 120A and 143AH or 143A. (W,S)

CHEM 125. Bioinorganic Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 225.) The roles of metal ions in biological systems, with emphasis on transition metal ions in enzymes that transfer electrons, bind oxygen, and fix nitrogen. Also included are metal complexes in medicine, toxicity, and metal ion storage and transport. Chem 225 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 124. Prerequisites: Chem 114A or 120A or graduate standing. Recommended: Chem 114A and/or 120A or, for graduate students, their equivalents. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 126. Physical Chemistry: Quantum Mechanics (4)
With Chem 127, Chem 126 condenses Physical Chemistry into two quarters. They may be taken in either order. The emphasis is on biochemical and environmental applications. Quantum mechanics and molecular structure, spectroscopy. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 126 and Chem 133. Prerequisites: Chem 6B or 6AH, Phys 2C or 2D, and Math 20D. (F)

CHEM 127. Physical Chemistry: Thermodynamics (4)
With Chem 126, Chem 127 condenses Physical Chemistry into two quarters. They may be taken in either order. The emphasis is on biochemical and environmental applications. Thermodynamics, first and second laws, thermochemistry, chemical equilibrium, solutions, kinetic theory, reaction kinetics. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 127 and Chem 131. Prerequisites: Chem 6C or 6BH, Phys 2C or 2D, and Math 20C. (W)

CHEM 130. Chemical Physics: Quantum Mechanics (4)
With Chem 131 and 132, Chem 130 is part of the Physical Chemistry sequence taught over three quarters. Recommended as the first course of the sequence. Key topics covered in this course include quantum mechanics, atomic and molecular spectroscopy, and molecular structure. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 130 and Chem 133, or for both Chem 130 and Chem 126. Prerequisites: Chem 6C or 6CH, and Phys 2C or 2D, and Math 20D. (F)

CHEM 131. Chemical Physics: Stat Thermo I (4)
With Chem 130 and 132, Chem 131 is part of the Physical Chemistry sequence taught over three quarters. Recommended as the second course of the sequence. Key topics covered in this course include thermodynamics, chemical equilibrium, phase equilibrium, and chemistry of solutions. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 131 and Chem 127. Prerequisites: Chem 6C or 6CH, Math 20C, and Phys 2C or 2D. (W)

CHEM 132. Chemical Physics: Stat Thermo II (4)
With Chem 130 and 131, Chem 132 is part of the Physical Chemistry sequence taught over three quarters. Recommended as the third course of the sequence. Key topics covered in this course include chemical statistics, kinetic theory, and reaction kinetics. Prerequisites: Chem 130 or 133, and Chem 131. (S)

CHEM 135. Molecular Spectroscopy (4)
Time-dependent behavior of systems; interaction of matter with light; selection rules. Radiative and nonradiative processes, coherent phenomena, and the density matrices. Instrumentation, measurement, and interpretation. Prior or concurrent enrollment in Chem 105A recommended. Prerequisites: Chem 133 and Math 20D. (S)

CHEM 140A. Organic Chemistry I (4)
Introduction to organic chemistry, with applications to biochemistry. Bonding theory, isomerism, stereochemistry, chemical and physical properties. Introduction to substitution, addition, and elimination reactions. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 140A and Chem 140AH. Prerequisites: Chem 6B or Chem 6BH. (F,W,S)

CHEM 140B. Organic Chemistry II (4)
Continuation of Organic Chemistry I, 140A. Methods of analysis, chemistry of hydrocarbons, chemistry of the carbonyl group. Introduction to the reactions of biologically important molecules. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 141B and Chem 140B. Prerequisites: Chem 140A (a grade of C or higher in Chem 140A is strongly recommended). (F,W,S)

CHEM 140AH. Honors Organic Chemistry I (4)
Rigorous introduction to organic chemistry, with preview of biochemistry. Bonding theory, isomerism, stereochemistry, physical properties, chemical reactivity. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 140AH and Chem 140A. Prerequisites: B+ or higher grade in Chem 6C or 6CH.

CHEM 140BH. Honors Organic Chemistry (4)
Organic chemistry course for honors-level students with a strong background in chemistry. Similar to Chem 140B, but emphasizes mechanistic aspects of reactions and effects of molecular structure on reactivity. Students may not receive credit for Chem 140B and Chem 140BH. Prerequisites: grade of B or higher in Chem 140A.

CHEM 140C. Organic Chemistry III (4)
Continuation of Organic Chemistry I (140A) and Organic Chemistry II (140B). Organic chemistry of biologically important molecules: carboxylic acids, carbohydrates, proteins, fatty acids, biopolymers, natural products. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 140C and Chem 141C. Prerequisites: Chem 140B (a grade of C or higher in Chem 140B is strongly recommended). (F,W,S)

CHEM 140CH. Honors Organic Chemistry (4)
Continuation of Organic Chemistry 140B or 140BH, at honors level. Chemistry of carbonylic acids, carbohydrates, proteins, lipids biopolymers, natural products. Emphasis on mechanistic aspects and structure reactivity relationships. Prerequisites: grade of B+ or higher in Chem 140B, or B– higher in Chem 140BH.

CHEM 141. Organic Nanomaterials (4)
This course will provide an introduction to the physics and chemistry of soft matter, followed by a literature-based critical examination of several ubiquitous classes of organic nanomaterials and their technological applications. Topics include self-assembled monolayers, block copolymers, liquid crystals, photoresists, organic electronic materials, micelles and vesicles, soft lithography, organic colloids, organic nano composites, and applications in biomedicine and food science. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH.

CHEM 143A. Organic Chemistry Laboratory (4)
Introduction to organic laboratory techniques. Separation, and purification, spectroscopy, product analysis, and effects of reaction conditions. Prerequisites: Chem 6BL or 7L, and Chem 140A or Chem 140AH. A materials fee is required. A mandatory safety exam must be passed within the first two weeks. (Note: students may not receive credit for both Chem 143A and Chem 143AH.)

CHEM 143AH. Honors Organic Chemistry Laboratory (4)
Organic chemistry laboratory for chemistry majors and other honors-level students with strong background in Chem 140A. Similar to Chem 143A, but emphasizes instrumental methods of product identification, separation, and analysis. A materials fee is required. A mandatory safety exam must be passed within the first two weeks. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 143A and Chem 143AH. Prerequisites: Chem 7L and B or better grade in Chem 140A. (W)

CHEM 143B. Organic Chemistry Laboratory (4)
Continuation of Chem 143AH or 143A, emphasizing synthetic methods of organic chemistry. Prerequisites: Chem 143AH or 143A, Chem 140B (may be taken concurrently). Enrollment is limited to majors in the Department of Chemistry and Biochemistry, unless space is available. A materials fee is required for this course. (W,S)

CHEM 143C. Organic Chemistry Laboratory (5)
Identification of unknown organic compounds by a combination of chemical and physical techniques. This course is intended for chemistry majors only. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: Chem 143 AH or 143A and Chem 140B. Must be chemistry major (CH25, CH28, CH31, CH32, CH33, CH34, CH35, CH36, CH37). (F)

CHEM 143D. Molecular Design and Synthesis (4)
Advanced organic synthesis. Relationships between molecular structure and reactivity using modern synthetic methods and advanced instrumentation. Stresses importance of molecular design, optimized reaction conditions for development of practically useful synthesis, and problem-solving skills. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH and Chem 143B. A materials fee is required for this course. (S)

CHEM 145. Chemistry and Biochemistry of Biofuels (4)
Fundamentals of the chemistry and biochemistry of petroleum and biofuel technologies. This course explores chemical identity and properties, metabolic pathways and engineering, refining processes, and analytical techniques related to current and future biofuels. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH.

CHEM 146. Kinetics and Mechanism of Organic Reactions (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 246.) Methodology of mechanistic organic chemistry; integration of rate expression, determination of rate constants, transition state theory; catalysis, kinetic orders, isotope effects, solvent effects, linear free energy relationship; product studies, stereochemistry; reactive intermediates; rapid reactions. Chem 246 students will be required to complete an additional term project beyond that expected of students in Chem 146. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH (146) or graduate standing (246). (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 151. Molecules that Changed the World (4)
A look at some of nature’s most intriguing molecules and the ability of man to discover, synthesize, modify, and use them. The role of chemistry in society, and how chemical synthesis—the art and science of constructing molecules—shapes our world. Prerequisites: Chem 140A or equivalent.

CHEM 152. Synthetic Methods in Organic Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 252; formerly Chem 148.) A survey of reactions of particular utility in the organic laboratory. Emphasis is on methods of preparation of carbon-carbon bonds and oxidation reduction sequences. Chem 252 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students enrolled in Chem 152. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH (152); or graduate standing (252).

CHEM 154. Mechanisms of Organic Reactions (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 254; formerly Chem 147.) A qualitative approach to the mechanisms of various organic reactions; substitutions, additions, eliminations, condensations, rearrangements, oxidations, reductions, free-radical reactions, and photochemistry. Includes considerations of molecular structure and reactivity, synthetic methods, spectroscopic tools, and stereochemistry. The topics emphasized will vary from year to year. This is the first quarter of the advanced organic chemistry sequence. Chem 254 students will be required to complete an additional paper/exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 154. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH (154); or graduate standing (254).

CHEM 155. Synthesis of Complex Molecules (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 255; formerly Chem 144.) This course discusses planning economic routes for the synthesis of complex organic molecules. The uses of specific reagents and protecting groups will be outlined as well as the control of stereochemistry during a synthesis. Examples will be selected from the recent literature. Chem 255 students will be required to complete an additional paper/exam. (May not be offered every year.) Prerequisites: Chem 152 or 252 or consent of instructor.

CHEM 156. Structure and Properties of Organic Molecules (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 256.) Introduction to the measurement and theoretical correlation of the physical properties of organic molecules. Topics covered include molecular geometry, molecular-orbital theory, orbital hybridization, aromaticity, chemical reactivity, stereochemistry, infrared and electronic spectra, photochemistry, and nuclear magnetic resonance. Chem 256 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students of Chem 156. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH (156); or graduate standing (256).

CHEM 157. Bioorganic and Natural Products Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 257.) A comprehensive survey of modern bioorganic and natural products chemistry. Topics will include biosynthesis of natural products, molecular recognition, and small molecule-biomolecule interactions. For Chem 257, students will be required to complete additional course work beyond that expected of students enrolled in Chem 157. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH (157); or graduate standing (257).

CHEM 158. Applied Spectroscopy (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 258.) Intensive coverage of modern spectroscopic techniques used to determine the structure of organic molecules. Problem solving and interpretation of spectra will be strongly emphasized. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH.

CHEM 161. Supramolecular Coordination Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 261.) An introduction and survey of modern coordination chemistry. Topics will include structure and bonding of alkali, transition, lanthanide and actinide metals, with emphasis on the first row transition metals; stereochemistry, coordination clusters, molecular solids and nanoparticles. Prerequisites: Chem 120A and 120B or equivalent.

CHEM 164. Structural Biology of Viruses (4)
(Cross-listed with BIMM 164.) An introduction to virus structures, how they are determined, and how they facilitate the various stages of the viral life cycle from host recognition and entry to replication, assembly, release, and transmission to uninfected host cells. (May not be offered every year.) Prerequisites: Chem 114A or BIBC 100. Recommended: a basic course in cell biology.

CHEM 165. 3D Electron Microscopy of Macromolecules (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 265; cross-listed with BIMM 162/BGGN 262.) Biological macromolecules and supramolecular complexes as well as organelles, and small cells are being examined in three dimensions by modern electron cryomicroscopy and image reconstruction techniques. The basic principles of transmission electron microscopy and 3D image reconstruction are discussed. Chem 265/BGGN 262 students will be required to complete an additional assignment/exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 165/BIMM 162. Prerequisites: Chem 114A or BIBC 100 or BIBC 110, and Phys 1A-B-C or Phys 2A-B-D.

CHEM 167. Medicinal Chemistry (4)
Basics of medicinal chemistry, emphasizing rigorous descriptions of receptor-protein structure, interactions, and dynamics; their implications for drug development; and an integrated treatment of pharmacodynamic and pharmacokinetic considerations in drug design. Treats computational approaches as well as practical experimental approaches. Prerequisites: Chem140C or 140CH and Chem 114B and Chem 118.

CHEM 168. Drug Synthesis and Design (4)
Practical methods to make drugs currently in use and to design future drugs. Treats both chemical synthesis and biologics like monoclonal antibodies. Topics include fragment-based screening, solid phase synthesis, directed evolution, and bioconjugation as well as efficacy, metabolism, and toxicity. Recommended preparation: Chem 114C. Prerequisites: Chem140C or 140CH and Chem 114B.

CHEM 171. Environmental Chemistry I (4)
An introduction to chemical concerns in nature with emphasis on atmospheric issues like air pollution, chlorofluorocarbons and the ozone hole, greenhouse effects and climate change, impacts of radioactive waste, sustainable resource usage, and risks and benefits of energy sources. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 149A and Chem 171. Prerequisites: Chem 6C or 6CH. (F)

CHEM 172. Environmental Chemistry II (4)
An introduction to chemical concerns in nature with emphasis on soil and water issues like agricultural productivity, biological impacts in the environment, deforestation, ocean desserts, natural and manmade disasters (fires, nuclear winter, volcanoes), and waste handling. Recommended preparation: Chem 171 (formerly 149A). Students may not receive credit for both Chem 172 and Chem 149B. Prerequisites: Chem 6C or 6CH. (W)

CHEM 173. Atmospheric Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 273.) Chemical principles applied to the study of atmospheres. Atmospheric photochemistry, radical reactions, chemical lifetime determinations, acid rain, greenhouse effects, ozone cycle, and evolution are discussed. Chem 273 students will be required to complete an additional assignment/exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 173. Prerequisites: Chem 171 and Chem 127 or 132(173); or graduate standing (273).  (S)

CHEM 174. Chemical Principles of Marine Systems (4)
(Cross-listed with SIO 141.) Introduction to the chemistry and distribution of the elements in seawater, emphasizing basic chemical principles such as electron structure, chemical bonding, and group and periodic properties and showing how these affect basic aqueous chemistry in marine systems. Prerequisites: Chem 6C with a grade of C– or better, or consent of instructor. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 182. Biological Databases (4)
(Cross-listed with BIMM 182/BENG 182/CSE 182.) This course provides an introduction to the features of biological data, how those data are organized efficiently in databases, and how existing data resources can be utilized to solve a variety of biological problems. Object oriented databases, data modeling, and description. Survey of current biological database with respect to above, implementation of database on a biological topic. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176. Bioinformatics majors only.

CHEM 184. Computational Molecular Biology (4)
(Cross-listed with BIMM 184/BENG 184/CSE 184.) This advanced course covers the application of machine learning and modeling techniques to biological systems. Topics include gene structure, recognition of DNA and protein sequence patterns, classification, and protein structure prediction. Pattern discovery, Hidden Markov models/support vector machines/neural network/profiles, protein structure prediction, functional characterization or proteins, functional genomics/proteomics, metabolic pathways/gene networks. Prerequisites: BIMM 181 or BENG 181 or CSE 181; BIMM 182 or BENG 182 or CSE 182 or Chem 182. Bioinformatics majors only.

CHEM 185. Introduction to Computational Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 285.) Course in computational methods building on a background in mathematics and physical chemistry. Brief introduction and background in computational theory, molecular mechanics, semi-empirical methods, and ab initio-based methods of increasing elaboration. Emphasis on applications and reliability. Chem 285 students will be required to complete an additional assignment/exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 185. Prerequisites: Chem 126 or 133 and Math 20C or 21C. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 187. Foundations of Teaching and Learning Science (4)
(Cross-listed with EDS 122.) Examine theories of learning and how they are important in the science classroom. Conceptual development in the individual student, as well as the development of knowledge in the history of science. Key conceptual obstacles in science will be explored. Prerequisites: Chem 6C and Chem 96.

CHEM 188. Capstone Seminar in Science Education (4)
(Cross-listed with EDS 123.) In the lecture and observation format, students continue to explore the theories of learning in the science classroom. Conceptual development is fostered, as well as continued development of knowledge of science history. Students are exposed to the science of teaching in science in actual practice. Prerequisites: Chem 6C and Chem 187/EDS 122.

CHEM 192. Senior Seminar in Chemistry and Biochemistry (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in chemistry or biochemistry. May be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Prerequisites: department stamp and/or consent of the instructor.

CHEM 194. Special Topics in Chemistry (2)
Selected topics in the field of chemistry. Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current subtitles will be listed on the Schedule of Classes. May be taken for credit up to four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic.

CHEM 195. Methods of Teaching Chemistry (4)
An introduction to teaching chemistry. Students are required to attend a weekly class on methods of teaching chemistry, and will teach a discussion section of one of the lower-division chemistry courses. Attendance at lecture of the lower-division course in which the student is participating is required. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

CHEM 196. Reading and Research in Chemical Education (2 or 4)
Independent literature or classroom research by arrangement with, and under the direction of, a member of the Department of Chemistry and Biochemistry faculty. Students must register on a P/NP basis. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, 2.5 minimum GPA, consent of instructor and department. (F,W,S)

CHEM 197. Chemistry Internship (2 or 4)
An internship program that provides work experience with public/private sector employers. Subject to the availability of positions, students will work in a local company under the supervision of a faculty member and site supervisor. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: Completion of ninety units with a GPA of 2.5, and a completed and approved Special Studies form (UC San Diego Application for Enrollment Special Studies Courses 197, 198, 199), and department stamp. (F,W,S)

CHEM 199. Reading and Research (2 or 4)
Independent literature or laboratory research by arrangement with, and under the direction of, a member of the Department of Chemistry and Biochemistry faculty. Students must register on a P/NP basis. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, 2.5 minimum GPA, consent of instructor and department. (F,W,S)

CHEM 200B. Fundamentals of Instrumental Analysis (4)
Fundamental theoretical principles, capabilities, applications, and limitations of modern analytical instrumentation used for qualitative and quantitative analysis. Students will learn how to define the nature of an analytical problem and how to select an appropriate analytical method. Letter grades only. Recommended preparation: background equivalent to Chem 100A and introductory optics and electricity from physics. (W)

CHEM 204. Introduction to X-ray Crystallography (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 104.) Analysis of macromecular structures by X-ray diffraction. Topics include symmetry, geometry of diffraction, detection of diffraction, intensity of diffracted waves, phase problem and its solution, heavy atom method, isomorphous replacement, anomalous dispersion phasing methods (MAD), direct methods, molecular replacement. Chem 204 students will be required to complete additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 104.

CHEM 207. Protein NMR (4)
A broad introduction to the uses of nuclear magnetic resonance to characterize and understand proteins. Not highly mathematical, this course should be accessible to chemistry graduate students working with proteins.

CHEM 209. Macromolecular Recognition (4)
Structures and functions of nucleic acids, folding and catalysis of nucleic acids, motifs and domains of proteins, principles of protein-protein interactions, chemistry of protein/DNA and protein/RNA interfaces, conformational changes in macromolecular recognition. Prerequisites: biochemistry background and graduate standing, or approval of instructor.

CHEM 210. Lipid Cell Signaling Genomics, Proteomics, and Metabolomics (2)
Overview of new systems biology “-omics” approached to lipid metabolism and cell signaling, including interrogating gene and lipid databases, techniques for lipidomics, and implications for profiling and biomarker discovery in blood and tissues relevant to inflammatory and other human diseases. Cross-listed with BIOM 209 and PHAR 208. Recommended preparation: one quarter of undergraduate biochemistry.

CHEM 213. Physical Chemistry of Biological Macromolecules (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 113.) A discussion of the physical principles governing biological macromolecular structure and function, and the physicochemical experiments used to probe their structure and function. Chem 213 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 113. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH; and Chem 127 or 131 (113); or graduate standing (213).

CHEM 214. Molecular and Cellular Biochemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 114D.) This course represents a continuation of 114C, or an introductory course for first- and second-year graduate students, and covers topics in molecular and cellular biochemistry. Emphasis will be placed on contemporary approaches to the isolation and characterization of mammalian genes and proteins, and molecular genetic approaches to understanding eukaryotic development and human disease. Chem 214 students will be required to complete additional course work beyond that expected of students in Chem 114D. Prerequisites: Chem 114A–C or consent of instructor. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 215. Modeling Biological Macromolecules (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 115; cross-listed with PHAR 205/BIOM 205.) Use of computer graphics and modeling methods in the study of biological macromolecules. The course will cover basic methods and techniques. The objective is to provide a good working knowledge of the critical features of the methods and to provide a foundation for further study for those who wish to pursue these methods as research topics. Chem 215/BIOM 205/PHAR 205 students will be required to complete additional course work beyond that expected of students in Chem 115. Prerequisites: Chem 114A or equivalent. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 216. Chemical Biology (4)
A discussion of current topics in chemical biology including mechanistic aspects of enzymes and cofactors, use of modified enzymes to alter biochemical pathways, chemical intervention in cellular processes, and natural product discovery. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 217. RNA Structure, Function, and Biology (4)
Selected topics in RNA structure and function, such as the ribosome, ribozyme, antibiotics, splicing and RNA interference, as they relate to the RNA role in gene expression and regulation. Emphasis on techniques to study the dynamics of macromolecular complexes and the mechanism of RNA catalysis. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

CHEM 219. Special Topics in Biochemistry (4)
This special topics course is designed for first-year graduate students in biochemistry. Topics presented in recent years have included protein processing, the chemical modification of proteins, the biosynthesis and function of glycoproteins, lipid biochemistry and membrane structure, and bioenergetics. Prerequisites: undergraduate courses in biochemistry, Chem 114A or equivalent. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 220. Regulatory Circuits in Cells (4)
Modulation cellular activity and influencing viral fate involve regulatory circuits. Emergent properties include dose response, cross-regulation, dynamic, and stochastic behaviors. This course reviews underlying mechanisms and involves mathematical modeling using personal computer tools. Recommended: some background in biochemistry and/or cellular biology. Mathematical competence at the level of lower-division college courses.

CHEM 221. Signal Transduction (4)
The aim of this course is to develop an appreciation for a variety of topics in signal transduction. We will discuss several historical developments while the focus will be on current issues. Both experimental approaches and results will be included in our discussions. Topics may vary from year to year. Prerequisites: biochemistry and molecular biology. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 222. Structure and Analysis of Solids (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 227.) Key concepts in the atomic structure and bonding of solids such as metals, ceramics, and semiconductors. Symmetry operations, point groups, lattice types, space groups, simple and complex inorganic compounds, structure/property comparisons, structure determination with X-ray diffraction. Ionic, covalent, metallic bonding compared with physical properties. Atomic and molecular orbitals, bands versus bonds, free electron theory.

CHEM 223. Organometallic Chemistry (4)
A survey of this field from a synthetic and mechanistic viewpoint. Fundamental reactivity patterns for transition element organometallic compounds will be discussed and organized according to periodic trends. Transition metal catalyzed reactions of importance to organic synthesis and industrial chemistry will be presented from a mechanistic perspective. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

CHEM 224. Spectroscopic Techniques (4)
Application of physical techniques to the elucidation of the structure of inorganic complex ions and organometallic compounds. Topics covered include group theory, and its application to vibrational, magnetic resonance and Raman spectroscopy. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 225. Bioinorganic Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 125.) The role of metal ions in biological systems, with emphasis on transition metal ions in enzymes that transfer electrons, bind oxygen, and fix nitrogen. Also included are metal complexes in medicine, toxicity, and metal ion storage and transport. Chem 225 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 125. Prerequisites: Chem 114A or 120A, or graduate standing. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 226. Transition Metal Chemistry (4)
Advanced aspects of structure and bonding in transition metal complexes with major emphasis on Molecular Orbital Theory. Electronic structure descriptions are used to rationalize structure/reactivity relationships. Other topics include computational chemistry, relativistic effects, metal-metal bonding, and reaction mechanisms. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

CHEM 227. Seminar in Inorganic Chemistry (2)
Seminars presented by faculty and students on topics of current interest in inorganic chemistry, including areas such as bioinorganic, organometallic and physical-inorganic chemistry. The course is designed to promote a critical evaluation of the available data in specialized areas of inorganic chemistry. Each quarter three or four different topics will be discussed. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.)

CHEM 228. Solid State Chemistry (4)
Survey of the chemistry of semiconductors, superconductors, molecular magnetic materials, zeolites, fast ion conductors, electronically conducting polymers and ceramics. Synethetic techniques such as molecular precursor design, the sol-gel process, electrosynthesis, and high-temperature thermolysis will be covered. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 229. Special Topics in Inorganic Chemistry (2–4)
Selection of topics of current interest. May be repeated for credit when topics vary. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 230A. Quantum Mechanics I (4)
Theoretical basis of quantum mechanics; postulates; wave packets; matrix representations; ladder operators; exact solutions for bound states in 1, 2, or 3 dimensions; angular momentum; spin; variational approximations; description of real one and two electron systems. Recommended background: Chem 133 and Math 20D or their equivalents.

CHEM 230B. Quantum Mechanics II (4)
Continuation of theoretical quantum mechanics: evolution operators and time dependent representations, second quantization, Born-Oppenheimer approximation, electronic structure methods, selected topics from among density operators, quantized radiation fields, path integral methods, scattering theory. Prerequisites: Chem 230A or consent of instructor.

CHEM 231. Chemical Kinetics and Molecular Reaction Dynamics (4)
Classical kinetics, transition state theory, unimolecular decomposition, potential energy surfaces; scattering processes and photodissociation processes. (May not be offered ever year.)

CHEM 232A. Statistical Mechanics I (4)
Derivation of thermodynamics from atomic descriptions. Ensembles, fluctuations, classical (Boltzmann) and quantum (Fermi-Dirac and Bose-Einstein) statistics, partition functions, phase space, Liouville equation, chemical equilibrium, applications to weakly interacting systems, such as ideal gases, ideal crystals, radiation fields. Recommended background: Chem 132 or its equivalent. Classical and quantum mechanics, thermodynamics, and mathematical methods will be reviewed as needed, but some background will be necessary.

CHEM 232B. Statistical Mechanics II (4)
Interacting systems at equilibrium, both classical (liquids) and quantum (spins). Phase transitions. Non-equilibrium systems: glasses, transport, time correlation functions, Onsager relations, fluctuation-dissipation theorem, random walks, Brownian motion. Applications in biophysics. Prerequisites: Chem 232A or consent of instructor.

CHEM 235. Molecular Spectroscopy (4)
Time-dependent behavior of systems; interaction of matter with light; selection rules. Radiative and nonradiative processes, coherent phenomena and the density matrices. Instrumentation, measurement, and interpretation. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 239. Special Topics in Chemical Physics (2 or 4)
Topics of special interest will be presented. Examples include NMR, solid-state chemistry, phase transitions, stochastic processes, scattering theory, nonequilibrium processes, tensor transformations, and advanced topics in statistical mechanics, thermodynamics, and chemical kinetics. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 240. Electrochemistry (4)
(Cross-listed with NANO 255.) Application of electrochemical techniques to chemistry research. Basic electrochemical theory and instrumentation: the diffusion equations, controlled potential, and current methods. Electro-chemical kinetics, Butler-Volmer, Marcus-Hush theories, preparative electrochemistry, analytical electrochemistry, solid and polymer electrolytes, semiconductor photoelectrochemistry. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 241. Organic Nanomaterials (4)
(Cross-listed with NANO 241.) This course will provide an introduction to the physics and chemistry of soft matter, followed by a literature-based critical examination of several ubiquitous classes of organic nanomaterials and their technological applications. Topics include self-assembled monolayers, block copolymers, liquid crystals, photoresists, organic electronic materials, micelles and vesicles, soft lithography, organic colloids, organic nano composites, and applications in biomedicine and food science.

CHEM 246. Kinetics and Mechanism (4)
Methodology of mechanistic organic chemistry: integration of rate expressions, determination of rate constants, transition state theory; catalysis, kinetic orders, isotope effects, substituent effects, solvent effects, linear free energy relationship; product studies, stereochemistry; reactive intermediates; rapid reactions. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 250. Seminar in Chemistry (2)
Regularly scheduled seminars by first-year graduate students provide opportunities for practice in seminar delivery and for the exploration of topics of general interest. (S/U grades only.) (S)

CHEM 251. Research Conference (2)
Group discussion of research activities and progress of the group members. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

CHEM 252. Synthetic Methods in Organic Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 152.) A survey of reactions of particular utility in the organic laboratory. Emphasis is on methods of preparation of carbon-carbon bonds and oxidation reduction sequences. For Chem 252, students would be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students enrolled in Chem 152. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH (152), or graduate standing (252).

CHEM 254. Mechanisms of Organic Reactions (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 154; formerly Chem 247.) A qualitative approach to the mechanisms of various organic reactions; substitutions, additions, eliminations, condensations, rearrangements, oxidations, reductions, free-radical reactions, and photochemistry. Includes considerations of molecular structure and reactivity, synthetic methods, spectroscopic tools, and stereochemistry. The topics emphasized will vary from year to year. This is the first quarter of the advanced organic chemistry sequence. Chem 254 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 154. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH (154), or graduate standing (254).

CHEM 255. Synthesis of Complex Molecules (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 155.) This course discusses planning economic routes for the synthesis of complex organic molecules. The uses of specific reagents and protecting groups will be outlined as well as the control of stereochemistry during a synthesis. Examples will be selected from the recent literature. Chem 255 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 155. (May not be offered every year.) Prerequisites: Chem 152 or 252 or consent of instructor.

CHEM 256. Structure and Properties of Organic Molecules (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 156.) Introduction to the measurement and theoretical correlation of the physical properties of organic molecules. Topics covered include molecular geometry, molecular-orbital theory, orbital hybridization, aromaticity, chemical reactivity, stereochemistry, infrared and electronic spectra, photochemistry, and nuclear magnetic resonance. Chem 256 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 156. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH (156), or graduate standing (256).

CHEM 257. Biorganic and Natural Products Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 157.) A comprehensive survey of modern bioorganic and natural products chemistry. Topics include biosynthesis of natural products, molecular recognition, and small molecule-biomolecule interactions. Chem 257 students will be required to complete additional course work beyond that expected of students in Chem 157. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or 140CH (157), or graduate standing (257).

CHEM 258. Applied Spectroscopy (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 158.) Intensive coverage of modern spectroscopic techniques used to determine the structure of organic molecules. Problem solving and interpretation of spectra will be strongly emphasized. Students will be required to write and submit a paper that reviews a recent research publication that reports the structure determination by spectroscopic methods of natural products. Recommended: one year of organic chemistry with laboratory.

CHEM 259. Special Topics in Organic Chemistry (2–4)
(Formerly Chem 249.) Various advanced topics in organic chemistry. Includes but is not limited to: advanced kinetics, advanced spectroscopy, computational chemistry, heterocyclic chemistry, medicinal chemistry, organotransition metal chemistry, polymers, solid-phase synthesis/combinatorial chemistry, stereochemistry, and total synthesis classics.

CHEM 260. Light and Electron Microscopy of Cells and Tissue (4)
Students will review basic principles of light and electron microscopy and learn a variety of basic and advanced microscopy methods through lecture and hands-on training. Each student will have his or her own project. Additional supervised instrument time is available. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CHEM 261. Supramolecular Coordination Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 161.) An introduction and survey of modern coordination chemistry. Topics will include structure and bonding of alkali, transition, lanthanide, and actinide metals, with emphasis on the first row transition metals; stereochemistry, coordination clusters, molecular solids and nanoparticles. Chem 261 students will be required to complete additional course work beyond that expected of students in Chem 161. Prerequisites: Chem 120A, 120B or equivalent, or graduate standing.

CHEM 262. Inorganic Chemistry and NMR (4)
A survey of inorganic chemistry to prepare for graduate research in the field, including a detailed introduction to nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR), followed by applications of NMR to structural and mechanistic problems in inorganic chemistry.

CHEM 264. Structural Biology of Viruses (4)
(Cross-listed with BGGN 264.) An introduction of virus structures, how they are determined, and how they facilitate the various stages of the viral life cycle from host recognition and entry to replication, assembly, release, and transmission to uninfected host cells. Students will be required to complete a term paper. (May not be offered every year.) Recommended: elementary biochemistry as treated in Chem 114A or BIBC 100 and a basic course in cell biology or consent of the instructor.

CHEM 265. 3D Electron Microscopy of Macromolecules (4)
(Cross-listed with BGGN 262.) Biological macromolecules and supramolecular complexes as well as organelles, and small cells are being examined in three-dimensions by modern electron cryomicroscopy and image reconstruction techniques. The basic principles of transmission electron microscopy and 3D image reconstruction are discussed. Chem 265/BGGN 262 students will be required to complete an additional oral presentation or paper or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 165/BGGN 162. (May not be offered every year.) Recommended: elementary biochemistry as treated in Chem 114A or BIBC 100 and a basic course in cell biology, or consent of instructor.

CHEM 270A-B-C. Current Topics in Environmental Chemistry (2-2-2)
Seminar series on the current topics in the field of environmental chemistry. Emphasis is on current research topics in atmospheric, oceanic, and geological environments. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.) (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 271. Special Topics in Analytical Chemistry (4)
Topics of special interest in analytical chemistry. May include, but is not limited to, chemical separation, sample introductions, mass analyzers, ionization schemes, and current state-of-the-art applications in environmental and biological chemistry.

CHEM 273. Atmospheric Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 173.) Chemical principles applied to the study of atmospheres. Atmospheric photochemistry, radical reactions, chemical lifetime determinations, acid rain, greenhouse effects, ozone cycle, and evolution are discussed. Chem 273 students will be required to complete additional assignment/exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 173. Recommended: background comparable to Chem 149A and Chem 132. (S)

CHEM 276. Numerical Analysis in Multiscale Biology (4)
Introduces mathematical tools to simulate biological processes at multiple scales. Numerical methods for ordinary and partial differential equations (deterministic and stochastic), and methods for parallel computing and visualization. Hands-on use of computers emphasized; students will apply numerical methods in individual projects. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (S)

CHEM 280. Applied Bioinformatics (4)
Publicly available databases and bioinformatics tools are now an indispensable component of biomedical research. This course offers an introductory survey of selected tools and databases; the underlying concepts, the software, and advice on using them. Practical exercises will be included.

CHEM 283. Supramolecular Structure Determination Laboratory (4)
A laboratory course combining hands-on mass spectrometry and bioinformatics tools to explore the relationship between structure and function in macromolecules. Tools for peptide sequencing, analysis of post-translational modification, and fragmentation analysis by mass spectrometry are examples of experiments students will run. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CHEM 285. Introduction to Computational Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 185.) Course in computational methods building on a background in mathematics and physical chemistry. Brief introduction and background in computational theory, molecular mechanics, semi-empirical methods, and ab initio-based methods of increasing elaboration. Emphasis on applications and reliability. Chem 285 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 185. Prerequisites: Chem 126 or 133 and Math 20C. (May not be offered every year.)

CHEM 294. Organic Chemistry Seminar (2)
Formal seminars or informal puzzle sessions on topics of current interest in organic chemistry, as presented by visiting lecturers, local researchers, or students. Prerequisites: advanced graduate-student standing. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

CHEM 295. Biochemistry Seminar (2)
Formal seminars or informal puzzle sessions on topics of current interest in biochemistry, as presented by visiting lecturers, local researchers, or students. Prerequisites: advanced graduate-student standing. (S/U grades only.)

CHEM 296. Chemical Physics Seminar (2)
Formal seminars or informal sessions on topics of current interest in chemical physics as presented by visiting lecturers, local researchers, or students. Prerequisites: advanced graduate-student standing. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

CHEM 297. Experimental Methods in Chemistry (4)
Experimental methods and techniques involved in chemical research are introduced. Hands-on experience provides training for careers in industrial research and for future thesis research. Prerequisites: graduate-student standing. (S/U grades only.)

CHEM 298. Special Study in Chemistry (1–4)
Reading and laboratory study of special topics for first-year graduate students under the direction of a faculty member. Exact subject matter to be arranged in individual cases. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: first-year graduate-student standing. (F,W,S)

CHEM 299. Research in Chemistry (1–12)
Prerequisites: graduate-student standing and consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

CHEM 500. Apprentice Teaching (4)
Under the supervision and mentorship of a course instructor, MS and PhD students serve as teaching assistants to undergraduate laboratory and lecture courses. To support teaching competency, regular meetings with the instructor and attendance at lectures are required. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit twelve times. Prerequisites: graduate-student standing and consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

CHEM 509. Teaching Methods in Chemistry and Biochemistry (2)
This course explores teaching strategies specific to chemistry at the college level, and promotes the development of skills for facilitating active, student-centered learning in both lecture and laboratory settings. It is required for first-time teaching assistants. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate-student standing and consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

CHIN 10AN. First Year Chinese—Non-native speakers I (5)
Introductory course of basic Chinese for students with no background in Chinese. First quarter of a one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese in communicative skills. Covers pronunciation, fundamentals of Chinese grammar, and vocabulary. Topics include greetings, family affairs, numbers, and daily exchanges. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 11 and CHIN 10AN. Prerequisites: department approval.

CHIN 10AM. First Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers I (5)
Introductory course of basic Chinese for students with background in Mandarin Chinese. First quarter of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese in communicative skills. Covers pronunciation, fundamentals of Chinese grammar, and vocabulary. Topics include greetings, family affairs, numbers, and daily exchanges. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 11 and CHIN 10AM. Prerequisites: department approval.

CHIN 10AD. First Year Chinese—Dialect speakers I (5)
Introductory course of basic Chinese for students with background in a dialect of Chinese. First quarter of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese in communicative skills. Covers pronunciation, fundamentals of Chinese grammar, and vocabulary. Topics include greetings, family affairs, numbers, and daily exchanges. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 11 and CHIN 10AD. Prerequisites: department approval.

CHIN 10BN. First Year Chinese—Non-native speakers II (5)
Continuation of basic Chinese for students with no background in Chinese. Second course of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative skills. Covers pronunciation, more elaborate grammar, and vocabulary. Focus on goal-oriented tasks: school life, shopping, and transportation. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 12 and CHIN 10BN. Prerequisites: CHIN 11, CHIN 10AN, or department stamp.

CHIN 10BM. First Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers II (5)
Continuation introduction of basic Chinese for students with background in Mandarin Chinese. Second course of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative skills. Covers pronunciation, more elaborate Chinese grammar, and expanded vocabulary. Focus on goal-oriented tasks such as school life, shopping, and transportation. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 12 and CHIN 10BM. Prerequisites: CHIN 11, CHIN 10AM, or department stamp.

CHIN 10BD. First Year Chinese—Dialect speakers II (5)
Continuation introduction of basic Chinese for students with background in a dialect of Chinese. Second course of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative skills. Covers pronunciation, more elaborate Chinese grammar, and expanded vocabulary. Focus on goal-oriented tasks such as school life, shopping, and transportation. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 12 and CHIN 10BD. Prerequisites: CHIN 11, CHIN 10AM, or department stamp.

CHIN 10CN. First Year Chinese—Non-native speakers III (5)
Continuation course of basic Chinese for students with no background in Chinese. Third course of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative skills. Expansion on pronunciation and more elaborate Chinese grammar and increasing vocabulary. Topics include dining, direction, and social life. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 13 and CHIN 10CN. Prerequisites: CHIN 12, CHIN 10BN, or department stamp.

CHIN 10CM. First Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers III (5)
Further continuation course of basic Chinese for students with background in Mandarin Chinese. Third course of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative skills. Expansion on pronunciation and more elaborate Chinese grammar and increasing vocabulary. Topics include dining, direction, and social life. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 13 and CHIN 10CM. Prerequisites: CHIN 12, CHIN 10BM, or department stamp.

CHIN 10CD. First Year Chinese—Dialect speakers III (5)
Further continuation course of basic Chinese for students with background in a dialect of Chinese. Third course of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative skills. Expansion on pronunciation and more elaborate Chinese grammar and increasing vocabulary. Topics include dining, direction, and social life. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 13 and CHIN 10CD. Prerequisites: CHIN 12, CHIN 10BD, or department stamp.

CHIN 20AN. Second Year Chinese—Non-native speakers I (4)
Second year of basic Chinese for students with no background. First course of second year of a one-year curriculum for Chinese in intermediate communicative skills. Covers sentence structure, idiomatic expression, development of listening, speaking, reading, and written competence in Chinese. Topics include sports, travel, and special events. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 21 and CHIN 20AN. Prerequisites: CHIN 13, CHIN 10CN, score of 3 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department stamp.

CHIN 20AM. Second Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers I (4)
Second year of basic Chinese for students with background in Mandarin. First course of second year of one-year curriculum for Chinese in intermediate communicative skills. Covers sentence structure and idiomatic expression, development of listening, speaking, reading, and written competence. Topics include sports, travel, and special events. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 21 and CHIN 20AM. Prerequisites: CHIN 13, CHIN 10CM, score of 3 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department stamp.

CHIN 20AD. Second Year Chinese—Dialect speakers I (4)
Second year of basic Chinese for students with background in a dialect of Chinese. First course of second year of one-year curriculum for Chinese in intermediate communicative skills. Covers sentence structure and idiomatic expression, development of listening, speaking, reading, and written competence in Chinese. Topics include sports, travel, and special events. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 21 and CHIN 20AD. Prerequisites: CHIN 13, CHIN 10CD, score of 3 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department stamp.

CHIN 20BN. Second Year Chinese—Non-native speakers II (4)
Continuation of second year of basic Chinese for students with no background. Second course of one-year curriculum for Chinese intermediate communicative skills. Covers sentence structure and idiomatic expressions, development of listening, speaking, reading and written competence in Chinese. Topics focus on China, population and other nationalities. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 22 and CHIN 20BN. Prerequisites: CHIN 21, CHIN 20AN, score of 4 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam or department stamp.

CHIN 20BM. Second Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers II (4)
Continuation of second year of basic Chinese for students with background in Mandarin. Second course of one-year curriculum for Chinese intermediate communicative skills. Covers sentence structure and idiomatic expressions, development of listening, speaking, reading, and written competence. Topics focus on China, population, and other nationalities. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 22 and CHIN 20BM. Prerequisites: CHIN 21, CHIN 20AM, score of 4 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department stamp.

CHIN 20BD. Second Year Chinese—Dialect speakers II (4)
Continuation of second year of basic Chinese for students with background in a dialect of Chinese. Second course of one-year curriculum for Chinese intermediate communicative skills. Covers sentence structure and idiomatic expressions, development of listening, speaking, reading, and written competence in Chinese. Topics focus on China, population, and other nationalities. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 22 and CHIN 20BD. Prerequisites: CHIN 21, CHIN 20AD, score of 4 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department stamp.

CHIN 20CN. Second Year Chinese—Non-native speakers III (4)
Final course of second year Chinese for students with no background. Third course of a one-year curriculum for Chinese intermediate communicative skills. Expansion on pronunciation and more elaborate Chinese grammar and increasing vocabulary. Topics include food, physical actions, and culture. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 23 and CHIN 20CN. Prerequisites: CHIN 22, CHIN 20BN, score of 5 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department stamp.

CHIN 20CM. Second Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers III (4)
Final course of second year Chinese for students with background in Mandarin. Third course of one-year curriculum for Chinese intermediate communicative skills. Expansion on pronunciation and Chinese grammar and increasing vocabulary. Topics include food, physical actions, and culture. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 23 and CHIN 20CM. Prerequisites: CHIN 22, CHIN 20BM, score of 5 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department stamp.

CHIN 20CD. Second Year Chinese—Dialect speakers III (4)
Final course of second year Chinese for students with background in a dialect of Chinese. Third course of one-year curriculum for Chinese intermediate communicative skills. Expansion on pronunciation and more elaborate Chinese grammar and increasing vocabulary. Topics include food, physical actions, and culture. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 23 and CHIN 20CD. Prerequisites: CHIN 22, CHIN 20BD, score of 5 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department stamp.

CHIN 100AN. Third Year Chinese—Non-native speakers I (4)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with no background. First course of third year of one-year curriculum that focuses on listening, reading, and speaking. Emphasizing the development of advanced oral, written competence, and aural skills in Mandarin. Topics include education, literature, history of Chinese language and society. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 111 and CHIN 100AN. Prerequisites: CHIN 23, CHIN 20CN, or department stamp.

CHIN 100AM. Third Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers I (4)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with background in Mandarin and other dialects. First course of third year of one-year curriculum that focuses on listening, reading, and speaking. Topics include education, literature, history of Chinese language and society. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 111 and CHIN 100AM. Prerequisites: CHIN 23, CHIN 20CM or CHIN 20CD, or department stamp.

CHIN 100BN. Third Year Chinese—Non-native speakers II (4)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with no background. Second course of third year of Chinese that emphasizes the development of advanced oral, written competence and aural skills in Mandarin. Topics include various cultural aspects of the Chinese language, additional family issues and society. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 112 and CHIN 100BN. Prerequisites: CHIN 111, CHIN 100AN or department stamp.

CHIN 100BM. Third Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers II (4)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with background in Mandarin and other dialects. Second course of third year of Chinese that emphasizes the development of advanced oral, written competence, and aural skills in Mandarin. Topics include cultural aspects of the Chinese language, additional family issues and society. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 112 and CHIN 100BM. Prerequisites: CHIN 111, CHIN 100AM, or department stamp.

CHIN 100CN. Third Year Chinese—Non-native speakers III (4)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with no background. Third course of third year of one-year curriculum in Chinese language acquisition. Continue to develop proficiency at intermediate level. Improves students’ Chinese language skills and knowledge of the culture with an emphasis of reading and writing. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 113 and CHIN 100CN. Prerequisites: CHIN 112, CHIN 100BN. or department stamp.

CHIN 100CM. Third Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers III (4)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with background in Mandarin and other dialects. Third course of third year of one-year curriculum in Chinese language acquisition. Continue to develop proficiency at intermediate level. Improves students’ Chinese language skills and knowledge of the culture with an emphasis of reading and writing. Topics include economic development in China. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 113 and CHIN 100CM. Prerequisites: CHIN 112, CHIN 100BM, or department stamp.

CHIN 160/260. Late Imperial and Twentieth-Century Chinese Historical Texts (4)
This course introduces the primary sources used by historians of late Imperial and twentieth-century Chinese history. Reading material includes diaries, newspaper articles, Qing documents, gazetteers, essays, speeches, popular fiction, journal articles, scholarly prose, and field surveys. May be repeated for credit. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: advanced knowledge of Chinese language and consent of instructor.

CHIN 165A. Business Chinese (4)
Basic training in oral and written communication skills for business, including introduction to modern business terminology and social conventions. Prerequisites: CHIN 113, CHIN 100CM, CHIN 100CN or department stamp.

CHIN 165B. Business Chinese (4)
Continuation of CHIN 165A. Basic training in oral and written communication skills for business, including introduction to modern business terminology and social conventions. Prerequisites: CHIN 165A or equivalent.

CHIN 165C. Business Chinese (4)
Continuation of CHIN 165B. Basic training in oral and written communication skills for business, including introduction to modern business terminology and social conventions. Prerequisites: CHIN 165B or equivalent.

CHIN 169A. Medical Chinese I (4)
Course focuses on conversational Chinese for students interested in medicine and health care. Designed to prepare students to speak, listen, and read effectively in a Chinese medical environment. Course aims to instruct students in basic to intermediate medical Chinese terminology for comprehensive patient review. Prerequisites: basic Chinese speaking and reading ability and instructor approval required.

CHIN 169B. Medical Chinese II (4)
Course designed to improve conversational Chinese for students interested in medicine and health care. Course aims for stronger Chinese proficiency within a medical environment. Prerequisites: CHIN 169A, basic Chinese speaking and reading ability and instructor approval required.

CHIN 182A. Introduction to Classical Chinese—Advanced I (4)
An introduction to classical Chinese for students with advanced Chinese background. Basic structures and function words are taught through fables of the pre-Qing period. Prerequisites: CHIN 113, CHIN 100C, or department approval.

CHIN 182B. Introduction to Classical Chinese—Advanced II (4)
Continuation of CHIN 182A. Selections from Kongzi, Mengzi, and other philosophers’ work will be taught. Focus is on structures, function words, and overall comprehension of a text. Prerequisites: CHIN 182A or departmental approval.

CHIN 182C. Introduction to Classical Chinese—Advanced III (4)
Continuation of CHIN 182B. Selections from later periods like Shiji and poetry will be introduced. Upon completion of this yearlong curriculum, students should be able to read classical Chinese texts on their own with the help of a dictionary. Prerequisites: CHIN 182B or department approval.

CHIN 185A-B-C. Readings in Chinese Culture and Society (4-4-4)
Designed for students who want advanced language skills, this course will enlarge students’ vocabulary and improve students’ reading skills through studies of original writings and other media on Chinese culture and society, past and present. Prerequisites: CHIN 113, CHIN 100CM, CHIN 100CN, or department stamp.

CHIN 186A-B-C. Readings in Chinese Economics, Politics, and Trade (4-4-4)
Introduction to the specialized vocabulary and verbal forms relating to Chinese politics, trade, development and society. Designed for students in the social sciences or with career interests in international trade, the course will stress rapid vocabulary development, reading and translating. Prerequisites: CHIN 113, CHIN 100CN, CHIN 100CM, or department stamp.

CHIN 196. Directed Thesis Research (4)
Bachelor’s thesis, under the direction of a faculty member in Chinese studies. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

CHIN 198. Directed Group Study in Chinese Studies (2 or 4)
Study of specific aspects in Chinese civilization not covered in regular course work, under the direction of faculty members in Chinese studies. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CHIN 199. Independent Study in Chinese Studies (2 or 4)
The student will undertake a program of research or advanced reading in selected areas in Chinese studies under the supervision of a faculty member of the Program in Chinese Studies. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CHIN 260. Late Imperial and Twentieth-Century Chinese Historical Texts (4)
This course introduces the primary sources used by historians of the late Imperial and twentieth-century Chinese history. Reading material includes diaries, newspaper articles, Qing documents, gazetteers, essays, speeches, popular fiction, journal articles, scholarly prose, and field surveys. May be repeated for credit. (P/NP grades only) Prerequisites: department stamp, advanced knowledge of Chinese language, and consent of instructor.

CHIN 269. Conversational Mandarin for Medical Students—Beginning (2)
(Cross listed with MED 269.) This introductory course is designed to develop a working knowledge of medical Mandarin that will enable the student to communicate with Mandarin-speaking patients. There will be instruction in basic medical vocabulary and grammar, with a focus on taking a medical history. This is only a conversational course and no previous knowledge of Mandarin is required. (S/U only.)

CHIN 296. Directed Thesis Research (2–12)
Graduate thesis research under the guidance of a faculty member affiliated with the Program in Chinese Studies.

CHIN 299. Independent Study in Chinese Studies (2–12)
Independent graduate research under the guidance of a faculty member affiliated with the Program in Chinese Studies. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of instructor.

CHIN 500. Apprentice Teaching (2–4)
A course in which graduate teaching assistants are aided in learning proper teaching methods by means of supervision of their work by the faculty, handling of discussions, assistance in the preparation and grading of exams and other written exercises, and student relations. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

CLAS 196. Directed Honors Thesis in Classical Studies (4)
BA honors thesis research under the direction of a member of a Classical Studies Program faculty. Prerequisites: acceptance into the Classical Studies Honors Program and consent of instructor.

Classics 200A. Contemporary Literary Theory and the Classics (4)
An introduction to contemporary literary theory, focusing on important critical approaches to the literary texts. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

Classics 200B. Historical Perspectives on Classical Antiquity (4)
Examines ways in which classical texts and ideas have been received and appropriated for the diverse purposes of ancient and subsequent cultures. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

Classics 200C. Greece and Rome in Their Contemporary Cultural Contexts (4)
An introduction to the methods and perspectives of social scientific theory that can be used to study the material and social dimensions of the cultures of ancient Greece and Rome. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

Classics 201. Research and Pedagogical Tools for Classicists (4)
Covers various technical skills essential for research and pedagogy in classics, including use of digital resources (e.g., bibliographical databases). Provides an introduction to important disciplinary subfields, such as textual criticism and epigraphy. Selection of topics will be at instructor’s discretion.

Classics 205. Concurrent Readings (2)
Concurrent enrollment with advanced undergraduate courses (either Greek 105 or Latin 105) with enhanced readings and separate examinations. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

Classics 220. Classics Graduate Seminar (4)
Subject matter variable; mainly but not exclusively major literary topics. May be repeated for credit as topics vary. Same as Art History 295 when topic is appropriate.

Classics 280. Independent Study (4)
Supervised independent research. Subject varies.

Classics 290. Research in Classics (4-4-4)
F,W,S.

Classics 299. Dissertation Research (4–12)
F,W,S. May be repeated for credit. Satisfactory/Unsatisfactory only.

Classics 399. University Teaching (4-4-4)
F,W,S. Required of and limited to teaching assistants.

SIOB 286. Marine Science, Economics, and Policy (4)
This course investigates global issues in marine conservation and potential policy solutions. The approach is interdisciplinary, fast-paced, and discussion oriented. Students will become acquainted with sufficient background in marine biology, ecology, marine and conservation economics, international law, and policy as preparation for participation in discussion on real-world issues in marine conservation. Topics and instructors change each quarter. Renumbered from SIO 286. Students may not receive credit for SIOB 286 and SIO 286. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SIOC 210. Physical Oceanography (4)
Physical description of the sea; physical properties of seawater, methods and measurements, boundary processes, regional oceanography. Renumbered from SIO 210. Students may not receive credit for both SIOC 210 and SIO 210. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SIOC 217A. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences I (4)
Thermodynamics and statics of dry and moist air, atmospheric composition, Earth radiation budget, vertical structure of the atmosphere, global energy balance, thermodynamic feedbacks in the climate system. Renumbered from SIO 217A. Students may not receive credit for both SIOC 217A and SIO 217A. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SIOC 217B. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences II (4)
Fluid dynamics of the atmosphere; derivation of governing equations from the laws of physics, scale analysis, conservation principles, theoretical and observed structure of midlatitude synoptic systems; gradient wind and thermal wind approximations, geostrophic and quasigeostrophic approximations; potential vorticity, Rossby waves, climate and weather phenomena such as jet streams and cyclones. Graduate students who have not completed SIO 217A but have an equivalent background may enroll with consent of instructor. Renumbered from SIO 217B. Students may not receive credit for both SIOC 217B and SIO 217B. Prerequisites: SIO 217A or SIOC 217A; graduate standing.

SIOC 217C. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences III (4)
Radiative, physical, and dynamical processes that govern the mean state, variability, and change of the atmosphere and climate including greenhouse gases, clouds and aerosols, convection and precipitation, general circulation, and coupled atmosphere-ocean interactions. Renumbered from SIO 217C. Students may not receive credit for both SIOC 217C and SIO 217C. Prerequisites: SIO 217A or SIOC 217A and SIO 217B or SIOC 217B; graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SIOC 217D. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences IV (4)
Atmospheric chemistry that impacts climate change, including photochemical reactions, ozone chemistry, and aerosol evolution in the troposphere and stratosphere. Atmospheric applications of catalytic cycles, heterogeneous chemistry, and microphysical processes will include the ozone hole, urban smog, and aerosol-cloud interactions. Renumbered from SIO 217D. Students may not receive credit for both SIOC 217D and SIO 217D. Prerequisites: SIO 217A or SIOC 217A and SIO 217B or SIOC 217B and SIO 217C or SIOC 217C; graduate standing.

SIOC 290S. Climate Math (6)
This is a preparatory mathematics class for climate sciences, specifically designed to review math concepts vital to understanding climate science in preparation for SIOC 210 and SIOC 217A. The course will use statistical methods to understand the observed climate records, calculus to investigate Earth's radiation budget, and vector rotation to introduce the dynamics and transport of the atmosphere and ocean. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SIOC 291S. @Climate (6)
This is a course in social media for the climate sciences. Students will develop a broad understanding of how to use social media to listen to, respond to, and engage in online climate science discussions. Students will learn to use digital technology to actively engage with constituents. Students will learn how social media can be used effectively for communications. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SIOC 292. Introduction to Climate Science and Policy (4)
This course explores the interaction between climate science, policy, and the larger culture. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SIOC 296. Climate Science and Policy Forum (2)
Required course for MAS-CSP students will focus on development of MAS Capstone Projects and discussions covering climate science and policy issues, including informal student presentations on political, economic, historical, educational, and natural science issues related to climate science and policy. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SIOC 299. Climate Science and Policy Capstone Project (6–10)
Building on the knowledge and experience gained from the entire curriculum of the master's in climate science and policy (MAS-CSP) program, students will design and present a specific climate science and policy project. May be taken for credit one time for a maximum of ten units. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Only students registered in MAS-CSP program.

SIOG 252A. Introduction to Isotope Geochemistry (4)
Radioactive and stable isotope studies in geology and geochemistry, including geochronology, isotopes as tracers of magmatic processes, cosmic-ray produced isotopes as tracers in the crust and weathering cycle, isotopic evolution of the crust and mantle. Co-scheduled with SIO 144. Course requires student presentation. Renumbered from SIO 252A. Students may not receive credit for both SIOG 252A and SIO 252A. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SIOG 260. Marine Chemistry (4)
Chemical description of the sea; the distribution of chemical species in the world oceans, and their relationships to physical, biological, and geological processes. Renumbered from SIO 260. Students may not receive credit for both SIOG 260 and SIO 260. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

Clinical Psychology 205. Neuroanatomy (6)
Fundamental anatomy/physiology of human nervous system, emphasizing higher cortical functions. Methods of clinical problem solving in neurology; background in basic neuropsychological skills.

Clinical Psychology 209. Child Development and Neuropsychology (3)
Basic aspects of behavioral and neuropsychological development, including guest lectures from program faculty on developmental disorders and clinical assessment issues specific to children. Some emphasis on practical techniques relevant to assessments of minor patients. Prerequisites: completion of two-year core curriculum in the Joint Doctoral Program in Clinical Psychology.

ClinicalPsychology 294. Proseminar in Neuropsychology (3)
Yearlong course (294A,B,C), each for three credits, offered sequentially fall, winter, spring. Provides a fundamental knowledge of brain-behavior relationships as well as strategies and methods of neuropsychological assessment and rehabilitation.

Schoolof Medicine 202E. Social and Behavioral Sciences—Psychopathology (3)
This sequence will acquaint students with techniques of interviewing, concepts of mental illness and normality, basic research in causality of behavioral disorders, and approaches to treatment, all in the context of a bio-psycho-social frame of reference. Format combines a lecture followed by smaller group sessions with a faculty leader. The groups enable students to meet patients with behavioral disorders, to practice interviewing, to develop observational skills, and to discuss material presented in lectures and assigned readings. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: SOM 202A,C,D or consent of instructor.

Clinical Psychology 296. Independent Study (1–12)   
Independent survey of basic concepts in clinical psychology using various sources of material, including scientific papers in clinical psychology and behavioral science and other sources as seem indicated.

CLRE 230. Digital Health (2)
This course covers how to develop and implement a digital strategy to drive a health research organization’s online presence, specifically the processes for selecting, using, managing, and evaluating the effectiveness of web, social media, and mobile technologies. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Clinical Research Program or consent of department.

CLRE 231. Implementation Science (2)
The goal of implementation science is to ensure that the knowledge and materials produced by health research actually leads to improved population health by: 1) reaching the people for whom they are intended; 2) being adapted to local circumstances; and 3) being implemented effectively, safely, equitably, and in a timely and patient-centered manner. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Clinical Research Program or consent of department.

CLRE 232. Qualitative Research (2)
This course provides skills in designing and carrying out a qualitative study useful for program management (planning, monitoring, and evaluation) and ensuring quality in health-care delivery. The methods included in the course are a sample of commonly used qualitative methods: structured and unstructured interviews, participatory learning methods, group and individual methods. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Clinical Research Program or consent of department.

CLRE 233. Regulatory Science (2)
This course provides students with a strong foundation in regulatory science and drug device development and a hands-on introduction to current good manufacturing, laboratory and clinical practices, as well as product development. It offers graduates unique instruction for the specialized jobs in regulatory science in federal, academic, and industry work settings. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Clinical Research Program or consent of department.

CLRE 234. Social Media Research (2)
This course will provide an overview of Institutional Review Board (IRB) considerations of social media in research, including those major ethical challenges and data security issues that may arise with the use of social media for recruitment, consent processes, data collection, and data dissemination. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Clinical Research Program or consent of department.

CLRE 235. Team Science (2)
This course offers practical guidance about how best to engage in interdisciplinary and multidisciplinary team science: to pursue complex science questions, to work effectively with team members, and to produce high impact research outcomes that help meet society’s needs. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Clinical Research Program or consent of department.

CLRE 236. Translational Research (2)
Students learn principles and practices of translational medicine as they apply to the development of new drugs, device, or diagnostic. Students receive training in the development of novel targets and leads, clinical pharmacology, regulatory process, and design of clinical trials. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Clinical Research Program or consent of department.

CLRE 250. Patient-Oriented Research I (2)
This course will develop and apply the theory of clinical trials design and analysis, discuss the practical issues of financing and implementing clinical trials, and describe issues of monitoring trials and working in cooperative groups. The scholar will design and present to a group of peers a concept sheet for a phase I/II and phase II/III clinical trial. Class sessions may also be offered live via distance learning with established remote site.

CLRE 251. Epidemiology I (2)
Scholars will recognize and understand different types of study designs, the relative strengths and limitations of each, and the proper choice of study design in conducting their own research. They will also be able to identify and calculate the correct measure of risk for each study design. Participants will recognize major sources of bias, confounding and misclassification, and understand design and analysis methods of dealing with each. They will also be familiar with criteria to differentiate association from causation. Class sessions may also be offered live via distance learning with established remote site.

CLRE 252. Health Services Research (2)
Scholars will evaluate relevant outcomes in patient-oriented research from the patient (quality of life) and societal (economic) perspectives and locate potential resources for assessing the relevant outcomes in a wide variety of study designs. They will also be able to describe the relative strengths of different health services research approaches to a clinical problem. Finally, they will understand the components of clinical practice guidelines, including patient preferences, and how these guidelines both depend upon as well as inform patient-oriented research. Class sessions may also be offered live via distance learning with established remote site.

CLRE 253. Biostatistics I (2)
Scholars will understand principles of measurement of clinical data, recognize data types, and correctly identify statistical methods appropriate for analysis of a given clinical data set. They will gain experience in assembling a clinical dataset in formats suitable for analysis by STATA or other comparable statistical packages. They will learn skills to conduct graphical and numerical exploratory data analysis, comparative tests of categorical, ordinal, and continuous data, linear and logistic regression analysis, and survival analysis by life table and Kaplan-Meier techniques. Class sessions may also be offered live via distance learning with established remote site.

CLRE 254. Biostatistics II (2)
Scholars will understand and conduct advanced biostatistical analyses including: multiple linear and logistic regression, survival analysis, and Cox and extended Cox regression. The scholar will also be familiar with person-time rate analysis with Poisson regression and longitudinal data analysis in the presence of missing values and varying measurement times. Class sessions may also be offered live via distance learning with established remote site. Prerequisites: Biostatistics I, CLRE 253.

CLRE 255. Data Management and Informatics (2)
This course provides an orientation to database design and management and covers key issues regarding data handling for clinical research and clinical trials. Scholars will also become familiar with technology assessment and decision-making methods and analysis. Class sessions may also be offered live via distance learning with established remote site.

CLRE 256. Patient-Oriented Research II (2)
This course will review the ethics and basic regulatory issues for research involving human subjects, including  access and confidentiality. Scholars will prepare a mock submission to an IRB for peer review and practice and will also review their peers’ proposals. Class sessions may also be offered live via distance learning with established remote site. Prerequisites: Patient-Oriented Research I, CLRE 250.

CLRE 257. Epidemiology II (2)
Scholars will select the appropriate sampling method and determine the sample size necessary for specific projects and adjust for confounding. Participants will be familiar with several specialized analytic techniques, including matched, cluster, and meta-analyses. They will also be familiar with methodological issues, unique to ecological, behavioral, and genetic studies. Class sessions may also be offered live via distance learning with established remote site. Prerequisites: Epidemiology I, CLRE 251.

CLRE 258. Professional Development in Clinical Research (2)
Students participate in a series of seminars on professional development topics that will focus on skills and knowledge to enhance the ability of clinical researchers to be successful. Seminar topics may include research management, team building and collaboration, leadership skills, career development in the clinical research field, negotiation skills, research project management, and research budgeting/financial management. Prerequisites: MAS program or permission of department.

CLRE 259. Scientific Communication Skills (2)
This course covers the key elements of scientific communication skills that are designed to enhance the clinical research’s ability to be successful. Topics include secrets of making good oral presentations and engaging the audience, how to write and prepare abstracts, basics of grant writing and submission, and how grants are reviewed. Course includes mock grant study section. Prerequisites: MAS program or permission of department.

CLRE 260. Directed Studies in Clinical Research (2)
Faculty member will direct a student’s study in selected professional development topics in clinical research. Specific content will be tailored to the student’s particular needs and interests. Students must make arrangements with the program and individual faculty member prior to enrolling in the course. Prerequisites: MAS program or permission of department.

CLRE 262. Analyzing Medical Data Using “R” (2)
Course will introduce the R Statistical Platform and help to build proficiency for data analysis. Students will perform their own analysis of the data, using linear regression methods, ANOVA, logistic regression, and regression methods for survival data. They will understand the assumptions, areas of applicability, and limitations of these statistical methods. Prerequisites: CLRE 253, CLRE 254.

CLRE 263. Longitudinal Data Analysis (2)
The class will introduce statistical methods and techniques for analyzing medical data from longitudinal studies using PASW/SPSS software. Students will understand the challenges and statistical issues for designing and analyzing longitudinal studies, recognize and use longitudinal data analysis methods and perform analysis. Prerequisites: CLRE 253.

CLRE 264. Clinical Decision Analysis (2)
The course provides an introduction to the use of decision sciences in health care. Student will be able to construct and evaluate an appropriate decision analysis probability tree, value health outcomes, use sensitivity analysis and understand how to conduct a cost-effectiveness analysis. Prerequisites: none. Restricted to MAS students (AS79).

CLRE 265. Advanced Regression Methods (2)
This course will expose and familiarize students with important advanced statistical methods such as methods for numeric outcomes (Linear regression), nonlinear regression, methods for binary outcomes (Logistic regression), methods for counts (Poisson regression) and categorical outcomes (Log-linear models). Prerequisites: CLRE 253, CLRE 254.

CLRE 268. Behavioral Science Research Methods (2)
The objective of the course is to provide students instruction in contemporary methods and statistical analyses in behavioral science research. Will teach hands-on practical skills in developing and validating assessment measures, designing clinical trials in behavioral sciences, dissemination and implementation methods, and meta-analysis. Prerequisites: access to SPSS statistical software, MAS Clinical Research program, or permission of department.

CLRE 296. Independent Study Project (6)
The ISP is the cornerstone of the MAS program. Students will be involved in a high-level clinical research project that integrates what they have learned in their formal course work. The ISP will be an independent and creative scholarly activity in an area related to one or more of the topics covered in the formal curriculum. Students’ work will be evaluated by a committee of faculty and may also include industry advisers when appropriate. Prerequisites: CLRE 250, 251, 252, 253, 254, 255, 256, 257, 258.

CLRE 298. Independent Study Project (4)
The ISP is the cornerstone of the MAS program. Students will be involved in a high-level clinical research project that integrates what they have learned in their formal course work. The ISP will be an independent and creative scholarly activity in an area related to one or more of the topics covered in the formal curriculum. Students’ work will be evaluated by a committee of faculty, and may also include industry advisors when appropriate. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in Clinical Research Program or consent of department.

CLRE 299. Mentorship and Career Planning for Clinical Research Professionals (2)
Faculty member directs student’s study in development of mentorship and career plan as related to student’s research specialization. Readings, assignments and formalized mentoring sessions designed to integrate and apply student’s learning of clinical research theory and practice to individualized career development plan. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Clinical Research Program or consent of department.

COGS 1. Introduction to Cognitive Science (4)
A team-taught course highlighting development of the field and the broad range of topics covered in the major. Example topics include addiction, analogy, animal cognition, human-computer interaction, language, neuroimaging, neural networks, reasoning, robots, and real-world applications.

COGS 3. Introduction to Computing (4)
A practical introduction to computers. Designed for undergraduates in the social sciences. Topics include: basic operations of personal computers (MAC, PC), UNIX, word processing, e-mail, spreadsheets, and creating web pages using the World Wide Web. No previous background in computing required.

COGS 8. Hands-on Computing (4)
Introductory-level course that will give students insight into the fundamental concepts of algorithmic thinking and design. The course will provide the students with first-person, hands-on experience programming a web crawler and simple physical robots.

COGS 9. Introduction to Data Science (4)
Concepts of data and its role in science will be introduced, as well as the ideas behind data-mining, text-mining, machine learning, and graph theory, and how scientists and companies are leveraging those methods to uncover new insights into human cognition.

COGS 10. Cognitive Consequences of Technology (4)
The role of cognition and computation in the development of state-of-the art technologies such as human computational interaction in aviation, air traffic control, medical diagnosis, robotics and telerobotics, and the design and engineering of cognitive artifacts.

COGS 11. Minds and Brains (4)
How damaged and normal brains influence the way humans solve problems, remember or forget, pay attention to things; how they affect our emotions, and the way we use language in daily life.

COGS 12. Language, Culture, and Cognition (4)
Do people who speak different languages think differently? Does learning new languages change the way you think? Are some thoughts unthinkable without language? Course will bring together ideas and findings from psychology, linguistics, anthropology, neuroscience, and philosophy.

COGS 13. Field Methods: Studying Cognition in the Wild (4)
This course introduces students to multiple methods to investigate cognition and behavior in natural settings. Students will learn about ethnography, videography (video data collection, coding, and analysis), surveys design and conducting interviews, and how to move from observations to modeling.

COGS 14A. Introduction to Research Methods (4)
Introduction to the scientific method. Methods of knowledge acquisition, research questions, hypotheses, operational definitions, variables, control. Observation, levels of measurement, reliability, validity. Experimentation and design: between-groups, within-subjects, quasi-experimental, factorial, single-subject. Correlational and observational studies. Ethics in research.

COGS 14B. Introduction to Statistical Analysis (4)
Introduction to descriptive and inferential statistics. Tables, graphs, measures of central tendency and variability. Distributions, Z-scores, correlation, regression. Probability, sampling, logic of inferential statistics, hypothesis testing, decision theory. T-test, one and two-way Anova, nonparametric tests (Chi-square). Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 14A.

COGS 15. What the *#!?: An Uncensored Introduction to Language (4)
This course uses the study of swearing to introduce topics in language: how children learn it, why it changes over time, and how people pronounce and understand it. Students who believe they could be offended by the study of swearing and other taboo language might not find this course appropriate for them.

COGS 17. Neurobiology of Cognition (4)
Introduction to the organization and functions of the nervous system. Topics include molecular, cellular, developmental, systems, and behavioral neurobiology. Specifically, structure and function of neurons, peripheral and central nervous systems, sensory, motor, and control systems, learning and memory mechanisms. (Students may not receive credit for both Biology 12 and Cognitive Science 17. This course fulfills general-education requirements for Marshall and Roosevelt Colleges as well as Warren by petition.)

COGS 18. Introduction to Programming with Matlab (4)
(Cross-listed with CSE 7.) Fundamentals of computer programming and basic software design covering topics related to variables, functions, and control structures; writing, testing, and debugging programs in Matlab. Examples focus on scientific applications. Recommended preparation: high school algebra and familiarity with the computing milieu. Students with limited computing experience may take Cognitive Science 3 for preparation. Students may not receive credit for both Cognitive Science 18 and CSE 7. (Will not be offered in 2016–17.)

COGS 20. Exploring the Musical Mind (4)
(Cross-listed with MUS 20.) How do we transform complex sounds into comprehensible and meaningful music? What physiological, neurological, cognitive, and cultural systems are involved? Why do we make music in such diverse ways around the globe? Does music have evolutionary or ecological significance? What is the relationship between music, motion, and emotions? This course explores contemporary understandings of how we hear and how we become musical and invites students to listen to new music in new ways. Students may not receive credit for both Cognitive Science 20 and MUS 20.

COGS 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

COGS 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
Special topics in cognitive science are discussed. P/NP grades only. (May be repeated when topics vary.)

COGS 91. SCANS Presents (1)
The department faculty and the Students for Cognitive and Neurosciences (SCANS) offer this seminar exploring issues in cognitive science. It includes informal faculty research presentations, investigations of topics not covered in the curriculum, and discussions on graduate school and careers. (May be repeated when topics vary.)

COGS 92. Resiliency in the Face of Adversity (2)
Psychological resiliency will be addressed both scientifically and pragmatically. Students will explore the way cognitive and behavioral factors contribute to one’s ability to cope with the stresses of life and emerge from them stronger than before. P/NP only. (Will not be offered in 2016–17.)

COGS 99. Independent Study (2 or 4)
Independent literature or laboratory research by arrangement with and under direction of a Department of Cognitive Science faculty member. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of thirty units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0, and a completed and approved Special Studies form.

COGS 100. Cyborgs Now and in the Future (4)
Covers the theories of situated, distributed, enactive, and embodied cognition. Explains how cyborgs are a natural consequence of our current understanding of embodied minds embedded in culturally shaped niches; how mental systems can be distributed over other people and things. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 10.

COGS 101A. Sensation and Perception (4)
An introduction to the experimental study of cognition with a focus on sensation and perception. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 1.

COGS 101B. Learning, Memory, and Attention (4)
A survey of the experimental study of learning, memory, and attention. Topics include conditioning, automaticity, divided attention, memory systems, and the nature of mental representation. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 1. Recommended: Cognitive Science 101A.

COGS 101C. Language (4)
An introduction to structure of natural language, and to the cognitive processes that underline its acquisition, comprehension, and production. This course covers findings from linguistics, computer science, psychology, and cognitive neuroscience to provide an integrated perspective on human language abilities. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 1 and 14A.

COGS 102A. Distributed Cognition (4)
Cognitive processes extend beyond the boundaries of the person to include the environment, artifacts, social interactions, and culture. Major themes include the philosophy and history of cognitive science, the role of artifacts in human cognition, and theories of socially distributed, embodied, and extended cognition. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 1 and Cognitive Science 14A.

COGS 102B. Cognitive Ethnography (4)
This course examines memory, reasoning, language understanding, learning, and planning directly in everyday, real-world settings. The course work includes projects in which students make observations of real-world activity and analyze their cognitive significance. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 102A.

COGS 102C. Cognitive Design Studio (6)
This is a project-based course focused on the process of cognitive design. Students work in teams to design and evaluate a prototype application or redesign an existing system. Three hours of lecture and two hours of design laboratory. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 102B or consent of instructor.

COGS 107A. Neuroanatomy and Physiology (4)
This first course in the sequence focuses on principles of brain organization, from neurons to circuits to functional networks. It explores developmental plasticity, neuronal connectivity, cellular communication, complex signaling, and how these various dimensions form functional brain systems. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 1 or Cognitive Science 17.

COGS 107B. Systems Neuroscience (4)
This course focuses on the electrical dynamics of neurons and how their patterns relate to perception, thought, and action. Neural activity patterns underlying vision, touch, audition, proprioception, and head orientation are examined in detail. Also examined are motor control, sleep/wake state production, action planning, learning, memory, attention, spatial cognition and function of the cerebellum, basal ganglia, and hippocampus. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 107A.

COGS 107C. Cognitive Neuroscience (4)
This course reviews research investigating the neural bases for human mental processes, including processing of affective, social, linguistic, and visuospatial information, as well as memory, attention, and executive functions. Also discussed are brain development and brain aging, and the nature of intelligence and creativity. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 107B and its prerequisites.

COGS 109. Modeling and Data Analysis (4)
Exposure to the basic computational methods useful throughout cognitive science. Computing basic statistics, modeling learning individuals, evolving populations, communicating agents, and corpus-based linguistics will be considered. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 14B and Mathematics 20F and CSE 7 or CSE 11 or CSE 8A or consent of instructor.

COGS 110. The Developing Mind (4)
(Cross-listed with HDP 121.) This course examines changes in thinking and perceiving the physical and social world from birth through childhood. Evidence of significant changes in encoding information, forming mental representations, and solving problems is culled from psychological research, cross-cultural studies, and cognitive science. Prerequisites: HDP 1 or Cognitive Science 1.

COGS 115. Neurological Development and Cognitive Change (4)
This course provides an overview of neurological development and explores the relations between physiological change and the experience for the child from the prenatal period through adolescence. Prerequisites: BILD 10, or Cognitive Science 17, or HDP 110.

COGS 118A. Natural Computation I (4)
This course is one part of a two-course foundation that forms a rigorous introduction to machine learning and computational modeling of biological intelligence. Natural Computation I and II are independent courses that may be taken in either order. Topics in Natural Computation I may include Bayesian inference, regression, graphical models, sampling, hidden Markov model, decision theory, information theory, reinforcement learning, and some application areas. Prerequisites: CSE 11 or CSE 8B and Mathematics 20F and Mathematics 20E and Mathematics 180A, or consent of instructor.

COGS 118B. Natural Computation II (4)
This course is one part of a two-course foundation that forms a rigorous introduction to machine learning and computational modeling of biological intelligence. Natural Computation I and II are independent courses that may be taken in either order. Topics in Natural Computation II may include: maximum likelihood estimation, bayesian parameter estimation, clustering, self-organized maps, principal component analysis, neural networks, support vector machines, and some application areas. Prerequisites: CSE 11 or CSE 8B and Mathematics 20F and Mathematics H20E and Mathematics 180A or consent of instructor.

COGS 118C. Neural Signal Processing (4)
This course will cover theoretical foundations and practical applications of signal processing to neural data. Topics include EEG/field potential methods (filtering, Fourier (spectral) analysis, coherence) and spike train analysis (reverse correlation, spike sorting, multielectrode recordings). Some applications to neural imaging (optical microscopy, fMRI) data will also be discussed. Prerequisites: Mathematics 18 or Mathematics 20F or Mathematics 31AH and Cognitive Science 14B or Psychology 60 and Cognitive Science 108 or Cognitive Science 109.

COGS 118D. Mathematical Statistics for Behavioral Data Analysis (4)
Statistical methods for analyzing behavioral data. A mathematically sophisticated course covering both classical and Bayesian statistical methods for estimation, hypothesis testing, regression, and model comparison. Emphasis on both mathematical understanding of statistical methods as well as common applications. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 108 or Cognitive Science 109 or Mathematics 11 and Mathematics 18 or Mathematics 20F or Mathematics 31AH and Mathematics180A or consent of instructor.

COGS 119. Programming for Experimental Research (4)
This course will help students in the behavioral sciences (cognitive science, psychology, linguistics, neuroscience, and related fields) learn how to program experiments and analyze and present data. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 14B and Mathematics 20F and CSE 7.

COGS 120. Interaction Design (5)
(Cross-listed with CSE 170.) Introduces fundamental methods and principles for designing, implementing, and evaluating user interfaces. Topics: user-centered design, rapid prototyping, experimentation, direct manipulation, cognitive principles, visual design, social software, software tools. Learn by doing: work with a team on a quarter-long design project. Recommended preparation: basic familiarity with HTML. Students may not receive credit for both Cognitive Science 120 and CSE 170. Prerequisites: CSE 11 or CSE 8A and Cognitive Science 1 or Cognitive Science 187A or DSGN 1.

COGS 121. Human Computer Interaction Programming Studio (4)
This course covers fundamentals of user interface design and implementation of web-based systems. A major component is completion of a substantial programming project in which students work together in small teams. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 120 and CSE 8B or CSE 11.

COGS 133. Data Science in Practice (4)
Data science is multidisciplinary, covering computer science, statistics, cognitive science and psychology, data visualization, artificial intelligence, and machine learning, among others. This course teaches critical skills needed to pursue a data science career using hands-on programming and experimental challenges. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 9, Cognitive Science 14B, and CSE 8A.

COGS 143. Animal Cognition (4)
Review of historical perspectives: introspectionist, behaviorist, and cognitivist models. Examination of how perceptual and motor constraints and ecological demands yield species-specific differences in cognitive repertoire. Contemporary issues in the comparative study of the evolution of human cognition. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

COGS 151. Analogy and Conceptual Systems (4)
Human thought and meaning are deeply tied to the capacity for mapping conceptual domains onto each other, inducing common schemas and performing mental simulation. This course examines major aspects of this cognitive activity including metaphor, conceptual blending, and embodied cognition. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

COGS 152. Cognitive Foundations of Mathematics (4)
How the human mind/brain creates mathematics: embodiment, innovation, and creativity. The emergence and power of abstract concepts, such as infinity, infinitesimals, imaginary numbers, or zero. Cognitive approaches that connect mathematics to human thought in general. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 1 or Philosophy 1 or Psychology 1 or Education Studies (20 or 30 or 31); upper-division standing.

COGS 153. Language Comprehension (4)
The processes and representations involved in understanding language—processing words, syntax, semantics, and discourse—are examined in light of evidence from both psychological experiments and computer simulations. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

COGS 154. Communication Disorders in Children and Adults (4)
Neural bases of language use in normal adults, and neural bases of language and communication development in normal children. Evidence on the language and communication deficits in adults (especially aphasia and dementia) and children (specific language impairment, focal brain injury, retardation, and autism). Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

COGS 155. Gesture and Cognition (4)
Spontaneous gestures and their relationship to speech, cognition, brain, and culture. The course covers, among others, gesture and language development, gesture and conceptual systems, speech-gesture coproduction and its brain bases, evolution of language, and gestural behavior in special populations. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

COGS 156. Language Development (4)
A comprehensive survey of theory, method and research findings on language development in children ranging from the earliest stages of speech perception and communication at birth to refinements in narrative discourse and conventional fluency through middle childhood and adolescence. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and background in development psychology and/or linguistics is recommended.

COGS 157. Music and the Mind (4)
Explores how humans (and other species) process music, including pitch, meter, emotion, motor aspects, links to language, brain activity. Students should have experience reading musical notation. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 101A or Cognitive Science 101B or Cognitive Science 101C.

COGS 160. Upper-Division Seminar on Special Topics (4)
Special topics in cognitive science are discussed. (May be repeated when topics vary.) Prerequisites: department approval.

COGS 163. Metabolic Disorders of the Brain (4)
Research is showing that cellular metabolic processes are mediating normal and abnormal brain function. For example, neurocognitive disorders often co-occur with metabolic disturbances, such as insulin resistance, diabetes, and obesity. An understanding of these mechanisms will provide insight to new treatments for cognitive and neurological disorders. The course will cover topics on the role of abnormal cellular structure, genetic, epigenetic and pathogenic influences on synaptic signaling. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

COGS 164. Neurobiology of Motivation (4)
This course will address principles of motivation, valuation, and reward, spanning a large territory of topics, from rules of synaptic learning to classroom learning. Recommended preparation: courses in basic biology, physiology, Cognitive Science 107A or 107B or 107C, or courses in education. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

COGS 169. Genetic Information for Behavior: From Single Cells to Mammals (4)
Behavior draws on a wide range of genes acting as a complex source of information. Model organisms—bacteria, Paramecium, C. elegans, Drosophila, and mice—have provided insight into how genes influence both innate and learned behaviors. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 1 and 107A or permission of instructor.

COGS 171. Mirror Neuron System (4)
This class will examine the neuroanatomy, physiology, and functional correlates of the human mirror neuron system and its putative role in social cognition, e.g., action understanding, empathy, and theory of mind. We will examine the developmental, neuroimaging, electrophysiological, as well as clinical evidence, for and against this hypothesis. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

COGS 172. Brain Disorders and Cognition (4)
A review of the patterns of impaired and intact cognitive abilities present in brain-damaged patients in terms of damage to one or more components of a model of normal cognitive functioning. (Cognitive science majors may not receive elective credit for both Psychology 139 and Cognitive Science 172.) Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 107A.

COGS 174. Drugs: Brain, Mind, and Culture (4)
This course explores how drugs interact with the brain/mind and culture. It covers evolutionary and historical perspectives, brain chemistry, pharmacology, expectancies and placebo effects, and models of addiction. It also provides a biopsychosocial survey of commonly used and abused substances. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

COGS 175. The Neuropsychological Basis of Alternate States of Consciousness (4)
This course will review the literature that correlates brain rhythms in the human EEG with aspects of cognition, behavioral states, neuropsycho-pharmacology, and psychopathology in order to understand the psychological and neurophysiological underpinnings of these experiences. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 101A or Cognitive Science 107A.

COGS 176. From Sleep to Attention (4)
This course will combine an examination of the neural character of quiet and active sleep states and their potential functions with an examination of the different mechanisms by which the brain mediates attention to specific features of the world. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 107B.

COGS 177. Space and Time in the Brain (4)
The course examines features of neural dynamics that map spatial and temporal relationships. Lectures will cover interval timing, mapping of item-to-observer position, mapping of observer-to-world position, and the conjunction of spatial and temporal coding in hippocampus. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 107B.

COGS 178. Genes, Brains, and Behavior (4)
Evidence for genetic mediation of behavioral and neural differences, mechanisms that may mediate these effects, and the roles of the environment and experience are discussed. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 107A and 107B or consent of instructor.

COGS 179. Electrophysiology of Cognition (4)
Survey the theory and practice of using electrical recordings (event-related brain potentials) to study cognition and behavior including attention, language, mental chronometry, memory, and plasticity. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 107A or Psychology 106; Cognitive Science 101A or Psychology 105.

COGS 180. Neural Coding in Sensory Systems (4)
This course covers recent advances in the understanding of common neural mechanisms and computational principles underlying the brain’s ability to process multiple sources of sensory information—vision, audition, olfaction, touch, and equilibrioception—and translate them into actions. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 1, Cognitive Science 14B, Cognitive Science 101A, and Cognitive Science 109.

COGS 184. Modeling the Evolution of Cognition (4)
This interdisciplinary course integrates data on evolutionary theory, hominid prehistory, primate behavior, comparative neuro-anatomy, cognitive development, and collaboration. After lectures, readings, discussions, and Museum of Man tour, students generate a detailed timeline of five million years of human cognitive evolution. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 17, or 107A, or 107B, or 107C.

COGS 185. Advanced Machine Learning Methods (4)
This course is an advanced seminar and project course that follows the Natural Computation courses. Advanced and new machine learning methods will be discussed and used. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 118B or Cognitive Science 118A.

COGS 187A. Usability and Information Architecture (6)
Examines the cognitive basis of successful web and multimedia design. Topics: information architecture, navigation, usability, graphic layout, transaction design, and how to understand user interaction. Prerequisites: CSE 7.

COGS 187B. Practicum in Professional Web Design (4)
This course follows up on the basics of multimedia design taught in Cognitive Science 187A. Students will probe more deeply into selective topics, such as animation, navigation, graphical display of information, and narrative coherence. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 187A or consent of instructor.

COGS 188. AI Algorithm and Social Language (4)
This class will cover latest machine learning and text analysis algorithm. Such algorithms have become important in the area of data collected from the Internet and for the analysis for social network activities such as Twitter posts, E-mails, blogs, etc. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 109 or Cognitive Science 118A or Cognitive Science 118B.

COGS 189. Brain Computer Interfaces (4)
This course will discuss signal processing, pattern recognition algorithms, and human-computer interaction issues in EEG-based brain-computer interfaces. Other types of brain-computer interfaces will also be discussed. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 118B or Cognitive Science 118A or Cognitive Science 109. 

COGS 190A. Pre-Honors Project in Cognitive Science (4)
This course prepares students for the Cognitive Science Honors Program. The aim is to refine the research project and to teach students what a successfully written proposal entails. Students may be admitted to the Honors Program contingent upon completion and progress in the course. See “Cognitive Science Honors Program” section for more information. Course should be taken for a letter grade. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; instructor and department approval.

COGS 190B. Honors Studies in Cognitive Science (4)
This course will allow cognitive science honors students to explore advanced issues in the field of cognitive science research. It will also provide the opportunity to develop a thesis on the topic of their choice and begin work under faculty supervision. See “Cognitive Science Honors Program” section for more information. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 190A and formal admittance to the Cognitive Science Honors Program; department stamp.

COGS 190C. Honors Thesis in Cognitive Science (4)
This course will provide honors candidates an opportunity to complete the research on and preparation of an honors thesis under close faculty supervision. Oral presentation of student’s thesis is required to receive honors; additionally, student must receive grade of A– or better in 190B and 190C to receive honors. See “Cognitive Science Honors Program” section for more information. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 190B with grade of A– or better and formal admittance to the Cognitive Science Honors Program.

COGS 190D. Preparation for Thesis Presentation (1)
This course is affiliated with the honors program (190A-B-C) and is required of honors students during spring quarter. Its aim is to prepare students to present research results to an audience. Emphasis will be on the oral presentation (organization, wording, graphics), but there will also be some discussion about written research reports. Seminar style format with occasional short lectures wherein students will practice oral presentations and provide constructive criticism to each other. Prerequisites: must be concurrently enrolled in 190B or 190C.

COGS 195. Instructional Apprenticeship in Cognitive Science (4)
Students, under the direction of the instructor, lead laboratory or discussion sections, attend lectures, and meet regularly with the instructor to help prepare course materials and grade papers and exams. Applications must be submitted to and approved by the department. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; 3.0 GPA; instructor and department approval.

COGS 198. Directed Group Study (2 or 4)
This independent study course is for small groups of advanced students who wish to complete a one- quarter reading or research project under the mentorship of a faculty member. Students should contact faculty whose research interests them to discuss possible projects. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; 2.5 GPA; consent of instructor and department approval.

COGS 199. Special Project (2 or 4)
This independent study course is for individual, advanced students who wish to complete a one- quarter reading or research project under the mentorship of a faculty member. Students should contact faculty whose research interests them to discuss possible projects. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; 2.5 GPA; consent of instructor and department approval.

COGS 200. Cognitive Science Seminar (4)
This seminar emphasizes the conceptual basis of cognitive science, including representation, processing mechanisms, language, and the role of interaction among individuals, culture, and the environment. Current developments in each field are considered as they relate to issues in cognitive science. (May be repeated for credit.)

COGS 201. Systems Neuroscience (4)
Examination of the neurophysiological and neuroanatomical basis for perception, cognition, and learning. Lectures will focus on the dynamics of neural activity in cortical and subcortical structures as they relate to sensory processing, motor control, attention, arousal state, and memory.  

COGS 202. Cognitive Science Foundations: Computational Modeling of Cognition (4)
This course surveys the development of symbolic and connectionist models of cognition. Selected readings from the late 1940s to the present are covered. Topics include: Turing machines, information theory, computational complexity, search, learning, symbolic artificial intelligence, and neural networks.

COGS 203. Cognitive Science Foundations: Theories and Methods in the Study of Cognitive Phenomena (4)
Surveys a variety of theoretical and methodological approaches to the study of human cognition. Topics include language structure, language processing, concepts and categories, knowledge representation, analogy and metaphor, reasoning, planning and action, problem solving, learning and expertise, and emotion.

COGS 205. Introduction to Thesis Research (4)
This course is taken to focus the students’ development of a thesis topic and research proposal. Students prepare an outline of thesis proposal and make an oral public presentation of the proposed topic prior to the end of the third year. S/U only.

COGS 210A-B-C. Introduction to Research (4-4-4)
This sequence is an intensive research project. Students under faculty mentorship perform a thorough analysis of the problem and the literature, carry out original studies, and prepare oral and written presentations. Students should aim for a report of publishable quality. Letter grade required.

COGS 211A-B-C. Research Methods in Cognitive Science (2-2-2)
Issues in design, implementation, and evaluation of research in cognitive science are discussed. Students will present and comment on their own research projects in progress. Discussions also include presentations of research to various audiences, abstracts, reviews, grant process, and scientific ethics. Letter grade required.

COGS 219. Programming for Behavioral Sciences (4)
An applied hands-on programming course that focuses on the design, implementation and analysis of experiments. Topics include experiment design, stimulus presentation, response collection, file manipulation, data analysis, display, and presentation. Course work includes both team and individual projects. Graduate students who have not programmed at all should speak with the professor beforehand.

COGS 220. Information Visualization (4)
This seminar surveys current research in information visualization with the goal of preparing students to do original research. The focus is on the cognitive aspects of information design, dynamic representations, and computational techniques. Topics vary each time course is offered.

COGS 225. Visual Computing (4)
This course is designed to open the doors for students who are interested in learning about the fundamental principles of visual perception and important applications of computer vision.

COGS 229. Design at Large (1)
(Cross-listed with CSE 219.) New societal challenges, cultural values, and technological opportunities are changing design—and vice versa. The seminar explores this increased scale, real-world engagement, and disruptive impact. Invited speakers from UC San Diego and beyond share cutting-edge research on interaction, design, and learning. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit ninety-nine times.

COGS 230. Topics in Human-Computer Interaction (4)
(Cross-listed with CSE 216.) Prepares students to conduct original HCI research by reading and discussing seminal and cutting-edge research papers. Topics include design, social software, input techniques, mobile, and ubiquitous computing. Student pairs perform a quarter-long mini research project that leverages campus research efforts. Letter grades only.

COGS 234. Distributed Cognition (4)
This course focuses on aspects of individual and socially distributed cognition. Empirical examples are drawn from natural and experimental settings that presuppose, tacitly or explicitly, socially distributed knowledge among participants. The class examines the way locally managed, pragmatic conditions influence how decisions are framed.

COGS 238. Topics in Cognitive Linguistics (1–4)
(Same as Linguistics 238.) Basic concepts, empirical findings, and recent developments in cognitive and functional linguistics. Language viewed dynamically in relation to conceptualization, discourse, meaning construction, and cognitive processing. (As topics vary, may be repeated for credit.)

COGS 241. Ethics and Survival Skills in Academia (3)
(Same as Neurosciences 241.) This course will cover ethical issues that arise in academia, including: dishonesty, plagiarism, attribution, sexual misconduct, etc. We will also discuss ‘survival’ issues, including job hunting, grant preparation, journal reviews, writing letters of recommendation, mentoring, etc. S/U only.

COGS 243. Statistical Inference and Data Analysis (2 or 4)
This course provides a rigorous treatment of hypothesis testing, statistical inference, model fitting, and exploratory data analysis techniques used in the cognitive and neural sciences. Students will acquire an understanding of mathematical foundations and hands-on experience in applying these methods using Matlab.

COGS 252. Cognitive Science of Mathematics (4)
Empirical investigation of the nature of mathematics. How the human mind/brain creates abstract concepts, such as infinity, infinitesimals, imaginary numbers, or zero: embodiment, creativity, and history. Cognitive approaches that connect mathematics to human thought in general.

COGS 260. Seminar on Special Topics (1–4)
Specific topics in cognitive science are discussed. (May be repeated when topics vary.)

COGS 277. Mirroring in Social Cognition (4)
The discovery of mirror neurons in the monkey brain raised the possibility that “mirroring” constitutes instances of mental simulation. In this seminar, we will examine the neural basis of social cognition and specifically the relationship between mirroring processes and cognition.

COGS 278. Genetics and Individuality (4)
Evidence for the heritability and for the association of genetic variants with behavioral and neural phenotypes will be reviewed. Integrative models of gene-environment interaction will be discussed. Guest faculty will describe their own work in this area.

COGS 279. Electrophysiology of Cognition (4)
(Cross-listed with NEU 279) This course surveys the theory and practice of using recordings of electrical and magnetic activity of the brain to study cognition and behavior. It explores what brain waves reveal about normal and abnormal perception, processing, decision making, memory, preparation, and comprehension. Graduate students will be required to do additional readings for the material each week (different for each grad) and to present orally (as well as in a written page) a critical analysis of the readings. Prerequisites: Cognitive Science 107A or Psychology 106; Cognitive Science 101A or Psychology 105.

COGS 280. Neural Oscillations (4)
Brain rhythms play a critical role in perception and cognition. What are they? Where do they come from? This course will examine the origin and function of neural oscillations and the role they play in neural computation, representation, and cognition. Prerequisites: departmental approval. Python/Matlab experience required prior to enrollment.

COGS 290. Cognitive Science Laboratory Rotation (2)
Laboratory rotations provide students with experience in the various experimental methods used in cognitive science. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. S/U only.

COGS 291. Laboratory Research (1–4)
Students engage in discussions of reading of recent research in an area designated and directed by the instructor and also participate in the design and execution of original research. Students are expected to demonstrate oral and written competence in presenting original research. Prerequisites: consent of the instructor and departmental approval. (May be repeated for credit.)

COGS 298. Directed Independent Study (1–12)
Students study and research selected topics under the direction of a member of the faculty.

COGS 299. Thesis Research (1–12)
Students are provided directed research on their dissertation topic by faculty advisors.

COGS 500. Teaching Apprenticeship (1–4)
This practicum for graduate students provides experience in teaching undergraduate cognitive science courses. S/U only.

COMM 10. Introduction to Communication (4)
Introduction to the history, theory, and practice of communication, including language and literacy, representation and semiotics, mediated technologies and institutional formations, and social interaction. Integrates the study of communication with a range of media production (for example, writing, electronic media, film, performance). Students will not receive credit for COGN 20 and COMM 10. COMM 10 may be taken concurrently with the COMM A, B, C courses and intermediate electives. Course is offered fall, winter, and summer quarters.

COGN 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

COMM 100A. Situated Practices (4)
A critical introduction to processes of interaction and engagement in lived and built environments. Includes historical survey of theories/methods, including actor network theory, conversation analysis, ethnography, ethnomethodology, cultural linguistics, performance, and social cognition; and integrates scholarly study with production-oriented engagement. Students will not receive credit for COHI 100 and COMM 100A. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 100B. Interpretive Strategies (4)
A critical introduction to the practice and the effects of representation within historically situated cultural contexts. Surveys a range of theories/methods in interpretations and identity to understand the effects of these practices upon the form and content of various representational genres, and integrates scholarly study with production-oriented engagement. Students will not receive credit for COCU 100 and COMM 100B. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 100C. Social Formations (4)
A critical introduction to structures of communication formed across the intersections of the state, economy, and civil society. Includes historical survey of communication industries, legal and policy-based arenas, civic and political organizations, and other social institutions; and integrates scholarly study with production-oriented engagement. Students will not receive credit for COSF 100 and COMM 100C. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 190. Junior Seminar in Communication (4)
The junior seminar entails a detailed examination of a specific topic from the field of communication, exploring in greater depth theories and methods introduced in the core communication curriculum. Seminars are limited to thirty students, with a heavy focus on class participation. Students complete a research project with a significant final product (typically a research paper). Students will not receive credit for both COGN 150 and COMM 190. Prerequisites: junior or senior standing and COMM 10 and at least one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 101. Introduction to Audiovisual Media Practices (4)
This upper-level undergraduate course is required as the gateway to all future media production courses. Students will learn about historical and theoretical contemporary media practices such as film, video, Internet, and social media production and how these practices are informed by technical and social constraints. In lab, students will work hands-on with video and new media equipment to apply what they have learned through genre and practical technique. Students will not receive credit for COGN 21 or 22 and COMM 101. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 101D. MPL: Nonlinear/Digital Editing (4)
Prepare students to edit on nonlinear editing facilities and introduce aesthetic theories of editing: time code editing, time line editing on the Media 100, digital storage and digitization of audio and video, compression, resolution, and draft mode editing. By the end of the course students will be able to demonstrate mastery of the digital editing facilities. May be taken for credit three times. Students will not receive credit for COMT 100 and COMM 101D. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and COMM 101 prerequisites can be taken concurrently by permission. 

COMM 101E. MPL: Ethnographic Methods for Media Production (4)
This is a practical course on ethnographic fieldwork—obtaining informed consent interviewing, negotiating, formulating a research topic, finding relevant literature, writing a research paper, and assisting others with their research. May be taken for credit three times. Students will not receive credit for COMT 112 and COMM 101E. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and COMM 101 prerequisites can be taken concurrently by permission. 

COMM 101K. MPL: Documentary Sketchbook (4)
Digital video is the medium used in this class both as a production technology and as a device to explore the theory and practice of documentary production. Technical demonstrations, lectures, production exercises, and readings will emphasize the interrelation between production values and ethics, problems of representation, and documentary history. May be taken for credit three times. Students will not receive credit for COMT 120 and COMM 101K. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and COMM 101 prerequisites can be taken concurrently by permission.

COMM 101M. MPL: Communication and Computers (4)
This course introduces students to computers as media of communication. Each quarter students participate in a variety of networking activities designed to show the interactive potential of the medium. Fieldwork designed to teach basic methods is combined with readings designed to build a deeper theoretical understanding of computer-based communication. Students will not receive credit for COMT 111A and COMM 101M. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 101N. MPL: Sound Production and Manipulation (4)
Advanced seminar in sound production, design, editing. Students create projects by recording original sounds, editing on a Pro-Tools system. We consider the potential of sound in film, radio, TV, and the web by reviewing work and reading sound theory. May be taken for credit three times. Students will not receive credit for COMT 121 and COMM 101N. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and COMM 101 prerequisites can be taken concurrently by permission.

COMM 101T. MPL: Topics in Production (4)
Specialized study in production with topics to be determined by the instructor for any given quarter. Students will use studio, editing rooms, cameras to construct a variety of in or outside studio productions that can include YouTube, Documentary shorts, Vimeo, with topics that show the effects on social issues. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: COMM 101 or COGN 22 or VIS 70N prerequisites can be taken concurrently by permission.

COMM 102C. MMPP: Practicum in New Media and Community Life (6)
A combined lecture/lab in a specially designed after-school setting in southeastern San Diego working with children and adults. Students design new media and produce special projects, and explore issues related to human development, social justice, and community life. May be taken for credit three times. Students will not receive credit for COMT 115 and COMM 102C. Prerequisites: none

COMM 102D. MMPP: Practicum in Child Development (6)
A combined lecture/lab course on after-school learning, social change, and community-based research. Students are expected to participate in a supervised after-school setting at one of four community labs in San Diego County. Students will learn ethnographic field methods, develop culturally relevant curriculum, and work in diverse settings. May be taken for credit three times. Students will not receive credit for COMT 116 and COMM 102D. Prerequisites: none.

COMM 102M. MMPP: Studio Television (6)
This course offers students the opportunity to produce and engage in critical discussions around various television production formats. We will study and produce a variety of projects, including public service announcements, panel programs, scripted drama, and performance productions. May be taken for credit three times. Students will not receive credit for COMT 104 and COMM 102M. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and COMM 101 or COGN 22 or VIS 70N.

COMM 102P. MMPP: Television Analysis and Production (6)
An introduction to the techniques and conventions common in television production with equal emphasis on method and content. Studio sessions provide students with opportunities to experiment in framing subject matter through a variety of cinematographic methods. May be taken for credit three times. Students will not receive credit for COMT 101 and COMM 102P. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and COMM 101 or COGN 22 or VIS 70N.

COMM 102T. MMPP: Television Documentary (6)
An advanced television course that examines the history, form, and function of the television documentary in American society. Experimentation with documentary techniques and styles requires prior knowledge of television or film production. Laboratory sessions apply theory and methods in the documentary genre via technological process. Integrates research, studio, and field experience of various media components. May be taken for credit three times. Students will not receive credit for COMT 103 and COMM 102T. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and COMM 101 or COGN 22 or VIS 70N.

COMM 103D. CM: Documentary History and Theory (4)
History of nonfiction film and video. Through film and written texts we survey the nonfiction film genre, considering technological innovations, ethical issues, and formal movements related to these representations of the “real.” Students write a research paper in lieu of a final. Students will not receive credit for COCU 124 and COMM 103D. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 103E. CM: History of Electronic Media (4)
This course considers the social, cultural, economic, and technological contexts that have shaped electronic media, from the emergence of radio and television to their convergence through the Internet, and how these pervasive forms of audiovisual culture have impacted American society. Students will not receive credit for COSF 130 and COMM 103E. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 103F. CM: How to Read a Film (4)
This course increases our awareness of the ways we interpret or make understanding from movies to enrich and increase the means by which one can enjoy and comprehend movies. We will talk about movies and explore a range of methods and approaches to film interpretation. Readings will emphasize major and diverse theorists, including Bazin, Eisenstein, Cavell, and Mulvey. Students will not receive credit for COCU 125 and COMM 103F. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 104D. CMS: Asia (4)
The development of media systems in Asia, focusing on India and China. Debates over nationalism, regionalism, globalization, new technologies, identity politics, censorship, privatization, and media piracy. Alignments and differences with North American and European media systems will also be considered. Students will not receive credit for COSF 140A and COMM 104D. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 104E. CMS: Europe (4)
The development of media systems and policies in Europe. Differences between European and American journalism. Debates over the commercialization of television. The role of media in postcommunist societies in Eastern Europe. Students will not receive credit for COSF 140B and COMM 104E. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 104F. CMS: Africa (4)
This course will critically examine the role of the mass media in sub-Saharan Africa in the areas of colonial rule, nationalist struggles, authoritarianism, and popular movements. It will examine general trends regionally and internationally, as well as individual national cases, from the early twentieth century to the Internet news services of the information age. Students will not receive credit for COSF 184 and COMM 104F. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 104G. CMS: Latin America and the Caribbean (4)
The development of media systems and policies in Latin America and the Caribbean. Debates over dependency and cultural imperialism. The news media and the process of democratization. Development of the regional television industry. Students will not receive credit for COSF 140C and COMM 104G. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 105G. CT: Computer Games Studies (4)
Course considers computer games both as media and as sites of communication. Games are studied through hands-on play and texts from a variety of disciplinary perspectives. Course encompasses commercial, academic, and independent games. Students will not receive credit for COCU 177 and COMM 105G. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 105M. CT: Mobile Communication (4)
Movement is central to our lives. This course draws on the latest research into how we travel, trade, and move. Diverse topics will be covered, including kids in cars, the New York subway, and theories of mobility. Students will not receive credit for COHI 128 and COMM 105M. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 105P. CT: Photographic Technologies (4)
This course examines photographic technologies as a set of instruments and practices that modern societies have developed and used to tell stories about themselves and make particular claims about truth and reality, focusing on the domains of science, policing, journalism, advertising, and self-expression. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 106A. Cultural Industries: Introduction (4)
Course examines the organization of some of the many industries (e.g., film, music, gaming, and publishing) that make up the cultural landscape with an eye toward discerning the conditions that shape the production of cultural goods and services: how is production organized within cultural industries; how are products distributed; and what is the impact of both the organization and distribution of goods on the conditions of work and labor? Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 106F. CI: Film Industry (4)
A study of the social organization of the film industry throughout its history. Who makes films, by what criteria, and for what audience. The changing relationships between studios, producers, directors, writers, actors, editors, censors, distributors, audience, and subject matter of the films will be explored. Students will not receive credit for COSF 186 and COMM 106F. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 106G. CI: Tourism: Global Industry and Cultural Form (4)
The largest industry in the world has far-reaching cultural ramifications. We will explore tourism’s history and its contemporary cultural effects, taking the perspective of the “toured” as well as that of the tourist. Students will not receive credit for COCU 130 and COMM 106G. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 106I. CI: Internet Industry (4)
The political economy of the emergent Internet industry, charted through analysis of its hardware, software, and services components. The course specifies leading trends and changing institutional outcomes by relating the Internet industry to the adjoining media, telecommunications, and computer industries. Students will not receive credit for COSF 127 and COMM 106I. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 106T. CI: Television Culture and the Public (4)
How and what does television communicate? Emphasis will be on contemporary US television programming, placed in comparative and historical context. Special topics may include: TV genres, TV and politics, TV and other media. Frequent in-class screenings. Students will not receive credit for COCU 140 and COMM 106T. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 106V. CI: TV Industry (4)
Course examines political economy of television throughout its history. How TV is made, who is involved, how is industry organized, how does it get regulated, distributed? Consider how these answers changed over time and look at recent influences of digital technologies. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 107. Visual Culture (4)
How visual images contribute to our understanding of the world and ourselves. Theoretical approaches from media studies, art history, gender studies, and social theory will be used to analyze cultures of science, art, mass media, and everyday life. Students will not receive credit for COCU 108 and COMM 107. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 108A. POB: Introduction (4)
How do political contests and debates come to be organized on and around bodies? In what sense is the natural body a sign system and how does its organization represent and reproduce cultural values, moral assumptions, social relations, and economic rationales? This course examines these and other questions through political, historical, and media analysis. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 108D. POB: Disability (4)
Cultural and historical ways of defining and understanding disability relative to communication and assistive technologies, including the impact of digital technologies and the Americans with Disabilities Act. Course use of audiovisual texts and writings from fields including science and technology studies, and cultural studies. Students will not receive credit for COCU 141C and COMM 108D. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 108G. POB: Gender and Biomedicine (4)
Historical and cultural aspects of media, information, imaging technology use in biomedical research, clinical care, health communication to constructions of gender and identity. We approach the subject through audiovisual texts and writings from fields including science and technology studies and cultural studies. Students will not receive credit for COCU 141B and COMM 108G. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 109D. MC: Advertising and Society (4)
Advertising in historical and cross-cultural perspectives. Ideology and organization of the advertising industry; meaning of material goods; gifts in capitalist, socialist, and nonindustrial societies; natures of needs, desires, and whether advertising creates needs, desires; and approaches to decoding the advertising messages. Students will not receive credit for COCU 170 and COMM 109D. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 109E. MC: Mass Communication: Political Economy of Mass Communication (4)
The social, legal, and economic forces affecting the evolution of mass communications institutions and structure in the industrialized world. The character and the dynamics of mass communications in the United States today. Students will not receive credit for COSF 180 and COMM 109E. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 109N. MC: American News Media (4)
History, politics, social organization, and ideology of the American news media. Surveys of the development of the news media as an institution, from earliest new newspapers to modern mass news media. Students will not receive credit for COSF 171A and COMM 109N, Prerequisites: SOCI 1 or COMM 10.

COMM 109P. MC: Propaganda and Persuasion (4)
Propaganda, in political-economic, national settings; Soviet Union; Nazi Germany; US World War I and II. Propaganda films, contribution of filmmakers to propaganda campaign. Explore issues in propaganda; persuasive communication; political propaganda; persuasive advertising; public relations; practical, ethical perspectives. Students will not receive credit for COSF 143 and COMM 109P. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 110M. LLC: Communication and Community (4)
This course examines forms of communication that affect people’s everyday lives. Focusing on ways that ethnic communities transmit and acquire information and interact with mainstream institutions, we examine a variety of alternative local media, including murals, graffiti, newsletters, and community radio. Students will not receive credit for COHI 122 and COM 110M. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 110P. LLC: Language and Human Communication (4)
This course examines the interaction of language and culture in human communication. Beginning with language evolution, the course then discusses a broad range of human languages, including indigenous languages, sign languages, and hybrid languages spoken in urban centers. Students will not receive credit for COHI 134 and COMM 110P. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 110T. LLC: Language, Thought, and Media (4)
This course examines the ways in which various communicative channels mediate human action and thought. A basic premise of the course is that human thought is shaped in important ways by the communicative devices used to communicate. There is a particular emphasis on how thought develops, both historically and in the individual. Students will not receive credit for COHI 117 and COMM 110T. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 111A. CCP: Communication and Cultural Production: Introduction (4)
This course examines the products of culture industries (e.g., music, television, fashion, food, landscape, architectural design) to analyze, specifically, how culture is consumed and by whom. How are spectators hailed and audiences fostered and shaped? And what is the role of audiences in fostering and shaping cultural forms and products? Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 111C. CCP: Cities and Space (4)
This course offers an introduction to the production of urban space. Cities are produced by sociocultural shifts wrought by migration, technological changes, new forms of production, globalization, and climate change. How is the landscape or built environment of the city shaped by the combined and often contradictory forces of capital, expert knowledge, social movements, and urban dwellers? Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 111D. CCP: Critical Design/Intermediate Studio (4)
Hands-on course that introduces students to design as political activity. Students work in groups to design an intervention into their own communities and think about how design plays a political role in our daily lives. Students ask how differently designed objects and environments help perpetuate or interrupt the status quo by examining examples from design, architecture, media activism, and everyday life. Students work on ambiguous problems, take and give feedback, and make and stage prototypes. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: COMM 10 or COGS 1 or EDS 20 or ESYS 10 or POLI 10 or USP 1.

COMM 111F. CCP: Folklore and Communication (4)
Folklore is characterized by particular styles, forms, and settings. Course introduces a range of folklore genres from different cultures, historical periods, oral narrative, material folk arts, dramas, rituals. Study of the relationship between expressive form and social context. Students will not receive credit for COCU 127 and COMM 111F. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 111G. CCP: Popular Culture (4)
An overview of the historical development of popular culture from the early modern period to the present. Also a review of major theories explaining how popular culture reflects and/or affects patterns of social behavior. Students will not receive credit for COCU 162 and COMM 111G. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 111P. CCP: Performance and Cultural Studies (4)
Explores performance as a range of aesthetic conventions (theatre, film, performance art) and as a mode of experiencing and conveying cultural identity. Texts include critical writing from anthropology, psychology, linguistics, media studies, as well as film/video, play scripts, live performance. Students will not receive credit for COCU 160 and COMM 111P. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 111T. CCP: Cultural Politics of Sport (4)
Examine sports as play, performance, competition, an arena where there are politics, culture, power, identity struggles. Establishing the social meanings of sport, we address ethics, race, class, nation, gender, body, science, technology, entertainment industries, commerce, spectatorship, consumption, amateurism, professionalism. Students will not receive credit for COCU 172 and COMM 111T.  Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 112C. IM: The Idea of Childhood (4)
Our understanding of childhood as a stage of innocence is a modern idea. The idea of childhood has not been constant; different cultures, communities, and classes have shaped the integration of children according to their own standards. We examine the different ways that attitudes toward children have changed, how these attitudes have been connected to an understanding of the human being, and how the desires of society and parents are manifested in what they think the child should be. Prerequisites: COMM 10 or HDP 1.

COMM 112G. IM: Language and Globalization (4)
The interaction of language and culture in human communication. New and old languages, standard and dialect, dominant and endangered are the special focus. Selected languages as examples of how languages exist in contemporary contexts. Students will not receive credit for COHI 135 and COMM 112G. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 113T. Intermediate Topics in Communication (4)
Specialized study of communication topics, to be determined by the instructor, for any given quarter. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 114C. CSI: On Constitutions (4)
Consider “constitutions” as meaning-making, world-building mechanisms and practices. Explore how constitutions work: as interpretive instruments designed to frame, organize, guide human thought, action, and systems (according to certain rules or principles often represented as divine in origin and universal in effect) and; as ongoing, dynamic interpretative processes that nevertheless congeal in objects, bodies, and social arrangements and are thus considered binding or unalterable. Prerequisites: COMM 10 or COGN 20.

COMM 114D. CSI: New Media, Youth, and Democracy (4)
Does ’new media’ deliver on its promise to expand access to public participation? We will analyze, produce, and counter narratives about media, youth, and democracy. The course should interest students who care about politics, human development, community engagement, or human computer interaction. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 114E. CSI: Gender, Labor, and Culture in the Global Economy (4)
This course introduces students to different theories of globalization and of gender. Against this theoretical background, students critically examine the gendered (and racialized) nature of labor in the production of material, social, and cultural goods in the global economy. Students will not receive credit for COSF 185 and COMM 114E. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 114F. CSI: Law, Communication, and Freedom of Expression (4)
Examination of the legal framework of freedom of expression in U.S. Covers fundamentals of First Amendment law studying key cases in historical content. Prior restraint, incitement, obscenity, libel, fighting words, public forum, campaign finance, commercial speech, and hate speech are covered. Students will not receive credit for COSF 139A, COSF 139, COSF 139B and COMM 114F. Prerequisites: COMM 10 or DOC 2 or POLI 40.

COMM 114G. CSI: Gender and Science (4)
This course will focus on arguments about cognitive differences between men and women in science. We will review current arguments about essential differences, historical beliefs about gender attributes and cognitive ability, and gender socialization into patterns of learning in school. Students will not receive credit for COHI 136 and COMM 114G. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 114I. CSI: Media Technologies and Social Movements (4)
Course explores the roles of media technologies in activist campaigns, social movements. Blending theory, historical case studies, and project-based group work, students will investigate possibilities and limitations of attempts to enroll new and old media technologies in collective efforts to make social change. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 114J. CSI: Food Justice (4)
Examine food justice from multiple analytical and theoretical perspectives: race, class, diversity, equity, legal-institutional, business, ethical, ecological, scientific, cultural, and socio-technical. Compare political strategies of food justice organizations/movements aimed at creating healthy and sustainable food systems locally and globally. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 114K. CSI: Community Fieldwork (2)
Specialized study in community-based and/or participatory design research with topics to be determined by the instructor, for any given quarter. Students who choose the option to do fieldwork for any given course, need to register for COMM 114K. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: none.

COMM 114M CSI: Communication and the Law (4)
Using classic and modern texts, the course explores fundamental questions of law and political theory: What are rights and where do they come from? What is the balance between freedom and equality, between individual and common goods? These theoretical explorations are then oriented to specifically communication concerns: What is the relationship between privacy and personhood? Between free speech and democracy? Between intellectual property and efficient markets? Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 114N. CSI: Communication and the Law: The Body in Law (4)
This course concentrates on one area of law specific to the concerns of communication: the relationship between privacy, personhood, and bodily autonomy. Using a combination of legal texts, court cases, and theoretical literature, we will consider the changing nature of each dimension of this relationship as the courts have been called upon to adjudicate conflicting claims and visions in matters of reproduction, sexual identity, genetic engineering, and the commodification of body parts. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 114P. CSI: Public History and Museum Studies (4)
This course will explore the role that “public history”—history as created for general audiences—plays in communicating cultural and national identities by examining museum exhibitions, their controversies, and how material objects mediate interpretations of the past. Students will not receive credit for COCU 129 and COMM 114P. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 114T CSI: Science Communication (4)
Examine science communication as a profession and unique form of storytelling. Identify who does science communication, how, why, and with what impacts. Highlight science communication’s role in democracy, power, public reason, technological trajectories, the sustainability transition, and shifting university-community relations. Prerequisites: COMM 10.

COMM 120I. AMP: Social Issues in Media Production (4)
Analyze forms of social issue media production, photography, audio/radio, arts, crafts, web, print zines, political documentary. Students work with several forms of media making: video, audio, web design, and a project in their chosen format. Students will not receive credit for COMT 122 and COMM 120I. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and two of COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 120M. AMP: Media Stereotypes (4)
An examination of how the media present society’s members and activities in stereotypical formats. Reasons for and consequences of this presentation are examined. Student responsibilities will be (a) participation in measurement and analysis of stereotype presentations. (b) investigating techniques for assessing both cognitive and behavioral effects of such scripted presentations on the users of media. Students will not receive credit for COMT 105 and COMM 120M. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and two of COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 120N. AMP: News Media Workshop (4)
Designed for students working in student news organizations or off-campus internships or jobs in news, public relations, or public information. A workshop in news writing and news analysis. Students will not receive credit for COMT 110 and COMM 120N. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and two from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 120P. AMP: Digital Media Pedagogy (4)
This course develops critical understanding of educational uses of digital media through firsthand experience in public educational settings, and readings/discussions of challenges, benefits, and pitfalls of educational applications of media technology. Three hours/week of fieldwork required. Students will not receive credit for COMT 109 and COMM 120P. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and two from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 120W. AMP: Writing for Digital Media (4)
Practice, history, and theory of writing for digital media. Text combines with images, sounds, movement, and interaction. New network technologies (e-mail, blogs, wikis, and virtual worlds) create new audience relationships. Computational processes enable texts that are dynamically configured and more. Students will not receive credit for COMT 108 and COMM 120W. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and two from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 124A. Critical Design Practice/Advanced Studio (4)
Hands-on course introduces design as political activity. How will differently designed objects, environments perpetuate, interrupt status quo. Examine design, architecture, media activism, workday life. Examine ambiguous problems, take and give feedback, create prototypes to engage communities, broader publics. Students see design as part of longer-term social transformations. Prerequisites: COMM 10 or COGS 1 or ESYS 10 or POLI 10 or POLI 10D or USP 1.

COMM 124B. Critical Design Practice/Topic Studio (4)
Course builds on understanding design as political activity. Group work to design quarter-long projects that explore political role of design, include design in built environments, organizations, media technologies. Deepened capacities to design in public, for publics, with publics. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: COMM 124A.

COMM 125. Transparent Society (4)
How have politics, media, and society made visible features of life that were once hidden? From the women’s health movement to gay liberation to laws requiring public disclosure, frankness challenges civility, privacy, and taste. How can this be understood? Students will not receive credit for COSF 173 and COMM 125. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 126. Children and Media (4)
A course that analyzes the influence of media on children’s behavior and thought processes. The course takes a historical perspective, beginning with children’s print literature, encompassing movies, music, television, and computers. Students will study specific examples of media products intended for children and apply various analytic techniques, including content analysis and experimentation to these materials. Students will not receive credit for COHI 123 and COMM 126. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 127. Problem of Voice (4)
This course will explore the problem of self-expression for members of various ethnic and cultural groups. Of special interest is how writers find ways of describing themselves in the face of others’ sometimes overwhelming predilection to describe them. Students will not receive credit for COCU 120 and COMM 127. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 128. Education and Global Citizenship (4)
Concepts, possibilities, and dilemmas inherent in the notion of global citizenship. Formulate goals and instructional strategies for global education, expected competence of individuals within society. Examine roles that communication and curriculum play in the formation of identity, language use, and civic responsibility of global citizens. Students will not receive credit for COHI 115 and COMM 128. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 129. Race, Nation, and Violence in Multicultural California (4)
How does media representation of race, nation, and violence work? Taking multicultural California as our site, we will explore how social power is embedded in a variety of visual texts, and how media not only represents but also reproduces conflict. Students will not receive credit for COCU 164 and COMM 129. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 131. Communication, Dissent, and the Formation of Social Movements (4)
Emergence of dissent in different societies, and relationship of dissent to movements of protest and social change. Movements studied include media concentration, antiwar, antiglobalization, death penalty, national liberation, and labor. Survey of dissenting voices seeking to explain the relationship of ideas to collective action and outcomes. Students will not receive credit for COSF 123 and COMM 131. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 132. Advanced Topics in Communication, Politics, and Society (4)
Specialized study of communication, politics, and society with topics to be determined by the instructor for any given quarter. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 133. Television and Citizenship (4)
Television is a contested site for negotiating the rationales of inclusion and exclusion associated with citizenship and national belonging. Historical and contemporary case studies within international comparative contexts consider regulation, civil rights, cultural difference, social movements, new technologies, and globalization. Students will not receive credit for COSF 129 and COMM 133. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 134. Media Audiences (4)
Examines the complex relationship between mass media and the consumers and viewers they target. This course covers theories about audiences, reading practices of audiences, the economics of audiences, and the role of audiences in the digital era. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 135. Contemporary Minority Media Makers and the Festival Experience (4)
This advanced course examines, analyzes, and discusses media works by contemporary Asian American, Native American, African American, and Latina/o American filmmakers. The course does not offer a historical survey of films by minority makers but rather will operate on themes such as cultural identity, urbanization, personal relationships, gender relations, cultural retentions, and music. The course will require students to attend some off-campus screenings, especially those at area film festivals. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 136. Transmedia (4)
Transmedia is a mode of production in which a text or story unfolds across multiple media platforms. Exploring all the facets of this widespread phenomenon—historical, aesthetic, industrial, theoretical, and practical. This course explores and critically analyzes the art and economics of contemporary transmedia. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 137. Black Women Filmmakers (4)
Students examine film and video media produced by black women filmmakers worldwide. This course will use readings from the writings of the filmmakers themselves as well as from film studies, women’s studies, literature, sociology, and history. Students will not receive credit for COCU 123 and COMM 137. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 138. Black Women, Feminism, and Media (4)
This course examines the challenges that arise in using feminist theory to understand black women’s experience in Africa and the United States. It also looks at the mass media and popular culture as arenas of black feminist struggle. Students will not receive credit for COSF 124 and COMM 138. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 140. Cinema in Latin America (4)
Analysis of the changing content and sociopolitical role in Latin America of contemporary media, including the “new cinema” movement, recent developments in film, and popular television programming, including the telenovela. Examples drawn from Mexico, Brazil, Cuba, and other countries. Students will not receive credit for COCU 110 and COMM 140. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 143. Science Fiction (4)
Focuses on science fiction’s critical investigation of history, identity, and society across a range of media forms, including film, television, and literature. Students will not receive credit for COSF 133 and COMM 143. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 144. American Television in the 1970s (4)
Course will explore the politics and culture of the 1970s through the lens of network television programming and the decade’s most provocative sitcoms, dramas, variety shows, and news features. Students will analyze television episodes and read relevant media studies scholarship. Students will not receive credit for COCU 178 and COMM 144. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 145. History, Memory, and Popular Culture (4)
What role does popular culture play in shaping and creating our shared memory of the past? The course examines diverse sources such as school textbooks, monuments, holidays and commemorations, museums, films, music, and tourist attractions. Students will not receive credit for COCU 165 and COMM 145. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and two from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 146. Advanced Topics in Cultural Production (4)
Specialized advanced study in cultural production with topics to be determined by the instructor for any given quarter. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 151. The Information Age: Fact and Fiction (4)
Analysis of the forces propelling the Information Age. An examination of the differential benefits and costs, and a discussion of the presentation in the general media of the Information Age. Students will not receive credit for COSF 126 and COMM 151. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 152. Global Economy and Consumer Culture (4) 
This course critically examines social and economic forces that shape the making of this new global consumer culture by following the flows of consumption and production between the developed and developing worlds in the 1990s. We will consider how consumers, workers, and citizens participate in a new globalized consumer culture that challenges older distinctions between the First and the Third World. In this course, we will focus on the flows between the U.S., Asia, and Latin America. Students will not receive credit for COSF 160 and COMM 152. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 153. Architecture as Communication (4)
This course examines how buildings, cities, towns, gardens, neighborhoods, roads, bridges, and other bits of infrastructure communicate. We consider both the materiality and language like properties of physical things in order to understand how built environments are represented, experienced, and remembered. Students will not receive credit for COCU 181 and COMM 153. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 155. Latino Space, Place, and Culture (4)
Develop a critical understanding of the history, politics, and poetics of the Latino barrio as a distinct urban form. Course covers key concepts such as the production of space, landscapes of power, spatial apartheid, everyday urbanism, urban renewal, and gentrification. Students will not receive credit for COCU 168 and COMM 155. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 158. Representations of the Israeli/Palestinian Conflict (4)
The conflict between the state of Israel and the group of people known as Palestinians is arguably the most intractable conflict in the world today. This course is a critical engagement with debates about this conflict, and the different representations of these debates. Students will not receive credit for both COSF 188 and COMM 158. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 159. Staging the Other (4)
Explores tourism encounters around the world to question the discourses, imaginaries, and social practices involved in the construction, consumption, and reproduction of stereotypical representations of otherness (place, nature, culture, bodies). Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 160. Political Economy and International Communication (4)
The character and forms of international communications. Emerging structures of international communications. The United States as the foremost international communicator. Differential impacts of the free flow of information and the unequal roles and needs of developed and developing economies in international communications. Students will not receive credit for COSF 181 and COMM 160. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 162. Advanced Studies in Cultural Industries (4)
We examine how people interact with products of popular culture, production of cultural goods by looking at conditions in cultural industries. We examine film, music, publishing, focusing on how production is organized, what kind of working conditions arise, how products are distributed. Students will not receive credit for COSF 128 and COMM 162. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 163. Concepts of Freedom (4)
This course examines some of the changing cultural, social, technological, and political meanings; practices; and aspirations that together constitute what is and has been called freedom. Students will not receive credit for COCU 136 and COMM 163. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 164. Behind the Internet: Invisible Geographies of Power and Inequality (4)
This course aims to unveil the vast and largely hidden infrastructures silently shaping how digital communication take place in contemporary societies as well as the visible and invisible geographic of power and inequality these infrastructures are helping to create. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 166. Surveillance, Mediation, and the Risk Society (4)
Contributions of the field of communication to the study of surveillance and risk. Critical and legal perspectives on consumer research, copyright enforcement, the surveillance capacity of Information and Communication Technologies (ICTs), closed-circuit television, interactive media, and the “rhetorics of surveillance” in television and film. Students will not receive credit for COSF 182 and COMM 166. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 168. Bilingual Communication (4)
This course is designed to introduce students to multiple settings where bilingualism is the mode of communication. Examination of how such settings are socially constructed and culturally based. Language policy, bilingual education, and linguistic minorities, as well as field activities included. Students will not receive credit for COHI 114 and COMM 168. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 169. Deaf Culture in the U.S. (4)
The relationship between small groups and dominant culture is studied by exploring the world of deaf people who have for the past twenty years begun to speak as a cultural group. Issues of language, communication, self-representation, and social structure are examined. Students will not receive credit for COHI 124 and COMM 169. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 170. Biography and Life Stories (4)
Course examines several different ways of telling stories as a form of communication: our own life and about the lives of others. There are also the occasions that the life stories of ordinary people are told at and celebrated, for example, funerals, Festschrifts, retirement dinners, fiftieth-anniversary parties, and retrospective art shows. Students will not receive credit for COHI 127 and COMM 170. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 171. Environmental Communication (4)
Survey of the communication practices found in environment controversies. The sociological aspects of environmental issues will provide background for the investigation of environmental disputes in particular contested areas, such as scientific institutions, communities, workplaces, governments, popular culture, and the media. Students will not receive credit for COCU 148 and COMM 171. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 172. Advanced Topics in Mediation and Interaction (4)
Specialized advanced study in mediation and interaction with topics to be determined by the instructor for any given quarter. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 173. Interaction with Technology (4)
In this class we will look closely at the everyday ways in which we interact with technology to discuss sociocultural character of objects, built environments; situated, distributed, and embodied character of knowledges; use of multimodal semiotic resources, talk, gesture, body orientation, and gaze in interaction with technology. Students will not receive credit for COHI 112 or COMM 112T and COMM 173. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C. 

COMM 174. Communication and Social Machines (4)
An examination of the questions that developments in robotics pose to the scholars of communication: How do we communicate when our interlocutors are nonhumans? How do we study objects that are claimed to be endowed with social and affective character? Students will not receive credit for COHI 113 or COMM 112M and COMM 174. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 175. Cultures of Consumption (4)
This course examines the cultural politics of consumption across time and cultures through several concepts: commodity fetishism; conspicuous consumption; taste; class; and identity formation; consumption’s psychological, phenomenological, and poetic dimensions; and contemporary manifestations of globalization and consumer activism. Students will not receive credit for COCU 145 and COMM 175. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 176. Communication and Religion (4)
The secularization thesis—that as society becomes more modern and standards of living rise, the importance of religion will diminish and be confined to the private sphere—may be wrong. We address religion, communication, culture, and politics in the United States. Students will not receive credit for COSF 135 and COMM 176. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 177. Culture, Domination, and Resistance (4)
Explores theories and narratives of cultural power, contemporary practices of resistance. Texts from a wide range of disciplines consider how domination is enacted, enforced, and what modes of resistance are employed to contend with uses and abuses of political power. Students will not receive credit for COCU 169 and COMM 177. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 179. Global Nature/Global Culture (4)
Considers globalization’s impact on concepts of nature in and through media texts, information systems, circulation of consumer goods and services, the emergence of global brands, science, health initiatives, environmental media activism, technology transfer in the twentieth and early twenty-first centuries. Students will not receive credit for COCU 141A and COMM 179. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 180. Advanced Studies in Communication Theory (4)
How are messages created, transmitted, and received? What is the relationship between thinking and communicating? How are linguistic processes embedded in sociocultural practices? Course discusses classic texts in the field of communication theory stemming from linguistics, semiotics, philosophy of language, literary theory. Students will not receive credit for COHI 137 and COMM 180. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 181. Globalization and Uneven Development (4)
Explores the uneven nature of globalization and its geographical expression in the built environment by looking into gentrification processes and community change in service-oriented economies in the global north as well as into production offshoring and disputes over development in the global south. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and one from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

COMM 193. Advanced Topics in Communication: General (2)
Specialized study in general communication with topics to be determined by the instructor for any given quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: must be taken with AIP 197.

COMM 194. Research Seminar in Washington, D.C. (4)
(Same as PS 194, USP 194, Hist 193, SocE 194, Erth 194.) Course attached to six-unit internship taken by students participating in the UCDC program. Involves weekly seminar meetings with faculty and teaching assistants and a substantial research paper. Prerequisites: participation in UCDC program.

COMM 196A. Honors Seminar in Communication (4)
Preparation of an honors thesis, which can be either a research paper or a media production project. Open to students who have been admitted to the honors program. Grades will be awarded upon completion of the two-quarter sequence. Students will not receive credit for COGN 191A and COMM 196A. Prerequisites: admission to the honors program.

COMM 196B. Honors Seminar in Communication (4)
Preparation of an honors thesis, which can be either a research paper or a media production project. Open to students who have been admitted to the honors program. Grades will be awarded upon completion of the two-quarter sequence. Students will not receive credit for COGN 191B and COMM 196B. Prerequisites: admission to the honors program.

COMM 198. Directed Group Study in Communication (4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (P/NP grades only.)

COMM 199. Independent Study in Communication (4)
Independent study and research under the direction of a member of the faculty. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (P/NP grades only.)

COGR 200A. Introduction to the Study of Communication as Social Force (4)
This course focuses on the political economy of communication and the social organization of key media institutions. There will be both descriptive and analytical concerns. The descriptive concern will emphasize the complex structure of communication industries and organizations, both historically and cross-nationally. The analytic focus will examine causal relationships between the economic and political structure of societies, the character of their media institutions, public opinion, and public attitudes and behaviors expressed in patterns of voting, consuming, and public participation. The nature of evidence and theoretical basis for such relationships will be critically explored. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 200B. Introduction to Study of Communication: Communication and Culture (4)
This course focuses on questions of interpretation and meaning. This course will examine how people use texts to interpret the world and coordinate their activities in social groups. Students will study both theories of interpretation in the conventional sense and theories about the act of interpreting. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 200C. Introduction to the Study of Communication: Communication and the Individual (4)
This course will draw on theorists who examine human nature as constituted by social, material, and historical circumstances. This course considers the media in relation to the ontogenetic and historical development of the human being and an examination of the individual as socially constituted in a language-using medium. The role of new communication technologies as part of research methodologies is explored in lecture-seminar. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 201B. Ethnographic Methods for Communication Research (4)
A supervised and coordinated group project will allow students to develop competence in a variety of ethnographic approaches to communication. Subjects covered include choosing a fieldwork site, setting or process for participation; entry and development of relationships; techniques of observation, interviewing, note taking, and transcription. Course may also include photography and video as research tools. All participant observation and interviewing strategies fall under the review of the Committee on Human Subjects. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 201C. Discourse Analysis (4)
Review and critique of studies employing discourse analysis, focusing on the ways that “discourse” is identified, recorded, and reported. A working notion of discourse will develop from works representing diverse disciplinary approaches. Students will record, transcribe, and report on segments of talk in an everyday setting. All participant observation and interviewing strategies fall under the review of the Committee on Human Subjects. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 201D. Historical Methods for Communication Research (4)
Different approaches to conducting historical research in communication. Such approaches may include the social history of communication technology; structuralist and poststructuralist accounts of language, media, and collective memory; and new historicist treatments of cultural history. Sources, documentation, and the nature of argument from historical evidence are emphasized. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 201J. Comparative Analysis (4)
The logic of comparative analysis and its role in communication research. Scientific inference in qualitative research. Selection of cases. Problems of translation across cultures. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 201L. Qualitative Analysis of Information Systems (4)
Historical and ethnographic studies of information systems—the design and use of information and communication technologies in their social, ethical, political, and organizational dimensions. Objects of study range from the invention of file folders to e-mail use and distributed databases as communication systems. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 201M. Content Analysis (4)
History uses methodology of quantitative analysis of media content. Includes conceptual issues concerning the quantification of meaning and practical procedures for coding and data analysis. Students read examples of studies using content analysis and carry out their own pilot analyses. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 201N. Genealogical Analysis (4)
Training in genealogical analysis based on Foucault and Nietzsche. Weekly exercises in genealogical methods, and class discussions of findings. A final paper: a genealogy of an object, practice, utterance, or discourse. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 210. Information and Society (4)
The social, legal, and economic forces affecting the evolution of mass communication institutions and structure in the industrialized world. Differential impacts of the free flow of information and unequal roles and needs of developed and developing economies. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 211. Memory Practices (4)
Examines theories of social and distributed memory—Maurice Halwachs to Ed Hutchins, John Sutton, and nature of the archive (Foucault and Derrida), reading databases (as memory prostheses), beginning with Manovich’s work. Enquiry into mediated nature of memory practices. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

COGR 215. Regulation of Telecommunications (4)
The course will look at the history of, and rationales for, the regulation of mass communications in the United States. The course will cover both broadcasting and common carrier regulation. We will analyze telecommunications regulatory structures as they were constituted historically with the 1934 Communications Act and examine their breakdown in the late 1970s. In a larger vein, the course will examine the rise and functions of regulatory agencies in modern American history. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 219. Discourse and Organizations (4)
A central part of organizational life is talk: interaction both in formal and informal meetings and social situations. In this course we will examine the discourse of organizations, drawing on conversational analysis, discourse analysis, and the sociology of organizations. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 220. The News Media (4)
History, politics, social organization, and ideology of the American news media. Special attention will be paid to: historical origins of journalism as a profession and “objective reporting” as ideology; empirical studies of print and TV journalism as social institutions; and news coverage of Vietnam and its implications for theories of the news media.

COGR 223. Communication Law and Policy (4)
This course examines the legal and policy framework for free speech in the United States. We cover First Amendment case law, free speech theory, copyright, and the different legal and regulatory treatment historically accorded print, broadcasting, cable television, telephone, and Internet. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 225A. Introduction to Science Studies: Part 1 (4)
Study and discussion of classic themes and texts in history of science, sociology of science, and philosophy of science, and of work that attempts to develop an interdisciplinary science studies approach. Prerequisites: enrollment in the Science Studies Program or consent of instructor.

COGR 225B. Seminar in Science Studies (4)
Study and discussion of a selected topic in the science studies field with an emphasis on the development of research and writing skills. The topic varies from year to year. Prerequisites: enrollment in the Science Studies Program or consent of instructor.

COGR 225C. Colloquium in Science Studies (4)
A forum for the presentation and discussion of research in progress in science studies by graduate students, faculty, and visitors. Students must attend the colloquium series for their entire first and second years. They receive course credit in one quarter each year. Prerequisites: enrollment in the Science Studies Program.

COGR 225D. Introduction to Science Studies Part II (4)
Continuing the introduction developed in Part 1, this course examines recent key topics and problem situations in science studies. Emphasis is on recent theoretical perspectives and empirical studies in communication, history, philosophy, and sociology of science and technology, and the interplay between them. Prerequisites: completion of COGR 225A, HIGR 238, Phil 209A, or SOCG 255A or consent of instructor.

COGR 237. Performance Theory (4)
Course is designed to introduce graduate students to the disciplinary, intellectual, and artistic genealogies of performance studies that bring together critical work from the fields of anthropology, art history, communication, critical gender studies, ethnic studies, film studies, literature, and theatre studies. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 238. The Frankfurt School on Mass Culture Social Theory (4)
This reading seminar will consider works by Frankfurt School theorists (Horkheimer, Adorno, Pollock, Lowenthal, Marcuse, Benjamin, Habermas) on mass media, mass culture, idology, art, authority and the individual, and their relevance in the analysis of contemporary capitalism. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 239. Computer Game Studies (4)
Course considers computer games as media, rule systems, technology, and sites of communication. Approaches include hands-on play and reading material from a variety of disciplinary perspectives. Course encompasses both commercial games and the longer, more diverse academic and independent traditions. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 240. The Culture of Consumption (4)
(Cross-listed with HIGR 273.) This course will explore the development and cultural manifestations of consumerism in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries. Topics will include the rise of museums, the development of mass market journalism and literature, advertising, and the growth of commercial amusements. Readings will focus primarily, but not exclusively, on the United States. Students will be encouraged to think comparatively. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 241. Geography and Communication (4)
Geographies as media of political cultural communication. Not simply mapping but also territorial engineering as a way of constituting geographical significance. Cross-mapping practices—intersecting representational practices—as political forms of communication. Geographies as visual practices of power. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 242. Globalization (4)
Examination of historical and contemporary reorderings of space, time, and experience through culture and commerce, social movements, war and trade, communication institutions and practices. Considers various disciplinary modes of analyzing the forms of life produced by these processes as well as the possibilities for intervention and transformation. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 243. Media Technologies (4)
Media technologies from books to electronic media. Consideration of both technological design processes and shifting uses of media. Reflection on media and broader patterns of technological innovation. Attention to the distinctive role of media in technological change. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 244. Cultural Studies (4)
Course traces theoretical approaches to the study of culture from the Birmingham School to poststructuralist critiques of power, resistance, consumption, and pleasure. Students combine critical theory and empirical research in order to interpret the cultural politics of everyday life. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 245. Science and Technology Studies and Communication (4)
Course explores human-technology interaction, social constructivism, actor-network theory, gender and technology, critical and cultural studies of science and technology, and public understandings of science and technology. Emphasis on what STS can contribute to the study of media and communication. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 246. Playable Media (4)
Course provides an introduction to the design, evaluation, and development of media that invite and structure play. This includes digital and nondigital games, as well as related forms. Exercises, readings, and projects are required. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 247. Writing for Media (4)
Course explores the potential and constraints specific to writing for one or more media forms. Approaches include writing exercises, studying media, reading theoretical and historical texts, and project work. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 248. Visual Culture (4)
The visual is an increasingly important component of communication in everyday life. This course covers post-1968 theories of visual culture in domains such as art, film, news, the media, popular culture, medicine, sciences, and many other aspects of everyday life. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 250. Third World Cinema Screening (4)
Course examines the historical impetus, development, and construction of “Third Cinema”—a particular style of media making in Africa, Latin America, and Asia. An interdisciplinary approach interrogates how Third Cinema influences world cinema of today. Additional screening session required. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

COGR 251. Media Theory (4)
Theories of the media considered in a historical and comparative context from the rise of preprint reproduction technologies to the digital age. Focuses on communication processes and practices in terms of formality, technology, the politics of subjectivity, and institutions. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 252. Race and Racism (4)
Seminar focuses on race as a social, phenomenal, historical, and political formation. The seminar will address the historical emergence and theorization of race and the contemporary ways in which race/racism is a modern principle of social division, exclusion, and political mobilization. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 253. Cultural Study of Music and Sound (4)
Seminar will focus on music and sound as social, aesthetic, historical, can political formations and phenomena. The relationship between musical and extramusical forces will be examined. This course intensively addresses cultural politics of sound/music making, hearing and performance. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 254. Intellectual Property (4)
The conceptual and regulatory boundaries of intellectual property law are increasingly challenged by technological change and by ownership claims over non-Western forms of creativity. Course focuses on those challenges from three interrelated perspectives: historical, philosophical, and political. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 255. Studies in Political Theory (4)
Considers classical and contemporary texts in primarily western political thought with an eye toward understanding how such theory is and/or might be brought to bear in grounding different approaches and agendas in the study of communication. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 256. Postcolonial Theory (4)
This course provides an overview of intellectual and political thought developed through decolonization struggles in Africa and the Caribbean, and the subsequent emergence of postcoloniality from subaltern studies in the 1980s to contemporary work shaped by globalization and neoliberal philosophies. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 257. Communication and Social Theory (4)
Social theory forms the theoretical foundation for much work in communication, including political communication, questions of the public and public opinion, propaganda and ideology. The course will consider Marx, Weber, Durkheim, Simmel, Dewey, Habermas, the Frankfurt School and its critics. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 258. Language in Human Communication (4)
In this course language is broadly conceived as a medium of communication, expressed multimodally. Among the topics of this course are: origins of speech and gesture, culture and language, language and social practice, and language in performance. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 259. Space, Place, and Media (4)
The course focuses on built environments and the production of space from an interdisciplinary, perspective, using the critical and methodological tools of communication, anthropology, geography, history, psychology, political science, and urban studies. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 261. Mediational Approaches to Culture/Mind (4)
This course will examine theories of mind in which cultural mediation is given a leading role. The work of anthropologists, psychologists, and communication scholars will be studied in depth. Emphasis will be placed on the methodological implication of cultural theories of mind for empirical research. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 262. Geographies of Difference, Exclusion and Conflict (4)
This seminar focuses on how differences between groups of people, and the patterns of power, exclusion and conflict resulting from such differences, become embedded in geographical landscapes. The course examines place-based sites of difference, power, and conflict beginning with the map, and moving through such spatial environments as the body, the city, the nation, the landscape, the reservation, culminating in borderland conflict here in our own backyard. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 263.  Writing Research Proposals (4)
This course is an introduction to the art of writing a research proposal. We will concentrate on proposals for ethnographic fieldwork, although the skills learned will be useful for many other purposes. The proposal writing process will be broken into component parts. Class time will be spent discussing these parts in greater detail and commenting on one another's work. By the end of the quarter students will have produced a research proposal of their own. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 275. Topics in Communication (4)
Specialized study in communication, with topics to be determined by the instructor for any given quarter.

COGR 278. Talking Culture, Culture Talking: Voices of Diversity (4)
(Cross listed with EDS 278). This course explores the discourse of culture in American society and the problem of silenced or unheard voices. The interaction of individual and collective voice, language, and identity are discussed as they bear on the ways that culture moves through important social institutions such as schools. Of particular interest are issues of teaching, learning, displacement, inclusion, marginality, and the speaking center. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 280. Advanced Workshop in Communication Media (4)
This course is a project course in which students prepare a production or experiment using one of the forms of media. The course is designed to allow students to experiment in a communication form other than the usual oral presentation in class or a term paper. Students can do a video production, a coordinated photographic essay or exhibit, a computer instructional game, a published newspaper or magazine article directed at a special audience, a theatrical presentation, or some form other than those listed. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 281. Understanding Everyday Life (4)
In this course we review how we might go about studying and thinking about the everyday life both as a concept and as a domain of study. The course will have a balance of both theoretical and empirical work. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 282. Reading and Memory (4)
Approaching reading from a historical perspective, the course concentrates on two analytic frames to connect memory to texts: ideas about “the memory palace,” locating memories in things, and figured worlds theory, treating objects as forms of intellectual scaffolding and memory. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 283. Political Economy (4)
Political economy is an older interdisciplinary approach explaining how the state, political environment, law, and economic system influence one another. The course engages classic texts, with attention to issues in the political economy of communication toward the end. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 284. Time (4)
This seminar will introduce key issues and readings in our understanding of time. Time is historical, not natural. We will examine ways that modern time structures and orders human interaction. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 294. The History of Communication Research (4)
Intellectual history of the field of communication studies from Robert Park to the present. Explication and assessment of major research approaches and classic studies representing both empirical and critical traditions. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 296. Communication Research as an Interdisciplinary Activity (4)
A course that introduces students to the interdisciplinary nature of the field of communication research as represented by the work of faculty in the Department of Communication. Through faculty research, students are presented with concrete examples of communication research theory and practice that can provide them with insights for conducting their own research projects. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 298. Directed Group Study (1–12)
The study and analysis of specific topics to be developed by a small group of graduate students under the guidance of an interested faculty member. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

COGR 299. Graduate Research (1–12)
Advanced independent study in communication under the guidance of Department of Communication faculty.

COGR 500. Practice Teaching in Communication (4)
A doctoral student in communication is required to assist in teaching undergraduate Department of Communication courses for a total of six quarters. One meeting per week with the instructor, one meeting per week with the assigned sections, and attendance at the lecture of the undergraduate course in which he or she is participating are part of this requirement.

CONT 1. CI: The University in Society (4)
Overview of the history and role of higher education in American society, including a focus on the relationship between society and institutions of higher learning. The course utilizes an interdisciplinary, multicultural perspective reflecting the diversity of the university. Summer Session only.

CONT 68. Disability, Race, and Diversity (4)
This course will examine disability in the case of individuals with an intellectual or physical disability. Faced with ableism, intentional or unintentional, people with disabilities often experience difficulties in society. Using ableism provides an effective way of addressing ableist discrimination. The course will develop students’ awareness of the challenges of disability in current society. Winter quarter only.

CONT 150A. College Academic Mentor Program (4)
The College Academic Mentor Program introduces students to the aspects of college advising at a local high school. Students will work with a diverse student population, focusing on low-income, first-generation students that are historically underrepresented at schools of higher education. Students will engage in both a training workshop and a field placement program. (P/NP grades only.)

CONT 150B. College Academic Mentor Program Field Study (2)
CAMP students continue service learning in underserved local communities by working as paraprofessionals mentoring high school students to prepare for college application and attendance under the guidance of school counselors and the instructor. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: CONT 150A. (P/NP grades only.)

CONT 196. Contemporary Issues Workshop (2)
A workshop for potential discussion leaders in the Contemporary Issues Program. Students will investigate topics for discussion and methods of presentation and inquiry. Participating in the workshop does not guarantee selection as discussion leader. (P/NP grades only.)

CONT 198. Group Studies in Contemporary Issues (2 or 4)
Group studies, readings, projects, and discussions in areas of contemporary concern. Course is set up so that students may work together as a group in an area of contemporary concern whereby the group emphasis would be more beneficial and constructive than individual studies. May be taken for credit three times for a maximum of twelve units. Prerequisites: department approval required. (P/NP grades only.)

CGS 2A. Introduction to Critical Gender Studies: Social Movements (4)
The role of social movements in contesting rights and representation in comparative and historical contexts. Historical examples in the U.S. and other locations, including civil rights, men’s movements, antiracist feminism, women’s movements, AIDS activism, transgenderism, immigrant rights, and the labor movement in the U.S.

CGS 2B. Introduction to Critical Gender Studies: Gender and Institutions (4)
This course examines how gender organizes and is organized by institutions. Domains of inquiry may include family, education, medicine, technology, law, media, the workplace, immigration, and citizenship.

CGS 87. Critical Gender Studies Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small, seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

CGS 100. Conceptualizing Gender: Theories and Methods (4)
This course will compare the uses of gender as a category of analysis across academic disciplines in the humanities, social sciences, and natural sciences with particular attention to research methodologies.

CGS 101. Gender, Modernity, and Globalization (4)
The global effects of modernity, modernization, and globalization on men and women. Topics: international consumer culture; international divisions of labor; construction of sexuality and gender within global movements; the migrations of people, capital, and culture. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 102. Selected Topics in Critical Gender Studies (4)
An interdisciplinary course focusing on one of a variety of topics in gender studies, such as gender and science, the body, reproductive technologies, public policy. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 103. Feminist Theory (4)
An interdisciplinary course in feminist theory. Topics may range from a general survey of feminist theory in a variety of disciplines to a more focused interdisciplinary theoretical topic such as postmodernism and feminism. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 104. Advanced Topics in Comparative Perspectives (4)
Focuses on the relationship between gender and culture from a multiplicity of perspectives. Possible topics could include gender and ethnicity, gender across class, and other topics to be examined in a cross-cultural framework. May be taken for credit two times when topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 105. Queer Theory (4)
Examines the different methodologies and disciplinary histories that together constitute the interdisciplinary project called queer studies. Of particular interest will be how these different methodologies and history construe and construct the relations between gender, race, class, and nation. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 106. Gender Equality and the Law (4)
Explores the legal treatment of discrimination on the basis of gender, including equal protection doctrine and some statutory law such as Title VII. Topics include the meaning of gender equality in such areas as single-sex education, military service, sexual harassment, discrimination on the basis of pregnancy, and other current issues. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 107. Gender and Reproductive Rights (4)
Legal treatment of gender, reproductive rights, and the family, particularly as evolving law, primarily in the US, has created conflicting rights, roles, and responsibilities. Topics include abortion, fetal rights, surrogacy, marriage, and child custody issues. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 111. Gender and the Body (4)
Various approaches to the study of gendered bodies. Possible topics to include masculinities/feminities; lifecycles; biology, culture, and identity; medical discourses; and health issues. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 112. Sexuality and Nation (4)
(Cross-listed with ETHN 127.) This course explores the nexus of sex, race, ethnicity, gender, and nation and considers their influence on identity; sexuality; migration movement and borders; and other social, cultural, and political issues that these constructs affect. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 113. Gender and Sexuality in the Arts (4)
Examines gender and sexuality in artistic practices: music, theatre, dance, performance, visual arts, and new media. Topics may include study of specific artists, historical moments, genres, cross-cultural analyses, and multiculturalism. May be taken three times when topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

CGS 114. Gender, Race, Ethnicity, and Class (4)
(Cross-listed with ETHN 183.) Gender is often neglected in studies of ethnic/racial politics. This course explores the relationship of race, ethnicity, class, and gender by examining the participation of working class women of color in community politics and how they challenge mainstream political theory.

CGS 115. Latina/o Sexualities (4)
(Cross-listed with ETHN 187.) The construction and articulation of Latina/o sexualities will be explored in this course through interdisciplinary and comparative perspectives. We will discuss how immigration, class, and norms of ethnicity, race, and gender determine the construction, expression, and reframing of Latina/o sexualities.

CGS 116. Girls and Sexuality: Moral Panics, Perils, and Pleasures (4)
Explores how girls' sexualities are shaped by gender, race, class, educational and penal institutions, and sexual norms. Engages with interdisciplinary scholarship that examines how and why the topic of girls and sexuality has become a volatile subject of public debate, and the manner in which girls' sexualities are represented in various media, particularly film.

CGS 147. Black Feminisms, Past and Present (4)
(Cross-listed with ETHN 147.) An advanced introduction to historical and contemporary black feminisms in the United States and transnationally. Students will explore the theory and practice of black feminists/womanists and analyze the significance of black feminism to contemporary understandings of race, class, gender, and sexuality.

CGS 150. Visuality, Sexuality, and Race (4)
(Cross-listed with ETHN 150.) Examines the role of the visual in power relations; the production of what we see regarding race and sexuality; the interconnected history of the caste system, plantation slavery, visuality and contemporary society; decolonial and queer counternarratives to visuality. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

CGS 165. Sex and Gender in African American Communities (4)
(Cross-listed with ETHN 165.) This course will investigate the changing constructions of sex, gender, and sexuality in African American communities defined by historical period, region, and class. Topics will include the sexual division of labor, myths of black sexuality, the rise of black feminism, black masculinity, and queer politics.

CGS 180. Labor’s Relations (4)
(Cross-listed with ANSC 180.) This course examines how work gives shape to our lives: how having a job relates to our sense of self, our gender, our racial identity, how it organizes our time and space, and how it affects our relationships with family and friends. Students may not receive credit for both CGS 180 and ANSC 180. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

CGS 190. Honors Seminar (4)
Interdisciplinary readings in feminist theory and research methodology to prepare students for writing an honors thesis. Open to critical gender studies majors who have been admitted to Critical Gender Studies Honors Program. May be applied toward primary concentration in critical gender studies major. Prerequisites: admission to Critical Gender Studies Honors Program and department preauthorization required.

CGS 196A. Critical Gender Studies Honors Research (4)
A program of independent study providing candidates for critical gender studies honors to develop, in consultation with an adviser, a preliminary proposal for the honors thesis. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of this quarter. A final grade for both quarters will be given upon completion of Critical Gender Studies 196B. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department preauthorization required.

CGS 196B. Honors Thesis (4)
Honors thesis research and writing for students who have completed Critical Gender Studies 190 and 196A. A letter grade for both Critical Gender Studies 196A and 196B will be given at the completion of this quarter. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department preauthorization required.

CGS 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Directed group study on a topic not generally included in the critical gender studies curriculum. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and director of Critical Gender Studies Program and department stamp required.

CGS 199. Independent Study (4)
Tutorial; independent study on a topic not generally included in the curriculum. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and director of Critical Gender Studies Program and department stamp required.

CGS 500. Apprentice Teaching in Critical Gender Studies (4)
Consideration of pedagogical methods appropriate to undergraduate teaching in critical gender studies courses under supervision of instructor of course. Instructor will define apprentice’s responsibilities in preparing class presentations, directing student discussions, evaluating and grading students’ work, and maintaining productive association with students.

CAT 1. Culture, Art, and Technology 1 (4)
A global historical overview of principles and patterns of human development, with emphasis on technology and the arts. Traces causes and consequences of cultural variation. Explores interactions of regional environments (geographic, climatic, biological) with social and cultural forces. Prerequisites: Sixth College students only; may be taken concurrently with SDCC 1.

CAT 2. Culture, Art, and Technology 2 (6)
Fundamental shifts in one area of endeavor can have a profound impact on whole cultures. Examines select events, technologies, and works of art that revolutionized ways of inhabiting the world. Intensive instructions in university-level writing: featured sections on information literacy. Prerequisites: completion of UC Entry Level Writing requirement and CAT 1; Sixth College students only.

CAT 3. Culture, Art, and Technology 3 (6)
Students engage with various interdisciplinary modes of apprehending the near future. Working in teams on community projects, they are challenged to listen and communicate across cultures and develop cogent technological and artistic responses to local problems. Writing and information literacy instruction. Prerequisites: CAT 1, CAT 2; Sixth College students only.

CAT 24. Introduction to Special Projects/Topics (2 or 4)
Lower-division students are introduced to projects/topics exploring the interplay of culture, art, and technology. Topics and projects will vary. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CAT 75. Experience Art!—Sixth College Seminar Series (1)
Seminars are hands-on arts experiences (performances, exhibits, site visits, etc.). Students and faculty attend events together and have discussions before or after, often with guest speakers such as the artists, curators, and/or faculty/graduate students from UC San Diego arts departments. Successful completion of this seminar series satisfies one of the eight Sixth College general education requirements for Art Making. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: Sixth College students only.

CAT 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students with preference given to entering freshmen. Prerequisites: none.

CAT 98. Culture, Art, and Technology Lower-Division Group Study (2 or 4)
Course designated for lower-division Sixth College students to have the opportunity to work together as a group or team on a project supervised by a faculty member in a specific department, not included in a regular curriculum, where group emphasis would be more beneficial and constructive then individual special studies. Prerequisites: lower-division standing and cumulative GPA of 3.0.

CAT 124. Sixth College Practicum (4)
Students initiate, plan, and carry out community-based and/or research-based projects that connect classroom-based experiences and knowledge to the outlying community, and that explicitly explore the interplay of culture, art, and technology. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor.

CAT 125. Public Rhetoric and Practical Communication (4)
Upper-division composition course in public rhetoric and practical communication, including oral presentation, writing in print formats, and digital content creation. This course also focuses on how writing can support and extend experiential learning before, during or after students do their practicum project. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; completion of CAT 1, 2 and 3 or (for transfer students) completion of general-education requirements, including lower-division writing requirement. Department authorization required.

CAT 192. Senior Seminar in Culture, Art, and Technology (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in Culture, Art, and Technology (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times with a change in topic and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

CAT 195. Apprentice Teaching (4)
Undergraduate instructional assistance. Responsibilities in areas of learning and instruction. May collect course material and assist with course projects, digital workshops, and collection, organization and analysis of formative assessment data. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; 3.0 cumulative GPA; consent of instructor.

CAT 197. Culture, Art, and Technology Field Studies (4)
Supervised community-based or industry-based fieldwork. Designated for Sixth College students to have the opportunity to work on a community-based or industry-based project supervised by a faculty member and community or industry mentor in which the subject or content of the project cannot be represented by a specific academic department. Students will submit written evaluations each week of their ongoing field study. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, completion of CAT 1, 2, and 3 or (for transfer students) completion of general-education requirements, including lower-division writing requirement.

CAT 198. Culture, Art, and Technology Directed Group Studies (4)
Directed group studies or, in group, field studies of a creative project. Designated for Sixth College students to have the opportunity to work together as a group or team on a project supervised by a faculty member in a specific department, not included in a regular curriculum, where group emphasis would be more beneficial and constructive than individual special studies. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, completion of CAT 1, 2, and 3 or (for transfer students) completion of general-education requirements, including lower-division writing requirement.

CAT 199. Culture, Art, and Technology Independent Studies (4)
Individual independent research or creative project. Designated for Sixth College students to have the opportunity to work on a project supervised by a faculty member in a specific department, where the subject or content of the project cannot be represented by the academic department of the faculty member. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, completion of CAT 1, 2, and 3 or (for transfer students) completion of general-education requirements, including lower-division writing requirement.

DSGN 1. Design of Everyday Things (4)
A project-based course examining how principles from cognitive science apply to the design of things simple (doors) and complex (new technology). Learn about affordances, constraints, mappings, and conceptual models. Learn observational and design skills. Become a human-centered design thinker.

DSGN 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
Special topics in design are discussed. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit four times when topics vary.

DSGN 100. Prototyping (4)
Explores cognitive principles of thinking through making. Introduces methods and tools for prototyping user experiences. Students make various prototypes and participate in weekly critique sessions. Topics: experience design, rapid prototyping, sketching, bodystorming, cardboard modeling, UI hacking, and design theory. Prerequisites: DSGN 1.

DSGN 160. Special Topics in Design (4)
Special topics in design. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

DSGN 161. Design Project (4)
Special topics in design. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary. Recommended preparation: may require shop skills. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

DSGN 195. Instructional Apprenticeship in Design (4)
Students, under the direction of the instructor, lead laboratory or discussion sections, attend lectures, and meet regularly with the instructor to help prepare course materials and grade papers and exams. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, 3.0 GPA, consent of instructor, and department approval.

DSGN 199. Independent Project (2 or 4)
This independent project course is for individual, advanced students who wish to complete a design project under the mentorship of a faculty member. Students should contact faculty whose research interests them to discuss possible projects. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, 2.5 GPA, consent of instructor, and department approval.

DSGN 260. Advanced Topics in Design (4)
Special topics in design. May be taken for credit eighteen times. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of instructor.

DSGN 261. Advanced Design Project (4)
Special topics in design. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Recommended preparation: may require maker-lab or shop skills. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of instructor.

DSGN 299.  Independent Project (2 or 4)
Students study, research, and implement project under the direction of a member of the faculty. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Recommended preparation: may require maker-lab or shop skills. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of instructor.

DOC 1. Dimensions of Culture: Diversity (4)
This course focuses on sociocultural diversity in examining class, ethnicity, race, gender, and sexuality as significant markers of differences among persons. Emphasizing American society, it explores the cultural understandings of diversity and its economic, moral, and political consequences. Three hours of lecture, one hour of discussion. Open to Marshall College students only. (Letter grade only.) (F)

DOC 2. Dimensions of Culture: Justice (6)
This course considers the nature of justice in philosophical, historical, and legal terms. Topics include racial justice, political representation, economic justice, gender and justice, the rights of cultural minorities, and crime and punishment. The course offers intensive instruction in writing university-level expository prose. Three hours of lecture, two hours of discussion and writing instruction. Open to Marshall College students only. (Letter grade only.) Prerequisite: completion of UC Entry Level Writing requirement. (W)

DOC 3. Dimensions of Culture: Imagination (6)
Using the arts, this course examines the evolution of pluralistic culture to the modern period. There is a special emphasis on the interdisciplinary study of twentieth-century American culture, including music, literature, art, film, and photography. The course offers intensive instruction in writing university-level expository prose. Three hours of lecture, two hours of discussion and writing instruction. Open to Marshall College students only. (Letter grade only.) Prerequisite: completion of UC Entry Level Writing requirement. (S)

DOC 100D. Dimensions of Culture: Promises and Contradictions in US Culture (4)
This course provides a broad overview of key historical contradictions in US history and explores the origins of social stratifications and movements. Students acquire tools for analyzing national tensions. Central aspects include slavery, women’s rights, and rising corporate power. Course introduces concepts at the intersections of class, gender, religion, race, and sexuality. Students learn to analyze and discuss complex historical/societal artifacts. Designed for two student sectors: 1) Marshall College transfer students who have not taken the DOC sequence, and 2) Transfer and other upper-division students from all six colleges who want to fulfill the campuswide diversity requirement. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and completion of college writing.

ECON 1. Principles of Microeconomics (4)
Introduction to the study of the economic system. Course will introduce the standard economic models used to examine how individuals and firms make decisions in perfectly competitive markets, and how these decisions affect supply and demand in output markets.

ECON 2. Market Imperfections and Policy (4)
Analysis of monopoly and imperfectly competitive markets, market imperfections and the role of government. Prerequisites: Econ 1.

ECON 3. Principles of Macroeconomics (4)
Introductory macroeconomics: unemployment, inflation, business cycles, monetary and fiscal policy. Prerequisites: Econ 1.

ECON 4. Financial Accounting (4)
(Cross-listed with MGT 4.) Recording, organizing, and communicating financial information relating to business entities. Credit not allowed for both Econ 4 and MGT 4.

ECON 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. May be repeated when course topics vary. (P/NP grades only.)

ECON 100A. Microeconomics A (4)
Economic analysis of household determination of the demand for goods and services, consumption/saving decisions, and the supply of labor. Prerequisites: Econ 1 and Math 10C or 20C or 31BH.

ECON 100B. Microeconomics B (4)
Analysis of firms’ production and costs, the supply of output and demand factors of production. Analysis of perfectly competitive markets. Prerequisites: Econ 100A.

ECON 100C. Microeconomics C (4)
Analysis of the effects of imperfect market structure, strategy, and imperfect information. Prerequisites: Econ 100B.

ECON 100AH. Honors Microeconomics A (1)
Honors sequence expanding on the material taught in Econ 100A. Major GPA of 3.5 or better required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 100A or after successful completion of Econ 100A with A– or better or consent of instructor. Priority enrollment given to majors in the department. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ECON 100BH. Honors Microeconomics B (1)
Honors sequence expanding on the material taught in Econ 100B. Major GPA of 3.5 or better required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 100B or after successful completion of Econ 100B with A– or better or consent of instructor. Priority enrollment given to majors in the department. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ECON 100CH. Honors Microeconomics C (1)
Honors sequence expanding on the material taught in Econ 100C. Major GPA of 3.5 or better required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 100C or after successful completion of Econ 100C with A– or better or consent of instructor. Priority enrollment given to majors in the department. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ECON 101. International Trade (4)
Examines theories of international trade in goods and services and relates the insights to empirical evidence. Explains international trade at the level of industries and firms and analyzes the consequences of trade for resource allocation, welfare, and the income distribution. Discusses sources of comparative advantage, motives for trade policies, and the effects of trade barriers and trading blocs on welfare and incomes. Prerequisites: Econ 100B or 102.

ECON 102. Globalization (4)
Presents theories of global economic integration, grounded in the principle of comparative advantage. Investigates patterns of trade when trade is balanced and capital flows when trade is not balanced. Assesses the consequences of global economic integration and economic policies for industry location, incomes, welfare and economic growth, and studies goods, services and sovereign debt markets. Prerequisites: Econ 1 and 2 or 3 or 100B.

ECON 103. International Monetary Relations (4)
Analyzes exchange rates and the current account. Relates their joint determination to financial markets and the real-side macroeconomy using international macroeconomic models and presents empirical regularities. Discusses macroeconomic policies under different exchange rate regimes and implications for financial stability and current account sustainability. Prerequisites: Econ 102 or 110B or 173A.

ECON 104. Economics of Network Industries (4)
Economics of industries with network effects such as telecommunications, internet, software, and airlines. Analysis of standards, complementarities, switching costs, economies of scale, and optimal price setting in the presence of network effects. Prerequisites: Econ 100C.

ECON 105. Industrial Organization and Firm Strategy (4)
Theory of monopoly and oligopoly pricing, price discrimination, durable goods pricing, cartel behavior, price wars, strategic entry barriers, mergers, pro- and anti-competitive restraints on business. Prerequisites: Econ 100C.

ECON 107. Economic Regulation and Antitrust Policy (4)
Detailed treatment of antitrust policy: Sherman Act, price fixing, collusive practices, predatory pricing, price discrimination, double marginalization, exclusive territories, resale price maintenance, refusal to deal, and foreclosure. Theory of regulation and regulatory experience in electrical utilities, oil, telecommunications, broadcasting, etc. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100B; and Math 10C or 20C or 31BH.

ECON 109. Game Theory (4)
Introduction to game theory. Analysis of people’s decisions when the consequences of the decisions depend on what other people do. This course features applications in economics, political science, and law. Prerequisites: Econ 100C or Math 31CH or Math 109 or (CSE 20 and Math 20 C).

ECON 109T. Advanced Topics in Game Theory (2)
This course presents a selection of applications and advanced topics that build on the material covered in the Econ 109. Game Theory course. Prerequisites: department approval required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 109 or after completion of Econ 109.

ECON 110A. Macroeconomics A (4)
Analysis of the determination of long run growth and models of the determination of output, interest rates, and the price level. Analysis of inflation, unemployment, and monetary and fiscal policy. Prerequisites: Econ 1 and Econ 3 and Math 10C or 20C or 31BH.

ECON 110B. Macroeconomics B (4)
Analysis of the determination of consumption spending at the aggregate level; extension of the basic macro model to include exchange rates and international trade; the aggregate money supply, and the business cycle. Prerequisites: Econ 110A.

ECON 110AH. Honors Macroeconomics A (1)
Honors sequence expanding on the material taught in Econ 110A. Major GPA of 3.5 or better required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 110A or after successful completion of Econ 110A with A–or better or consent of instructor. Priority enrollment given to majors in the department. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ECON 110BH. Honors Macroeconomics B (1)
Honors sequence expanding on the material taught in Econ 110B. Major GPA of 3.5 or better required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 110B or after successful completion of Econ 110B with A– or better or consent of instructor. Priority enrollment given to majors in the department. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ECON 111. Monetary Economics (4)
Financial structure of the US economy. Bank behavior. Monetary control. Prerequisites: Econ 3 and Math 10A or 20A.

ECON 113. Mathematical Economics (4)
Mathematical concepts and techniques used in advanced economic analysis; applications to selected aspects of economic theory. Prerequisites: Econ 100C; or Math 140A or Math 142A.

ECON 114. Economics of Immigration (4)
Impact of immigration on the US economy. Empirical evidence on the labor market and fiscal impacts of immigration. Consequences of US immigration policies on the economy. Prerequisites: Econ 1 and 3.

ECON 116. Economic Development (4)
Introduction to the economics of less developed countries, covering their international trade, human resources, urbanization, agriculture, income distribution, political economy, and environment. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100B.

ECON 117. Economic Growth (4)
Models of the economic growth of developed economies. Prerequisites: Econ 100A.

ECON 118. Law and Economics: Torts, Property, and Crime (4)
Uses economic theory to evaluate the economic effects of US law in several legal fields, including tort law (accidents), products liability law, property law, criminal law (law enforcement), and litigation. Also considers risk bearing and why people buy insurance. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100A; and Math 10A or 20A.

ECON 119. Law and Economics: Contracts and Corporations (4)
This course asks how firms are organized and why the corporate form dominates, how corporations are governed and the distortions that result, when firms borrow and how they deal with financial distress and bankruptcy. The course will present basic legal doctrines in corporate law, contract law, debtor-creditor law, and bankruptcy, and use economic models to analyze whether and when these doctrines promote economically efficient behavior. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100A and Math 10A or 20A.

ECON 120A. Econometrics A (4)
Probability and statistics used in economics. Probability and sampling theory, statistical inference, and use of spreadsheets. Credit not allowed for Econ 120A and any of the following: ECE 109; Math 180A; Math183; Math 186. Prerequisites: Econ 1; and Math 10C or 20C.

ECON 120B. Econometrics B (4)
Basic econometric methods, including the linear regression, hypothesis testing, quantifying uncertainty using confidence intervals, and distinguishing correlation from causality. Credit not allowed for both Econ 120B and Math 181B. Prerequisites: Econ 120A or ECE 109 or Math 180A or Math 183 or Math 186.

ECON 120C. Econometrics C (4)
Advanced econometric methods: estimation of linear regression models with endogeneity, economic methods designed for panel data sets, estimation of discrete choice models, time series analysis, and estimation in the presence of autocorrelated and heterskedastic errors. Prerequisites: Econ 120B or Math 181B.

ECON 120AH. Honors Econometrics A (1)
Honors sequence expanding on the material taught in Econ 120A. Major GPA of 3.5 or better required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 120A or after successful completion of Econ 120A with A– or better or consent of instructor. Priority enrollment given to majors in the department. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ECON 120BH. Honors Econometrics B (1)
Honors sequence expanding on the material taught in Econ 120B. Major GPA of 3.5 or better required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 120B or after successful completion of Econ 120B with A– or better or consent of instructor. Priority enrollment given to majors in the department. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ECON 120CH. Honors Econometrics C (1)
Honors sequence expanding on the material taught in Econ 120C. Major GPA of 3.5 or better required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 120C or after successful completion of Econ 120C with A– or better or consent of instructor. Priority enrollment given to majors in the department. Prerequisites: department approval required.

ECON 121. Applied Econometrics (4)
Application of econometric methods to such areas as labor supply, human capital, and financial time series. Concurrent enrollment in Econ 120C is permitted. Prerequisites: Econ 120C.

ECON 122. Econometric Theory (4)
Detailed study of the small sample and asymptotic properties of estimators commonly used in applied econometric work: multiple linear regression, instrumental variables, generalized method of moments, and maximum likelihood. Econometric computation using MATLAB. Recommended preparation: Econ 120C. Prerequisites: Econ 120B or Math 181B and Math 20F or Math 31AH.

ECON 125. Demographic Analysis and Forecasting (4)
Interaction between economic forces and demographic changes are considered, as are demographic composition and analysis; fertility, mortality, and migration processes and trends. Course emphasizes the creation, evaluation, and interpretation of forecasts for states, regions, and subcounty areas. Econ 178 is recommended. Prerequisites: Econ 120B or Math 181B.

ECON 130. Public Policy (4)
Course uses basic microeconomic tools to discuss a wide variety of public issues, including the war on drugs, global warming, natural resources, health care and safety regulation. Appropriate for majors who have not completed Econ 100A-B-C and students from other departments. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100A.

ECON 131. Economics of the Environment (4)
Environmental issues from an economic perspective. Relation of the environment to economic growth. Management of natural resources, such as forest and fresh water. Policies on air, water, and toxic waste pollution. International issues such as ozone depletion and sustainable development. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100A.

ECON 132. Energy Economics (4)
Energy from an economic perspective. Fuel cycles for coal, hydro, nuclear, oil, and solar energy. Emphasis on efficiency and control of pollution. Comparison of energy use across sectors and across countries. Global warming. Role of energy in the international economy. Prerequisites: Econ 1 and (Econ 2 or 3 or 100A or 131 or ESYS 103 or MAE 124) and Math 10C or 20C or 31BH.

ECON 133. International Environmental Agreements (4)
Addresses environmental issues that transcend national boundaries, such as climate change, biodiversity loss, over-fishing. Examines why international agreements are required, how they are negotiated and implemented, and studies their effectiveness. Explores whether more effective environmental treaties could be designed. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100A.

ECON 135. Urban Economics (4)
(Cross-listed with USP 102.) Economic analysis of why cities develop, patterns of land use in cities, why cities suburbanize, and the pattern of urban commuting. The course also examines problems of urban congestion, air pollution, zoning, poverty, crime, and discusses public policies to deal with them. Credit not allowed for both Econ 135 and USP 102. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100A; and Math 10A or 20A.

ECON 136. Human Resources (4)
A practical yet theory-based study of the firm’s role in managing workers, including issues related to hiring, education and training, promotions, layoffs and buyouts, and the overarching role that worker compensation plays in all of these. Prerequisites: Econ 100B.

ECON 139. Labor Economics (4)
Theoretical and empirical analysis of labor markets. Topics include: labor supply, labor demand, human capital investment, wage inequality, labor mobility, immigration, labor market discrimination, labor unions and unemployment. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100B.

ECON 140. Economics of Health Producers (4)
Provides an overview of the physician, hospital, and pharmaceutical segments of the health sector. Uses models of physician behavior, for-profit and nonprofit institutions to understand the trade-offs facing health-sector regulators and the administrators of public and private insurance arrangements. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100B.

ECON 141. Economics of Health Consumers (4)
Demand for health care and health insurance, employer-provision of health insurance and impact on wages and job changes. Cross-country comparisons of health systems. Prerequisites: Econ 100C.

ECON 142. Behavioral Economics (4)
Course will study economic models in which standard economic rationality assumptions are combined with psychologically plausible assumptions on behavior. We consider whether the new models improve ability to predict and understand phenomena including altruism, trust and reciprocity, procrastination, and self-control. Prerequisites: Econ 109.

ECON 143. Experimental Economics (4)
Explore use of experiments to study individual and interactive (strategic) decision-making. Topics may include choice over risky alternatives, altruism and reciprocity, allocation and information aggregation in competitive markets, cooperation and collusion, bidding in auctions, strategy in coordination and “outguessing” games. Prerequisites: Econ 100C.

ECON 144. Economics of Conservation (4)
Examines conservation of biodiversity from an economic perspective. Topics include valuing biodiversity, defining successful conservation, and evaluating the cost effectiveness of policies such as conservation payments, ecotourism, and privatization. Emphasis on forests, coral reefs, elephants, tigers, and sea turtles. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100A.

ECON 145. Economics of Ocean Resources (4)
Economic issues associated with oceans. Economics of managing renewable resources in the oceans, with an emphasis on fisheries, economics of conservation and biodiversity preservation for living marine resources, with an emphasis on whales, dolphins, sea turtles, and coral reefs. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100A.

ECON 146. Economic Stabilization (4)
Theory of business cycles and techniques used by governments to stabilize an economy. Discussion of recent economic experience. Prerequisites: Econ 110B.

ECON 147. Economics of Education (4)
Examination of issues in education using theoretical and empirical approaches from economics. Analysis of decisions to invest in education. Consideration of various market structures in education, including school choice and school finance programs. Prerequisites: Econ 2 or 100A; and Econ 120B or Math 181B.

ECON 150. Public Economics: Taxation (4)
Overview of the existing national tax structure in the United States, its effects on individual and firm decisions, and the resulting efficiency costs and distributional consequences. The course concludes with an examination of several commonly proposed tax reforms. Prerequisites: Econ 100C.

ECON 151. Public Economics: Expenditures I (4)
Overview of the public sector in the US and the scope of government intervention in economic life. Theory of public goods and externalities. Discussion of specific expenditure programs such as education and national defense. Prerequisites: Econ 100C.

ECON 152. Public Economics: Expenditures II (4)
Overview of the public sector in the US and the justifications for government intervention in economic life. Theory of income redistribution and social insurance. Applications to current policy in such areas as health insurance, welfare, unemployment insurance, and Social Security. Prerequisites: Econ 100C.

ECON 158. Economic History of the United States I (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 140.) The United States as a raw materials producer, as an agrarian society, and as an industrial nation. Emphasis on the logic of the growth process, the social and political tensions accompanying expansion, and nineteenth- and early twentieth-century transformations of American capitalism. Credit not allowed for both Econ 158 and HIUS 140. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ECON 159. Economic History of the United States II (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 141.) The United States as a modern industrial nation. Emphasis on the logic of the growth process, the social and political tensions accompanying expansion, and twentieth-century transformations of American capitalism. Credit not allowed for both Econ 159 and HIUS 141. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ECON 161. Global Integration of Latin America (4)
Examines the integration of Latin American and Caribbean countries into the global economy. Topics include trade in agricultural and manufactured goods, regional trade agreements, international capital flows to Latin America, financial vulnerabilities, and policy responses. Prerequisites: Econ 1 and 3.

ECON 162. Economics of Mexico (4)
Survey of the Mexican economy. Topics such as economic growth, business cycles, saving-investment balance, financial markets, fiscal and monetary policy, labor markets, industrial structure, international trade, and agricultural policy. Prerequisites: Econ 1 and 3.

ECON 163. Japanese Economy (4)
Survey of the Japanese economy. Economic growth, business cycles, saving-investment balance, financial markets, fiscal and monetary policy, labor markets, industrial structure, international trade, and agricultural policy. Prerequisites: Econ 1 and 3.

ECON 165. Middle East Economics (4)
Socioeconomic development in the Arab world, Iran, and Turkey. Historical perspective; international trade and fuel resources; education, health, and gender gaps; unemployment and migration; population and environment; Islam and democracy. Prerequisites: Econ 1 and 3.

ECON 165T. Advanced Topics in Middle East Economics (2)
This course will cover certain country experiences and certain topics in more depth than in Econ 165. Students will also have the opportunity to choose countries and topics of particular interest to them for further reading and as subjects for a presentation and brief paper. Prerequisites: department approval required. May be taken concurrently with Econ 165 or after completion of Econ 165.

ECON 166. Economics of Southeast Asia (4)
Long-run economic development and current economic issues of Southeast Asia. Topics include: economic growth, industrialization, financial development, demography, human capital and labor, inequality and poverty, corporate sector, institutions, and government. Designed to teach how to apply economics to the real world, with examples and case studies from Southeast Asian economies. Will start with general economic frameworks then use them to discuss issues from countries in Southeast Asia. Prerequisites: Econ 110B.

ECON 171. Decisions Under Uncertainty (4)
Decision making when the consequences are uncertain. Decision trees, payoff tables, decision criteria, expected utility theory, risk aversion, sample information. Prerequisites: Econ 100A and Econ 120A or ECE 109 or Math 180A or Math 183 or Math 186.

ECON 172A. Operations Research A (4)
Linear and integer programming, elements of zero-sum, two-person game theory, and specific combinatorial algorithms. Credit not allowed for both Econ 172A and Math 171A. Prerequisites: Econ 100A; and Econ 120A or ECE 109 or Math 180A or Math 183 or Math 186; and Math 20F.

ECON 172B. Operations Research B (4)
Nonlinear programming, deterministic and stochastic dynamic programming, queuing theory, search models, and inventory models. Credit not allowed for both Econ 172B and Math 171B. Prerequisites: Econ 172A or Math 171A.

ECON 173A. Financial Markets (4)
Financial market functions, institutions and instruments: stocks, bonds, cash instruments, derivatives (options), etc. Discussion of no-arbitrage arguments, as well as investors’ portfolio decisions and the basic risk-return trade-off established in market equilibrium. Prerequisites: Econ 100A and Econ 120B or Math 181B; and Math 20F or 31AH.

ECON 173AL. Applied Finance Laboratory (2)
Empirical, case-based analysis requiring students to use economic theory from Econ 173A: Financial Markets and data to address real-world issues such as conducting market research, conducting discounted cash flow analyses, and applying the CAPM model to identify issues in investment management, and more. Presentation of student analyses both orally and in writing. Can be used in conjunction with another two-unit upper-division Econ course to meet major elective requirements by petition. Prerequisites: Econ 173A.

ECON 173B. Corporate Finance (4)
Introduces the firm’s capital budgeting decision, including methods for evaluation and ranking of investment projects, the firm’s choice of capital structure, dividend policy decisions, corporate taxes, mergers and acquisitions. Prerequisites: Econ 4 or MGT 4; and Econ 173A.

ECON 174. Financial Risk Management (4)
Risk measures, hedging techniques, value of risk to firms, estimation of optimal hedge ratio, risk management with options and futures. Econ 171 is recommended. Prerequisites: Econ 173A.

ECON 176. Marketing (4)
Role of marketing in the economy. Topics such as buyer behavior, marketing mix, promotion, product selection, pricing, and distribution. Concurrent enrollment in Econ 120C is permitted. Prerequisites: Econ 120C.

ECON 177L. Applied Management Laboratory (4)
Applied theory and case-based class requiring students to develop hypothesis-driven, problem-solving skills. Students will work in teams and will develop management consultant skills by applying microeconomic theory, marketing, accounting, and econometric analyses to real-world business problems. Presentation of student analyses both orally and in writing. Prerequisites: Econ 4 and Econ 100C and Econ 176.

ECON 178. Economic and Business Forecasting (4)
Survey of theoretical and practical aspects of statistical and economic forecasting. Such topics as long-run and short-run horizons, leading indicator analysis, econometric models, technological and population forecasts, forecast evaluation, and the use of forecasts for public policy. Concurrent enrollment in Econ 120C is permitted. Prerequisites: Econ 120C.

ECON 182. Topics in Microeconomics (4)
Selected topics in microeconomics. Prerequisites: Econ 100C, consent of department is required.

ECON 191A. Senior Essay Seminar A (4)
Senior essay seminar for students with superior records in department majors. Students must complete Econ 191A and Econ 191B in consecutive quarters. Prerequisites: department stamp required.

ECON 191B. Senior Essay Seminar B (4)
Senior essay seminar for students with superior records in department majors. Students must complete Econ 191A and Econ 191B in consecutive quarters. Prerequisites: department stamp required.

ECON 195. Introduction to Teaching Economics (4)
Introduction to teaching economics. Each student will be responsible for a class section in one of the lower-division economics courses. Limited to advanced economics majors with at least a 3.5 GPA in upper-division economics work. (P/NP grades only.) Students may not earn more than eight units credit in 195 courses. Prerequisites: consent of the department.

ECON 198. Directed Group Study (2 or 4)
Directed study on a topic or in a group field not included in regular department curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor. May be repeated up to three times when course topics vary. (P/NP grades only.)

ECON 199. Independent Study (2 or 4)
Independent reading or research under the direction of and by special arrangement with a Department of Economics faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor and departmental approval.

ECON 200A. Microeconomics A (4)
Modern consumer and producer theory. Preferences, utility maximization, demand, choice under uncertainty, intertemporal choice. Production, cost, profit maximization and supply. Comparative statics, duality. Prerequisites: none. Enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 200B. Microeconomics B (4)
Arrow-Debreu model of general economic equilibrium and welfare economics. Axiomatic theory of the firm and household. Existence of general economic equilibrium. First and Second Fundamental Theorems of Welfare Economics. Futures and contingent commodity markets. Core and core convergence. Prerequisites: Econ 200A. Enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 200C. Mircoeconomics C (4)
Information economics: static and dynamic games of incomplete information, signaling, screening, and lemons. Institutional analysis: social choice, mechanism design, cooperative bargaining, contracts, strategic theory of the firm. Prerequisites: Econ 200B. Enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 201. Advanced Economic Theory (4)
An intensive examination of selected topics in economic theory. Course topic nonrepetitive in a three-year cycle. Prerequisites: Econ 207 and 213.

ECON 202A-B-C. Workshop in Economic Theory (0–4/0–4/0–4)
An examination of recent research in economic theory, including topics in general equilibrium, welfare economics, duality, and social choice; development of related research topics by both graduate students and faculty. Course may be repeated an unlimited number of times. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: Econ 207 or consent of instructor.

ECON 205. Mathematics for Economists (4)
Advanced calculus review for new graduate students. Prerequisites: none. Enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 206. Decisions (4)
Further topics in consumer and producer theory, intertemporal optimization, and decision making under uncertainty. (Previously numbered Econ 200D.) Prerequisites: Econ 200A-B-C or consent of instructor.

ECON 208. Games and Information (4)
Further topics in game theory and the economics of information. (Previously numbered Econ 200F.) Prerequisites: Econ 200A-B-C or consent of instructor.

ECON 210A. Macroeconomics A (4)
Dynamic optimization: Lagrangean methods and recursive methods. The neoclassical growth model: social planner, competitive equilibrium, first and second welfare theorems, steady state analysis, dynamic analysis, shocks, heterogeneity and aggregation, applications. Prerequisites: none. Enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75); or consent of instructor.

ECON 210B. Macroeconomics B (4)
Models of the household’s intertemporal consumption/saving decision, and implications for risk aversion, basic portfolio allocation, and asset pricing. Models with heterogeneous agents—overlapping generations, incomplete markets, precautionary saving. Implications of labor market frictions for equilibrium employment. Prerequisites: Econ 210A. Enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75); or consent of instructor.

ECON 210C. Macroeconomics C (4)
Basic facts and time series for macroeconomics. Modern theories of short-run fluctuations: sources of business cycle and the evolution of income, employment, interest rate, and prices. Monetary and fiscal policy theories in the presence of real and nominal rigidities. Prerequisites: Econ 210B. Enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75); or consent of instructor.

ECON 210D. Monetary Economics and Business Cycles (4)
Study of the determinants of economic fluctuations, inflation, and interest rates with particular focus on the effects of monetary policy. Overview of key methods and findings of empirical research in macroeconomics. Recommended preparation: Econ 220D. Prerequisite: graduate standing and Econ 210A-B-C.

ECON 211. Advanced Macroeconomics (4-4-4)
Covers various topics in macroeconomics at the frontiers of research, including theory, computation, and empirical work. Emphasis depends on the instructor. Students will read the latest working papers and publications in the covered areas. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 210A-B-C or consent of instructor.

ECON 212A-B-C. Workshop in Macroeconomics (0–4/0–4/0–4)
Examination of recent research in macroeconomics; development of own research by graduate students and faculty. Course may be repeated an unlimited number of times. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: Econ 210C.

ECON 213. Advanced Macroeconomic Theory (4)
This course develops purely theoretical models for problems in macroeconomics. Topics include dynamic general equilibrium, asset market equilibrium, and economic growth and distribution. Prerequisites: Econ 210A-B-C or consent of instructor.

ECON 214. Applied Macroeconomics (4)
This course focuses on applied macroeconomics, including econometric testing of macroeconomic theories and empirical measurement guided by theoretical insights. Topics will vary from year to year depending on the latest developments in research. Students will complete the course with a broader understanding of a number of leading topics in macroeconomics as well as a toolkit of estimation and simulation programs. Recommended preparation: Econ 220D. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 210A-B-C or consent of instructor.

ECON 215. Macroeconomic Policy (4)
This course focuses on theoretical models and empirical analysis aimed at understanding and directing macroeconomic policy, including monetary, fiscal, and structural policies. Prerequisites: Econ 210A-B-C or consent of instructor.

ECON 216. Computation for Macroeconomics (4)
This course covers advanced computation techniques that are widely used in macroeconomics, finance, and other fields. Students will learn a range of numerical methods for handling systems of equations, integration, optimization, and other problems. Prerequisites: Econ 210A-B-C or consent of instructor.

ECON 217. Real Frictions and Financial Frictions (4)
While understanding how the macro economy behaves in the ideal, frictionless setting is indispensable; most of the interesting issues in macro arise as a consequence of some sort of friction or missing market. In this course, we will study some models based on real frictions and financial frictions. Topics covered include convex and nonconvex adjustment costs, housing markets and investment decisions, and financial crises. Prerequisites: Econ 210A-B-C or consent of instructor.

ECON 219. Readings in Macroeconomics (4)
This course will cover numerical analysis of dynamic macroeconomic models. Topics include numerical techniques, dynamic programming, linear systems, solution algorithms, and applications to dynamic general equilibrium. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ECON 220A. Econometrics A (4)
An introduction to probability and statistics for graduate students in economics. Topics include: random variables, sampling distributions, the law of large numbers, the central limit theorem, maximum likelihood estimation, hypothesis testing. Knowledge of multivariable calculus and linear algebra is assumed. Prerequisites: graduate standing; enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 220B. Econometrics B (4)
Introduction to regression analysis and other estimation methods. Topics covered include: ordinary and generalized least squares, asymptotic approximations, specification testing, two-stage least squares, generalized method of moments, and maximum likelihood estimation. Prerequisites: Econ 220A, graduate standing; Enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 220C. Econometrics C (4)
This course focuses on econometric analysis of panel data and cross-section data. Topics covered include: static/dynamic panel data models, discrete choice models, censored and truncated regression models, sample selection models, and evaluation of treatment effects. Theory of extreme estimators is used to study the specification, estimation, and testing of these models. Prerequisites: Econ 220B, graduate standing; enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 220D. Econometrics D (4)
Examines modern time series econometrics, extending methods from Econ 220A-C to dependent data. Topics covered include spectral density theory, HAC estimation, vector autoregressions, nonstationary econometrics, filtering. Prerequisites: Econ 220C, graduate standing; enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 220E. Econometrics E (4)
Identification of economic models. Topics include: rank and order conditions for identification in linear simultaneous equations systems; identification in nonlinear models; likelihood based identification criteria; nonparametric identification; identification in models with multiple equilibria. Prerequisites: Econ 220D, graduate standing; enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 220F. Econometrics F (4)
This course focuses on the application of econometric techniques to issues in microeconomics and macroeconomics. The major emphasis in the class is on the completion of an empirical project. Prerequisites: Econ 220E, graduate standing; enrollment limited to Economics PhD students (EN75) or Rady PhD students (RS79); or consent of instructor.

ECON 221. Advanced Econometrics (4)
Advanced topics in econometrics. Topics may vary from year to year, covering areas such as cross-section, time-series, panel, limited dependent variables, conditional quantile estimation, bootstrapping, and large- and small-sample distribution theory. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 220A, 220B, 220C, 220D, and 220E or consent of instructor.

ECON 222A-B-C. Workshop in Econometrics (4-4-4)
Examination of recent econometric research; development of own research by students and faculty. Course may be repeated an unlimited number of times. (S/U grades only.)

ECON 225. Forecasting (4)
Topics include testing for rationality of forecasts, Mincer-Zarnowitz regressions, asymmetric loss functions, tests for equal (superior) predictive ability, multivariate forecasting. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 220A, 220B, 220C, 220D, and 220E or consent of instructor.

ECON 226. Bayesian and Numerical Methods (4)
Topics include Bayesian inference and decision theory, loss functions, estimation of dynamic stochastic general equilibrium models, nonlinear time series, state-space models, spatial-temporal models, and high-frequency data. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 220A, 220B, 220C, 220D, and 220E or consent of instructor.

ECON 227. Nonparametric and Semiparametric Models (4)
Topics include neural networks, kernels, series, splines, estimation of densities and spectra, smoothing parameter selection, semiparametric models, efficiency and adaptation, forecasting with nonlinear models, over-fit, computation, and interpretation. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 220A, 220B, 220C, 220D, and 220E or consent of instructor.

ECON 228. Nonstandard Inference (4)
Topics include weak instruments, unit roots, break tests, switching models, set-based inference, maximum likelihood estimation and meaning of misspecified models, consistency, asymptotic normality, consistent covariance matrix estimation, and tests of model misspecification. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 220A, 220B, 220C, 220D, and 220E or consent of instructor.

ECON 230. Public Economics: Taxation (4)
Exploration of existing theoretical literature evaluating the efficiency and distribution effects of income and commodity taxes. Characterization of an “optimal” tax structure, and examination of problems faced in tax administration. Scrutiny of behavioral responses to existing tax structures. Prerequisites: Econ 200A-B-C and Econ 220A-B-C.

ECON 231. Public Economics: Public Goods and Externalities (4)
Justifications for government intervention in the context of public goods and externalities. Exploration of normative and positive models of government behavior. Lessons from fiscal federalism for federal, state, and local roles. Applications to specific expenditure programs, such as national defense and education. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 200A-B-C and Econ 220A-B-C.

ECON 232. Public Economics: Redistribution and Social Insurance (4)
Justifications for government involvement in redistribution and insurance markets. Optimal design of transfer and social insurance programs. Theoretical and empirical analyses of programs including cash welfare assistance, unemployment insurance, social security, Medicaid, and Medicare. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 200A-B-C and Econ 220A-B-C.

ECON 235A-B-C. Workshop in Applied Economics (0–4/0–4/0–4)
Examination of recent research in applied economics; development of own research by graduate students and faculty. Course may be repeated an unlimited number of times. (S/U grades only.)

ECON 241. Microeconomics of Development (4)
Course introduces the household as a decision-making unit, and the contracts and institutions that emerge to compensate for imperfect markets. Emphasis is placed on data and identification strategies that can be used to measure the impact of policy interventions. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ECON 242. Macroeconomics of Development (4)
Course begins with measurement of development and continues to history of division of world into industrial and agricultural countries. Roles of trade, finance, and investment in aggregate growth are then studied. Course concludes by covering income distribution and political economy. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ECON 245. International Trade (4)
This course covers the determinants of the pattern and volume of trade in goods and services, the interaction of international trade with income distribution and economic growth, and commercial policy. The emphasis is on theory, with some empirical illustration and motivation. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECON 246. International Macroeconomics (4)
This course presents open-economy macroeconomics and international finance. Topics include theories of the exchange rate, foreign-exchange regimes, current account adjustments, and international portfolio investments. The course examines real and monetary explanations, and implications of international capital market integration. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECON 247. Empirical Topics in International Economics (4)
This course examines the empirical work in international trade or international macroeconomics. International trade topics include empirical tests of theories of international trade and international capital movements. International macroeconomic topics include empirical studies of exchange rate and relative price adjustments. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECON 249A. International Development Workshop I (1–4)
Presentation of recent research in international and development economics by faculty and graduate students, covering micro and macroeconomic aspect of both areas. Regular attendance is required. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ECON 249C. International Development Workshop III (1–4)
Presentation of recent research in international and development economics by faculty and graduate students, covering micro and macroeconomic aspect of both areas. Regular attendance is required. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ECON 250. Labor Economics (4)
Theoretical and empirical issues in labor economics. (Previously numbered Econ 236A-B.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECON 260. Industrial Organization: Firms (4)
This course covers theory and empirical applications in the following areas of industrial organization: dynamic pricing, price discrimination, collusion, market power, discrete choice demand modeling, entry, asymmetric information, and search. Prerequisites: Econ 220C. Enrollment by completion of prerequisites or by consent of instructor.

ECON 261. Industrial Organization: Markets (4)
This course covers theory and empirical applications in the following areas of industrial organization: mergers, vertical integration, and innovation. Optional topics include network effects, technology adoption, and regulation. Prerequisites: Econ 200C and 220C. Enrollment by completion of prerequisites or by consent of instructor.

ECON 263. Modeling Behavioral Economics (4)
Covers various models in behavioral economics including self-control, bounded memory, belief manipulation, framing effects, and behavioral game theory. The course will also discuss their role in industrial organization, finance, and political economy, and their implications for welfare. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 200A-B-C.

ECON 264. Experimental Economics (4)
Design and interpretation of controlled experiments using human subjects. (Previously numbered Econ 207.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECON 265. Alternative Choice Theory (4)
Experimental findings by economists and psychologists of systematic departures from the classical model of decision making under risk and uncertainty. Issues of dynamic consistency in choice. Development, formal analysis and application of alternative models of risk preferences and beliefs. Prerequisites: graduate standing and Econ 200A-B-C.

ECON 266. Economics of Natural Resources (4)
Theoretical and empirical issues in natural resource economics. (Previously numbered Econ 242.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECON 267. Topics in Environmental and Resource Economics (4)
The course will cover any of a variety of topics in environmental and resource economics, including climate change, exhaustible and renewable resources, international environmental agreements, nonmarket valuation, energy economics, and water allocation. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECON 270. Finance—Core Asset Pricing (4)
Theoretical and empirical issues in finance. (Previously numbered Econ 214A.)

ECON 272. Finance—Theory and Testing of Intertemporal Asset Pricing Models (4)
Theoretical and empirical issues in finance. (Previously numbered Econ 214C.)

ECON 280. Computation (2)
Introduction to computing for economists. Prerequisites: enrollment limited to economics PhD students (EN75).

ECON 281. Special Topics in Economics (4)
Lecture course at an advanced level on a special topic. May be repeated for credit if topic differs. (Previously numbered Econ 267.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECON 285. Precandidacy Presentation (2)
This course is a workshop in which students make formal presentations on the literature and on their own projects and receive input from other students and the instructor. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECON 286. Graduate Research Presentation Workshop (3)
The aim of the course is to train students to present their research effectively to a broad audience. Students are required to prepare a formal presentation, and then to provide feedback on the presentations made by other students. Depending on student demand, meetings may be divided into multiple sections, based on field interests. Prerequisites: graduate standing, Econ 285.

ECON 291. Advanced Field Advising (4)
Controlled reading and discussion with advisor; literature survey. May be repeated for credit. (S/U grades only.)

ECON 296. Original Research Paper (1–12)
In this course, students are guided toward the formulation of an original research idea and the writing of an original paper. Students receive support and input through group discussion and also through interaction with the instructor. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECON 297. Independent Study (1–5)
(S/U grades only.)

ECON 299. Research in Economics for Dissertation (1–9)
(S/U grades only.)

ECON 500A-B-C. Teaching Methods in Economics (4-4-4)
The study and development of effective pedagogical materials and techniques in economics. Students who hold appointments as teaching assistants must enroll in this course, but it is open to other students as well. (S/U grades only.)

EDS 20S. Introduction to Principles of Learning (4)
Students will study discipline-specific principles of effective learning, including critical thinking, problem solving, collaboration, and group communication. Laboratory and hypothesis testing, library research and writing skills, and self-assessment. Students will explore concepts and procedures in mathematics, science, and economics. Prerequisites: Summer Bridge participation. Department stamp required.

EDS 21S. Writing and Learning—Triton Transition (4)
Reading, writing, and speaking exercises will introduce students to the teaching conventions and learning expectations of American universities. Students will use writing as a means of academic inquiry to explore the culture of higher education in the United States and will gain practice with appropriate style, structure, and mechanics. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: department stamp required.

EDS 22. Education in Cuba: Institutional Structures, History, and Culture (2)
Cuba’s educational system achieves higher outcomes than any other country in Latin America, and compared to the U.S., it represents a very different institutional structure. Cuban education serves as an explicit vehicle for the transmission of Cuban culture and historical consciousness. This course examines Cuba’s emphasis on educational achievement following the triumph of its revolution in 1959, including institutional structures, pedagogy, and content. Prerequisites: Summer Bridge participation, instructor approval required.

EDS 22S. Education in Cuba—Field Experience (4)
This course provides a combination of seminar work and intensive field experience after the end of the spring quarter, during special summer session. Topics are introduced and analyzed in seminars and reinforced and expanded upon in field visits to historic and cultural sites in Cuba.  Additional fees may be required for travel expenses. Prerequisites: students must be participants in the OASIS Learning Communities Program. Enrollment by instructor approval only. Due to expenses of field experience, enrollment will be limited to students who have completed EDS 22 and attended planning meetings with the instructor to discuss cost and travel requirements.

EDS 23. Success and Satisfaction in the Second Year of Higher Education: Research Trends and Conclusions (2)
Course focuses on challenges that confront college students in their second year of higher education and solutions. Emphasis on historically underrepresented students of color with more complex adjustment to college. Analysis of national trends from research including high impact practices. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: departmental approval. This course is a collaboration with Student Affairs “2 Excel Program.” Enrollees should only be program participants.

EDS 30/Math 95. Introduction to Math Teaching (2)
Revisit students’ learning difficulties in mathematics in more depth to prepare students to make meaningful observations of how K–12 teachers deal with these difficulties. Explore how instruction can use students’ knowledge to pose problems that stimulate students’ intellectual curiosity.

EDS 31/Chem 96. Introduction to Teaching Science (2)
Explores routine challenges and exceptional difficulties students often have in learning science. Prepares students to make meaningful observations of how K–12 teachers deal with difficulties. Explores strategies that teachers may use to pose problems that stimulate students’ intellectual curiosity.

EDS 39. Practicum in Science and Math Teaching/Learning (2)
Undergraduate students are placed in local schools and work with children in classrooms and the community. Students work on educational activities with K–12 students a minimum of twenty hours/quarter. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: department stamp.

EDS 50. Chancellor’s Associates Scholars Program Freshman Introductory Course (1)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking, organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. Prerequisites: Open to Chancellor’s Associates Scholars Program freshman first-year students only.

EDS 105. Teaching and Learning Physics (4)
(Same as Phys 180) A course on how people learn and understand key concepts in Newtonian mechanics. Reading in physics and cognitive science plus fieldwork teaching and evaluating K–12 students. Useful for students interested in teaching. Prerequisites: three quarters of lower-division physics.

EDS 112. Urban Education in the United States (4)
Students will read, discuss, and analyze past and present urban education demographics, resources, policies, practices, and outcomes to deepen their knowledge and critique of issues in urban education. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

EDS 113. Chicanas/os and Latinos in Education: Policy, Practice, and Challenges to Equity (4)
An overview of the experiences, challenges, and opportunities for educating Chicano/Latino students. This course unpacks the socioeconomic and systematic factors that underlie these data. Further, to understand this persistent phenomenon and explore approaches to altering the current pathway of this group, this course will provide a comprehensive overview of Chicana/o-Latina/o students at every state in the P-20 education continuum. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

EDS 114. Cognitive Development and Interactive Computing Environments (4)
Development and learning are increasingly supported by interactive computing environments. This course will explore technology-supported learning environments, looking at the ways they can be used to promote effective development, learning, and teaching. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

EDS 115. Cognitive Development and Education (4)
This course examines the development of cognition, thinking, and language from infancy to adolescence with implications for education. Topics include learning theories, executive function, memory and language, as well as impacts of technology, poverty, diversity, and bilingualism. Course content focuses on addressing achievement gaps. Students may not receive credit for both EDS 115 and EDS 115GS. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

EDS 115GS. Cognitive Development and Education (4)
This course examines the development of cognition, thinking, and language from infancy to adolescence with implications for education. Topics include learning theories, executive function, memory and language, as well as impacts of technology, poverty, diversity, and bilingualism. Course content focuses on addressing achievement gaps. This course is offered in Quito, Ecuador. It will integrate field experiences gained through organized class excursions and individual experiences of students. Program or material fee may apply. Students may not receive credit for both EDS 115GS and EDS 115. Prerequisites: department approval. Students must apply and be accepted to the Global Seminar Program in order to enroll.

EDS 116. The Psychology of Teaching and Structures of Information for Human Learning (4)
College students tutoring college students. Curriculum: basic applied learning principles, specifying objectives, planning and designing instruction, testing, evaluation, interpersonal communication skills, study skills. Objectives will be specified for each area. Competency will be assessed by project completion and practicum feedback. This course is not creditable toward professional preparation requirements for the multiple subject credential. Prerequisites: departmental approval (consent of instructor)—department stamp restriction.

EDS 117. Language, Culture, and Education (4)
(Same as SOCI 117) The mutual influence of language, culture, and education will be explored; explanations of students’ school successes and failures that employ linguistic and cultural variables will be considered; bilingualism and cultural transmission through education. Students may not receive credit for EDS 117 and SOCI 117 and EDS 117GS. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

EDS 117GS. Language, Culture, and Education (4)
The mutual influence of language, culture, and education will be explored; explanations of students’ school successes and failures that employ linguistic and cultural variables will be considered; bilingualism and cultural transmission through education. This course is offered in Quito, Ecuador. It will integrate field experiences gained through organized class excursions and individual experiences of students. Program or material fee may apply. Students may not receive credit for EDS 117GS and EDS 117 and SOCI 117. Prerequisites: department approval. Students must apply and be accepted to the Global Seminar Program in order to enroll.

EDS 118. Adolescent Development and Education (4)
This course introduces prospective secondary teachers to the cognitive, social, and emotional development of adolescents, including developmental learning theory, the teaching/learning process, effective learning environments, and cross-cultural variation in development. Implications for classroom practice are drawn.

EDS/LIGN 119. First and Second Language Learning: From Childhood through Adolescence (4)
An examination of how human language learning ability develops and changes over the first two decades of life, including discussion of factors that may affect this ability. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

EDS 121A/Math 121A. Foundations of Teaching and Learning Mathematics I (4)
Develop teachers’ knowledge base (knowledge of mathematics content, pedagogy, and student learning) in the context of advanced mathematics. This course builds on the previous courses where these components of knowledge were addressed exclusively in the context of high-school mathematics. Prerequisites: EDS 30/Math 95, and Calculus 10C or 20C.

EDS 121B/Math 121B. Foundations of Teaching and Learning Math II (4)
Examine how learning theories can consolidate observations about conceptual development with the individual student as well as the development of knowledge in the history of mathematics. Examine how teaching theories explain the effect of teaching approaches addressed in the previous courses. Prerequisites: EDS 121A/Math 121A.

EDS 122/Chem 187. Foundations of Teaching and Learning Science (4)
Examine theories of learning and how they are important in the science classroom. Conceptual development in the individual student, as well as the development of knowledge in the history of science. Key conceptual obstacles in science will be explored. Prerequisites: EDS 31/Chem 87: Introduction to Teaching Science, Chemistry 6C.

EDS 123/Chem 188. Capstone Seminar in Science Education (4)
In the lecture and observation format, students continue to explore the theories of learning in the science classroom. Conceptual development is fostered, as well as continued development of knowledge of science history. Students are exposed to the science of teaching science in actual practice. Prerequisites: EDS 122/Chem 187.

COMM 169. Deaf Culture in the U.S. (4)
The relationship between small groups and dominant culture is studied by exploring the world of deaf people who have for the past twenty years begun to speak as a cultural group. Issues of language, communication, self-representation, and social structure are examined. Prerequisites: COMM 10 and two from COMM 100A, 100B, 100C.

EDS 125. History, Politics, and Theory of Bilingual Education (4)
This course provides a historical overview and models of bilingual education in the United States. Students will examine socio-cultural, theoretical, and policy issues associated with native language and second-language instruction, and legal requirements for public bilingual program.

EDS 126. Social Organization of Education (4)
(Same as SOCI 126) The social organization of education in the U.S. and other societies; the functions of education for individuals and society; the structure of schools; educational decision making; educational testing; socialization and education; formal and informal education; cultural transmission. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

EDS 128 A-B. Introduction to Teaching and Learning (Elementary) (4-4)
This course series is for undergraduates who are exploring a career in elementary school teaching. Topics addressed include: theories of teaching and learning; research on cognition and motivation; and the cultural context of classroom teaching and learning. EDS 128A focuses on the learner in the teaching-learning interaction and EDS 128B focuses on the teacher in the teaching-learning interaction. Prerequisites: department stamp required; EDS 139 must be taken as corequisite. EDS 130 or 134 must be completed before EDS 128A, and 128A for 128B. EDS 128A and EDS 128B are restricted for students applying to the EDS MEd/Multiple Subject Credential Program.

EDS 129 A-B-C. Introduction to Teaching and Learning (Secondary) (4-4-4)
This course series is for undergraduates who are exploring a career in teaching secondary school. Topics addressed include: theories of teaching and learning processes and motivation for science, mathematics, and English instruction. EDS 129A focuses on the analysis of the needs of individual learners and small group instruction techniques; EDS 129B emphasizes the various roles of the classroom teacher and planning individual lessons; and EDS 129C emphasizes the assessment of student work and longer-range curriculum planning. Prerequisites: department stamp; EDS 139 must be taken as corequisite. Must have successfully completed EDS 136, 138, or 129A for 129B, and 129B for 129C. EDS 129B and 129C are restricted for students applying to the EDS MEd/Single Subject Credential Program.

EDS 130. Introduction to Academic Mentoring of Elementary/School Students (4)
This course focuses on the role of undergraduate mentors in raising academic expectations for students and families traditionally underrepresented at the university. The relationship between the school and community, the social and political organization of elementary schools, and the academic achievement of elementary children are examined. Prerequisites: department stamp required; EDS 139 must be taken as a corequisite.

EDS 131. Early Childhood Development and Education (4)
This course investigates early child development (birth through eight years) and education and the role of high quality early education on reducing inequities among diverse populations. Field experience and seminar focus on applying research and theory to experiences in early childhood classrooms (P–3). Prerequisites: department approval. Students will need to fill out a placement form prior to getting approval to enroll in EDS 131. This form provides the course instructor with information to make the appropriate field placement; EDS 139 must be taken as a corequisite.

EDS 132. Hands-On Seminar (4)
The “Hands-On Lab” enables UC San Diego students to practice inquiry-based instructional strategies with elementary or high school students in authentic laboratory situations supervised be EDS faculty members. The hands-on lessons provide early teaching experience in science for undergraduates exploring teaching as a career. All lessons are based on the California content standards in science. Recommended preparation: knowledge of STEM field subject matter. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

EDS 136. Introduction to Academic Tutoring of Secondary School Students (4)
This course focuses on the role of undergraduate tutors in building academic resiliency in secondary students traditionally underrepresented at the university. The relationship between the school and community, the social and political organization of secondary schools, the philosophical, sociological, and political issues which relate to the US secondary educational system, and the academic achievement of secondary children are examined. Prerequisites: department stamp required; EDS 139 must be taken as a corequisite.

EDS 137. Introduction to Discipline-Specific Teaching and Learning (4)
This course examines effective practices for teaching and learning in specific academic content areas in PreK–12 school or community settings. The field experience and seminar focus on relationship building between mentors and learners, discipline-relevant teaching and learning processes, and community service. Prerequisites: EDS 139 must be taken as a corequisite; department stamp required.

EDS 138. Introduction to Academic Tutoring at Charter Schools (4)
This course focuses on effects of the Charter School movement on public education in the U.S., the role of the research universities in K–12 education, the social and political organization of the schools, the philosophical, sociological, and political issues which relate to the US secondary educational system, and the academic achievement of secondary children. Students investigate the role of undergraduate tutors in building academic resiliency in secondary students traditionally underrepresented at the university. Prerequisites: department stamp required; EDS 139 must be taken as a corequisite.

EDS 139. Practicum in Teaching and Learning (2)
Students are placed in local schools and work with students in classrooms and the community. Students work on educational activities with K–12 students a minimum of four hours/week. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit six times. Corequisites: One of the following courses must be taken concurrently: EDS 128A-B, or 129A-B-C, 130, 131, 136, 137, 138 or 140. Prerequisites: department stamp required.

EDS 140. Introduction to Action Research in Pre-K–12 Education (4)
EDS 140 builds on the students’ foundational knowledge about pre-K–12 public education obtained in introductory PAL courses. This course is conducted as a seminar, where students shape their research questions, theoretical frameworks, and data collection methods for the action research projects. In conjunction to their action research projects, EDS 140 students serve as mentors, tutors, and/or interns at local low-income, underserved pre-K–12 public schools and/or community centers. If students wish to continue their service-learning practicum at their host school, they can take EDS 139. Prerequisites: EDS 138 or EDS 137 or EDS 136 or EDS 134 or EDS 131 or EDS 130, department approval. Students will need to fill out a placement form prior to getting approval to enroll in EDS 140. This form provides the course instructor with information regarding student’s prior experiences with PAL, areas/topics of interest; EDS 139 must be taken as a corequisite.

EDS 141. Action Research in Pre-K–12 Education: Advanced Practicum in Pre-K–12 Schools and Communities (4)
Course builds on students’ prior knowledge, experiences, and work from PAL foundations and intermediate courses to prepare them to conduct action research on relevant P–12 education issues. Students in the course will continue serving as tutors/mentors/interns in schools and communities. Students will also learn how to design educational research, carry out research in ethical ways, and analyze data for themes that the schools and communities find important. Prerequisites: EDS 138 or EDS 137 or EDS 136 or EDS 134 or EDS 131 or EDS 130; department approval. Students will need to fill out a placement form prior to getting approval to enroll in EDS 140. This form provides the course instructor with information regarding student’s prior experiences with PAL, areas/topics of interest; EDS 139 must be taken as a corequisite.

EDS 150. Chancellor’s Associates Scholars Program Transfer Introductory Course (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking, organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: Open to Chancellor’s Associates Scholars Program transfer students only.

EDS 190. Research Practicum (1–6)
Supervised research studies with individual topics selected according to students’ special interests. Students will develop a research proposal and begin to gather and analyze data. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

EDS 195. Apprentice Teaching (2–4)
Advanced EDS students are prepared in effective methods of supervising the preparation of UC San Diego students serving as paraprofessionals in K–12 classrooms. Topics covered include: classroom management, interpersonal relations, supervision techniques, multicultural and multilingual education, politics in the school, and curriculum development. Each student serves as a discussion leader and conducts at least two workshops. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department stamp.

EDS 198. Directed Group Study (4–2)
Directed group study, guided reading, and study involving research and analysis of activities and services in multicultural education, bilingual education, the teaching-learning process, and other areas that are not covered by the present curriculum. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

EDS 199. Special Studies (4)
Individual guided reading and study involving research and analysis of activities and services in multicultural education, bilingual education, the teaching-learning process, and other areas that are not covered by the present curriculum. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

EDS 342A. ASL-English Bilingual Education Practices (4)
Students will examine the history, current theory, philosophy, legislation, and trends in deaf education. Methods of first- and second-language development, communication, and literacy skills for deaf and hard-of-hearing children will be introduced. Prerequisites: must be a ED76 major. (F)

EDS 342B. ASL-English Bilingual Education Practices (4)
Students will investigate formal and informal assessment techniques used for deaf and hard-of-hearing children, bilingual/multicultural education practices across the curriculum, effective learning environments and approaches for educating and interacting with families and communities. Prerequisites: EDS 342A, EDS 361A. Must be an ED76 major. Concurrent enrollment in EDS 361B and 369A. (W)

EDS 342C. ASL-English Bilingual Education Practices (4)
Students will continue to investigate formal and informal assessment techniques used for deaf and hard of hearing children, bilingual/multicultural education practices across the curriculum, effective learning environments and approaches for educating and interacting with families and communities. Prerequisites: EDS 342A, EDS 342B, EDS 361A. Must be an ED76 major.

EDS 349. Deaf Education Specialist Student Teaching Practicum (9)
Education specialist credential candidate performs student teaching in participating schools for a minimum of seven weeks full-time under the supervision of a cooperating teacher and university supervisor. The field experience provides professional preparation and diversified teaching responsibilities for post-baccalaureate students pursuing the California Deaf and Hard of Hearing Specialist and BCLAD Credential. Prerequisites: must be an ED76 major, Teaching and Bilingual Education (ASL-English)

EDS 351. Teaching the English Language Learner (4)
Students will examine the principles of second language acquisition and approaches to bilingual education. They will develop a repertoire of strategies for teaching in elementary or secondary content areas. Prerequisites: ED76 or ED78 major: Elementary Multiple Subject or Single Subject candidates at UC San Diego who have advanced to student teaching or internship. (F)

EDS 352A. Bilingual Instructional Practices I (2)
First course in a two-course sequence. Provides a theoretical and practical grounding in various pedagogical techniques for teaching in bilingual settings. Course covers principles of bilingualism and bilingual pedagogy; transfer between primary and target languages as appropriate to the language(s) of emphasis. Candidates study methods for teaching primary and target languages in a variety of program models; curriculum/assessment practices; and approaches for interacting with families/communities. Prerequisites: ED78 major: Elementary Multiple Subject or Single Subject candidates at UC San Diego who have advanced to student teaching or internship. Department approval for all other students required.

EDS 352B. Bilingual Instructional Practices II (2)
Second course in a two-course sequence. Provides a theoretical and practical grounding in various pedagogical techniques for teaching in bilingual settings. Course covers principles of bilingualism and bilingual pedagogy; transfer between primary and target languages as appropriate to the language(s) of emphasis. Candidates study methods for teaching primary and target languages in a variety of program models; curriculum/assessment practices; and approaches for interacting with families/communities. Prerequisites: EDS 352A. ED78 major: Elementary Multiple Subject or Single Subject candidates at UC San Diego who have advanced to student teaching or internship.

EDS 355A. Advanced Mathematics Teaching Practices for Grades K–6 (2)
First course in a three-course sequence. Provides a theoretical and practical grounding in pedagogy and professional factors influencing high-quality elementary mathematics education. Students will review research literature and various content standards, assessment materials, and curriculum materials in preparation for specialized mathematics instruction in elementary classrooms. Prerequisites: admission into the ED78: Multiple Subject (MS-2 program), and concurrent enrollment in EDS 361A or consent of instructor.

EDS 355B. Advanced Mathematics Teaching Practices for Grades K–6 (2)
Second course in the sequence. Provides a theoretical and practical grounding in pedagogy and professional factors influencing high-quality elementary mathematics education. Students will review research literature and various content standards, assessment materials, and curriculum materials in preparation for specialized mathematics instruction in elementary classrooms. Prerequisites: EDS 355A, admission into the ED85: Multiple Subject (MS-2 program), and concurrent enrollment in EDS 361B or consent of instructor.

EDS 355C. Advanced Mathematics Teaching Practices for Grades K–6 (2)
Third course in the series, which provides a theoretical and practical grounding in pedagogy and professional factors influencing high-quality elementary mathematics education. Students will review research literature and various content standards, assessment materials, and curriculum materials in preparation for specialized mathematics instruction in elementary classrooms. Prerequisites: EDS 355B is required prior to EDS 355C. Students must have been admitted to ED85; Multiple Subject (MS-2 program), and concurrent enrollment in EDS 361C or consent of instructor.

EDS 361A. Innovative Instructional Practices I (6)
First course in a three-course sequence. It provides pedagogical methods for multiple-subject teaching. Diverse subject areas (math, science, fine arts, P.E., and social studies) are integrated into a single intercurricular course of study by emphasizing activity/inquiry techniques of instruction. Prerequisites: must be an ED76 major: Teaching and Learning Bilingual Education (ASL-English) or ED78 major only for Elementary Multiple Subject candidate who has advanced to student teaching. (F)

EDS 361B. Innovative Instructional Practices II (6)
Second course in three-course sequence. It provides pedagogical methods for multiple subject teaching. Diverse subject areas (language arts, English language development, health education, mathematics, sciences, social studies, fine arts, and physical education) are integrated into a single intercurricular course of study by emphasizing activity/inquiry techniques of instructions. Prerequisites: EDS 361A, ED76 major: Teaching and Learning Bilingual Education (ASL-English) or ED78 major only for Elementary Multiple Subject candidate who has advanced to student teaching.

EDS 361C. Innovative Instructional Practices III (4)
Last course in a three-course sequence. It provides pedagogical methods for multiple subject teaching. General teaching methods are integrated into a single intercurricular course of study by emphasizing activity/inquiry techniques of instruction. Prerequisites: EDS 361B, ED76 major: Teaching and Learning Bilingual Education (ASL-English) or ED78 major only for Elementary Multiple Subject candidate who has advanced to student teaching.

EDS 369A. Multiple Subject (Elementary) Student Teaching Practicum-I (9)
First course in a series. The elementary credential candidate performs student teaching in participating schools for seven to eight weeks full-time for each course (fifteen weeks total) under the supervision of a cooperating teacher and university supervisor. The student teaching experience offers professional preparation and diversified teaching responsibilities for post-baccalaureate students pursuing the California Multiple Subject Teaching Credential. Prerequisites: ED78 major for Elementary Multiple Subjects only. Affirmed Multiple Subject Credential candidate at UC San Diego who has advanced to student teaching.

EDS 369B. Multiple Subject (Elementary) Student Teaching Practicum-II (9)
Second course in a two-course series. The elementary credential candidate performs student teaching in participating schools for seven to eight weeks full-time for each course (fifteen weeks total) under the supervision of a cooperating teacher and university supervisor. The student teaching experience offers professional preparation and diversified teaching responsibilities for post-baccalaureate students pursuing the California Multiple Subject Teaching Credential. Prerequisites: EDS 369A, ED78 major for Elementary Multiple Subjects only. Affirmed Multiple Subject Credential candidate at UC San Diego who has advanced to student teaching.

EDS 372. World Language Teaching Practices (4)
Proficiency-oriented language teaching techniques, including project-based and communicative approaches, developing student knowledge and appreciation of the cultures and societies in which the target language is spoken, the use of technology to support instruction aligned to the California academic content standards.

EDS 373. Secondary English Teaching Practices (4)
The course introduces prospective secondary teachers to principles and strategies of teaching English language arts. Topics include: writing processes, reading processes, integrated language arts, assessment, the second language learner, the classroom community, the California English Language Arts Framework. Prerequisites: ED78 Single Subject major only. Affirmed Single Subject candidate at UC San Diego who has advanced to internship or consent of instructor.

EDS 374. Secondary Mathematics Teaching Practices (4)
Mathematics teaching techniques, including curriculum design, California Model Curriculum Standards, instructional methods, computer applications, selection and use of textbooks, student assessment, lesson planning, and classroom organization. Professional matters including curriculum planning, professional organizations, para-professionals, professional ethics, education law, and parent involvement are addressed. Prerequisites: ED78 Single Subject major only. Affirmed Single Subject candidate at UC San Diego who has advanced to internship or consent of instructor.

EDS 375. Secondary Science Teaching Practices (4)
Science teaching techniques, including science curriculum design, California Model Curriculum Standards, instructional methods, computer applications, selection and use of textbooks, student assessment, lesson planning, and classroom organization. Professional matters including curriculum planning, professional organizations, paraprofessionals, professional ethics, education law, and parent involvement are addressed. Prerequisites: ED78 Single Subject major only. Affirmed Single Subject candidate at UC San Diego who has advanced to internship or consent of instructor.

EDS 376. Language and Learning Instruction (4)
This course satisfies the California Commission on Teacher Credentialing requirement for preparation in reading theory and methods for all credential candidates. Theories of reading development, integration of the language arts, reading and writing in the content areas, teaching methods, and literature. Prerequisites: ED78 Elementary Multiple Subject or Single Subject candidates at UC San Diego who have advanced to student teaching or internship.

EDS 379A. Single Subject (Secondary) Internship Practicum I (8)
The secondary credential candidate teaches approximately one academic quarter for each course in this series (one public school academic year) under the guidance of a university supervisor with additional support provided by an on-site teacher. The internship offers extensive professional preparation and diversified teaching experience under actual classroom conditions for post-baccalaureate students pursuing the California Single Subject Teaching Credential. Prerequisites: ED78 Single Subject major only. Affirmed Single Subject candidate at UC San Diego who has advanced to internship or consent of instructor.

EDS 379B. Single Subject (Secondary) Internship Practicum II (8)
Second course in the series. The secondary credential candidate teaches approximately one academic quarter for each course in this series (one public school academic year) under the guidance of a university supervisor with additional support provided by an on-site teacher. The internship offers extensive professional preparation and diversified teaching experience under actual classroom conditions for post-baccalaureate students pursuing the California Single Subject Teaching Credential. Prerequisites: EDS 379A. ED78 Single Subject major only. Affirmed Single Subject candidate at UC San Diego who has advanced to internship.

EDS 379C. Single Subject (Secondary) Internship Practicum III (8)
Third course in the series. The secondary credential candidate teaches approximately one academic quarter for each course in this series (one public school academic year) under the guidance of a university supervisor with additional support provided by an on-site teacher. The internship offers extensive professional preparation and diversified teaching experience under actual classroom conditions for post-baccalaureate students pursuing the California Single Subject Teaching Credential. Prerequisites: EDS 379B. ED78 Single Subject major only. Affirmed Single Subject candidate at UC San Diego who has advanced to internship.

EDS 381. Health Education (4)
This course satisfies the Commission on Teacher Credentialing requirement for Health Education. Topics include: physical education, substance abuse, sex education, cardio-pulmonary resuscitation, nutrition, and first aid. Prerequisites: ED78 major: Elementary Multiple Subject or Single Subject candidates at UC San Diego who have advanced to student teaching or internship.

EDS 382. Inclusive Educational Practices (4)
This course satisfies the Commission on Teacher Credentialing requirements for Special Education. Topics include: teaching methods for accommodating special-needs students in the regular classroom, developing an Individual Education Plan, characteristics of special-needs students, lesson planning to accommodate individual differences, and legislated mandates. Prerequisites: ED78 or ED81 major: Elementary Multiple Subject or Single Subject candidates at UC San Diego who have advanced to student teaching or internship and department stamp required.

EDS 385. Elementary School Mathematics Content and Pedagogy (4)
Examines the underlying mathematical concepts of the elementary school mathematics curriculum and related pedagogical implications for teaching. Topics include number concepts, algebraic thinking, geometry, and data collection and analysis. Prerequisites: students must be ED78 majors: MEd/Elementary-Multiple Subject Credential candidates who have advanced to student teaching or internship. (MS-2).

SOCG 270. The Sociology of Education (4)
A consideration of the major theories of schooling and society, including functionalist, conflict, critical, and interactional; selected topics in the sociology of education will be addressed in a given quarter, including: the debate over inequality, social selection, cultural reproduction and the transition of knowledge, the cognitive and economic consequences of education. Major research methods will be discussed and critiqued.

EDS 201. Introduction to Resources for Teaching and Learning (4)
This course introduces students to educational resources, both in print and online. Students compile and evaluate research studies, curricular materials, and instructional approaches in preparation for future projects in developing and evaluating various approaches to teaching and learning. Prerequisites: students must be registered EDS graduate students (ED 76, 77, 78, 79, 80).

EDS 203. Technology, Teaching, and Learning (4)
This course will review current literature on effective applications of technology in the classroom. Students will also become fluent in the use of productivity tools, presentation software, and web development for teaching and learning; critique software relevant to their area of teaching; and develop an educational activity based on their review of the literature that harnesses the power of technology. Prerequisites: students must be registered EDS graduate students (ED 76, 77, 78, 79, 80).

EDS 204. Technology and Professional Assessment (4)
Advanced techniques for using network-based resources for teaching and learning will be introduced. Students will review relevant research on advanced technologies related to assessment of professional performance and student achievement. Students will present a web-based professional Teaching Performance Assessment Portfolio that reflects teaching performance during their student teaching or internship field experience. Prerequisites: students must be registered EDS graduate students.

EDS 205A. Reflective Teaching Practice (2)
This course introduces principles and practices of reflective teaching. Student teachers and interns will systematically document their practice teaching and analyze observation data to improve performance. Students will collaborate with supervisors and expert teachers throughout the yearlong preservice teaching experience. Prerequisites: students must be registered EDS graduate students.

EDS 205B. Reflective Teaching Practice (2)
This course introduces principles and practices of reflective teaching. Student teachers and interns will systematically document their practice teaching and analyze observation data to improve performance. Students will collaborate with supervisors and expert teachers throughout the yearlong preservice teaching experience. Prerequisites: EDS 205A, and students must be registered EDS graduate students.

EDS 206. Teaching Performance Assessment Portfolio (4)
This course introduces the use of a Teaching Performance Assessment Portfolio for assessment of teaching performance. Student teachers and interns will design an electronic portfolio that demonstrates acceptable performance on essential credential standards. National Board of Professional Teaching Standards will also be introduced. Prerequisites: students must be registered EDS graduate students.

EDS 229. Introduction to Educational Resources (4)
This course prepares K–12 teacher-researchers to design, implement, and evaluate classroom research. Students learn how to access and evaluate research studies, curricular materials, and instructional approaches both on-line and in print. Prerequisites: students must be registered ED75 majors.

EDS 230A-B-C. Research in Curriculum Design (4-4-4)
A yearlong course sequence, which provides an extensive overview of curriculum, design principles appropriate for K–12 instruction. Consensus and model building methods will be discussed using case studies of curriculum research and development projects appropriate for various subject areas and grade levels. Participants will design, implement, and evaluate a curriculum project in their own classrooms. Prerequisites: must be ED75 major or consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

EDS 231. Advanced Topics in Instructional Practices (4)
Selected advanced topics in K–12 instructional practices in various subject areas. Techniques for teaching higher-level cognitive processes and advanced applications of computers and other technology will be stressed. Participants will conduct a field study of promising teaching practices appropriate to their grade level(s) and subject area(s) of instruction. Prerequisites: must be ED75 major or consent of instructor. (Su)

EDS 232. Special Topics in Education (4)
This course explores topical issues in education. It focuses on recent developments that have broad implications for research and practice in teaching and learning. Course topics will vary each time the course is offered. Prerequisites: ED75 major or consent of instructor.

EDS 233A. Topics in Education Research and Design (2)
Current topics and issues in education and educational research methodology, including action research, participant observation, ethnography, and survey research. This is the first in a two-course series. Prerequisites: ED79 major or consent of instructor.

EDS 233B. Topics in Education Research and Design (2)
Current topics and issues in education and educational research methodology, including action research, participant observation, ethnography, and survey research. This is the second in a two-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 233A: ED79 major or consent of instructor.

EDS 240A. Research in ASL-English Bilingual Education (4)
A three-course sequence in which participants conduct an overview of research and design and conduct a study related to bilingual, bicultural education for deaf children. Prerequisites: ED76 major: Teaching and Learning Bilingual Education (ASL-English) or consent of instructor.

EDS 240B. Research in ASL-English Bilingual Education (4)
A three-course sequence in which participants conduct an overview of research and design and conduct a study related to bilingual, bicultural education for deaf children. Prerequisites: EDS 240A, and ED76 major: Teaching and Learning Bilingual Education (ASL-English) or consent of instructor.

EDS 240C. Research in ASL-English Bilingual Education (4)
A three-course sequence in which participants conduct an overview of research and design and conduct a study related to bilingual, bicultural education for deaf children. Prerequisites: EDS 240A/EDS 240B, and ED76 major: Teaching and Learning Bilingual Education (ASL-English) or consent of instructor.

EDS 250. Equitable Educational Research and Practice (4)
This course introduces students to research studies and educational practices of educational equity, both in general and within specific content areas. Research studies relevant to educational equity will be examined, as will practices that have attempted to enable all students to achieve to the best of their abilities. Prerequisites: students must be registered EDS graduate students.

EDS 253. Transforming Educational Systems and Policy (4)
This course exposes students to past and present systemic policies that influence the practices and efficiency of the P–20 system. Students will explore the barriers and facilitators of successful policy interventions at the local, state, and federal levels of education policy. Attention is given to each segment of the educational continuum, exposing students to strategies for transforming the educational system to ensure equitable opportunities to learn and achieve. Prerequisites: ED82 major or consent of instructor.

EDS 260A. Educational Research and Evaluation Design (4)
This course integrates a variety of social and behavioral science perspectives and research methodologies in examining topics of central relevance to education. Students have opportunities to design and apply to educational-research questions a variety of methodologies, including survey, interview, ethnographic, case study, video data analysis, and discourse analysis methods. This is the first of a three-course series. Prerequisites: admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 260B. Educational Research and Evaluation Design (4)
This course integrates a variety of social and behavioral science perspectives and research methodologies in examining topics of central relevance to education. Students have opportunities to design and apply to educational-research questions a variety of methodologies, including survey, interview, ethnographic, case study, video data analysis, and discourse analysis methods. This is the second of a three-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 260A, and admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 260C. Educational Research and Evaluation Design (4)
This course integrates a variety of social and behavioral science perspectives and research methodologies in examining topics of central relevance to education. Students have opportunities to design and apply to educational research questions a variety of methodologies, including survey, interview, ethnographic, case study, video data analysis, and discourse analysis methods. This is the third of a three-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 260B, and admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 261A. Advanced Research and Evaluation Methods (4)
This course addresses more advanced topics in research design and methodology. Students hone the requisite research skills to conduct dissertation research. Students gain varied hands-on experiences in collecting and analyzing data relevant to schooling, as well as learn how to develop, manage, and analyze large data files. Students create a research agenda and develop skills needed in proposal writing: development, organization and coherence, conceptualization of research design, and attention to audience and writing style. This is the first of a three-course series. Prerequisites: admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 261B. Advanced Research and Evaluation Methods (4)
This course addresses more advanced topics in research design and methodology. Students hone the requisite research skills to conduct dissertation research. Students gain varied hands-on experiences in collecting and analyzing data relevant to schooling, as well as learn how to develop, manage, and analyze large data files. Students create a research agenda and develop skills needed in proposal writing: development, organization and coherence, conceptualization of research design, and attention to audience and writing style. This is the second of a three-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 261A, and admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 261C. Advanced Research and Evaluation Methods (4)
This course addresses more advanced topics in research design and methodology. Students hone the requisite research skills to conduct dissertation research. Students gain varied hands-on experiences in collecting and analyzing data relevant to schooling, as well as learn how to develop, manage, and analyze large data files. Students create a research agenda and develop skills needed in proposal writing: development, organization and coherence, conceptualization of research design, and attention to audience and writing style. This is the third of a three-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 261B, and admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 262A. Dissertation Writing Seminar (4)
This seminar provides an opportunity for doctoral candidates to present and critique in-progress dissertation research and writing. Topics addressed will also include writing for professional publications and presenting research findings to varied audiences. This is the first of a three-course series. Prerequisites: admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 262B. Dissertation Writing Seminar (4)
This seminar provides an opportunity for doctoral candidates to present and critique in-progress dissertation research and writing. Topics addressed will also include writing for professional publications and presenting research findings to varied audiences. This is the second of a three-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 262A, and admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 262C. Dissertation Writing Seminar (4)
This seminar provides an opportunity for doctoral candidates to present and critique in-progress dissertation research and writing. Topics addressed will also include writing for professional publications and presenting research findings to varied audiences. This is the third of a three-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 262B, and admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 263. Developmental Theory and Culture (4)
This seminar will examine basic approaches to the study of human development, drawing on theory, research, and methods from multiple disciplines to study how children and adults develop within the context of cultural communities. It includes discussion of cultural practices as mediators on developmental outcomes, notions of universals and diversity, and individualism and familism. We will discuss the complex ways that individual and sociocultural factors interact in learning and development.

EDS 264. Introduction to Qualitative Analysis (4)
This course provides an introduction to qualitative approaches in education research. Students explore various qualitative methods and analytic strategies and gain hands-on experiences analyzing qualitative data collected on topics relevant to the study of education. The assigned readings include scholarship on the philosophical underpinnings and practice of qualitative research and varied examples of published qualitative research studies. Prerequisites: ED82 major or consent of instructor.

EDS 265. Special Topics in Qualitative Methods (4)
This course series addresses special topics in education research and data analysis. Students explore a faculty-specified qualitative research method and analytic approach. Approaches may include case studies, video analysis, mixed methods, naturalistic observations, ethnography, and netnography. The assigned readings include scholarship on the practice and philosophical underpinnings of the specified qualitative research approach and examples of published qualitative studies. Prerequisites: ED82 major or consent of instructor.

EDS 270. Leadership and Equity in Educational Reform (4)
This course provides a framework for understanding school reform movements that integrates relevant theory and research from a number of academic disciplines. Prerequisites: admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 272. Education and Culture (4)
This course examines schooling from an anthropological perspective, focusing on the impact of social and cultural forces on teaching and learning in US public schools using comparative materials from other societies and settings. Prerequisites: admission into the EdD program or consent of instructor.

EDS 278/COGR 278. Talking Culture, Culture Talking: Voices of Diversity (4)
This course explores the discourse of culture in American society and the problem of “silenced” or unheard voices. The interaction of individual and collective voice, language, and identity are discussed as they bear on the ways that culture moves through important social institutions such as schools. Of particular interest are issues of teaching, learning, displacement, inclusion, marginality, and the “speaking center.” Prerequisites: graduate status or consent of instructor.

EDS 280. Rethinking Leadership (4)
This course will present the evolution of leadership thought and theory, with an emphasis on the distinction between, and interrelatedness of, effective management and leadership. The ethics of leadership practice and epistemological perspectives of emerging leadership styles will be explored, and students will have opportunities to reflect on the nature of leadership as it is practiced in educational settings. Applying critical, self-reflective leadership practice through structured activities is also an element of this course.

EDS 281. Leadership for Learning (4)
This course will explore various models of curriculum and instruction in response to students’ learning needs. It also will examine models of school organization and the leader’s role and responsibility in developing a school culture that promotes student achievement, using evidence-based decision making. A major emphasis will be on evaluating research on which theories and practice are based. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status (ED81).

EDS 282. Leadership for a Diverse Society (4)
This course will address theories and practices for achieving schools and classrooms that are informed by and built around the participation of diverse communities and cultures. The emphasis is on how leadership intersects with sociohistorical and sociocultural theories that suggest that the organization of schools and instruction is critical to student inclusion and outcomes. A basic premise of this course is that a socially just learning theory begins with using all of the resources and knowledge of families, communities, and cultures in formulating policy and practice. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status.

EDS 283. Leadership for Organizational Change (4)
This course will present multiple theories of organizational change, explore group processes and identify models of decision making, and analyze human motivation theories. Establishing and nurturing a purpose-driven organization, while dealing with competing demands, will be discussed. A major emphasis in this course is on people as agents of change and on the creation of high-quality ethical and productive workplaces where employees can achieve success and satisfaction, while advancing the mission of the educational organization. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 284. Leadership for Organizational Development (4)
This course will investigate the skills and dispositions needed for students to lead the development of learning organizations. Faculty will teach and model concepts of working with people within educational organizations and programs. Emphasis will be placed on individual’s team development and facilitation, organizational communications, adult learning, and professional development. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 285. Leadership for the Future (4)
This course addresses interdisciplinary influences on leadership practice within learning organizations. Contributions from scholars in futures’ studies, including those influenced by modernism and postmodernism, will be used to explore topics such as long-range planning, demographic trends, technology, and brain theory. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 286. Advanced Topics in Leadership (4)
This course explores topical issues in the field of leadership. It focuses on recent developments that have broad implications for research and practice in educational leadership. Course topics will vary each time the course is offered. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status.

EDS 287A. Educational Research and Evaluation Design (4)
This course integrates a variety of social and behavioral science perspectives and research methodologies in examining topics of central relevance to education. Students have opportunities to design and apply to educational-research questions a variety of methodologies, including experimental and quasi-experimental survey, interview, ethnographic, case study, video data analysis, and discourse analysis methods. This is the first in a three-course sequence. Prerequisites: EDS education doctorate student or consent of instructor.

EDS 287B. Educational Research and Evaluation Design (4)
This course integrates a variety of social and behavioral science perspectives and research methodologies in examining topics of central relevance to education. Students have opportunities to design and apply to educational-research questions a variety of methodologies, including experimental and quasi-experimental survey, interview, ethnographic, case study, video data analysis, and discourse analysis methods. Prerequisites: EDS 287A, and EDS education doctorate student or consent of instructor.

EDS 287C. Educational Research and Evaluation Design (4)
This course integrates a variety of social and behavioral science perspectives and research methodologies in examining topics of central relevance to education. Students have opportunities to design and apply to educational-research questions a variety of methodologies, including experimental and quasi-experimental survey, interview, ethnographic, case study, video data analysis, and discourse analysis methods. Prerequisites: EDS 287B, and EDS education doctorate student or consent of instructor.

EDS 288A. Advanced Research and Evaluation Methods—Data and Introduction to Inferential Statistics (4)
This first course in a three-course series focuses on the importance of data interpretation. Students hone the requisite research skills to conduct dissertation research as it pertains to gathering, collecting, analyzing, and reporting data in a meaningful way. This course provides an overview of data use in educational systems as well as an introduction to survey design and inferential statistics. Students create a research agenda to develop skills needed in proposal writing. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 288B. Advanced Research and Evaluation Methods (4)
Second course in a three-course series. Focuses on student’s skill development in qualitative research with emphasis on designing qualitative studies with a strong focus on case study method and second level statistics.  Students will learn and practice a variety of qualitative data collection approaches such as observing, interview, and documenting analysis.  In addition, students will develop competence in evaluation using Appreciative Inquiry and active research tools that can assist organizations (schools, districts) in evaluating programs. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 288C. Advanced Research and Evaluation Methods (4)
A continuation of 288B, this course focuses on analyzing data. Students will deepen knowledge and skill on data collection and analysis and using data to prepare and report findings. Students will have an opportunity to use the qualitative data software program N-Vivo to code and sort data. In collaborative groups, students will also explore other research methods of their choosing and will develop and conduct a small pilot study relevant to dissertation topics. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 289A. Dissertation Writing Seminar (4)
This seminar provides an opportunity for doctoral candidates to present and critique in-progress dissertation research and writing. Topics addressed will also include writing for professional publications and presenting research findings to varied audiences. This is the first in a four-course series. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 289B. Dissertation Writing Seminar (4)
This seminar provides an opportunity for doctoral candidates to present and critique in-progress dissertation research and writing. Topics addressed will also include writing for professional publications and presenting research findings to varied audiences. This is the second in a four-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 289A, and Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 289C. Dissertation Writing Seminar (4)
This seminar provides an opportunity for doctoral candidates to present and critique in-progress dissertation research and writing. Topics addressed will also include writing for professional publications and presenting research findings to varied audiences. This is the third in a four-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 289B, and Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 289D. Dissertation Writing Seminar (4)
This seminar provides an opportunity for doctoral candidates to present and critique in-progress dissertation research and writing. Topics addressed will also include writing for professional publications and presenting research findings to varied audiences. This is the fourth course in a four-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 289C, and Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 290. Research Practicum (1–12)
Supervised research studies with individual topics selected according to students’ special interests. Students will develop a research proposal appropriate for MA thesis, begin to gather and analyze data. Prerequisites: MA candidate and consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.)

EDS 291A. Leadership Research Practicum (2)
Students use their placements in local schools and educational settings to examine leadership research and practice topics raised in the Leadership core courses and Research and Evaluation Design/Methods courses. This is the first in a three-course series. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 291B. Leadership Research Practicum (2)
Students use their placements in local schools and educational settings to examine leadership research and practice topics raised in the Leadership core courses and Research and Evaluation Design/Methods courses. This is the second course in a three-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 291A, and Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status.

EDS 292. Qualifying Paper Preparation (2)
This course will provide students with time, resources, and guidance for the purpose of developing a review of literature on a student-related topic, which typically becomes the focus of the dissertation research project. Students will be expected to use a variety of research tools in order to discover and identify relevant information. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status. (S/U grade permitted)

EDS 293A. Advanced Leadership Research Practicum (2)
Students use their placements in local schools and educational settings to examine leadership research and practice topics raised in the Leadership core courses and Research and Evaluation Design/Methods courses. This is the first course in a three-course series. Prerequisites: Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 293B. Advanced Leadership Research Practicum (2)
Students use their placements in local schools and educational settings to examine leadership research and practice topics raised in the Leadership core courses and Research and Evaluation Design/Methods courses. This is the second course in a three-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 293A, and Joint EdD in Educational Leadership student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 294A. Colloquium on Educational Leadership (2)
Program faculty and visiting lecturers present leadership research in progress. Serves as a forum to discuss current research in educational leadership. This is the first course of a two-course series. Prerequisites: graduate student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 294B. Colloquium on Educational Leadership (2)
Program faculty and visiting lecturers present leadership research in progress. Serves as a forum to discuss current research in educational leadership. This is the second course in a two-course series. Prerequisites: EDS 294A, and graduate student status or consent of instructor.

EDS 295. MA Thesis (1–8)
Research for the master’s thesis (Educational Research) or curriculum design portfolio thesis (Curriculum Design). Open for repeated registration up to eight units (S/U grade only). Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

EDS 296. Research Apprenticeship Course (2–4)
The RAC will introduce students to transformational research and practice in education through involvement in faculty-led research teams. The RAC will provide a structured environment for mentoring through engagement in collaborative research activities. Each RAC will conceptualize and conduct research that is likely to result in student presentations at educational conferences and in student publications. The RAC also provides support for the analysis and write-up of dissertation research. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit eighteen times for a maximum of thirty-eight units. Prerequisites: ED82 major or consent of instructor.

EDS 297. Directed Group Study (1–6)
Study and analysis of specific topics under the guidance of a faculty member. Offered for repeated registration. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

EDS 298. Independent Study (1–6)
Individual guided study and/or independent research in an area not covered by present course offerings. Offered for repeated registration. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

EDS 299. Dissertation Research (1–12)
Directed research on dissertation topic for students who have been admitted to candidacy for the EdD degree. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: admission into the EdD program.

ENG 1. Orientation to Engineering I (1)
ENG 1, offered in the fall quarter, focuses on study skills, academic planning, time management, and the use of campus and community resources to help achieve academic, personal, and professional goals. It also presents engineering both as a field of study and as a profession. Activities include presentations by student organization officers and various UC San Diego organizations. Students may not receive credit for both ENG 1 and ECE 1A.

ENG 2. Orientation to Engineering II (1)
ENG 2, offered in the winter quarter, focuses on academic and personal planning, business etiquette, resume development and review, time management, and presentation skills. Activities include panel presentations with practicing professionals from industry. Students may not receive credit for both ENG 2 and ECE 1B.

ENG 3. Orientation to Engineering III (1)
ENG 3, offered in the spring quarter, focuses on leadership, engineering as a profession, personal and professional development, ethics, preparation for graduate school, resume development, and job offer evaluation. Activities include presentations by UC San Diego staff and panel discussions with practicing professionals from industry. Students may not receive credit for both ENG 3 and ECE 1C.

ENG 100A. Team Engineering (2)
Introduction to theory and practice of team engineering, including temperament and work styles; stages of team development; project management; communication, problem solving, and conflict resolution skills; creativity; leadership; social entrepreneurship; and ethics. Students may not receive credit for both ENG 100 and ENG 100A. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in or completion of one of the following: DOC 2, CAT 2, HUM 2, MMW 2, MCWP 50, or WCWP 10B, or consent of instructor.

ENG 100B. Engineering Leadership (2)
Engineering leadership attitudes, styles, principles, and approaches; stages of product development and evolution; strategic and critical thinking and problem solving for engineering projects; resource management; quality control; risk analysis and risk taking; engineering business economics, law, leadership and corporate ethics. Contact gordoncenter@ucsd.edu if you are unable to enroll in the course. Prerequisites: ENG 100A, or ENG 100, or consent of the instructor.

ENG 100C. Technical Writing/Communication for Engineers and Scientist (2)
ENG 100C focuses on principles and procedures of technical writing and professional communication. The course is ideal for students pursuing careers in science and/or engineering and covers organizing information, writing for technical forms such as proposals and abstracts, and designing visual aids.

ENG 100D. Design for Development (4)
An introduction to the practice of design and team engineering within a humanitarian context. Includes a group project designing a solution for a local or global nonprofit organization. Topics include: design process, contextual listening, project management, needs and capacity assessment, stakeholder analysis, ethical issues, models of leadership, gender and cultural issues, sustainable community development, and social entrepreneurship. ENG 100D is the gateway course for the Global TIES humanitarian engineering program, but is open to all undergraduate students. Please go to http://globalties.ucsd.edu for information about Global TIES. Recommended Preparation: one university-level mathematics course. Prerequisites: CAT 2 or DOC 2 or HUM 2 or MCWP 40 or MMW 2 or WCWP 10B.

ENG 100L. Design for Development Lab (2)
Faculty-directed, multidisciplinary, long-term humanitarian engineering and technology projects. Students work in design teams to design and develop solutions to real-world problems experienced by nonprofit organizations and the communities they serve. ENG 100L is the laboratory course for the Global TIES program. Enrollment in this course is limited to students who have applied to and been accepted into the Global TIES program. Please go to http://globalties.ucsd.edu to apply to the program. May be taken for credit six times.  Prerequisites: ENG 100 or ENG 100A, or ENG 100D. Department approval required.

ENG 201. Venture Mechanics (4)
Examines the engineering/entrepreneurism interface. Discovery, development, and implementation of new product ideas. Understanding markets, competitors, and selling innovations. Cultivating effective working relationships between research, engineering, manufacturing, and marketing elements of an organization. Priority enrollment given to engineering majors.

ENG 202. Enterprise Dynamics (4)
Case studies of start-ups, strategic technology management, practice in use of industrial decision-making tools, and speakers from successful firms combined with experience in making management decisions dynamically in a competitive computer-simulated enterprise. Field study of ongoing processes in a local high technology company. Priority enrollment given to engineering majors.

ENG 203. Applied Innovations (4)
Course includes the examination of business plans developed by early stage technology businesses. Students expected to work on the development of business plans for real, innovative business organizations. Will explore all of the business research and analysis that needs to be undertaken in order to develop a complete business plan. Completion of ENG 201 or ENG 202 preferred.

ENG 207. Corporate Entrepreneurship for Global Competitiveness (4)
Explore corporate entrepreneurship and innovation process using the medical device industry as a case example. This highly dynamic industry segment provides an approachable model to analyze corporate strategies and behaviors that affect overall competitiveness. Prerequisites: ENG 201, ENG 202, ENG 203, or consent of the instructor.

ENG 210. Systems Engineering  (4)
This course examines the complexity of integrating components of product engineering, marketing and client requirements into a single engineering system. Case studies explore successes and failures in engineered systems and how to detect and avoid potential failures using strong leadership skills, systemic analysis and thinking. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ENG 211. Engineering Leadership in Academia (4)
This course is designed to teach leadership in teaching and learning at the college/university level. Students will learn through readings on engineering leadership, proposal development, ethics, and cognitive science, and thorough practical experience writing and developing course and project development plans. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

BENG 1. Introduction to Bioengineering (2)
An introduction to bioengineering that includes lectures and hands-on laboratory on design projects. The principles of problem definition, engineering inventiveness, team design, prototyping, and testing, as well as information access, engineering standards, communication, ethics, and social responsibility will be emphasized. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: none. (W)

BENG 2. Introductory Computer Programming and Matlab (2)
Introduction to Matlab is designed to give students fluency in Matlab, including popular toolboxes. Consists of interactive lectures with a computer running Matlab for each student. Topics: variables, operations and plotting; visualization and programming; solving equations and curve fitting. Prerequisites: Bioengineering: BioSystems majors only or consent of department. (F)

BENG 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. (F,W,S)

BENG 97. Internship/Field Studies (1–4)
An enrichment program available to a limited number of lower-division undergraduate students, which provides work experience with industry, government offices, and hospitals. The internship is coordinated through UC San Diego’s Academic Internship Program under the supervision of a faculty member and an industrial, government, or hospital employee. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of thirty units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0, and a completed and approved Special Studies form. (F,W,S)

BENG 98. Directed Group Study (1–4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular department curriculum. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of thirty units of undergraduate study at UC San Diego with a UC San Diego GPA of at least 3.0 and consent of a bioengineering faculty member; completed and approved Special Studies form.

BENG 99. Independent Study for Undergraduates (4)
Independent reading or research by arrangement with a bioengineering faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of thirty units of undergraduate study at UC San Diego with a UC San Diego GPA of at least 3.0 and consent of a bioengineering faculty member; completed and approved Special Studies form.

BENG 99H. Independent Study (1)
Independent study or research under direction of a member of the faculty. Prerequisites: student must be of first-year standing and a Regent’s Scholar; approved Special Studies form.

BENG 100. Statistical Reasoning for Bioengineering Applications (4)
General introduction to probability and statistical analysis, applied to bioengineering design. Topics include preliminary data analysis, probabilistic models, experiment design, model fitting, goodness-of-fit analysis, and statistical inference/estimation. Written and software problems are provided for modeling and visualization. Prerequisites: BENG 1, Math 20C or Math 31BH, Math 20D, Math 18, Phys 2A-B-C, or consent of department. (S)

BENG 102. Molecular Components of Living Systems (4)
Introduction to molecular structures. Macromolecules and assemblies-proteins, nucleic acids, and metabolites. Principles of design of simple and complex components of organelles, cells, and tissues. Prerequisites: BENG 120 or consent of department. (S)

BENG 103B. Bioengineering Mass Transfer (4)
Mass transfer in solids, liquids, and gases with application to biological systems. Free and facilitated diffusion. Convective mass transfer. Diffusion-reaction phenomena. Active transport. Biological mass transfer coefficients. Steady and unsteady state. Flux-force relationships. (Credit not allowed for both CENG 101C and BENG 103B.) Prerequisites: CENG 101A or MAE 101A or BENG 112A, or consent of department. (S)

BENG 110. Foundation of Biomechanics (4)
Introduction to mechanics: statics and dynamics, free body diagrams, and bodies in contact. Vectors and tensors; stresses, theory of deformation, and constitutive equations. Equations of motion. Biomechanics design examples. Prerequisites: Math 20D, Math 20E or Math 31CH, Math 20F or Math 31AH; Phys 2C, or consent of department. (F)

BENG 112A. Tissue Biomechanics (4)
Biomechanics of living tissues with emphasis on mechanical properties of major tissues and organs. Foundations of viscoelasticity. Field equations and stress analysis of living tissues. Bioengineering and medical design examples. Prerequisites: BENG 110 or consent of department. (W)

BENG 112B. Fluid and Cell Biomechanics (4)
Foundations of membrane mechanics. Micro- and nano-mechanics of cells and their constituent protein networks. Biomechanics of the circulation, properties of blood, non-Newtonian behavior, dimensionless flow analysis. Applications to cardiovascular diseases. Polymer and statistical mechanics. Engineering design and problem solving.  Prerequisites: BENG 112A or consent of department. (S)

BENG 119A. Design Development in Biomechanics (3)
Development of design project in biomechanics. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 119B. Design Implementation in Biomechanics (3)
Implementation of design project in biomechanics. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 120. Organic Chemistry Structural and Design Principles (4)
Structural and design principles of carbon compounds. Structure and stereochemistry. Functional groups and chemical transformations. Structure and design principles of biomolecules. Molecules of life and their organization. Prerequisites: Chem 6A and 6B or consent of department. (W)

BENG 122A. Biosystems and Control (4)
Systems and control theory applied to bioengineering. Modeling, linearization, transfer functions, Laplace transforms, closed-loop systems, design and simulation of controllers. Dynamic behavior and controls of first and second order processes. PID controllers. Stability. Bode design. Features of biological controls systems. A simulation term project using Matlab and an oral presentation are required. Prerequisites: MAE 140 or consent of department. (F)

BENG 123. Dynamic Simulation in Bioengineering (4)
Dynamic simulation of biochemical reaction networks, including reconstruction of networks, mathematical description of kinetics of biochemical reactions, dynamic simulation of systems of biochemical reactions, and use of simulators for data interpretation and prediction in biology. Emphasis on a design project. Prerequisites: Math 18, Math 20D, BENG 120, or Chem 140B; majors only or consent of department. (W)

BENG 125. Modeling and Computation in Bioengineering (4)
Computational modeling of molecular bioengineering phenomena: excitable cells, regulatory networks, and transport. Application of ordinary, stochastic, and partial differential equations. Introduction to data analysis techniques: power spectra, wavelets, and nonlinear time series analysis. Prerequisites: BENG 122A or BENG 123 or consent of department. (S)

BENG 126A. Design Development in Bioinformatics Bioengineering (3)
Development of design project in bioinformatics bioengineering. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 126B. Design Implementation in Bioinformatics Bioengineering (3)
Implementation of design project in bioinformatics bioengineering. Prerequisites: BENG 126A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 127A. Design Development in Molecular Systems Bioengineering (3)
Development of design project in molecular systems bioengineering. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 127B. Design Implementation in Molecular Systems Bioengineering (3)
Implementation of design project in molecular systems bioengineering. Prerequisites: BENG 127A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 128A. Design Development in Genetic Circuits Bioengineering (3)
Development of design project in genetic circuits bioengineering. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 128B. Design Implementation in Genetic Circuits Bioengineering (3)
Implementation of design project in genetic circuits bioengineering. Prerequisites: BENG 128A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 129A. Design Development in Cell Systems Bioengineering (3)
Development of design project in cell systems bioengineering. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 129B. Design Implementation in Cell Systems Bioengineering (3)
Implementation of design project in cell systems bioengineering. Prerequisites: BENG 129A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 130. Biotechnology Thermodynamics and Kinetics (4)
An introduction to physical principles that govern biological matter and processes, with engineering examples. Thermodynamic principles, structural basis of life, molecular reactions and kinetics, and models to illustrate biological phenomena. Prerequisites: Chem 6B, Math 20A, 20B, 20D, Physics 2A, 2B, 2C; majors only or consent of department. (W)

BENG 133. Numerical Analysis and Computational Engineering (4)
Principles of digital computing, including number representation and arithmetic operations. Accuracy, stability, and convergence. Algorithms for solving linear systems of equations, interpolation, numerical differentiation, and integration and ordinary differential equations. Prerequisites: Math 20D and 20F or consent of department. (S)

BENG 134. Measurements, Statistics, and Probability (4)
A combined lecture and laboratory course that provides an introductory treatment of probability theory, including distribution functions, moments, and random variables. Practical applications include estimation of means and variances, hypothesis testing, sampling theory, and linear regression. Prerequisites: Math 20D and Math 20F or Math 31AH or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 135. Biomedical Signals and Systems (4)
Discrete systems: linearity, convolution, impulse, and step responses. Linear systems properties. Difference equations. Fourier Series. Continuous FS. Discrete FS. Periodic signals, filtering, and FT. Discrete FT examples. Frequency response of linear systems. Sampling. Relationship between FT, DFT. Laplace Transform. LT and inverse LT. Prerequisites: ECE 45 and BENG 133 or consent of department. (F) Not offered until fall 2016.

BENG 139A. Design Development in Molecular Bioengineering (3)
Development of design project in molecular bioengineering. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 139B. Design Implementation in Molecular Bioengineering (3)
Implementation of design project in molecular bioengineering. Prerequisites: BENG 139A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 140A. Bioengineering Physiology (4)
Introductory mammalian physiology for bioengineering students, with emphasis on control mechanisms and engineering principles. Basic cell functions; biological control systems; muscle; neural; endocrine, and circulatory systems. Not intended for premedical bioengineering students. Credit not allowed for both BIPN 100 and BENG 140A. Prerequisites: Chem 6A-B, Physics 2A-B-C, BILD 1, or BENG 102; majors only or consent of department. (W)

BENG 140B. Bioengineering Physiology (4)
Introductory mammalian physiology for bioengineering students, with emphasis on control mechanisms and engineering principles. Digestive, respiratory, renal, and reproductive systems; regulation of metabolism, and defense mechanisms. (Credit not allowed for both BIPN 102 and BENG 140B.) Prerequisites: BENG 140A; majors only or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 141. Biomedical Optics and Imaging (4)
Introduction to optics. Light propagation in tissue. Propagation modeling. Optical components. Laser concepts. Optical coherence tomography. Microscopic scattering. Tissue optics. Microscopy. Confocal microscopy. Polarization in tissue. Absorption, diffuse reflection, light scattering spectroscopy. Raman, fluorescence lifetime imaging. Photo-acoustic imaging. Prerequisites: BENG 100 or consent of department. (F)

BENG 147A. Design Development in Neural Engineering (3)
Development of design project in neural engineering. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 147B. Design Implementation in Neural Engineering (3)
Implementation of design project in neural engineering. Prerequisites: BENG 147A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 148A. Design Development in Cardiac Bioengineering (3)
Development of design project in cardiac bioengineering. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 148B. Design Implementation in Cardiac Bioengineering (3)
Implementation of design project in cardiac bioengineering. Prerequisites: BENG 148A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 149A. Design Development in Vascular Bioengineering (3)
Development of design project in vascular bioengineering. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 149B. Design Implementation in Vascular Bioengineering (3)
Implementation of design project in vascular bioengineering. Prerequisites: BENG 149A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 152. BioSystems Engineering Laboratory (4)
Experimental study of real and simulated systems and their controls (examples will include electrical, biological, and biomechanical systems). Projects consist of identification, input-output analysis, design, and implementation of analog controls. Laboratory examples will include electrical circuit design and analysis, analysis of living tissues such as bone, analysis and manipulation of cells (bacteria in chemostat). Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: BENG 102; Bioengineering: BioSystems majors only or consent of department. (W)

BENG 160. Chemical and Molecular Bioengineering Techniques (4)
Introductory laboratory course in current principles and techniques of chemistry and molecular biology applicable to bioengineering. Quantitation of proteins and nucleic acids by spectrophotometric, immunological, and enzymatic methods. Separations and purification by centrifugation, chromatographic, and electrophoretic methods. Course material fee may apply. Prerequisites: BICD 100, BENG 100, MAE 170; majors only or consent of department. (S)

BENG 161A. Bioreactor Engineering (4)
Engineering, biochemical, and physiological considerations in the design of bioreactor processes: enzyme kinetics, mass transfer limitations, microbial growth, and product formation kinetics. Fermentation reactor selection, design, scale-up, control. Quantitative bioengineering analysis and design of biochemical processes and experiments on biomolecules. Prerequisites: BENG 123 and BENG 160 or consent of department. (F)

BENG 161B. Biochemical Engineering (4)
Commercial production of biochemical commodity products. Application of genetic control systems and mutant populations. Recombinant DNA and eucaryotic proteins in E. coli and other host organisms. Product recovery operations, including the design of bioseparation processes of filtration, adsorption, chromatography, and crystallization. Bioprocess economics. Human recombinant erythropoietin as an example, from genomic cloning to CHO cell expression, to bioreactor manufacturing and purification of medical products for clinical application. Prerequisites: BENG 161A or consent of department. (W)

BENG 162. Biotechnology Laboratory (4)
Laboratory practices and design principles for biotechnology. Culture of microorganisms and mammalian cells, recombinant DNA bioreactor design and operation. Design and implementation of biosensors. A team design-based term project and oral presentation required. Course material fee(s) may apply. Prerequisites: MAE 170 and BENG 160; majors only or consent of department . (F)

BENG 166A. Cell and Tissue Engineering (4)
Engineering analysis of physico-chemical rate processes that affect, limit, and govern the function of cells and tissues. Cell migration, mitosis, apoptosis, and differentiation. Dynamic and structural interactions between mesenchyme and parenchyme. The role of the tissue microenvironment including cell-cell interactions, extracellular matrix, and growth factor communication. The design of functional tissue substitutes including cell and material sourcing, scale-up and manufacturability, efficacy and safety, regulatory, and ethical topics. Clinical Applications. Prerequisites: BENG 103B or BENG 112B; senior standing or consent of department. (F)

BENG 168. Biomolecular Engineering (4)
Basic molecular biology and recombinant DNA technologies. Structure and function of biomolecules that decode genomes and perform energy conversion, enzymatic catalysis, and active transport. Metabolism of macromolecules. Molecular diagnostics. Design, engineering, and manufacture of proteins, genomes, cells, and biomolecular therapies. Prerequisites: BILD 1 and BENG 100, or consent of department. (W)

BENG 169A. Design Development in Tissue Engineering (3)
Development of design project in tissue engineering. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 169B. Design Implementation in Tissue Engineering (3)
Implementation of design project in tissue engineering. Prerequisites: BENG 169A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 172. Bioengineering Laboratory (4)
A laboratory course demonstrating basic concepts of biomechanics, bioengineering design, and experimental procedures involving animal tissue. Sources of error and experimental limitations. Computer data acquisition, modeling, statistical analysis. Experiments on artery, muscle and heart mechanics, action potentials, viscoelasticity, electrocardiography, hemorheology. Course material fee may apply. Prerequisites: MAE 170; junior or senior standing in the major or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 179A. Design Development in Bioinstrumentation (3)
Development of design project in bioinstrumentation. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in BENG 187B; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 179B. Design Implementation in Bioinstrumentation (3)
Implementation of design project in bioinstrumentation. Prerequisites: BENG 179A; concurrent enrollment in BENG 187C; Bioengineering or Bioengineering: Biotechnology majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG/BIMM/CSE 181. Molecular Sequence Analysis (4)
(Cross-listed as BIMM 181 and CSE 181.) This course covers the analysis of nucleic acid and protein sequences, with an emphasis on the application of algorithms to biological problems. Topics include sequence alignments, database searching, comparative genomics, and phylogenetic and clustering analyses. Pairwise alignment, multiple alignment, DNA sequencing, scoring functions, fast database search, comparative genomics, clustering, phylogenetic trees, gene finding/DNA statistics. Prerequisites: CSE 100; CSE 101; BIMM 100 or Chem 114C; Bioinformatics majors only. (W)

BENG/BIMM/CSE/Chem 182. Biological Databases (4)
(Cross-listed as BIMM 182, CSE 182, and Chem 182.) This course provides an introduction to the features of biological data, how those data are organized efficiently in databases, and how existing data resources can be utilized to solve a variety of biological problems. Object oriented databases, data modeling and description. Survey of current biological database with respect to above, implementation of database focused on a biological topic. Prerequisites: CSE 100; Bioinformatics majors only. (S)

BENG 183. Applied Genomic Technologies (4)
Principles and technologies for using genomic information for biomedical applications. Technologies will be introduced progressively, from DNA to RNA to protein to whole cell systems. The integration of biology, chemistry, engineering, and computation will be stressed. Topics include: technology for the genome, DNA chips, RNA technologies, proteomic technologies, physiomic and phenomic technologies, analysis of cell function. Prerequisites: BIMM 100 or Chem 114C and BICD 110, or consent of department. (F)

BENG/BIMM/CSE/Chem 184. Computational Molecular Biology (4)
(Cross-listed as BIMM 184, CSE 184, and Chem 184.) This advanced course covers the application of machine learning and modeling techniques to biological systems. Topics include gene structure, recognition of DNA and protein sequence patterns, classification, and protein structure prediction. Pattern discovery, hidden Markov models/support vector machines/neural network/profiles, protein structure prediction, functional characterization of proteins, functional genomics/proteomics, metabolic pathways/gene networks. Prerequisites: BENG 181 or BIMM 181 or CSE 181; BENG 182 or BIMM 182 or CSE 182 or Chem 182; Bioinformatics majors only. (S)

BENG 186A. Principles of Biomaterials Design (4)
Fundamentals of materials science as applied to bioengineering design. Natural and synthetic polymeric materials. Materials characterization and design. Wound repair, blood clotting, foreign body response, transplantation biology, biocompatibility of materials, tissue engineering. Artificial organs and medical devices. Government regulations. Patenting. Economic impact. Ethical issues. A term project and oral presentation are required. Prerequisites: BENG 112B or BENG 123, or consent of department. (S)

BENG 186B. Principles of Bioinstrumentation Design (4)
Biophysical phenomena, transducers, and electronics as related to the design of biomedical instrumentation. Potentiometric and amperometric signals and amplifiers. Biopotentials, membrane potentials, chemical sensors. Electrical safety. Mechanical transducers for displacement, force, and pressure. Temperature sensors. Flow sensors. Light-based instrumentation. Prerequisites: ECE 35 or MAE 140; ECE 45 or MAE 170; or consent of department. (W)

BENG 187A. Bioengineering Design Project: Planning (1)
General engineering design topics including project planning and design objectives, background research, engineering needs assessment, technical design specifications, engineering standards, and design requirements and constraints. Introduction to biomedical and biotechnology design projects. Career and professional advising. Majors must enroll in the course for a letter grade in order to count the sequence toward the major. No exceptions will be approved. Prerequisites: BENG 112A or BENG 152 or BENG 168; Bioengineering, Bioengineering: Biotechnology, or Bioengineering: BioSystems majors only or consent of department. (S)

BENG 187B. Bioengineering Design Project: Development (1)
Development of original bioengineering design to solution of problem in biology or medicine. Analysis of economic issues, manufacturing and quality assurance, ethics, safety, government regulations and patent requirements. Oral presentation and formal engineering reports. Majors must enroll in the course for a letter grade in order to count the sequence towards the major. No exceptions will be approved. Prerequisites: BENG 187A, MAE 170, and BENG 112B or BENG 123; concurrent enrollment in one of BENG 119A, BENG 126A, BENG 127A, BENG 128A, BENG 129A, BENG 139A, BENG 147A, BENG 148A, BENG 149A, BENG 169A, or BENG 179A; Bioengineering, Bioengineering: Biotechnology, or Bioengineering: BioSystems majors only or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 187C. Bioengineering Design Project: Implementation (1)
Approaches to implementation of senior design project, including final report. Teams will report on construction of prototypes, conduct of testing, collection of data, and assessment of reliability and failure. Majors must enroll in the course for a letter grade in order to count the sequence toward the major. No exceptions will be approved. Prerequisites: BENG 187B; concurrent enrollment in one of the following lab sections: BENG 119B, BENG 126B, BENG 127B, BENG 128B, BENG 129B, BENG 139B, BENG 147B, BENG 148B, BENG 149B, BENG 169B, or BENG 179B; Bioengineering, Bioengineering: Biotechnology, or Bioengineering: BioSystems majors only or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 187D. Bioengineering Design Project: Presentation (1)
Oral presentations of design projects, including design, development, and implementation strategies and results of prototype testing. Majors must enroll in the course for a letter grade in order to count the sequence toward the major. No exceptions will be approved. Prerequisites: BENG 187C; Bioengineering, Bioengineering: Biotechnology, or Bioengineering: BioSystems majors only or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 189. Physiological Systems Engineering (4)
Quantitative description of physiological systems, e.g., electrical and mechanical properties of muscle (skeletal and cardiac). Modeling and simulation of properties. Kidney, transport, and models. Neural circuits and models. Prerequisites: BENG 133, 134, 135, 140A and 140B, or consent of department. (S) Not offered until spring 2017.

BENG 191/291. Senior Seminar I: Professional Issues in Bioengineering (2)
(Conjoined with BENG 291.) Instills skills for personal and organizational development during lifelong learning. Student prepares portfolio of personal attributes and experiences, prepares for career interviews plus oral report of interviewing organizational CEO. Graduate students will prepare a NIH small business research grant. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 193. Clinical Bioengineering (4)
Introduction on the integration of bioengineering and clinical medicine through lectures and rotations with clinical faculty. Students will work with clinical mentors and course faculty to identify areas where engineering can improve diagnostics, clinical practice, and/or treatment. Prerequisites: BENG 140A or BIPN 100; BENG 140B or BIPN 102; consent of instructor required. A GPA of 3.5 is requested as a requirement per the agreement with the School of Medicine to ensure that students who are participating in the program have a strong academic background to be in the clinic as an undergraduate. (F)

BENG 195. Teaching (2–4)
Teaching and tutorial assistance in a bioengineering course under supervision of instructor. Not more than four units may be used to satisfy graduation requirements. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: 3.0 GPA in the major and departmental approval. (F,W,S)

BENG 196. Bioengineering Industrial Internship (1–4)
Under the joint supervision of a faculty adviser and industry mentor, the student will work at a bioengineering industrial site to gain practical bioengineering experience, summarized in a technical report. With departmental approval, four units of credit may substitute for a technical elective. (P/NP grades only.) Course may be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: consent of department and completion of all lower-division course requirements, including general-science requirements; laboratory experience; completion of ninety units with a 2.5 GPA; and consent of a bioengineering faculty coordinator. (F,W,S,Su)

BENG 197. Engineering Internship (1–4)
An enrichment program, available to a limited number of undergraduate students, which provides work experience with industry, government offices, hospitals, and their practices. Subject to the availability of positions, students will work in a local industry or hospital (on a salaried or unsalaried basis) under the supervision of a faculty member and industrial, government, or hospital employee. Coordination of the Engineering Internship is conducted through UC San Diego’s Academic Internship Program. Time and effort to be arranged. Units may not be applied towards major graduation requirements unless prior approval of a faculty adviser is obtained and internship is an unsalaried position. Prerequisites: completion of ninety units with a 2.5 GPA and consent of a bioengineering faculty coordinator. (F,W,S,Su)

BENG 198. Directed Group Study (1–4)
Directed group study, on a topic or in a field not included in the regular department curriculum, by arrangement with a bioengineering faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing, completion of ninety units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 2.5, consent of instructor, and a completed and approved Special Studies form. (F,W,S)

BENG 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (4)
Independent reading or research by arrangement with a bioengineering faculty member. May be taken for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing, completion of ninety units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 2.5, consent of instructor, and a completed and approved Special Studies form. (F,W,S,Su)

BENG 202/CSE 282. Bioinformatics II: Introduction to Bioinformatics Algorithms (4)
(Formerly BENG 202/CSE 257A.) Introduction to methods for sequence analysis. Application to genome and proteome sequences. Protein structure, sequence-structure analysis. Prerequisites: Pharm 201 or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 203/CSE 283. Genomics, Proteomics, and Network Biology (4)
Annotating genomes, characterizing functional genes, profiling, reconstructing pathways. Prerequisites: Pharm 201, BENG 202/CSE 282, or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 207. Topics in Bioengineering (4)
Course given at the discretion of the faculty on current topics of interest in bioengineering. (F,W,S)

BENG 208. Topics in Bioengineering with Lab (4)
Course given at the discretion of the faculty on topics of current interest in engineering science. This course is intended to be a lecture and lab companion topics course. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 211. Systems Biology and Bioengineering I: Biological Components (4)
Components of biological systems, their biochemical properties and function. The technology used for obtaining component lists. Relationship within and integration of component lists. Structured vocabularies and component ontologies. Algorithms for comparative approaches in deciphering and mining component lists. Prerequisites: BENG 230A or BIMM 100, or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 212. Systems Biology and Bioengineering II: Network Reconstruction (4)
This course will cover the process of reconstructing complex biological reaction networks. Reconstruction of metabolic networks, regulatory networks and signaling networks. Bottom-up and top-down approaches. The use of collections of historical data. The principles underlying high-throughput experimental technologies and examples given on how this data is used for network reconstruction, consistency checking, and validation. Prerequisites: BENG 211 or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 213. Systems Biology and Bioengineering III: Building and Simulating Large-Scale In Silico Models (4)
Mathematical models of reconstructed reaction networks and simulation of their emergent properties. Classical kinetic theory, stochastic simulation methods and constraints-based models. Methods that are scalable and integrate multiple cellular processes will be emphasized. Existing genome-scale models will be described and computations performed. Emphasis will be on studying the genotype-phenotype relationship in an in silico model driven fashion. Comparisons with phenotypic data will be emphasized. Prerequisites: BENG 212 or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 221. Mathematical Methods for Bioengineering (4)
Introduction of the foundations of engineering by teaching the mathematical methods that describe the engineering principles. Analytical and numerical approaches to solving the equations. Prerequisites: graduate standing in bioengineering or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 223. Thermodynamics, Statistical Mechanics, Interfacial Phenomena in Living Systems (4)
Thermodynamics, statistical mechanics, and interfacial phenomena that emphasize the chemical natures of living systems. Topics include intermolecular and surface forces, calculation of energetic processes, computation of electrical forces and fields, and principles of physics in multiscale engineering and design. Prerequisites: graduate standing in bioengineering or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 226. Foundations of Biomechanics (4)
Modern development of biomechanics at an advanced mathematical level. Description of internal stresses and deformation in living tissues and fluids, thermodynamics. Mechanics of soft connective tissue, extracellular matrix, cells, membranes, and cytoskeleton. Mechanotransduction, migration, adhesion. Blood flow in microvessels. Biomechanical analysis of tissue injury. Students that have taken BENG 222 cannot take BENG 226 for credit. Recommended preparation: A previous background in biomechanics is strongly recommended prior to taking this course. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 227. Transport Phenomena in Living Systems (4)
This course describes the movement of heat and chemical mass in biological systems. Diffusion, convection and biochemical reactions in a variety of biological and engineering examples are analyzed and modeled. Students that have taken BENG 222 cannot take BENG 227 for credit. Prerequisites: BENG 221, graduate standing, or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 230A. Biochemistry (4)
A graduate course in biochemistry especially tailored to the requirements and background of bioengineering graduate students. It will cover the important macro- and small molecules in cells that are the major constituents, or that function as signaling molecules or molecular machineries. The structures, pathways, interactions, methodologies, and molecular designs using recombinant DNA technology will be covered. Prerequisites: restricted to bioengineering graduate students with major code BE75. (F)

BENG 230B. Cell and Molecular Biology (4)
A general survey of structure-function relationships at the molecular and cellular levels. Emphasis on basic genetic mechanisms; control of gene expression; membrane structure, transport and traffic; cell signaling; cell adhesion; mechanics of cell division; and cytoskeleton. Prerequisites: BENG 230A; restricted to bioengineering graduate students with major code BE75. (W)

BENG 230C. Cardiovascular Physiology (4)
Physical concepts of behavior of heart, large blood vessels, vascular beds in major organs and the microcirculation. Physical and physiological principles of blood flow, blood pressure, cardiac work, electrophysiology of the heart. Special vascular beds, including their biological and hemodynamic importance. Integration through nervous and humoral controls. Prerequisites: BENG 230B or consent of instructor.

BENG 230D. Respiratory and Renal Physiology (4)
Mechanics of breathing. Gas diffusion. Pulmonary blood flow. Stress distribution. Gas transport by blood. Kinetics of oxygen and carbon dioxide exchange. VA/Q relations. Control of ventilation. Glomerular and proximal tubule functions. Water metabolism. Control of sodium and potassium in the kidney. Prerequisites: BIPN 100, 102, and BENG 230C, or consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

BENG 232. Musculoskeletal Health, Injury, and Disease (4)
An overview of the musculoskeletal system from a bioengineering perspective. Health, injury, disease of bone, cartilage, tendon, ligament, meniscus, synovium, intervertebral disc, skeletal muscle, peripheral nerve. Mechanisms and models underlying current and future therapies. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 233. Neuromuscular Physiology and Biomechanics (4)
Mechanical properties of structures involved in movement (muscles, tendons, bones). Models of neuromuscular adaptation to chronic electrical stimulation, voluntary exercise, surgical overload, spinal cord injury, denervation, limb immobilization, exercise-induced injury and muscle regeneration. Stem cells in muscle function and plasticity. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

BENG 234. Intro to Neurophysiology: Molecules to Systems (4)
Introduction to molecular and cellular neurobiology and their integration with systems neurophysiology. Homeostasis will be an organizing theme. The material will be presented both qualitatively and quantitatively, emphasizing the mathematical, physical, and chemical foundations and dynamics that underlie neurophysiological functions. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 235. Molecular Imaging and Quantitation in Living Cells (4)
This course will introduce quantitative fluorescence microscopy techniques for imaging, manipulating, and quantifying the spatiotemporal characteristics of molecular events in live cells. A laboratory component will be integrated with students organized into small teams for projects. Recommended preparation: basic optics at the level of ECE 181, introductory molecular and cellular biology at the level of BIMM 100 and BICD 110, respectively. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 238/MED 238. Molecular Biology of the Cardiovascular System (4)
An overview of heart, vascular development and associated diseases from a molecular biological perspective. Current approaches for generating mouse models of cardiovascular disease and recently developed technologies for physiological assessment in small animal models will be presented. (W)

BENG 241A. Tissue Engineering and Regenerative Medicine: Foundations (4)
Overview and foundations of tissue engineering and regenerative medicine. Tissue structure, function, and dynamics in health and disease. Cells, microenvironment, extracellular matrix, and biomaterials as components of engineered tissues and organs. Functional goals, design, testing, and evaluation of therapies. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (F)

BENG 241B. Tissue Engineering and Regenerative Medicine: Cell Microenvironment (4)
The role of the cellular microenvironment in directing cell behavior and function in health and disease. Cell adherence and deformation and cell-mediated matrix remodeling. Bioengineering of the microenvironment in tissue engineering and regenerative medicine. Prerequisites: BENG 241A, graduate standing, or consent of instructor.

BENG 241C. Tissue Engineering and Regenerative Medicine: Development and Growth (4)
Development, morphogenesis, growth, and remodeling of tissues and organs in health and disease. Integrative metabolism and biomechanics of cells and extracellular matrix at tissue, organ, and organism scales. Bioengineering restoration of tissues and organs. Industry applications and regulations. Prerequisites: BENG 241A, graduate standing, or consent of instructor.

BENG 242/MATS 257/NANO 257. Polymer Science and Engineering (4)
Quantitative basic understanding of different branches of polymer science varying from polymer chemistry, characterization, thermodynamics, rheological properties, smart materials, self-assembly in biopolymers (natural) and synthetic polymers, and applications of polymers ranging from medicine to structure. Prerequisites: graduate standing in bioengineering, nanoengineering, or materials science, or consent of instructor.

BENG 247A/ECE 247A/NANO 247A. Advanced Biophotonics (4)
Basic physics and chemistry of interaction of photons with matter; photonic radiation pressure; advanced optoelectronic detection systems, devices, methods, time-resolved fluorescent, chemiluminescent methods, fluorescent energy transfer techniques, quantum dots, near-field optical techniques, mechanisms of light sensitive biological systems including chloroplasts for photosynthetic energy conversion and basis of vision processes. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (F)

BENG 247B/ECE 247B/NANO 247B. Bioelectronics (4)
Topics include photolithographic techniques for high-density DNA microarray production, incorporation of CMOS control into electronic DNA microarrays, direct electronic detection technology, bio-fuel cells, highly integrated devices (lab-on-a-chip, in vivo biosensors, etc.). Form heterogeneous materials and components. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (W)

BENG 247C/ECE 247C/NANO 247C. Bionanotechnology (4)
Nanosensors, nanodevices for clinical diagnostics, biowarfare agent detection; nanostructures for drug delivery; nanoarrays, nanodevices; nanoanalytical devices and systems, methods for modification or functionalization of nanoparticles; nanostructures with biological molecules; nanostructural aspects of fuel cells, biofuel cells; potential use of DNA, other biomolecules. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (S)

BENG 260/BGGN 260/PHYS 279. Neurodynamics (4)
Introduction to the nonlinear dynamics of neurons and neural systems using bifurcation theory and chaotic motions, at different levels of abstraction, e.g., biophysical and “reduced” models for analysis of regularly spiking and bursting cells. Laboratory exercises will accompany the lectures. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 267. Microcirculation in Health and Disease (4)
Structural and functional aspects of transport and blood-tissue exchange in key organs during circulatory shock, bacterial toxemia, hypertension. Physical and ultrastructural techniques used to analyze small-vessel dynamics. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (S)

BENG 276/Chem 276/Math 276/Pharm 276. Numerical Analysis in Multiscale Biology (4)
Introduces mathematical tools to simulate biological processes at multiple scales. Numerical methods for ordinary and partial differential equations (deterministic and stochastic), and methods for parallel computing and visualization. Hands-on use of computers emphasized; students will apply numerical methods in individual projects. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 277/BIOM 287. Tissue Engineering Laboratory (4)
Students will learn to conduct tissue engineering and developmental biology experiments, microfabricate cell culture systems, engineer biopolymer materials, and develop and analyze quantitative models of transport, cell fate, and growth mechanics. The understanding and manipulation of multicellular processes that comprise development and growth involves specialized areas of biomechanics, developmental biology, biomaterials, and the tools of molecular biology, as well as the integration of theory and experiment. To fabricate functional tissues, it is important to establish underlying molecular and physical mechanisms and then control and integrate these. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 278/RAD 278. Magnetic Resonance Imaging (4)
This lab course provides hands-on experience with MR physics, data acquisition, image formation, and data analysis, using a human MRI scanner. It will cover basic principles of MRI and key applications, including scanner hardware, spin echoes, gradient echoes, echo-planar imaging, MR angiography, fMRI, and perfusion imaging. This will be accomplished through one hour of formal instruction and four hours of scanner time per week. Each week will cover one topic, and grading will be based on lab reports. The last two weeks are reserved for a final project, which can be student initiated. Prerequisites: BENG 280A or basic knowledge of linear systems and MRI, or consent of instructor. (W)

BENG 280A. Principles of Biomedical Imaging (4)
Fundamentals of Fourier transform and linear systems theory including convolution, sampling, noise, filtering, image reconstruction and visualization with an emphasis on applications to biomedical imaging. Examples from optical imaging, CT, MR, ultrasound, nuclear, PET, and radiography. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (F)

BENG 280B. Comparative Biomedical Imaging (4)
Application of biomedical imaging to the measurement of structure, function, and dynamics of organ systems from the microscopic to the organ level. Emphasis on detailed evaluation and comparison of specific imaging modalities. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (W,S)

BENG 281. Seminar in Bioengineering (1)
Weekly seminars by faculty, visitors, postdoctoral research fellows, and graduate students concerning research topics in bioengineering and related subjects. May be repeated for credit. Course does not apply toward MS graduation requirements. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

BENG 282. Seminar: Faculty Research (1)
Weekly seminars by bioengineering faculty presenting their research. May be repeated for credit. Course does not apply toward MS or PhD graduation requirements. (S/U grades only.) (F)

BENG 283/Chem 283/BIOM 283. Supramolecular Structure Determination Laboratory (4)
A laboratory course combining hands-on mass spectrometry and bioinformatics tools to explore the relationship between structure and function in macromolecules. Tools for peptide sequencing, analysis of post-translational modification, and fragmentation analysis by mass spectrometry are examples of experiments students will run. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

BENG 285/BNFO 285/ECE 204. Statistical Learning in Bioinformatics (4)
A hallmark of bioinformatics is the computational analysis of complex data. The combination of statistics and algorithms produces statistical learning methods that automate the analysis of complex data. Such machine learning methods are widely used in systems biology and bioinformatics. This course provides an introduction to statistical learning and assumes familiarity with key statistical methods. Students may not receive credit for BENG 285 and ECE 204 and BNFO 285. Prerequisites: ECE 271A or ECE 271B or Math 283; or consent of instructor.

BENG 291/191. Senior Seminar I: Professional Issues in Bioengineering (2)
(Conjoined with BENG 191.) Instills skills for personal and organizational development during lifelong learning. Student prepares portfolio of personal attributes and experiences, prepares for career interviews plus oral report of interviewing organizational CEO. Graduate students will prepare a NIH small business research grant. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F)

BENG 295. Bioengineering Design Project and Industrial Training (4)
Independent work by graduate students focused on design, applied research, and professional experience. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and departmental approval. (F,W,S)

BENG 296. Independent Study (4)
Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

BENG 298. Directed Group Study (1–4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in regular department curriculum, by special arrangement with a faculty member. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

BENG 298L. Laboratory Research Rotation (4)
Laboratory research rotation for first-year BENG PhD students. Students will write a final paper. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: PhD student in bioengineering. (F,W,S)

BENG 299. Graduate Research (1–12)
Independent work by graduate students engaged in research and writing theses. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

BENG 500. Apprentice Teaching for Specialization in Multi-Scale Biology (2, 4)
Teaching experience in one of the six bioengineering lab courses designated as a part of the BENG PhD Specialization in Multi-Scale Biology. Student is under the direction of the faculty member in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor and departmental approval. (F,W,S)

BENG 501. Teaching Experience (2, 4)
Teaching experience in an appropriate bioengineering undergraduate course under direction of the faculty member in charge of the course. Lecturing one to two hours per week in either a problem-solving section or regular lecture. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor and departmental approval. (F,W,S)

CSE 3. Fluency in Information Technology (4)
Introduces the concepts and skills necessary to effectively use information technology. Includes basic concepts and some practical skills with computer and networks. Prerequisites: none.

CSE 4GS. Mathematical Beauty in Rome (4)
Exploration of topics in mathematics and engineering as they relate to classical architecture in Rome, Italy. In depth geometrical analysis and computer modeling of basic structures (arches, vaults, domes), and on-site studies of the Colosseum, Pantheon, Roman Forum, and St. Peter’s Basilica. Prerequisites: Math 10A or Math 20A; departmental approval, and corequisite of CSE 6GS.

CSE 6GS. Mathematical Beauty in Rome Lab (4)
Companion course to CSE 4GS where theory is applied and lab experiments are carried out “in the field” in Rome, Italy. For final projects, students will select a complex structure (e.g., the Colosseum, the Pantheon, St. Peter’s, etc.) to analyze and model, in detail, using computer-based tools. Prerequisites: Math 10A or Math 20A; departmental approval, and corequisite of CSE 4GS.

CSE 5A. Introduction to Programming I (4)
(Formerly CSE 62A) Introduction to algorithms and top-down problem solving. Introduction to the C language, including functions, arrays, and standard libraries. Basic skills for using a PC graphical user interface operating system environment. File maintenance utilities are covered. (A student may not receive credit for CSE 5A after receiving credit for CSE 10 or CSE 11 or CSE 8B or CSE 9B or CSE 62B or CSE 65.) Prerequisites: A familiarity with high-school level algebra is expected, but this course assumes no prior programming knowledge.

CSE 7. Introduction to Programming with Matlab (4)
Fundamentals of computer programming and basic software design covering topics related to variables, functions, and control structures; writing, testing, and debugging programs in Matlab. Examples focus on scientific applications. Recommended preparation: high school algebra and familiarity with the computing milieu. Students with limited computing experience may take CSE 3 for preparation. Students may not take CSE 7 after completing COGS 18. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: none.

CSE 8A. Introduction to Computer Science: Java I (4)
Introductory course for students interested in computer science. Fundamental concepts of applied computer science using media computation. Exercises in the theory and practice of computer science. Hands-on experience with designing, editing, compiling, and executing programming constructs and applications. CSE 8A is part of a two-course sequence (CSE 8A and CSE 8B) that is equivalent to CSE 11. Students should take CSE 8B to complete this track. Formerly offered as corequisite courses CSE 8A plus 8AL. Students who have taken CSE 8B or CSE 11 may not take CSE 8A. Recommended preparation: No prior programming experience is assumed, but comfort using computers is helpful. Students should consult the CSE Course Placement Advice web page for assistance in choosing which CSE course to take first. Prerequisites: none.

CSE 8B. Introduction to Computer Science: Java II (4)
Continuation of the Java language. Continuation of programming techniques. More on inheritance. Exception handling. CSE 8B is part of a two-course sequence (CSE 8A and CSE 8B) that is equivalent to CSE 11. Students should consult the CSE Course Placement Advice web page for assistance in choosing which CSE course to take first. Students may not receive credit for CSE 8B and CSE 11. Prerequisites: CSE 8A.

CSE 11. Introduction to Computer Science and Object-Oriented Programming: Java (4)
An accelerated introduction to computer science and programming using the Java language. Basic UNIX. Modularity and abstraction. Documentation, testing and verification techniques. Basic object-oriented programming, including inheritance and dynamic binding. Exception handling. Event-driven programming. Experience with AWT library or other similar library. Students who have completed CSE 8B may not take CSE 11. Students should consult the CSE Course Placement Advice web page for assistance in choosing which CSE course to take first. Recommended preparation: high school algebra and familiarity with computing concepts and a course in a compiled language. Prerequisites: none.

CSE 12. Basic Data Structures and Object-Oriented Design (4)
Use and implementation of basic data structures including linked lists, stacks, and queues. Use of advanced structures such as binary trees and hash tables. Object-oriented design including interfaces, polymorphism, encapsulation, abstract data types, pre-/post-conditions. Recursion. Uses Java and Java Collections. Prerequisites: CSE 8B or CSE 11, and concurrent enrollment with CSE 15L.

CSE 15L. Software Tools and Techniques Laboratory (2)
Hands-on exploration of software development tools and techniques. Investigation of the scientific process as applied to software development and debugging. Emphasis is on weekly hands-on laboratory experiences, development of laboratory notebooking techniques as applied to software design. Prerequisites: CSE 8B or CSE 11, and concurrent enrollment with CSE 12.

CSE 20. Discrete Mathematics (4)
Basic discrete mathematical structures: sets, relations, functions, sequences, equivalence relations, partial orders, and number systems. Methods of reasoning and proofs: prepositional logic, predicate logic, induction, recursion, and pigeonhole principle. Infinite sets and diagonalization. Basic counting techniques; permutation and combinations. Applications will be given to digital logic design, elementary number theory, design of programs, and proofs of program correctness. Credit not offered for both Math 15A and CSE 20. Equivalent to Math 15A. Prerequisites: CSE 8A or CSE 8B or CSE 11. CSE 8B or CSE 11 may be taken concurrently with CSE 20/ Math 15A.

CSE 21. Mathematics for Algorithms and Systems (4)
This course will provide an introduction to the discrete mathematical tools needed to analyze algorithms and systems. Enumerative combinatorics: basic counting principles, inclusion-exclusion, and generating functions. Matrix notation. Applied discrete probability. Finite automata. Credit not offered for both Math 15B and CSE 21. Equivalent to Math 15B. Prerequisites: CSE 20 or Math 15A.

CSE 30. Computer Organization and Systems Programming (4)
Introduction to organization of modern digital computers—understanding the various components of a computer and their interrelationships. Study of a specific architecture/machine with emphasis on systems programming in C and Assembly languages in a UNIX environment. Prerequisites: CSE 12, CSE 15L, or consent of instructor.

CSE 80. UNIX Lab (2)
The objective of the course is to help the programmer create a productive UNIX environment. Topics include customizing the shell, file system, shell programming, process management, and UNIX tools. Prerequisites: CSE 8B or CSE 11.

CSE 86. C++ for Java Programmers (2)
Helps the Java programmer to be productive in the C++ programming environment. Topics include the similarities and differences between Java and C++ with special attention to pointers, operator overloading, templates, the STL, the preprocessor, and the C++ Runtime Environment. Prerequisites: CSE 12 or consent of instructor.

CSE 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. Prerequisites: none.

CSE 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
A seminar providing an overview of a topic of current research interest to the instructor. The goal is to present a specialized topic in computer science and engineering students. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary. 

CSE 91. Perspectives in Computer Science and Engineering (2)
A seminar format discussion led by CSE faculty on topics in central areas of computer science, concentrating on the relation among them, recent developments, and future directions. Prerequisites: majors only.

CSE 99. Independent Study in Computer Science and Engineering (4)
Independent reading or research by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: lower-division standing. Completion of thirty units at UC San Diego with a UC San Diego GPA of 3.0. Special Studies form required. Department stamp required. Consent of instructor and approval of the department.

CSE 100. Advanced Data Structures (4)
High-performance data structures and supporting algorithms. Use and implementation of data structures like (un)balanced trees, graphs, priority queues, and hash tables. Also memory management, pointers, recursion. Theoretical and practical performance analysis, both average case and amortized. Uses C++ and STL. Credit not offered for both Math 176 and CSE 100. Equivalent to Math 176. Recommended preparation: background in C or C++ programming. Prerequisites: CSE 12, CSE 15L, CSE 21 or Math 15B, and CSE 5A or CSE 30 or ECE 15 or MAE 9.

CSE 101. Design and Analysis of Algorithms (4)
Design and analysis of efficient algorithms with emphasis of nonnumerical algorithms such as sorting, searching, pattern matching, and graph and network algorithms. Measuring complexity of algorithms, time and storage. NP-complete problems. Credit not offered for both Math 188 and CSE 101. Equivalent to Math 188. Prerequisites: CSE 12, CSE 21 or Math 15B, or Math 100A, or Math 103A and CSE 100, or Math 176.

CSE 103. A Practical Introduction to Probability and Statistics (4)
Distributions over the real line. Independence, expectation, conditional expectation, mean, variance. Hypothesis testing. Learning classifiers. Distributions over R^n, covariance matrix. Binomial, Poisson distributions. Chernoff bound. Entropy. Compression. Arithmetic coding. Maximal likelihood estimation. Bayesian estimation. CSE 103 is not duplicate credit for ECE 109, Econ 120A, or Math 183. Prerequisites: Math 20A and Math 20B.

CSE 105. Theory of Computability (4)
An introduction to the mathematical theory of computability. Formal languages. Finite automata and regular expression. Push-down automata and context-free languages. Computable or recursive functions: Turing machines, the halting problem. Undecidability. Credit not offered for both Math 166 and CSE 105. Equivalent to Math 166. Prerequisites: CSE 12, CSE 21 or Math 15B, or Math 100A, or Math 103A.

CSE 107. Introduction to Modern Cryptography (4)
Topics include private and public-key cryptography, block ciphers, data encryption, authentication, key distribution and certification, pseudorandom number generators, design and analysis of protocols, zero-knowledge proofs, and advanced protocols. Emphasizes rigorous mathematical approach including formal definitions of security goals and proofs of protocol security. Prerequisites: CSE 21 or Math 15B, CSE 101 or Math 188, CSE 105 or Math 166.

CSE 110. Software Engineering (4)
Introduction to software development and engineering methods, including specification, design, implementation, testing, and process. An emphasis on team development, agile methods, and use of tools such as IDE’s, version control, and test harnesses. CSE 70 is renumbered to CSE 110: students may not receive credit for both CSE 70 and CSE 110. Prerequisites: CSE 12, CSE 21, or Math 15B.

CSE 112. Advanced Software Engineering (4)
This course will cover software engineering topics associated with large systems development such as requirements and specifications, testing and maintenance, and design. Specific attention will be given to development tools and automated support environments. Prerequisites: CSE 111.

CSE 118. Ubiquitous Computing (4)
Explores emerging opportunities enabled by cheap sensors and networked computing devices. Small research projects will be conducted in teams, culminating in project presentations at the end of the term. Section will cover material relevant to the project, such as research methods, software engineering, teamwork, and project management. Prerequisites: any course from the following: CSE 131, CSE 132B, Cog Sci 102C, Cog Sci 121, Cog Sci 184, COMT 111B, COMT 115, ECE 111, ECE 118, ECE 191, ECE 192, or ICAM 160B; or consent of instructor.

CSE 120. Principles of Computer Operating Systems (4)
Basic functions of operating systems; basic kernel structure, concurrency, memory management, virtual memory, file systems, process scheduling, security and protection. Prerequisites: CSE 30, and CSE 101 or Math 188, and CSE 70 or CSE 110.

CSE 121. Operating Systems: Architecture and Implementation (4)
(Formerly CSE 171B.) Case study of architecture and implementation of a selected modern operating system. In-depth analysis through a detailed study of source code. Topics include process creation, context-switching, memory allocation, synchronization mechanisms, interprocess communication, I/O buffering, device drivers, and file systems. Prerequisites: CSE 120.

CSE 123. Computer Networks (4)
(Renumbered from CSE 123A.) Introduction to concepts, principles, and practice of computer communication networks with examples from existing architectures, protocols, and standards with special emphasis on the Internet protocols. Layering and the OSI model; physical and data link layers; local and wide area networks; datagrams and virtual circuits; routing and congestion control; internetworking. Transport protocols. Credit may not be received for both CSE 123 and ECE 158A, or CSE 123A and CSE 123. Prerequisites: CSE 120 or consent of instructor. Majors only.

CSE 124. Networked Services (4)
(Renumbered from CSE 123B.) The architecture of modern networked services, including data center design, enterprise storage, fault tolerance, and load balancing. Protocol software structuring, the Transmission Control Protocol (TCP), remote procedure calls, protocols for digital audio and video communication, overlay and peer-to-peer systems, secure communication. Credit may not be received for both CSE 124 and ECE 158B. Students may not receive credit for both CSE 123B and CSE 124. Prerequisites: CSE 120 or consent of instructor.

CSE 125. Software System Design and Implementation (4)
Design and implementation of large, complex software systems involving multiple aspects of CSE curriculum. Emphasis is on software system design applied to a single, large group project with close interaction with instructor. Prerequisites: senior standing with substantial programming experience, and consent of instructor. Department stamp required.

CSE 127. Introduction to Computer Security (4)
Topics include basic cryptography, security/threat analysis, access control, auditing, security models, distributed systems security, and theory behind common attack and defense techniques. The class will go over formal models as well as the bits and bytes of security exploits. Prerequisites: CSE 21 or Math 15B, and CSE 120.

CSE 130. Programming Languages: Principles and Paradigms (4)
(Formerly CSE 173.) Introduction to programming languages and paradigms, the components that comprise them, and the principles of language design, all through the analysis and comparison of a variety of languages (e.g., Pascal, Ada, C++, PROLOG, ML.) Will involve programming in most languages studied. Prerequisites: CSE 12, and CSE 100 or Math 176, CSE 105 or Math 166.

CSE 131. Compiler Construction (4)
(Formerly CSE 131B.) Introduction to the compilation of programming languages, practice of lexical and syntactic analysis, symbol tables, syntax-directed translation, type checking, code generation, optimization, interpretation, and compiler structure. (Students may receive repeat credit for CSE 131A and CSE 131B by completing CSE 131.) Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176, CSE 105 or Math 166, CSE 70 or CSE 110, and CSE 130.

CSE 132A. Database System Principles (4)
Basic concepts of databases, including data modeling, relational databases, query languages, optimization, dependencies, schema design, and concurrency control. Exposure to one or several commercial database systems. Advanced topics such as deductive and object-oriented databases, time allowing. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176.

CSE 132B. Database Systems Applications (4)
Design of databases, transactions, use of trigger facilities and datablades. Performance measuring, organization of index structures. Prerequisites: CSE 132A or equivalent.

CSE 134B. Web Client Languages (4)
Design and implementation of interactive World Wide Web clients using helper applications and plug-ins. The main language covered will be Java. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176.

CSE 135. Server-side Web Applications (4)
Design and implementation of dynamic web-based applications. Multitier architecture, scripting languages, SQL, XML, session handling, nonbrowser clients, web services, and scalability, security, and usability in the web context. Credit is not offered for both CSE 135 and CSE 134A. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176.

CSE 140. Components and Design Techniques for Digital Systems (4)
(Formerly CSE 170A) Design of Boolean logic and finite state machines; two-level, multilevel combinational logic design, combinational modules and modular networks, Mealy and Moore machines, analysis and synthesis of canonical forms, sequential modules. Prerequisites: CSE 20 or Math 15A, and corequisite of CSE 140L.

CSE 140L. Digital Systems Laboratory (2)
Implementation with computer-aided design tools for combinational logic minimization and state machine synthesis. Hardware construction of a small digital system. Prerequisites: CSE 20 or Math 15A; CSE 140 must be taken concurrently.

CSE 141. Introduction to Computer Architecture (4)
Introduction to computer architecture. Computer system design. Processor design. Control design. Memory systems. Prerequisites: CSE 140, CSE 140L, or consent of the instructor. CSE 141L should be taken concurrently.

CSE 141L. Project in Computer Architecture (2)
Hands-on computer architecture project aiming to familiarize students with instruction set architecture, and design of process. Control and memory systems. Prerequisites: CSE 110, CSE 140, CSE 140L, or consent of the instructor. CSE 141 should be taken concurrently.

CSE 143. Microelectronic System Design (4)
VSLI process technologies; circuit characterization; logic design styles; clocking strategies; computer-aided design tools; subsystem design; design case studies. System design project from hardware description, logic synthesis, physical layout to design verification. Prerequisites: CSE 140 or CSE 170A or ECE 81.

CSE 144. Computer-Aided Design of VLSI Circuits (4)
Introduction to computer-aided design. Placement, assignment and floor planning techniques. Routing. Symbolic layout and compaction. Module generation and silicon compilation. Prerequisites: CSE 140 and CSE 140L.

CSE 145. Embedded System Design Project (4)
Project class building an embedded computing system. Learn fundamental knowledge of microcontrollers, sensors, and actuators. Introduction to the hardware and software tools to build project in a team environment and end-to-end system building. Prerequisites: CSE 30.

CSE 148. Advanced Processor Architecture Design Project (4)
Students will use hardware description language tools to add advanced architectural features to a basic processor design. These features may include pipelining, superscalar execution, branch prediction, and advanced cache features. Designs will be implemented in programmable logic devices. Prerequisites: CSE 141, CSE 141L, or consent of instructor.

CSE 150. Introduction to Artificial Intelligence: Search and Reasoning (4)
Search algorithms including BFS, DFS, iterative deepening and A*, randomized search algorithms including Walksat, syntax and semantics of first-order logic (FOL), knowledge representation in FOL including reasoning, basic reasoning with probabilities, basic Bayesian learning. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176, or consent of instructors.

CSE 151. Introduction to Artificial Intelligence: Statistical Approaches (4)
Reasoning with probabilities, reasoning and learning with Bayesian networks, decision making under uncertainty, sequential decision making, statistical learning methods, and reinforcement learning. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176, or consent of instructor.

CSE 152. Introduction to Computer Vision (4)
The goal of computer vision is to compute scene and object properties from images and video. This introductory course includes feature detection, image segmentation, motion estimation, object recognition, and 3-D shape reconstruction through stereo, photometric stereo, and structure from motion. Prerequisites: Math 20F, CSE 100 or Math 176, CSE 101 or Math 188.

CSE 153. Cognitive Modeling (4)
Construction of computational models that “do the same things people do,” in terms of perception, categorization, memory, language, action, etc. and typically in a fashion that is plausibly carried out by the neural networks in our brains. The model must fit behavioral, neurophysiological, and/or neuropsychological data. Recommended preparation: background knowledge in computer science, cognitive science, psychology, or neuroscience, and a basic understanding of the most fundamental concepts of differential calculus, linear algebra, and statistics. Computer programming skills may be useful to some students as they conduct their term projects, but such skills are not required. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176 or consent of instructor.

CSE 160. Introduction to Parallel Computing (4)
Introduction to high performance parallel computing: parallel architecture, algorithms, software, and problem-solving techniques. Areas covered: Flynns’ taxonomy, processor-memory organizations, shared and nonshared memory models: message passing and multithreading, data parallelism; speedup, efficiency and Amdahl’s law, communication and synchronization, isoefficiency and scalability. Assignments given to provide practical experience. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176.

CSE 164. GPU Programming (4)
Principles and practices of programming graphics processing units (GPUs). GPU architecture and hardware concepts, including memory and threading models. Modern hardware-accelerated graphics pipeline programming. Application of GPU programming to rendering of game graphics, including physical, deferring, and global lighting models. Recommended preparation: Practical Rendering and Computation with Direct3D 11 by Jason Zink, Matt Pettineo, and Jack Hoxley. Prerequisites: CSE 167. 

CSE 165. 3D User Interaction (4)
This course focuses on design and evaluation of three-dimensional (3D) user interfaces, devices, and interaction techniques. The course consists of lectures, literature reviews, and programming assignments. Students will be expected to create interaction techniques for several different 3D interaction devices. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: CSE 167.

CSE 166. Image Processing (4)
Principles of image formation, analysis, and representation. Image enhancement, restoration, and segmentation; stochastic image models. Filter design, sampling, Fourier and wavelet transforms. Selected applications in computer graphics and machine vision. Prerequisites: Math 20F, CSE 100 or Math 176.

CSE 167. Computer Graphics (4)
Representation and manipulation of pictorial data. Two-dimensional and three-dimensional transformations, curves, surfaces. Projection, illumination, and shading models. Raster and vector graphic I/O devices; retained-mode and immediate-mode graphics software systems and applications. Students may not receive credit for both Math 155A and CSE 167. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176.

CSE 168. Computer Graphics II: Rendering (4)
Weekly programming assignments that will cover graphics rendering algorithms. During the course the students will learn about ray tracing, geometry, tessellation, acceleration structures, sampling, filtering, shading models, and advanced topics such as global illumination and programmable graphics hardware. Prerequisites: CSE 167.

CSE 169. Computer Animation (4)
Advanced graphics focusing on the programming techniques involved in computer animation. Algorithms and approaches for both character animation and physically based animation. Particular subjects may include skeletons, skinning, key framing, facial animation, inverse kinematics, locomotion, motion capture, video game animation, particle systems, rigid bodies, clothing, and hair. Recommended preparation: An understanding of linear algebra. Prerequisites: CSE 167 or consent of instructor.

CSE 170. Introduction to Human-Computer Interaction Design (4)
Introduces fundamental methods and principles for designing, implementing, and evaluating user interfaces. Topics: user-centered design, rapid prototyping, experimentation, direct manipulation, cognitive principles, visual design, social software, software tools. Learn by doing: Work with a team on a quarter-long design project. Cross-listed with COGS 120. Recommended preparation: Basic familiarity with HTML. Prerequisites: CSE 11 or CSE 8A or CSE 7.

CSE 181. Molecular Sequence Analysis (4)
This course covers the analysis of nucleic acid and protein sequences, with an emphasis on the application of algorithms to biological problems. Topics include sequence alignments, database searching, comparative genomics, and phylogenetic and clustering analyses. Pairwise alignment, multiple alignment, DNS sequencing, scoring functions, fast database search, comparative genomics, clustering, phylogenetic trees, gene finding/DNA statistics. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176, CSE 101 or Math 188, BIMM 100 or Chem 114C. Bioinformatics majors only. CSE 181 is cross-listed with BIMM 181 and BENG 181.

CSE 182. Biological Databases (4)
This course provides an introduction to the features of biological data, how those data are organized efficiently in databases, and how existing data resources can be utilized to solve a variety of biological problems. Object oriented databases, data modeling and description. Survey of current biological database with respect to above, implementation of a database on a biological topic. Cross-listed with BIMM 182/BENG 182/Chem 182. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or Math 176. Bioinformatics majors only.

CSE 184. Computational Molecular Biology (4)
This advanced course covers the application of machine learning and modeling techniques to biological systems. Topics include gene structure, recognition of DNA and protein sequence patterns, classification, and protein structure prediction. Pattern discovery, Hidden Markov models/support victor machines/neural network/profiles. Protein structure prediction, functional characterization or proteins, functional genomics/proteomics, metabolic pathways/gene networks. Cross-listed with BIMM 184/BENG 184/Chem 184. Prerequisites: BIMM 181 or BENG 181 or CSE 181, BENG 182 or BIMM 182 or CSE 182 or CHEM 182. Bioinformatics majors only.

CSE 190. Topics in Computer Science and Engineering (4)
Topics of special interest in computer science and engineering. Topics may vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit with the consent of instructor. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. Department stamp required.

CSE 191. Seminar in CSE (1–4)
A seminar course on topics of current interest. Students, as well as, the instructor will be actively involved in running the course/class. This course cannot be counted toward a technical elective. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. Department stamp required.

CSE 192. Senior Seminar in Computer Science and Engineering (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in CSE (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing; department stamp required and consent of instructor.

CSE 195. Teaching (4)
Teaching and tutorial assistance in a CSE course under the supervision of the instructor. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of the department chair. Department stamp required.

CSE 197. Field Study in Computer Science and Engineering (4, 8, 12, or 16)
Directed study and research at laboratories away from the campus. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of the instructor and approval of the department. Department stamp required.

CSE 198. Directed Group Study (2 or 4)
Computer science and engineering topics whose study involves reading and discussion by a small group of students under the supervision of a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of the instructor. Department stamp required.

CSE 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
Independent reading or research by special arrangement with a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of the instructor. Department stamp required.

CSE 199H. CSE Honors Thesis Research for Undergraduates (4)
Undergraduate research for completing an honors project under the supervision of a CSE faculty member. May be taken across multiple quarters. Students should enroll for a letter grade. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: Admission to the CSE department honors program. Consent of the instructor. Department stamp required.

CSE 200. Computability and Complexity (4)
Computability review, including halting problem, decidable sets, r.e. sets, many-one reductions; TIME(t(n)), SPACE(s(n)) and general relations between these classes; L, P, PSPACE, NP; NP—completeness; hierarchy theorems; RP, BPP. Prerequisites: CSE 105 or equivalent.

CSE 202. Algorithm Design and Analysis (4)
The basic techniques for the design and analysis of algorithms. Divide-and-conquer, dynamic programming, data structures, graph search, algebraic problems, randomized algorithms, lower bounds, probabilistic analysis, parallel algorithms. Prerequisites: CSE 101 or equivalent.

CSE 203A. Advanced Algorithms (4)
Modern advances in design and analysis of algorithms. Exact syllabus varies. Topics include approximation, randomized algorithms, probabilistic analysis, heuristics, online algorithms, competitive analysis, models of memory hierarchy, parallel algorithms, number-theoretic algorithms, cryptanalysis, computational geometry, computational biology, network algorithms, VLSI CAD algorithms. Prerequisites: CSE 202.

CSE 205A. Logic in Computer Science (4)
(Formerly CSE 208D) Mathematical logic as a tool in computer science. Propositional logic, resolution, first-order logic, completeness and incompleteness theorems with computational viewpoint, finite model theory, descriptive complexity, logic programming, nonmonotonic reasoning, temporal logic. Applications to databases, automatic theorem proving, program verification, and distributed systems. Prerequisites: CSE 200 or consent of instructor.

CSE 206A. Lattice Algorithms and Applications (4)
(Formerly CSE 207C) Introduction to the algorithmic theory of point lattices (aka algorithmic geometry of numbers), and some of its most important applications in cryptography and cryptanalysis. Topics usually include: LLL basis reduction algorithm, cryptanalysis of broadcast RSA, hardness of approximating lattice problems. Prerequisites: CSE 202, CSE 200, or concurrent.

CSE 207. Modern Cryptography (4)
Private and public key cryptography, introduction to reduction based proofs of security, concrete security, block ciphers, pseudorandom functions and generators, symmetric encryption, asymmetric encryption, computational number theory, RSA and discrete log systems, message authentication, digital signatures, key distribution and key management. Prerequisites: CSE 202 or consent of instructor.

CSE 208. Advanced Cryptography (4)
Zero-knowledge, secure computation, session-key distribution, protocols, electronic payment, one-way functions, trapdoor permutations, pseudorandom bit generators, hardcore bits. Prerequisites: CSE 202, CSE 200, and CSE 207 or consent of instructor.

CSE 209A. Topics/Seminar in Algorithms, Complexity, and Logic (1–4)
Topics of special interest in algorithms, complexity, and logic to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 209B. Topics/Seminar in Cryptography (1–4)
Topics of special interest in cryptography to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 210. Principles of Software Engineering (4)
(Formerly CSE 264A.) General principles in modern software engineering. Both theoretical and practical topics are covered. Theoretical topics include proofs of correctness, programming language semantics, and theory of testing. Practical topics include structured programming, modularization techniques, design of languages for reliable programming, and software tools. Prerequisites: CSE 100, 131A, 120, or consent of instructor.

CSE 211. Software Testing and Analysis (4)
Survey of testing and analysis methods. Introduction to advanced topics in area as well as traditional production methods. Topics include inspections and reviews, formal analysis, verification and validation standards, nonstatistical testing, statistical-testing and reliability models, coverage methods, testing and analysis tools, and organization management and planning. Methods special to special development approaches such as object-oriented testing will also be described. Prerequisites: undergraduate major in computer science or extensive industrial experience.

CSE 216. Research Topics in Human-Computer Interaction (4)
Prepares students to conduct original HCI research by reading and discussing seminal and cutting-edge research papers. Topics include design, social software, input techniques, mobile, and ubiquitous computing. Student pairs perform a quarter-long mini research project that leverages campus research efforts. Cross-listed with COGS 230. Prerequisites: none.

CSE 218. Advanced Topics in Software Engineering (4)
This course will cover a current topic in software engineering in depth. Topics in the past have included software tools, impacts of programming language design, and software system structure. (S/U grades permitted.) Prerequisites: none.

CSE 219. Design at Large (1)
New societal challenges, cultural values, and technological opportunities are changing design—and vice versa. The seminar explores this increased scale, real-world engagement, and disruptive impact. Invited speakers from UC San Diego and beyond share cutting-edge research on interaction, design, and learning. Cross-listed with COGS 229. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: none.

CSE 221. Operating Systems (4)
Operating system structures, concurrent computation models, scheduling, synchronization mechanisms, address spaces, memory management protection and security, buffering, streams, data-copying reduction techniques, file systems, naming, caching, disk organization, mapped files, remote file systems, case studies of major operating systems. Prerequisites: CSE 120 and 121, or consent of instructor.

CSE 222A. Computer Communication Networks (4)
(Formerly CSE 222.) Computer communication network concepts, protocols, and architectures, with an emphasis on an analysis of algorithms, protocols, and design methodologies. Topics will include layering, error control, flow control, congestion control, switching and routing, quality of service management, mobility, naming, security, and selected contemporary topics. Prerequisites: CSE 123A or consent of instructor.

CSE 222B. Internet Algorithmics (4)
(Formerly CSE 228H.) Techniques for speeding up Internet implementations, including system restructuring, new algorithms, and hardware innovations. Topics include: models for protocols, systems and hardware; efficiency principles; applying these principles to deriving techniques for efficient implementation of common endnode and router functions. Prerequisites: CSE 123A or CSE 222A, or consent of instructor.

CSE 223A. Principles of Distributed Computing (4)
(Formerly CSE 223.) Logical and physical time, snapshot protocols, failure models, replication strategies, consensus and reliable broadcast, self-stabilization, atomic commit. Prerequisites: CSE 221 or consent of instructor.

CSE 223B. Distributed Computing and Systems (4)
Efficient primitives for distributed operating systems and high-performance network servers, including concurrent and event-driven server architectures, remote procedure calls, and load shedding. Distributed naming, directory, and storage services, replication for fault tolerance, and security in distributed systems. Prerequisites: CSE 221, CSE 222A, or consent of instructor.

CSE 227. Computer Security (4)
Security and threat models, risk analysis, authentication and authorization, auditing, operating systems security, access control mechanisms, protection mechanisms, distributed systems/network security, security architecture, electronic commerce security mechanisms, security evaluation. Prerequisites: CSE 221 or consent of instructor.

CSE 229A. Topics/Seminar in Computer Systems (1–4)
Discussion on problems of current research interest in computer systems. Possible areas of focus include: distributed computing, computational grid, operating systems, fault-tolerant computing, storage systems, system services for the World Wide Web. Topics to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 229B. Topics/Seminar in Networks and Communication (1–4)
Discussion on problems of current research interest in computer networks and communication. Possible areas of focus include: wide-area networking, wireless networks, the Internet, computational grid, operating systems, fault-tolerant computing, storage systems. Topics to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 229C. Topics/Seminar in Computer Security (1–4)
Discussion on problems of current research interest in computer security. Topics to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 230. Principles of Programming Languages (4)
(Formerly CSE 273.) Functional versus imperative programming. Type systems and polymorphism; the ML language. Higher order functions, lazy evaluation. Abstract versus concrete syntax, structural and well-founded induction. The lambda calculus, reduction strategies, combinators. Denotational semantics, elementary domain theory. Prerequisites: CSE 130 or equivalent, or consent of instructor.

CSE 231. Advanced Compiler Design (4)
(Formerly CSE 264C.) Advanced material in programming languages and translator systems. Topics include compilers, code optimization, and debugging interpreters. Prerequisites: CSE 100, 131A–B, or consent of instructor.

CSE 232. Principles of Database Systems (4)
(Formerly CSE 264D.) Database models including relational, hierarchic, and network approaches. Implementation of databases including query languages and system architectures. Prerequisites: CSE 100 or consent of instructor.

CSE 232B. Database System Implementation (4)
A hands-on approach to the principles of databases implementation. Algebraic rewriters/optimizers, query processors, triggers. Beyond centralized relational databases. Prerequisites: CSE 232.

CSE 233. Database Theory (4)
Theory of databases. Theory of query languages, dependency theory, deductive databases, incomplete information, complex objects, object-oriented databases, and more. Connections to logic and complexity theory including finite model theory and descriptive complexity. Prerequisites: CSE 200.

CSE 237A. Introduction to Embedded Computing (4)
Embedded system technologies including processors, DSP, memory, and software. System interfacing basics, communication strategies, sensors, and actuators. Mobile and wireless technology in embedded systems. Using predesigned hardware and software components. Design case studies in wireless, multimedia, and/or networking domains. Prerequisites: basic courses in digital hardware, algorithms and data structures, elementary calculus, and probability; or consent of instructor.

CSE 237B. Software for Embedded Systems (4)
Embedded computing elements, device interfaces, time-critical IO handling. Embedded software design under size, performance, and reliability constraints. Software timing and functional validation. Programming methods and compilation for embeddable software. Embedded runtime systems. Case studies of real-time software systems. Prerequisites: CSE 237A; or basic courses in programming, algorithms and data structures, elementary calculus, discrete math, computer architecture; or consent of instructor.

CSE 237C. Validation and Testing of Embedded Systems (4)
Embedded system building blocks including IP cores. Cosimulation. Formal verification using model checking. Verification environments. Test challenges in core integration: compliance, feature, random, and collision testing. Core access and test integration. Interface-based verification and standards. Prerequisites: CSE 237A; or basic courses in algorithms and data structures, elementary calculus, discrete math, symbolic logic, computer architecture; or consent of instructor.

CSE 237D. Design Automation and Prototyping for Embedded Systems (4)
System representation and modeling. Abstract and language models. Simulation as a modeling activity. Computational and hw/sw system prototypes. System analysis using models. Constraint and interface modeling. Behavioral compilation and synthesis. Prerequisites: CSE 237A; or basic courses in digital logic design, algorithms and data structures, elementary calculus, discrete math, symbolic logic, computer architecture; or consent of instructor.

CSE 239A. Topics/Seminar in Databases (1–4)
Discussion on problems of current research interest in databases. Possible areas of focus include: core database issues, data management on the web, data integration, new database models and applications, formal methods in databases. Topics to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 240A. Principles of Computer Architecture (4)
(Formerly CSE 240.) This course will cover fundamental concepts in computer architecture. Topics include instruction set architecture, pipelining, pipeline hazards, bypassing, dynamic scheduling, branch prediction, superscalar issue, memory-hierarchy design, advanced cache architectures, and multiprocessor architecture issues. Prerequisites: CSE 141 or consent of instructor.

CSE 240B. Parallel Computer Architecture (4)
This course covers advanced topics in parallel computer architecture, including on-chip and off-chip interconnection networks, cache coherence, cache consistency, hardware multithreading, multi-core and tiled architectures. It incorporates the latest research and development on parallel architectures and compilation techniques for those architectures. CSE 240A recommended. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

CSE 240C. Advanced Microarchitecture (4)
This course covers advanced topics in computer architecture. It incorporates the latest research and development on topics such as branch prediction, instruction-level parallelism, cache hierarchy design, speculative multithreading, reliable architectures, and power-management techniques. CSE 240A recommended. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

CSE 240D. Application Specific Processors (4)
This course covers advanced topics in design concepts and implementation principles of application specific processors, including embedded system design principles and application specific processors, application specific instruction set processors, domain specific processor architectures, embedded memories and dynamically customizable processors. CSE 240A recommended. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

CSE 241A/ECE 260B. VLSI Integration of Computing Circuitry (4)
VLSI integrated-circuit building blocks of computing systems, and their implementation. Computer-aided design and performance simulations, design exercises and projects. Devices, standard cells and interconnects, clocking, power/ground distribution, arithmetic modules, memories. Methodologies and tradeoffs in system implementation. Prerequisites: layout (CSE 165 or ECE 260A) and logic design (CSE 140 or ECE 111), or consent of instructor.

CSE 242A. Integrated Circuit Layout Automation (4)
Couplings among timing, circuits and spatial embedding in nanometer-scale CMOS design. The role, and key problems, of physical layout in IC implementation. Example topics: RTL-to-GDSII methodologies, analyses and estimations, partitioning, floor planning, placement, routing, special net routing, cell generation, compaction. Prerequisites: CSE 241A or consent of instructor.

CSE 243A. Introduction to Synthesis Methodologies in VLSI CAD (4)
Hardware software co-design, architectural level synthesis, control synthesis and optimization, scheduling, binding, register and bus sharing, interconnect design, module selection, combinational logic optimization, state minimization, state encoding, and retiming. Prerequisites: none.

CSE 244A. VLSI Test (4)
Design for test, testing economics, defects, failures and faults, fault models, fault simulation, automatic test pattern generation, functional testing, memory, PLA, FPGA, microprocessor test, and fault diagnosis. Prerequisites: none.

CSE 245. Computer Aided Circuit Simulation and Verification (4)
This course is about the computer algorithms, techniques, and theory used in the simulation and verification of electrical circuits. Prerequisites: CSE 241A or consent of instructor.

CSE 247. Application Specific and Reconfigurable Computer Architecture (4)
This course covers architecture concepts used to tailor processors to a specific application or sets of applications. It covers Field-Programmable Gate Arrays (FPGAs), various forms of Application Specific Integrated Circuit (ASIC) designs, Application Specific Integrated Processors (ASIP), and augmenting customizable VHDL cores. Prerequisites: CSE 241A or consent of instructor.

CSE 248. Algorithmic and Optimization Foundations for VLSI CAD (4)
Algorithmic techniques and optimization frameworks for large-scale, difficult optimizations. Primal-dual multicommodity flow approximations, approximations for geometric and graph Steiner formulations, continuous placement optimization, heuristics for Boolean satisfiability, multilevel methods, semidefinite programming, and application to other formulations (e.g., scheduling). Prerequisites: CSE 241A or CSE 242A, or consent of instructor.

CSE 249A. Topics/Seminar in Computer Architecture (1–4)
Topics of special interest in computer architecture to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 249B. Topics/Seminar in VLSI (1–4)
Topics of special interest in VLSI to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 249C. Topics/Seminar in CAD (1–4)
Topics of special interest in CAD to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 250A. Principles of Artificial Intelligence: Probabilistic Reasoning and Learning (4)
Methods based on probability theory for reasoning and learning under uncertainty. Content may include directed and undirected probabilistic graphical models, exact and approximate inference, latent variables, expectation-maximization, hidden Markov models, Markov decision processes, applications to vision, robotics, speech, and/or text. Recommended preparation: CSE 103 or similar course. Prerequisites: graduate standing in CSE or consent of instructor.

CSE 250B. Principles of Artificial Intelligence: Learning Algorithms (4)
Algorithms for supervised and unsupervised learning from data. Content may include maximum likelihood; log-linear models, including logistic regression and conditional random fields; nearest neighbor methods; kernel methods; decision trees; ensemble methods; optimization algorithms; topic models; neural networks; and backpropagation.Recommended preparation: CSE 103 or similar course. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

CSE 250C. Machine Learning Theory (4)
Theoretical foundations of machine learning. Topics include concentration of measure, the PAC model, uniform convergence bounds, and VC dimension. Possible topics include online learning, learning with expert advice, multiarmed bandits, and boosting. Recommended preparation: CSE 103 and CSE 101 or similar course. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

CSE 252A. Computer Vision I (4)
Comprehensive introduction to computer vision providing broad coverage including low-level vision (image formation, photometry, color, image feature detection), inferring 3-D properties from images (shape-from shading, stereo vision, motion interpretation) and object recognition. Companion to CSE 252B covering complementary topics. Prerequisites: Math 10D and Math 20A–F or equivalent.

CSE 252B. Computer Vision II (4)
Comprehensive introduction to computer vision providing focused coverage of multiview geometry, structure from motion, image segmentation, motion segmentation, texture analysis and recognition, object detection, and image-based rendering. Companion to CSE 252A covering complementary topics. Prerequisites: Math 10D and Math 20A–F or equivalent.

CSE 252C. Selected Topics in Vision and Learning (1–4)
Selected topics in computer vision and statistical pattern recognition, with an emphasis on recent developments. Possible topics include: grouping and segmentation, object recognition and tracking, multiple view geometry, kernel-based methods, dimensionality reduction, and mixture models. Prerequisites: CSE 252 or equivalent and CSE 250B or equivalent.

CSE 254. Statistical Learning (4)
Learning algorithms based on statistics. Possible topics include minimum-variance unbiased estimators, maximum likelihood estimation, likelihood ratio tests, resampling methods, linear logistic regression, feature selection, regularization, dimensionality reduction, manifold detection. An upper-division undergraduate course on probability and statistics such as Math 183 or 186, or any graduate course on statistics, pattern recognition, or machine learning is recommended. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

CSE 255. Data Mining and Predictive Analytics (4)
Learning methods for applications. Content may include data preparation, regression and classification algorithms, support vector machines, random forests, class imbalance, overfitting, decision theory, recommender systems and collaborative filtering, text mining, analyzing social networks and social media, protecting privacy, A/B testing. Recommended preparation: CSE 103 or similar. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

CSE 256/LING 256. Statistical Natural Language Processing (4)
Introduction to modern statistical approaches to natural language processing: part-of-speech tagging, word-sense disambiguation and parsing, using Markov models, hidden Markov models and probabilistic context-free grammars. Recommended: one of LIGN 165, LIGN 245, CSE 151, CSE 250A, CSE 254. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

CSE 258A. Cognitive Modeling (4)
Connectionist models and a sampling of other cognitive modeling techniques. Models of language processing, memory, sequential processes, and vision. Areas covered may vary depending on student and faculty interests. Can be repeated for credit. CSE 151 or CSE 250B or CSE 253 or CSE 254, or equivalent experience recommended. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

CSE 259. Seminar in Artificial Intelligence (1)
A weekly meeting featuring local (and occasional external) speakers discussing their current research in Artificial Intelligence Neural Networks, and Genetic Algorithms. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: none.

CSE 259C. Topics/Seminar in Machine Learning (1–4)
Topics of special interest in machine learning to be presented by faculty and students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 260. Parallel Computation (4)
(Formerly CSE 274A.) This course provides an overview of parallel hardware, algorithms, models, and software. Topics include Flynn’s taxonomy, interconnection networks, memory organization, a survey of commercially available multiprocessors, parallel algorithm paradigms and complexity criteria, parallel programming environments and tools for parallel debugging, language specification, mapping, performance, etc. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

CSE 262. System Support for Applications of Parallel Computation (4)
This course will explore design of software support for applications of parallel computation. Topics include: programming languages, run time support, portability, and load balancing. The course will terminate in a project. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 272. Advanced Image Synthesis (4)
Computer graphics techniques for creating realistic images. Topics include ray tracing, global illumination, subsurface scattering, and participating media. CSE 168 or equivalent recommended.

CSE 274. Selected Topics in Graphics (2–4)
Selected topics in computer graphics, with an emphasis on recent developments. Possible topics include computer animation, shape modeling and analysis, image synthesis, appearance modeling, and real-time rendering. CSE 168 or CSE 169 recommended. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

CSE 280A. Algorithms in Computational Biology (4)
(Formerly CSE 206B.) The course focuses on algorithmic aspects of modern bioinformatics and covers the following topics: computational gene hunting, sequencing, DNA arrays, sequence comparison, pattern discovery in DNA, genome rearrangements, molecular evolution, computational proteomics, and others. Prerequisites: CSE 202 preferred or consent of instructor.

CSE 282/BENG 202. Bioinformatics II: Sequence and Structure Analysis—Methods and Applications (4)
(Formerly CSE 257A/BENG 202.) Introduction to methods for sequence analysis. Applications to genome and proteome sequences. Protein structure, sequence-structure analysis. Prerequisites: Pharm 201 or consent of instructor.

CSE 283/BENG 203. Bioinformatics III: Functional Genomics (4)
Annotating genomes, characterizing functional genes, profiling, reconstructing pathways. Prerequisites: Pharm 201, BENG 202/CSE 282, or consent of instructor.

CSE 290. Seminar in Computer Science and Engineering (1–4)
(Formerly CSE 280A.) A seminar course in which topics of special interest in computer science and engineering will be presented by staff members and graduate students under faculty direction. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated for credit. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Offered as faculty resources permit.)

CSE 291. Topics in Computer Science and Engineering (1–4)
Topics of special interest in computer science and engineering. Topics may vary from quarter to quarter. May be taken for credit nine times with the consent of instructor. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) (Offered as faculty resources permit.)

CSE 292. Faculty Research Seminar (1)
(Formerly CSE 282.) Computer science and engineering faculty will present one-hour seminars of the current research work in their areas of interest. Prerequisites: CSE graduate status.

CSE 293. Special Project in Computer Science and Engineering (1–12)
The student will conceive, design, and execute a project in computer science under the direction of a faculty member. The project will typically include a large programming or hardware design task, but other types of projects are possible. Prerequisites: CSE graduate student status. (CS 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81) (S/U grades only.)

CSE 294. Research Meeting in CSE (2)
Advanced study and analysis of active research in computer science and computer engineering. Discussion of current research and literature in the research specialty of the staff member teaching the course. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 298. Independent Study (1–16)
Open to properly qualified graduate students who wish to pursue a problem through advanced study under the direction of a member of the staff. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CSE 299. Research (1–16)
Research. Prerequisites: consent of faculty.

CSE 500. Teaching Assistantship (2–4)
A course in which teaching assistants are aided in learning proper teaching methods by means of supervision of their work by the faculty: handling of discussions, preparation and grading of examinations and other written exercises, and student relations. May be used to meet teaching experience requirement for candidates for the PhD degree. Number of units for credit depends on number of hours devoted to class or section assistance. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of instructor.

CSE 599. Teaching Methods in Computer Science (2)
Training in teaching methods in the field of computer science. This course examines theoretical and practical communication and teaching techniques particularly appropriate to computer science. Prerequisites: consent of faculty.

AESE 278A. Complexity and Large-Scale Systems (4)
Comprehensive introduction to system and event complexity, software and systems engineering practices for complexity management, agile and plan-driven development, development and management processes and process models, data-, information- and knowledge-management, basics of distributed data and computation. This course will meet from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. every alternating Friday and Saturday. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE or instructor approval. AESE 278A is cross-listed with CSE 278A, ECE 205A, and MAE 277A.

AESE 278B. Enterprise Architecting (4)
Architectural foundations, frameworks, standards, and infrastructures with an emphasis on layered architectures, loose coupling, architecture evolution, service- and component-oriented architectures, enterprise service buses, metadata and information virtualization, ontologies, Semantic Web, policy and governance, service-level agreements, information assurance essentials. This course will meet from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. every alternating Friday and Saturday. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE, MGT 291, MGT 406, and AESE 278A or MAE 277A or ECE 205 or CSE 278A or instructor approval.

AESE 278C. Modeling, Simulation, and Analysis (4)
Model-driven architecture and development concepts, business process and workflow modeling, structured analysis and IDEF modeling methods, object-, component- and service-orientation and the Unified Modeling Language, event- and stream models, colored Petri Nets, executable architectures, distributed simulation for performance analysis. This course will meet from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. every alternating Friday and Saturday. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE, MGT 291, AESE 278A, AESE 278B or instructor approval. AESE 278C is cross-listed with CSE 278C, ECE 206, and MAE 278A.

AESE 278D. Engineering Essentials for Open, Distributed Systems (4)
Engineering tools and their use in defining the layered and service-oriented architectures, Unified Modeling Language and enterprise architecture tools, business and process modeling tools, visualization methods, data and information management tools, comprehensive domain modeling, architecture implementation via enterprise service buses. This workshop course meets once a quarter from Wednesday to Saturday from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. for more intensive interaction. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE, AESE 278A (or CSE 278A or ECE 205A or MAE 277A), AESE 278C (or CSE 278C or ECE 206 or MAE 278A) or instructor approval.

AESE 278E. Patterns for Enterprise Architecting (4)
Fundamental aspects of pattern methodologies and re-use, requirements, design and architecture patterns, patterns for service-oriented architectures, enterprise application and integration patterns, E-business patterns, event-driven architectures and patterns for complex event processing, process patterns, architecture evolution and refactoring using patterns. This course will meet from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. every alternating Friday and Saturday. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE, AESE 278B, AESE 278C, AESE 278D or instructor approval.

AESE 241. Decision and Risk Analysis (4)
Focuses on analytic techniques supporting rational business decision making, providing systematic approaches to complex decision situations. Addresses analysis of conflicting objectives and use of tools such as value trees, decision trees, influence diagrams, and value hierarchies, Bayesian networks, and data mining. This course will meet from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. every alternating Friday and Saturday. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE, or permission of the instructor. AESE 241 is cross-listed with MGT 241.

AESE 261. Managing Stakeholder Relationships (4)
Addresses critical processes and frameworks required to build effective business relationships internally and externally. Focuses on the skills required by functional or technical leaders to envision strategic value and create business development strategies aligned with organizational needs. This workshop meets once a quarter from Wednesday to Saturday from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. for more intensive interaction. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE, MGT 406 or permission of the instructor. AESE 261 is cross-listed with MGT 261.

AESE 279A. Architecture-based Enterprise Systems Engineering Quarterly Team Project (1)
Students will work collaboratively on a team project, mostly in a lab setting, to demonstrate their knowledge of leadership teams and enterprise architecting for complex systems. Students are required to take three instances of AESE 279A before they can take AESE 279B (the final for the team project). Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE.

AESE 279B. Architecture-based Enterprise Systems Engineering Capstone Team Project (3)
Students will work collaboratively on a team project, mostly in a lab setting, to demonstrate their grasp of the material in the entire project sequence. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE; three instances of AESE 279A successfully completed prior to this class; department approval required.

 
UC San Diego 9500 Gilman Dr., La Jolla, CA 92093

ECE 5. Introduction to Electrical and Computer Engineering (4)
An introduction to electrical and computer engineering. Topics include circuit theory, assembly, and testing, embedded systems programming and debugging, transducer mechanisms and interfacing transducers, signals and systems theory, digital signal processing, and modular design techniques. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: priority enrollment given to engineering majors EC04, EC26, EC27, EC28 and EC37.

ECE 15. Engineering Computation (4)
Students learn the C programming language with an emphasis on high-performance numerical computation. The commonality across programming languages of control structures, data structures, and I/O is also covered. Techniques for using Matlab to graph the results of C computations are developed. Prerequisites: a familiarity with basic mathematics such as trigonometry functions and graphing is expected but this course assumes no prior programming knowledge.

ECE 16. Rapid Hardware and Software Design for Interfacing with the World (4)
Students are introduced to embedded systems concepts with structured development of a computer controller based on electromyogram (EMG) signals through four lab assignments through the quarter. Key concepts include: sampling, signal processing, communication, and real-time control. Students will apply their prior knowledge in C (from ECE15) to program microcontrollers and will engage in data analysis using the Python programming language. Prerequisites: ECE 15. Priority enrollment given to engineering majors EC04, EC26, EC27, EC28 and EC37.

ECE 25. Introduction to Digital Design (4)
This course emphasizes digital electronics. Principles introduced in lectures are used in laboratory assignments, which also serve to introduce experimental and design methods. Topics include Boolean algebra, combination and sequential logic, gates and their implementation in digital circuits. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: none.

ECE 30. Introduction to Computer Engineering (4)
The fundamentals of both the hardware and software in a computer system. Topics include: representation of information, computer organization and design, assembly and microprogramming, current technology in logic design. Prerequisites: ECE 15 and 25 with grades of C– or better.

ECE 35. Introduction to Analog Design (4)
Fundamental circuit theory concepts, Kirchoff’s voltage and current laws, Thevenin’s and Norton’s theorems, loop and node analysis, time-varying signals, transient first order circuits, steady-state sinusoidal response. Math 20C and Phys 2B must be taken concurrently. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: Math 20A–B and Phys 2A.

ECE 45. Circuits and Systems (4)
Steady-state circuit analysis, first and second order systems, Fourier Series and Transforms, time domain analysis, convolution, transient response, Laplace Transform, and filter design. Prerequisites: ECE 35.

ECE 65. Components and Circuits Laboratory (4)
Introduction to linear and nonlinear components and circuits. Topics will include: two terminal devices, bipolar and field-effect transistors, and large and small signal analysis of diode and transistor circuits. (Program or material fee may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 35.

ECE 85. iTunes 101: A Survey of Information Technology (4)
Topics include how devices such as iPods and iPhones generate, transmit, receive and process information (music, images, video, etc.), the relationship between technology and issues such as privacy and “net-neutrality,” and current topics related to information technology. Prerequisites: none.

ECE 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. Prerequisites: none.

ECE 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
This seminar class will provide a broad review of current research topics in both electrical engineering and computer engineering. Typical subject areas are signal processing, VLSI design, electronic materials and devices, radio astronomy, communications, and optical computing. Prerequisites: none.

ECE 100. Linear Electronic Systems (4)
Linear active circuit and system design. Topics include frequency response; use of Laplace transforms; design and stability of filters using operational amplifiers. Integrated lab and lecture involves analysis, design, simulation, and testing of circuits and systems. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: ECE 45 and ECE 65. ECE 65 may be taken concurrently.  

ECE 101. Linear Systems Fundamentals (4)
Complex variables. Singularities and residues. Signal and system analysis in continuous and discrete time. Fourier series and transforms. Laplace and z-transforms. Linear Time Invariant Systems. Impulse response, frequency response, and transfer functions. Poles and zeros. Stability. Convolution. Sampling. Aliasing. Prerequisites: ECE 45 with grade of C– or better.

ECE 102. Introduction to Active Circuit Design (4)
Nonlinear active circuits design. Nonlinear device models for diodes, bipolar and field-effect transistors. Linearization of device models and small-signal equivalent circuits. Circuit designs will be simulated by computer and tested in the laboratory. Prerequisites: ECE 65 and ECE 100. ECE 100 can be taken concurrently. 

ECE 103. Fundamentals of Devices and Materials (4)
Introduction to semiconductor materials and devices. Semiconductor crystal structure, energy bands, doping, carrier statistics, drift and diffusion, p-n junctions, metal-semiconductor junctions. Bipolar junction transistors: current flow, amplification, switching, nonideal behavior. Metal-oxide-semiconductor structures, MOSFETs, device scaling. Prerequisites: ECE 65 and Phys 2D or Phys 4D and 4E.

ECE 107. Electromagnetism (4)
Electrostatics and magnetostatics; electrodynamics; Maxwell’s equations; plane waves; skin effect. Electromagnetics of transmission lines: reflection and transmission at discontinuities, Smith chart, pulse propagation, dispersion. Rectangular waveguides. Dielectric and magnetic properties of materials. Electromagnetics of circuits. Prerequisites: Phys 2A–D or 4A–E and ECE 45 with grades of C– or better.

ECE 108. Digital Circuits (4)
A transistor-level view of digital integrated circuits. CMOS combinational logic, ratioed logic, noise margins, rise and fall delays, power dissipation, transmission gates. Short channel MOS model, effects on scaling. Sequential circuits, memory and array logic circuits. Three hours of lecture, one hour of discussion, three hours of laboratory. Prerequisites: ECE 25 or CSE 140, 45, and 65 and ECE 30 or CSE 30.

ECE 109. Engineering Probability and Statistics (4)
Axioms of probability, conditional probability, theorem of total probability, random variables, densities, expected values, characteristic functions, transformation of random variables, central limit theorem. Random number generation, engineering reliability, elements of estimation, random sampling, sampling distributions, tests for hypothesis. Students who completed MAE 108, Math 180A–B, Math 183, Math 186, Econ 120A, or Econ 120AH will not receive credit for ECE 109. Prerequisites: Math 20A-B-C, 20D, 20F, with grades of C– or better. ECE 101 recommended.

ECE 111. Advanced Digital Design Project (4)
Advanced topics in digital circuits and systems. Use of computers and design automation tools. Hazard elimination, synchronous/asnychronous FSM synthesis, synchronization and arbitration, pipelining and timing issues. Problem sets and design exercises. A large-scale design project. Simulation and/or rapid prototyping. Prerequisites: ECE 25 or CSE 140.

ECE 115. Fast Prototyping (4)
Lab-based course. Students will learn how to prototype a mechatronic solution. Topics include: cheap/accessible materials and parts; suppliers; fast prototyping techniques; useful electronic sketches and system integration shortcuts. Students will learn to materialize their electromechanical ideas and make design decisions to minimize cost, improve functionality/robustness. Labs will culminate towards a fully functional robot prototype for demonstration. Prerequisites: ECE 16 or consent of instructor.

ECE 118. Computer Interfacing (4)
Interfacing computers and embedded controllers to the real world: busses, interrupts, DMA, memory mapping, concurrency, digital I/O, standards for serial and parallel communications, A/D, D/A, sensors, signal conditioning, video, and closed loop control. Students design and construct an interfacing project. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 30 or CSE 30 and ECE 35, 45, 65.

ECE 120. Solar System Physics (4)
General introduction to planetary bodies, the overall structure of the solar system, and space plasma physics. Course emphasis will be on the solar atmosphere, how the solar wind is produced, and its interaction with both magnetized and unmagnetized planets (and comets). Prerequisites: Phys 2A–C or 4A–D, Math 20A–B, 20C with grades of C– or better.

ECE 121. Energy Conversion (4)
Principles of electro-mechanical energy conversion, balanced three-phase systems, fundamental concepts of magnetic circuits, single-phase transformers, and the steady-state performance of DC and induction machines. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ECE 121A. Power Systems Analysis and Fundamentals (4)
This course introduces concepts of large-scale power system analysis: electric power generation, distribution, steady-state analysis and economic operation. It provides the fundamentals for advanced courses and engineering practice on electric power systems, smart grid, and electricity economics. The course requires implementing some of the computational techniques in simulation software. Prerequisites: ECE 35.

ECE 123. Antenna Systems Engineering (4)
The electromagnetic and systems engineering of radio antennas for terrestrial wireless and satellite communications. Antenna impedance, beam pattern, gain, and polarization. Dipoles, monopoles, paraboloids, phased arrays. Power and noise budgets for communication links. Atmospheric propagation and multipath. Prerequisites: ECE 107 with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 125A. Introduction to Power Electronics I (4)
Power generation, system, and electronics. Topics include power semiconductor devices and characteristics, single-phase and three-phase half and full controlled AC-to-DC rectifiers, nonisolated/isolated DC-DC converters, power loss calculation, and thermal considerations, Snubber circuits. Prerequisites: ECE 65.

ECE 125B. Introduction to Power Electronics II (4)
Design and control of DC-DC converters, PWM rectifiers, single-phase and three-phase inverters, power management, and power electronics applications in renewable energy systems, motion control, and lighting. Prerequisites: ECE 125A.

ECE 134. Electronic Materials Science of Integrated Circuits (4)
Electronic materials science with emphasis on topics pertinent to microelectronics and VLSI technology. Concept of the course is to use components in integrated circuits to discuss structure, thermodynamics, reaction kinetics, and electrical properties of materials. Prerequisites: Phys 2C–D with grades of C– or better.

ECE 135A. Semiconductor Physics (4)
Crystal structure and quantum theory of solids; electronic band structure; review of carrier statistics, drift and diffusion, p-n junctions; nonequilibrium carriers, imrefs, traps, recombination, etc; metal-semiconductor junctions and heterojunctions. Prerequisites: ECE 103 with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 135B. Electronic Devices (4)
Structure and operation of bipolar junction transistors, junction field-effect transistors, metal-oxide-semiconductor diodes and transistors. Analysis of dc and ac characteristics. Charge control model of dynamic behavior. Prerequisites: ECE 135A with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 136L. Microelectronics Laboratory (4)
Laboratory fabrication of diodes and field effect transistors covering photolithography, oxidation, diffusion, thin film deposition, etching and evaluation of devices. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 103.

ECE 138L. Microstructuring Processing Technology Laboratory (4)
A laboratory course covering the concept and practice of microstructuring science and technology in fabricating devices relevant to sensors, lab-chips and related devices. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing for science and engineering students.

ECE 145AL-BL-CL. Acoustics Laboratory (4-4-4)
Automated laboratory based on H-P GPIB controlled instruments. Software controlled data collection and analysis. Vibrations and waves in strings and bars of electromechanical systems and transducers. Transmissions, reflection, and scattering of sound waves in air and water. Aural and visual detection. Prerequisites: ECE 107 with a grade of C– or better or consent of instructor.

ECE 153. Probability and Random Processes for Engineers (4)
Random processes. Stationary processes: correlation, power spectral density. Gaussian processes and linear transformation of Gaussian processes. Point processes. Random noise in linear systems. Prerequisites: ECE 109 with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 154A. Communications Systems I (4)
Study of analog modulation systems including AM, SSB, DSB, VSB, FM, and PM. Performance analysis of both coherent and noncoherent receivers, including threshold effects in FM. Prerequisites: ECE 101 and 153 with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 154B. Communications Systems II (4)
Design and performance analysis of digital modulation techniques, including probability of error results for PSK, DPSK, and FSK. Introduction to effects of intersymbol interference and fading. Detection and estimation theory, including optimal receiver design and maximum-likelihood parameter estimation. Prerequisites: ECE 154A with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 154C. Communications Systems III (4)
Introduction to information theory and coding, including entropy, average mutual information, channel capacity, block codes and convolutional codes. Prerequisites: ECE 154B with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 156. Sensor Networks (4)
Characteristics of chemical, biological, seismic, and other physical sensors; signal processing techniques supporting distributed detection of salient events; wireless communication and networking protocols supporting formation of robust sensor fabrics; current experience with low power, low cost sensor deployments. Undergraduate students must take a final exam; graduate students must write a term paper or complete a final project. Cross-listed with MAE 149 and SIO 238. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor, or graduate student in science and engineering.

ECE 157A. Communications Systems Laboratory I (4)
Experiments in the modulation and demodulation of baseband and passband signals. Statistical characterization of signals and impairments. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 154A with a grade of C+ or better.

ECE 157B. Communications Systems Laboratory II (4)
Advanced projects in communication systems. Students will plan and implement design projects in the laboratory, updating progress weekly and making plan/design adjustments based upon feedback. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 154A with a grade of C+ or better.

ECE 158A. Data Networks I (4)
Layered network architectures, data link control protocols and multiple-access systems, performance analysis. Flow control; prevention of deadlock and throughput degradation. Routing, centralized and decentralized schemes, static dynamic algorithms. Shortest path and minimum average delay algorithms. Comparisons. Prerequisites: ECE 109 with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 158B. Data Networks II (4)
Layered network architectures, data link control protocols and multiple-access systems, performance analysis. Flow control; prevention of deadlock and throughput degradation. Routing, centralized and decentralized schemes, static dynamic algorithms. Shortest path and minimum average delay algorithms. Comparisons. Prerequisites: ECE 158A with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 161A. Introduction to Digital Signal Processing (4)
Review of discrete-time systems and signals, Discrete-Time Fourier Transform and its properties, the Fast Fourier Transform, design of Finite Impulse Response (FIR) and Infinite Impulse Response (IIR) filters, implementation of digital filters. Prerequisites: ECE 101.

ECE 161B. Digital Signal Processing I (4)
Sampling and quantization of baseband signals; A/D and D/A conversion, quantization noise, oversampling and noise shaping. Sampling of bandpass signals, undersampling downconversion, and Hilbert transforms. Coefficient quantization, roundoff noise, limit cycles and overflow oscillations. Insensitive filter structures, lattice and wave digital filters. Systems will be designed and tested with Matlab, implemented with DSP processors and tested in the laboratory. Prerequisites: ECE 161A with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 161C. Applications of Digital Signal Processing (4)
This course discusses several applications of DSP. Topics covered will include: speech analysis and coding; image and video compression and processing. A class project is required, algorithms simulated by Matlab. Prerequisites: ECE 161A.

ECE 163. Electronic Circuits and Systems (4)
Analysis and design of analog circuits and systems. Feedback systems with applications to operational amplifier circuits. Stability, sensitivity, bandwidth, compensation. Design of active filters. Switched capacitor circuits. Phase-locked loops. Analog-to-digital and digital-to-analog conversion. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 101 and 102 with grades of C– or better.

ECE 164. Analog Integrated Circuit Design (4)
Design of linear and nonlinear analog integrated circuits including operational amplifiers, voltage regulators, drivers, power stages, oscillators, and multipliers. Use of feedback and evaluation of noise performance. Parasitic effects of integrated circuit technology. Laboratory simulation and testing of circuits. Prerequisites: ECE 102 with a grade of C– or better. ECE 163 recommended.

ECE 165. Digital Integrated Circuit Design (4)
VLSI digital systems. Circuit characterization, performance estimation, and optimization. Circuits for alternative logic styles and clocking schemes. Subsystems include ALUs, memory, processor arrays, and PLAs. Techniques for gate arrays, standard cell, and custom design. Design and simulation using CAD tools. Prerequisites: ECE 102.

ECE 166. Microwave Systems and Circuits (4)
Waves, distributed circuits, and scattering matrix methods. Passive microwave elements. Impedance matching. Detection and frequency conversion using microwave diodes. Design of transistor amplifiers including noise performance. Circuits designs will be simulated by computer and tested in the laboratory. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 102 and 107 with grades of C– or better.

ECE 171A. Linear Control System Theory (4)
Stability of continuous- and discrete-time single-input/single-output linear time-invariant control systems emphasizing frequency domain methods. Transient and steady-state behavior. Stability analysis by root locus, Bode, Nyquist, and Nichols plots. Compensator design. Prerequisites: ECE 45 or MAE 140.

ECE 171B. Linear Control System Theory (4)
Time-domain, state-variable formulation of the control problem for both discrete-time and continuous-time linear systems. State-space realizations from transfer function system description. Internal and input-output stability, controllability/observability, minimal realizations, and pole-placement by full-state feedback. Prerequisites: ECE 171A with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 172A. Introduction to Intelligent Systems: Robotics and Machine Intelligence (4)
This course will introduce basic concepts in machine perception. Topics covered will include edge detection, segmentation, texture analysis, image registration, and compression. Prerequisites: ECE 101 with a grade of C– or better. ECE 109 recommended.

ECE 174. Introduction to Linear and Nonlinear Optimization with Applications (4)
The linear least squares problem, including constrained and unconstrained quadratic optimization and the relationship to the geometry of linear transformations. Introduction to nonlinear optimization. Applications to signal processing, system identification, robotics, and circuit design. Recommended preparation: ECE 100. Prerequisites: Math 20F or Math 18, ECE 15, and ECE 109 or consent of instructor.

ECE 175A. Elements of Machine Intelligence: Pattern Recognition and Machine Learning (4)
Introduction to pattern recognition and machine learning. Decision functions. Statistical pattern classifiers. Generative vs. discriminant methods for pattern classification. Feature selection. Regression. Unsupervised learning. Clustering. Applications of machine learning. Prerequisites: ECE 109 and ECE 174.

ECE 175B. Elements of Machine Intelligence: Probabilistic Reasoning and Graphical Models (4)
Bayes’ rule as a probabilistic reasoning engine; graphical models as knowledge encoders; conditional independence and D-Separation; Markov random fields; inference in graphical models; sampling methods and Markov Chain Monte Carlo (MCMC); sequential data and the Viterbi and BCJR algorithms; The Baum-Welsh algorithm for Markov Chain parameter estimation. Prerequisites: ECE 175A.

ECE 180. Topics in Electrical and Computer Engineering (4)
Topics of special interest in electrical and computer engineering. Subject matter will not be repeated so it may be taken for credit more than once. Prerequisites: consent of instructor; department stamp.

ECE 181. Physical Optics and Fourier Optics (4)
Ray optics, wave optics, beam optics, Fourier optics, and electromagnetic optics. Ray transfer matrix, matrices of cascaded optics, numerical apertures of step and graded index fibers. Fresnel and Fraunhofer diffractions, interference of waves. Gaussian and Bessel beams, the ABCD law for transmissions through arbitrary optical systems. Spatial frequency, impulse response and transfer function of optical systems, Fourier transform and imaging properties of lenses, holography. Wave propagation in various (inhomogeneous, dispersive, anisotropic or nonlinear) media. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 103 and 107 with grades of C– or better.

ECE 182. Electromagnetic Optics, Guided-Wave, and Fiber Optics (4)
Polarization optics: crystal optics, birefringence. Guided-wave optics: modes, losses, dispersion, coupling, switching. Fiber optics: step and graded index, single and multimode operation, attenuation, dispersion, fiber optic communications. Resonator optics. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 103 and 107 with grades of C– or better.

ECE 183. Optical Electronics (4)
Quantum electronics, interaction of light and matter in atomic systems, semiconductors. Laser amplifiers and laser systems. Photodetection. Electrooptics and acoustooptics, photonic switching. Fiber optic communication systems. Labs: semiconductor lasers, semiconductor photodetectors. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 103 and 107 with grades of C– or better.

ECE 184. Optical Information Processing and Holography (4)
(Conjoined with ECE 241AL) Labs: optical holography, photorefractive effect, spatial filtering, computer generated holography. Students enrolled in ECE 184 will receive four units of credit; students enrolled in ECE 241AL will receive two units of credit. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 182 with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 185. Lasers and Modulators (4)
(Conjoined with ECE 241BL) Labs: CO2 laser, HeNe laser, electrooptic modulation, acoustooptic modulation, spatial light modulators. Students enrolled in ECE 185 will receive four units of credit; students enrolled in ECE 241BL will receive two units of credit. (Course material and/or program fees may apply.) Prerequisites: ECE 183 with a grade of C– or better.

ECE 187. Introduction to Biomedical Imaging and Sensing (4)
Image processing fundamentals: imaging theory, image processing, pattern recognition; digital radiography, computerized tomography, nuclear medicine imaging, nuclear magnetic resonance imaging, ultrasound imaging, microscopy imaging. Prerequisites: Math 20A-B-F, 20C or 21C, 20D or 21D, Phys 2A–D, ECE 101 (may be taken concurrently) with grades of C– or better.

ECE 188. Topics in Electrical and Computer Engineering with Laboratory (4)
Topics of special interest in electrical and computer engineering with laboratory. Subject matter will not be repeated so it may be taken for credit up to three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ECE 190. Engineering Design (4)
Students complete a project comprising at least 50 percent or more engineering design to satisfy the following features: student creativity, open-ended formulation of a problem statement/specifications, consideration of alternative solutions/realistic constraints. Written final report required. Prerequisites: students enrolling in this course must have completed all of the breadth courses and one depth course. The department stamp is required to enroll in ECE 190. (Specifications and enrollment forms are available in the undergraduate office.)

ECE 191. Engineering Group Design Project (4)
Groups of students work to design, build, demonstrate, and document an engineering project. All students give weekly progress reports of their tasks and contribute a section to the final project report. Prerequisites: completion of all of the breadth courses and one depth course.

ECE 193H. Honors Project (4–8)
An advanced reading or research project performed under the direction of an ECE faculty member. Must contain enough design to satisfy the ECE program’s four-unit design requirement. Must be taken for a letter grade. May extend over two quarters with a grade assigned at completion for both quarters. Prerequisites: admission to the ECE departmental honors program.

ECE 195. Teaching (2 or 4)
Teaching and tutorial activities associated with courses and seminars. Not more than four units of ECE 195 may be used for satisfying graduation requirements. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of the department chair.

ECE 197. Field Study in Electrical and Computer Engineering (4, 8, 12, or 16)
Directed study and research at laboratories and observatories away from the campus. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor and approval of the department.

ECE 198. Directed Group Study (2 or 4)
Topics in electrical and computer engineering whose study involves reading and discussion by a small group of students under direction of a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECE 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
Independent reading or research by special arrangement with a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECE 200. Research Conference (2)
Group discussion of research activities and progress of group members. (Consent of instructor is strongly recommended.) (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 201. Introduction to Biophysics (4)
The class will cover fundamental physical principles of biological processes at the molecular, cellular, tissue and organ levels that are related to human physiology and diseases. Topics include energetics and dynamics of biological systems, physical factors of environment, and the kinetics of biological systems. Prerequisites: senior or graduate level standing.

ECE 202. Medical Devices and Interfaces (4)
This course will cover basic cellular and electrochemical processes, membrane potentials, ionic currents, nerve cell conductance, extracellular and intracellular stimulation, neural probe technology materials and devices, diagnostic and drug delivery devices, material/physiological considerations, biosensors, microfluids, optical, magnetic and electrical screening. Prerequisites: senior or graduate level standing.

ECE 203. Biomedical Integrated Circuits and Systems (4)
Integrated circuit analysis and design for medical devices. Introduction to subthreshold conduction in MOS transistor and its similarities to biomolecular transport. Design of instrumentation amplifiers, sensors, and electrical stimulation interfaces. Transcutaneous wireless power transfer and electromagnetic effects on tissue. Recommended preparation: ECE 164 or BENG 186B or equivalent. Prerequisites: senior or graduate level standing.

ECE 204. Statistical Learning in Bioinformatics (4)
A hallmark of bioinformatics is the computational analysis of complex data. The combination of statistics and algorithms produces statistical learning methods that automate the analysis of complex data. Such machine learning methods are widely used in systems biology and bioinformatics. This course provides an introduction to statistical learning and assumes familiarity with key statistical methods. Students may not receive credit for BNFO 285 and ECE 204 and BENG 285. Cross-listed with BNFO 285 and BENG 285. Prerequisites: ECE 271A or ECE 271B or Math 283; graduate standing.

ECE 212AN. Principles of Nanoscience and Nanotechnology (4)
Introduction to and rigorous treatment of electronic, photonic, magnetic, and mechanical properties of materials at the nanoscale. Concepts from mathematical physics, quantum mechanics, quantum optics, and electromagnetic theory will be introduced as appropriate. Students may not receive credit for both ECE 212A and ECE 212AN. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 212BN. Nanoelectronics (4)
Quantum states and quantum transport of electrons; single-electron devices; nanoelectronic devices and system concepts; introduction to molecular and organic electronics. Students may not receive credit for both ECE 212BN and ECE 212C. Prerequisites: ECE 212AN; graduate standing.

ECE 212CN. Nanophotonics (4)
Photonic properties of artificially engineered inhomogeneous nanoscale composite materials incorporating dielectrics, semiconductors, and/or metals. Near-field localization effects and applications. Device and component applications. Students may not receive credit for both ECE 212CN and 212B. Prerequisites: ECE 212BN; graduate standing.

ECE 222A. Antennas and Their System Applications (4)
Antennas, waves, polarization. Friis transmission and Radar equations, dipoles, loops, slots, ground planes, traveling wave antennas, array theory, phased arrays, impedance, frequency independent antennas, microstrip antennas, cell phone antennas, system level implications such as MIMO, multi-beam and phased array systems. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE107 or an equivalent undergraduate course in electromagnetics.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 222B. Applied Electromagnetic Theory—Electromagnetics (4)
Graduate-level introductory course on electromagnetic theory with applications. Topics covered include Maxwell’s equations, plane waves in free space and in the presence of interfaces, polarization, fields in metallic and dielectric waveguides including surface waves; fields in metallic cavities, Green’s functions, electromagnetic field radiation and scattering. Prerequisites: ECE 222A; graduate standing.

ECE 222C. Applied Electromagnetic Theory—Computational Methods for Electromagnetics (4)
Computational techniques for numerical analysis of electromagnetic fields, including the finite difference time domain (FDTD) method, finite difference frequency domain (FDFD) method, method of moments (MOM), and finite element method (FEM). Practice in writing numerical codes. Review of commercial electromagnetic simulators. Prerequisites: ECE 222B; graduate standing.

ECE 222D. Advanced Antenna Design (4)
Review of 222A–B. Fourier transform, waveguide antennas. Mutual coupling, active impedance, Floquet modes in arrays. Microstrip antennas, surface waves. Reflector and lens analysis: taper, spillover, aperture and physical optics methods. Impedance surfaces. Advanced concepts: Sub-wavelength propagation, etc. (chosen by instructor). (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 222A, ECE 222B, or equivalent.) Prerequisites: ECE 222C; graduate standing.

ECE 230A. Solid State Electronics I (4)
This course is designed to provide a general background in solid state electronic materials and devices. Course content emphasizes the fundamental and current issues of semiconductor physics related to the ECE solid state electronics sequences. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 135A–B or equivalent.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 230B. Solid State Electronics II (4)
Physics of solid-state electronic devices, including p-n diodes, Schottky diodes, field-effect transistors, bipolar transistors, pnpn structures. Computer simulation of devices, scaling characteristics, high frequency performance, and circuit models. Prerequisites: ECE 230A; graduate standing.

ECE 230C. Solid State Electronics III (4)
This course is designed to provide a treatise of semiconductor devices based on solid state phenomena. Band structures carrier scattering and recombination processes and their influence on transport properties will be emphasized. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 230A or equivalent.) Prerequisites: ECE 230B; graduate standing.

ECE 235. Nanometer-Scale VLSI Devices (4)
This course covers modern research topics in sub-100 nm scale, state-of-the-art silicon VLSI devices. Starting with the fundamentals of CMOS scaling to nanometer dimensions, various advanced device and circuit concepts, including RF CMOS, low power CMOS, silicon memory, silicon-on-insulator, SiGe bipolar, strained silicon MOSFET’s, etc. will be taught. The physics of nearballistic transport in an ultimately scaled 10 nm MOSFET will be discussed in light of the recently developed scattering theory. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 236A. III-V Compound Semiconductor Materials (4)
This course covers the growth, characterization, and heterojunction properties of III-V compound semiconductors and group-IV heterostructures for the subsequent courses on electronic and photonic device applications. Topics include epitaxial growth techniques, electrical properties of heterojunctions, transport and optical properties of quantum wells and superlattices. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 230A-B-C.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 236B. Optical Processes in Semiconductors (4)
Absorption and emission of radiation in semiconductors. Radiative transition and nonradiative recombination. Laser, modulators, and photodetector devices will be discussed. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 230A and ECE 230C or equivalent.) Prerequisites: ECE 236A; graduate standing.

ECE 236C. Heterojunction Field Effect Transistors (4)
The physics and circuit applications of heterojunction field effect transistors (HFETs) and heterojunction bipolar transistors (HBTs). Operating principles of FETs and BJTs are reviewed, and opportunities for improving their performance with suitable material choices and bandgap engineering are highlighted. SiGe and III-V HBTs, III-V FETs, and current research areas are covered. Microwave characteristics, models and representative circuit applications. Students who have already completed ECE 236C and/or D should not enroll in this course. Recommended preparation: ECE 230B or equivalent course with emphasis on physics of solid-state electronic devices. Prerequisites: ECE 236B; graduate standing.

ECE 238A. Thermodynamics of Solids (4)
The thermodynamics and statistical mechanics of solids. Basic concepts, equilibrium properties of alloy systems, thermodynamic information from phase diagrams, surfaces and interfaces, crystalline defects. . Cross-listed with Materials Science 201A and MAE 271A. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECE 238B. Solid State Diffusion and Reaction Kinetics (4)
Thermally activated processes. Boltzman factor, homogeneous and heterogeneous reactions, solid state diffusion, Fick’s law, diffusion mechanisms, Kirkendall effects, Boltzmann-Manato analysis, high diffusivity paths. Cross-listed with Materials Science 201B and MAE 271B. Prerequisites: ECE 238A.

ECE 240A. Lasers and Optics (4)
Fresnel and Fraunhofer diffraction theory. Optical resonators, interferometry. Gaussian beam propagation and transformation. Laser oscillation and amplification, Q-switching and mode locking of lasers, some specific laser systems. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 107 and ECE 182 or equivalent, introductory quantum mechanics or ECE 183.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 240B. Optical Information Processing (4)
Space-bandwidth product, superresolution, space-variant optical system, partial coherence, image processing with coherent and incoherent light, processing with feedback, real-time light modulators for hybrid processing, nonlinear processing. Optical computing and other applications. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 182 or equivalent.) Prerequisites: ECE 240A; graduate standing.

ECE 240C. Optical Modulation and Detection (4)
Propagation of waves and rays in anisotropic media. Electro-optical switching and modulation. Acousto-optical deflection and modulation. Detection theory. Heterodyne detection, incoherent and coherent detection. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 181, ECE 183 or equivalent.) Prerequisites: ECE 240B; graduate standing.

ECE 241A. Nonlinear Optics (4)
Second harmonic generation (color conversion), parametric amplification and oscillation, photorefractive effects and four-wave mixing, optical bistability; applications. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 240A, C.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 241B. Optical Devices for Computing. (4)
Application of electro-optic, magneto-optic, acousto-optic, and electro-absorption effects to the design of photonic devices with emphasis on spatial light modulation and optical storage techniques. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 240A–C.) Prerequisites: ECE 241A; graduate standing.

ECE 241C. Holographic Optical Elements (4)
Fresnel, Fraunhofer, and Fourier holography. Analysis of thin and volume holograms, reflection and transmission holograms, color and polarization holograms. Optically recorded and computer-generated holography. Applications to information storage, optical interconnects, 2-D and 3-D display, pattern recognition, and image processing. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 182 or equivalent.) Prerequisites: ECE 241B; graduate standing.

ECE 243B. Optical Fiber Communication (4)
Optical fibers, waveguides, laser communication system. Modulation and demodulation; detection processes and communication-receivers. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 240A-B-C or equivalent.) Prerequisites: ECE 243A; graduate standing.

ECE 244A. Statistical Optics (4)
Introduction to statistical phenomena in optics including first order properties of light waves generated from various sources. Coherence of optical waves, high-order coherence. Partial coherence and its effects on imaging systems. Imaging in presence of randomly inhomogeneous medium. Limits in photoelectric detection of light. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 240A–B.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 247A. Advanced BioPhotonics (4)
Basic physics and chemistry for the interaction of photons with matter, including both biological and synthetic materials; use of photonic radiation pressure for manipulation of objects and materials; advanced optoelectronic detection systems, devices and methods, including time resolved fluorescent and chemiluminescent methods, fluorescent energy transfer (FRET) techniques, quantum dots, and near-field optical techniques; underlying mechanisms of the light sensitive biological systems, including chloroplasts for photosynthetic energy conversion and the basis of vision processes. Cross-listed with BENG 247A and NANO 247A. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 247B. BioElectronics (4)
Topics to be covered will include photolithographic techniques for high-density DNA microarray production, incorporation of CMOS control into electronic DNA microarrays, direct electronic detection technology used in microarrays and biosensor devices, and focus on problems related to making highly integrated devices (lab-on-a-chip, in-vivo biosensors, etc.) from heterogeneous materials and components. Cross-listed with BENG 247B and NANO 247B. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 247C. BioNanotechnology (4)
Topics include: nanosensors and nanodevices for both clinical diagnostics and biowarfare (bioterror) agent detection; nanostructures for drug delivery; nanoarrays and nanodevices; use of nanoanalytical devices and systems; methods and techniques for modification or functionalization of nanoparticles and nanostructures with biological molecules; nanostructural aspects of fuel cells and bio-fuel cells; potential use of DNA and other biomolecules for computing and ultra-high-density data storage. Cross-listed with BENG 247C and NANO 247C. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 250. Random Processes (4)
Random variables, probability distributions and densities, characteristic functions. Convergence in probability and in quadratic mean, Stochastic processes, stationarity. Processes with orthogonal and independent increments. Power spectrum and power spectral density. Stochastic integrals and derivatives. Spectral representation of wide sense stationary processes, harmonizable processes, moving average representations. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 153.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 251A. Digital Signal Processing I (4)
Discrete random signals; conventional (FFT based) spectral estimation. Coherence and transfer function estimation; model-based spectral estimation; linear prediction and AR modeling. Levinson-Durbin algorithm and lattice filters, minimum variance spectrum estimation. Cross-listed with SIO 207B. SIO 207A is intended for graduate students who have not had an undergraduate course in DSP. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 153 in addition to either ECE 161 or 161A and SIO 207A or equivalent background.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 251B. Digital Signal Processing II (4)
Adaptive filter theory, estimation errors for recursive least squares and gradient algorithms, convergence and tracking analysis of LMD, RLS, and Kalman filtering algorithms, comparative performance of Weiner and adaptive filters, transversal and lattice filter implementations, performance analysis for equalization, noise cancelling, and linear prediction applications. Cross-listed with SIO 207C. Prerequisites: graduate standing; ECE 251A (for ECE 251B); SIO 207B (for SIO 207C).

ECE 251C. Filter Banks and Wavelets (4)
Fundamentals of multirate systems (Noble Identities, Polyphase representations), maximally decimated filter banks (QMF filters for 2-channels, M-channel perfect reconstruction systems), Paraunitary perfect reconstruction filter banks, the wavelet transform (Multiresolution, discrete wavelet transform, filter banks and wavelet). (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 161 or equivalent.) Prerequisites: ECE 251B; graduate standing.

ECE 251D. Array Processing (4)
The coherent processing of data collected from sensors distributed in space for signal enhancement and noise rejection purposes or wavefield directionality estimation. Conventional and adaptive beamforming. Matched field processing. Sparse array design and processing techniques. Applications to acoustics, geophysics, and electromagnetics. Cross-listed with SIO 207D. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 251A.) Prerequisites: graduate standing; ECE 251C (for ECE 251D); SIO 207C (for SIO 207D).

ECE 252A. Speech Compression (4)
Speech signals, production and perception, compression theory, high rate compression using waveform coding (PCM, DPCM, ADPCM, . . .), DSP tools for low rate coding, LPC vocoders, sinusoidal transform coding, multiband coding, medium rate coding using code excited linear prediction (CELP). (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 161A.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 252B. Speech Recognition (4)
Signal analysis methods for recognition, dynamic time warping, isolated word recognition, hidden Markov models, connected word, and continuous speech recognition. Prerequisites: ECE 252A; graduate standing.

ECE 253. Fundamentals of Digital Image Processing (4)
Image quantization and sampling, image transforms, image enhancement, image compression. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 109, 153, ECE 161, ECE 161A).

ECE 254. Detection Theory (4)
Hypothesis testing, detection of signals in white and colored Gaussian noise; estimation of signal parameters, maximum-likelihood detection; resolution of signals; detection and estimation of stochastic signals; applications to radar, sonar, and communications. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 153.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 255A. Information Theory (4)
Introduction to basic concepts, source coding theorems, capacity, noisy-channel coding theorem. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 154A-B-C.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 255B. Source Coding (4)
Theory and practice of lossy source coding, vector quantization, predictive and differential encoding, universal coding, source-channel coding, asymptotic theory, speech and image applications. Students that have taken 255BN cannot take 255B for credit. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 250, and 259A or 259AN) Prerequisites: ECE 255A; graduate standing.

ECE 255C. Network Information Theory (4)
The course aims to provide a broad coverage of key results, techniques, and open problems in network information theory. Topics include background (information measures and typical sequences, point-to-point communication) and single-hop networks (multiple access channels, degraded broadcast channels, interference channels, channels with state, general broadcast channels, Gaussian vector channels, distributed lossless source coding, source coding with side information). Prerequisites: ECE 250; ECE 255B; graduate standing.

ECE 257A. Multiuser Communication Systems (4)
Congestion control, convex programming and dual controller, fair end-end rate allocation, max-min fair vs. proportional fairness. Markov Chains and recurrence, Lyapunov-Foster theorem, rate stable switch scheduling, stable (back-pressure) routing versus minimum delay routing versus shortest path routing. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 257B. Principles of Wireless Networks (4)
This course will focus on the principles, architectures, and analytical methodologies for design of multiuser wireless networks. Topics to be covered include cellular approaches, call processing, digital modulation, MIMO technology, broadband networks, ad-hoc networks, and wireless packet access. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 159A and 154B, or equivalent.) Prerequisites: ECE 257A; graduate standing.

ECE 257C. Stochastic Wireless Networks Models (4)
Elements of spatial point processes. Spatial stochastic models of wireless networks. Topological structure, interference, stochastic dependencies. Elements of network information theory/statistical physics models of information flow. Role of signal propagation/random fading models. Decentralized operation, route discovery, architectural principles. Energy limitations/random failures. (Recommended prerequisites: previous exposure to stochastic processes and information theory.) Prerequisites: ECE 257B; graduate standing.

ECE 258A–B. Digital Communication (4-4)
Digital communication theory including performance of various modulation techniques, effects of inter-symbol interference, adaptive equalization, spread spectrum communication. Prerequisites: ECE 154A-B-C and ECE 254 or consent of instructor.

ECE 259A. Algebraic Coding (4)
Fundamentals of block codes, introduction to groups, rings and finite fields, nonbinary codes, cyclic codes such as BCH and RS codes, decoding algorithms, applications. Students who have taken ECE 259AN may not receive credit for ECE 259A. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 259B. Probabilistic Coding (4)
Convolutional codes, maximum-likelihood (ML) decoding, maximum a-posteriori (MAP) decoding, parallel and serial concatenation architectures, turbo codes, repeat-accumulate (RA) codes, the turbo principle, turbo decoding, graph-based codes, message-passing decoding, low-density parity check codes, threshold analysis, applications. Students who have taken ECE 259BN may not receive credit for ECE 259B. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 154A-B-C.) Prerequisites: ECE 259A; graduate standing.

ECE 259C. Advanced Topics in Coding (4)
Advanced topics in coding theory. Course contents vary by instructor. Example course topics: Coded-modulation for bandwidth-efficient data transmission; advanced algebraic and combinatorial coding theory; space-time coding for wireless communications; constrained coding for digital recording. Students who have taken ECE 259CN may not receive credit for ECE 259C. Prerequisites: ECE 259A–B; graduate standing.

ECE 260A. VLSI Digital System Algorithms and Architectures (4)
Custom and semi-custom VLSI design from both the circuit and system designer’s perspective. MOS transistor theory, circuit characterization, and performance estimation. CMOS logic design will be emphasized. Computer-aided design (CAD) tools for transistor level simulation, layout and verification will be introduced. (Recommended prerequisites: undergraduate-level semiconductor electronics and digital system design, ECE 165 or equivalent.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 260B. VLSI Integrated Circuits and Systems Design (4)
VLSI implementation methodology across block, circuit, and layout levels of abstraction. Circuit building blocks including embedded memory and clock distribution. Computer-aided design (synthesis, place-and-route, verification) and performance analyses, and small-group block implementation projects spanning RTL to tape-out using leading-edge EDA tools. Cross-listed with CSE 241A. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 165.) Prerequisites: ECE 260A; graduate standing.

ECE 260C. VLSI Advanced Topics (4)
Advanced topics in design practices and methodologies for modern system-on-chip design. Different design alternatives are introduced and analyzed. Advanced design tools are used to design a hardware-software system. Class discussion, participation, and presentations of projects and special topics assignments are emphasized. Prerequisites: ECE 260B; graduate standing.

ECE 264A. CMOS Analog Integrated Circuits and Systems I (4)
Frequency response of the basic CMOS gain stage and current mirror configurations. Advanced feedback and stability analysis; compensation techniques. High-Performance CMOS operational amplifier topologies. Analysis of noise and distortion. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 164 and ECE 153, or equivalent courses.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 264B. CMOS Analog Integrated Circuits and Systems II (4)
Nonideal effects and their mitigation in high-performance operational amplifiers. Switched-capacitor circuit techniques: CMOS circuit topologies, analysis and mitigation of nonideal effects, and filter synthesis. Overview of CMOS samplers, data converters, and PLLs. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 251A or ECE 251AN.) Prerequisites: ECE 264A; graduate standing.

ECE 264C. CMOS Analog Integrated Circuits and Systems III (4)
Integrated CMOS analog/digital systems: Analog to digital and digital to analog converters, Nyquist versus oversampling, linearity, jitter, randomization, calibration, speed versus resolution, pipeline, folding, interpolation, averaging. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 163 and 164.) Prerequisites: ECE 264B; graduate standing.

ECE 264D. CMOS Analog Integrated Circuits and Systems IV (4)
PLL: Phase noise effect, VCO, phase detector, charge pump, integer/fractional-N frequency synthesizer, clock and data recovery, decision feedback. Filter: Continuous-time filter, I-Q complex filter, raised-cosine, Gaussian, delay, zero equalizers. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 163 and 164.) Prerequisites: ECE 264C; graduate standing

ECE 265A. Communication Circuit Design I (4)
Introduction to noise and linearity concepts. System budgeting for optimum dynamic range. Frequency plan tradeoffs. Linearity analysis techniques. Down-conversion and up-conversion techniques. Modulation and demodulation. Microwave and RF system design communications. Current research topics in the field. Prerequisites: ECE 166 or consent of instructor.

ECE 265B. Communication Circuit Design II (4)
Radio frequency integrated circuits: low-noise amplifiers, AGCs, mixers, filters, voltage-controlled oscillators. BJT and CMOS technologies for radio frequency and microwave applications. Device modeling for radio frequency applications. Design and device tradeoffs of linearity, noise, power dissipation, and dynamic range. Current research topics in the field. Prerequisites: ECE 166 and ECE 265A or consent of instructor.

ECE 265C. Power Amplifiers for Wireless Communications (4)
Design of power amplifiers for mobile terminals and base-stations, with emphasis on high linearity and efficiency. After a discussion of classical designs (Class A, AB, B, C, D, E, F, and S), linearization procedures are presented and composite architectures (envelope tracking, EER, and Doherty) are covered. Familiarity with basic microwave design and communication system architecture is assumed. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 166.) Prerequisites: ECE 265A and B; consent of instructor.

ECE 267. Wireless Embedded and Networked Systems (4)
Study of wireless networked systems from a system design perspective, covering the protocol stack from physical to network layer with a focus on energy. Topics include digital communications, networking and programming, and a basic knowledge of these is recommended. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 268.  Security of Hardware Embedded Systems (4)
The course gives an overview of areas of security and protection of modern hardware, embedded systems, and IoTs. Covers essential cryptographic methodologies and blocks required for building a secure system. Topics include low overhead security, physical and side-channel attacks, physical security primitives, physical security and proofs of presence, hardware-based secure program execution, scalable implementation of secure functions, emerging technologies, and rising threats. Recommended preparation: Programming in a standard programming language. Undergraduate level knowledge of the IC design flow and digital designs. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 270A-B-C. Neurocomputing (4-4-4)
Neurocomputing is the study of biological information processing from an artificial intelligence engineering perspective. This three-quarter sequence covers neural network structures for arbitrary object (perceptual, motor, thought process, abstraction, etc.) representation, learning of pairwise object attribute descriptor antecedent support relationships, the general mechanism of thought, and situationally responsive generation of movements and thoughts. Experimental homework assignments strongly reinforce the fundamental concepts and provide experience with myriad associated technical issues. Prerequisites: graduate standing, an understanding of mathematics through basic linear algebra and probability, or consent of instructor.

ECE 271A. Statistical Learning I (4)
Bayesian decision theory; parameter estimation; maximum likelihood; the bias-variance trade-off; Bayesian estimation; the predictive distribution; conjugate and noninformative priors; dimensionality and dimensionality reduction; principal component analysis; Fisher’s linear discriminant analysis; density estimation; parametric vs. kernel-based methods; expectation-maximization; applications. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 109.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 271B. Statistical Learning II (4)
Linear discriminants; the Perceptron; the margin and large margin classifiers; learning theory; empirical vs. structural risk minimization; the VC dimension; kernel functions; reproducing kernel Hilbert spaces; regularization theory; Lagrangian optimization; duality theory; the support vector machine; boosting; Gaussian processes; applications. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 109.) Prerequisites: ECE 271A; graduate standing.

ECE 272A. Stochastic Processes in Dynamic Systems I (4)
Diffusion equations, linear and nonlinear estimation and detection, random fields, optimization of stochastic dynamic systems, applications of stochastic optimization to problems. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 250.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 272B. Stochastic Processes in Dynamic Systems II (4)
Continuous and discrete random processes, Markov models and hidden Markov models, Martingales, linear and nonlinear estimation. Applications in mathematical finance and real options. Prerequisites: ECE 272A; graduate standing.

ECE 273. Convex Optimization and Applications (4)
This course covers some convex optimization theory and algorithms. It will mainly focus on recognizing and formulating convex problems, duality, and applications in a variety of fields (system design, pattern recognition, combinatorial optimization, financial engineering, etc.). (Recommended prerequisites: basic linear algebra.)

ECE 275A. Parameter Estimation I (4)
Linear least Squares (batch, recursive, total, sparse, pseudoinverse, QR, SVD); Statistical figures of merit (bias, consistency, Cramer-Rao lower-bound, efficiency); Maximum likelihood estimation (MLE); Sufficient statistics; Algorithms for computing the MLE including the Expectation Maximation (EM) algorithm. The problem of missing information; the problem of outliers. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 109 and ECE 153.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 275B. Parameter Estimation II (4)
The Bayesian statistical framework; Parameter and state estimation of Hidden Markov Models, including Kalman Filtering and the Viterbi and Baum-Welsh algorithms. A solid foundation is provided for follow-up courses in Bayesian machine learning theory. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 153.) Prerequisites: ECE 275A; graduate standing.

ECE 279. Special Seminar (2)
A seminar course in which topics of special interest for electrical and computer engineering students will be presented. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 280. Special Topics in Electronic Devices and Materials/Applied Physics (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty at which topics of interest in electronic devices and materials or applied physics will be presented by visiting or resident faculty members. Subject matter will not be repeated, may be taken for credit more than once. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 281. Special Topics in Nanoscience/Nanotechnology (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty at which topics of interest in nanoscience and nanotechnology will be presented by visiting or resident faculty members. Subject matter will not be repeated, may be taken for credit more than once. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 282. Special Topics in Photonics/Applied Optics (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty at which topics of interest in photonics, optoelectronic materials, devices, systems, and applications will be presented by visiting or resident faculty members. Subject matter will not be repeated, may be taken for credit more than once. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 283. Special Topics in Electronic Circuits and Systems (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty at which topics of interest in electronic circuits and systems will be presented by visiting or resident faculty members. Subject matter will not be repeated, may be taken for credit more than once. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 284. Special Topics in Computer Engineering (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty at which topics of interest in computer engineering will be presented by visiting or resident faculty members. Subject matter will not be repeated, may be taken for credit more than once. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 285. Special Topics in Signal and Image Processing/Robotics and Control Systems (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty at which topics of interest in signal and image processing or robotics and control systems will be presented by visiting or resident faculty members. Subject matter will not be repeated, may be taken for credit more than once. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 286. State-of-the-Art Topics in Computational Statistics and Machine Learning (4)
Class discusses both fundamental and state-of-the-art research topics in computational statistics and machine learning. Topics vary based upon current research, and have included: nonparametric Bayesian models; sampling methods for inference in graphical models; Markov Chain Monte Carlo (MCMC) methods. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 287. Special Topics in Communication Theory and Systems (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty at which topics of interest in information science will be presented by visiting or resident faculty members. It will not be repeated so it may be taken for credit more than once. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 289. Special Topics in Electrical and Computer Engineering (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty at which general topics of interest in electrical and computer engineering will be presented by visiting or resident faculty members. May be taken for credit six times provided each course is a different topic. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 290. Graduate Seminar on Current ECE Research (2)
Weekly discussion of current research conducted in the Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering by the faculty members involved in the research projects. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 291. Industry Sponsored Engineering Design Project (4)
Design, build, and demonstrate an engineering project by groups. All students give weekly progress reports on tasks and write final report, with individual exams and presentations. Projects/sponsorships originate from the needs of local industry. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 230 or ECE 240 or ECE 251 or ECE 253 or ECE 258 or equivalent.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 293. Graduate Seminar in Communication Theory and Systems (2)
Weekly discussion of current research topics in communication theory and systems. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 294. Graduate Seminar in Electronic Devices and Materials/Applied Physics (2)
Weekly discussion of current research topics in electronic devices and materials or applied solid state physics and quantum electronics. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 295. Graduate Seminar in Signal and Image Processing/Robotics and Control Systems (2)
Weekly discussion of research topics in signal and image processing of robotics and control systems. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 296. Graduate Seminar in Photonics/Applied Optics (2)
Weekly discussion of current research topics in photonics and applied optics, including imaging, photonic communications, sensing, energy and signal processing. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 297. Graduate Seminar in Nanoscience/Nanotechnology (2)
Weekly discussion of current research topics in nanoscience and nanotechnology. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ECE 298. Independent Study (1–16)
Open to properly qualified graduate students who wish to pursue a problem through advanced study under the direction of a member of the staff. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

ECE 299. Research (1–16)
(S/U grades only.)

ECE 501. Teaching (1–4)
Teaching and tutorial activities associated with courses and seminars. Number of units for credit depends on number of hours devoted to class or section assistance. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of department chair.

MAE 02. Introduction to Aerospace Engineering (4)
An introduction to topics in aeronautical and astronautical engineering including aerodynamics, propulsion, flight mechanics, structures, materials, orbital mechanics, design, mission planning, and environments. General topics include historical background, career opportunities, engineering ethics, and professionalism. Must be taken for a letter grade. Prerequisites: none.

MAE 03. Introduction to Engineering Graphics and Design (4)
Introduction to design process through a hands-on design project performed in teams. Topics include problem identification, concept generation, project management, risk reduction. Engineering graphics and communication skills are introduced in the areas of: Computer-Aided Design (CAD), hand sketching, and technical communication. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in Phys 2A or 4A. Priority enrollment given to engineering majors.

MAE 05. Quantitative Computer Skills (4)
Introductory course for nonengineering majors. Use of computers in solving problems; applications from life sciences, physical sciences, and engineering. Students run existing computer programs and complete some programming in BASIC. Prerequisites: none.

MAE 07. Spatial Visualization (1)
(Cross-listed with SE 7.) Spatial visualization is the ability to manipulate 2-D and 3-D shapes in one's mind. In this course, students will perform exercises that increase their spatial visualization skills. P/NP grades only. Students may not receive credit for SE 7 and MAE 7. Prerequisites: none.

MAE 08. Matlab Programming for Engineering Analysis (4)
Computer programming in Matlab with elementary numerical analysis of engineering problems. Arithmetic and logical operations, arrays, graphical presentation of computations, symbolic mathematics, solutions of equations, and introduction to data structures. Prerequisites: Math 20A and 20B or consent of instructor.

MAE 20. Elements of Materials Science (4)
The structure of materials: metals, ceramics, glasses, semiconductors, superconductors, and polymers to produce desired, useful properties. Atomic structures. Defects in materials, phase diagrams, microstructural control. Mechanical and electrical properties are discussed. Time temperature transformation diagrams. Diffusion. Prerequisites: Phys 2A or 4A, Chem 6A or Chem 6AH, and Math 20C.

MAE 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. Prerequisites: none.

MAE 92A. Design Competition—Design, Build, and Fly Aircraft (1)
(Cross-listed with SE 10A.) Student teams design, build, and fly unmanned aircraft for a national student competition. Students concentrate on vehicle system design including aerodynamics, structures, propulsion, and performance. Teams engineering, fabricate the aircraft, submit a design report, and prep aircraft for competition. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 93. Design Competition—Design, Build, and Test Race Car (1)
Student teams design, build, and test a formula-style racing car for an international student competition. Students concentrate on vehicle system analysis and design, manufacturability, and performance. Teams engineer, fabricate car, submit a designreport, and prep car for competition. Prerequisites: department approval.

MAE 98. Directed Group Study (2)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular departmental curriculum. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Credit may not be received for a course numbered 97, 98, or 99 subsequent to receiving credit for a course numbered 197, 198, or 199. Prerequisites: department approval. 

MAE 99H. Independent Study (1)
Independent study or research under direction of a member of the faculty. Prerequisites: student must be of first-year standing and a Regent’s Scholar; approved Special Studies form.

MAE 101A. Introductory Fluid Mechanics (4)
Fluid statics; fluid kinematics; integral and differential forms of the conservation laws for mass, momentum, and energy; Bernoulli equation; potential flows; dimensional analysis and similitude. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in Phys 2A, Math 20D or 21D and Math 20E, or consent of instructor. Enrollment restricted to engineering majors only.

MAE 101B. Advanced Fluid Mechanics (4)
Laminar and turbulent flow. Pipe flow including friction factor. Boundary layers, separation, drag, and lift. Compressible flow including shock waves. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 101A or CENG 101A or CENG 103A, and MAE 110A or CENG 102, or consent of instructor.

MAE 101C. Heat Transfer (4)
Extension of fluid mechanics in MAE 101A–B to viscous, heat-conducting flows. Application of the energy conservation equation to heat transfer in ducts and external boundary layers. Heat conduction and radiation transfer. Heat transfer coefficients in forced and free convection. Design applications. Prerequisites: MAE 101A or CENG 101A or CENG 103A, MAE 101B, and MAE 105, or consent of instructor.

MAE 104. Aerodynamics (4)
Basic relations describing flow field around wings and bodies at subsonic and supersonic speed. Thin-wing theory. Slender-body theory. Formulation of theories for evaluating forces and moments on airplane geometries. Application to the design of high-speed aircraft. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 101A and 101B, or consent of instructor. Enrollment restricted to MC 25, MC 27, MC 28, and SE 27 majors only.

MAE 105. Introduction to Mathematical Physics (4)
Fourier series, Sturm Liouville theory, elementary partial differential equations, integral transforms with applications to problems in vibration, wave motion, and heat conduction. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in Phys 2A and B, and Math 20D or 21D. Enrollment restricted to engineering majors only.

MAE 107. Computational Methods in Engineering (4)
Introduction to scientific computing and algorithms; iterative methods, systems of linear equations with applications; nonlinear algebraic equations; function interpolation and differentiation and optimal procedures; data fitting and least-squares; numerical solution of ordinary differential equations. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 8 or 9, and Math 20F. Enrollment restricted to engineering majors only.

MAE 108. Probability and Statistical Methods for Mechanical and Environmental Engineering (4)
Probability theory, conditional probability, Bayes theorem, random variables, densities, expected values, characteristic functions, central limit theorem. Engineering reliability, elements of estimation, random sampling, sampling distributions, hypothesis testing, confidence intervals. Curve fitting anddata analysis. Prerequisites: Math 20F.

MAE 110A. Thermodynamics (4)
Fundamentals of engineering thermodynamics: energy, work, heat, properties of pure substances, first and second laws for closed systems and control volumes, gas mixtures. Application to engineering systems, power and refrigeration cycles, combustion. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in Phys 2C and Chem 6A. Enrollment restricted to engineering majors only.

MAE 110B. Thermodynamic Systems (4)
Thermodynamic analysis of power cycles with application to combustion driven engines: internal combustion, diesel, and gas turbines. Thermodynamics of mixtures and chemical and phase equilibrium. Computational methods for calculating chemical equilibrium. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in MAE 110A. Course not offered every year.

MAE 113. Fundamentals of Propulsion (4)
Compressible flow, thermodynamics, and combustion relevant to aircraft and space vehicle propulsion. Analysis and design of components for gas turbines, including turbines, inlets, combustion chambers and nozzles. Fundamentals of rocket propulsion. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 110A or CENG 102, and MAE 101A or CENG 101A, and MAE 101B or CENG 101C. Enrollment restricted to MC 25, MC 27, and MC 28 majors only.

MAE 117A. Elementary Plasma Physics (4)
(Cross-listed with Physics 151.) Particle motions, plasmas as fluids, waves, diffusion, equilibrium and stability, nonlinear effects, controlled fusion. Recommended preparation: Phys 100B–C or ECE 107. Prerequisites: Math 20D or 21D, or consent of instructor.

MAE 118. Introduction to Energy Systems (4)
Overview of present day primary energy sources and availability; fossil fuel, renewable, and nuclear; heat engines; energy conservation, transportation, air pollution, and climate change. Students may not receive credit for both MAE 118 and MAE 118A. Prerequisites: MAE 101A or CENG 101A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 119. Introduction to Renewable Energy: Solar and Wind (4)
Basic principles of solar radiation—diffuse and direct radiation; elementary solar energy engineering—solar thermal and solar photovoltaic; basic principles of wind dynamics—hydrodynamic laws, wind intermittency, Betz’s law; elementary wind energy engineering; solar and wind energy perspectives; operating the California power grid with 33 percent renewable energy sources. Students may not receive credit for both MAE 118B and MAE 119. Prerequisites: MAE 101A or CENG 101A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 120. Introduction to Nuclear Energy (4)
Overview of basic fission and fusion processes. Elementary fission reactor physics and engineering; environmental and waste disposal issues. Survey of fusion technology issues and perspectives. May not receive credit for both MAE 118C and MAE 120. Prerequisites: MAE 101A or CENG 101A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 121. Air Pollution Transport and Dispersion Modeling (4)
Overview of air pollution and wastes and their impact. Characteristics of air pollutants. Air pollution transport. Atmospheric stability. Plume rise and dispersion. Meteorological data. Selecting the appropriate air quality model and case studies. Modeling complex terrain situations. Current air quality modeling issues. Laws and regulations to control air pollution. Prerequisites: MAE 122 or 125A or consent of instructor.

MAE 122. Flow and Transport in the Environment (4)
Introduction to the air and aquatic environments. Buoyancy, stratification, and rotation. Earth surface energy balance. Introduction to the atmospheric boundary layer. Advection and diffusion. Turbulent diffusion and dispersion in rivers and in the atmospheric boundary layer. Surface waves and internal gravity waves. Prerequisites: MAE 101A or CENG 101A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 123. Introduction to Transport in Porous Media (4)
Introduction to groundwater flow. Pollution transport through the water table. Fundamentals of flow. Single- and multi-phase flow. Darcy law. Well hydraulics. Diffusion and dispersion. Gravity currents and plumes in porous media. Chemistry of fluid-solid interactions. Fundamentals of adsorption and surface reactions. Prerequisites: MAE 101C or CENG 101B, and MAE 105 and 107.

MAE 124. Environmental Challenges: Science and Solutions (4)
(Cross-listed with ESYS 103.) This course explores the impacts of human social, economic, and industrial activity on the environment. It highlights the central roles in ensuring sustainable development played by market forces, technological innovation and governmental regulation on local, national, and global scales. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in Math 20B or Math 10A–C, or consent of instructor.

MAE 126A. Environmental Engineering Laboratory (4)
Analysis of experiments in Environmental Engineering: Drag in a water tunnel, shading effects on solar photovoltaic, buoyant plume dispersion in a water tank, atmospheric turbulence, and others. Use of sensors and data acquisition. Laboratory report writing; error analysis; engineering ethics. Prerequisites: MAE 101A or CENG 101A; MAE 170 and MAE 122.

MAE 126B. Environmental Engineering Design (4)
Fundamental principles of environmental design. Building a working prototype or computer model for an environmental engineering application. Work in teams to propose and design experiments and components, obtain data, complete engineering analysis, and write a report. Engineering ethics and professionalism. Prerequisites: MAE 126A.

MAE 130A. Mechanics I: Statics (4)
(Cross-listed with SE 101A.) Statics of particles and rigid bodies in two and three dimensions. Free body diagrams. Internal forces. Static analysis of trusses, frames, and machines. Shear force and bending moment diagrams in beams. Equilibrium problems with friction. Students may not receive credit for both MAE 130A and SE 101A. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in Math 20C and Phys 2A. Students cannot also receive credit for SE 101A.

MAE 130B. Mechanics II: Dynamics (4)
(Cross-listed with SE101B.) Kinematics and kinetics of particles in 2-D and 3-D motion. Newton’s equations of motion. Energy and momentum methods. Impulsive motion and impact. Systems of particles. Kinematics and kinetics of rigid bodies in 2-D. Introduction to 3-D dynamics of rigid bodies. Students may not receive credit for both MAE 130B and SE 101B. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in MAE 130A or SE 101A.

MAE 130C. Mechanics III: Vibrations (4)
(Cross-listed with SE 101C.) Free and forced vibrations of undamped and damped single degree of freedom systems. Harmonically excited vibrations. Vibrations under general loading conditions. Vibrating systems with multiple degrees of freedom. Modal analysis with application to realistic engineering problems. Vibration of continuous systems. Students may not receive credit for both MAE 130C and SE 101C. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in Math 20F and MAE 130B or SE 101B.

MAE 131A. Solid Mechanics I (4)
(Cross-listed with SE 110A.) Students may not receive credit for SE 110A or MAE 131A and SE 110A/MAE 131A. Concepts of stress and strain. Hooke’s Law. Axial loading of bars. Torsion of circular shafts. Shearing and normal stresses in beam bending. Deflections in beams. Statically determinate and indeterminate problems. Combined loading. Principal stresses and design criteria. Buckling of columns. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in Math 20D, and MAE 130A or SE 101A.

MAE 131B. Fundamentals of Solid Mechanics II (4)
Continuous mechanics of solids and its application to the mechanical response of machine and structural elements. Stress and strain in indicial notation; field equations and constitutive relations. Linear elastic stress analysis in torsion, plane stress and plane strain; stress concentrations; fracture mechanics. Extremum principles and structural stability. Viscoelasticity, plasticity, and failure criteria. Theorems of plastic limit analysis. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 131A or SE 110A, and MAE 105. Enrollment restricted to engineering majors only.

MAE 133. Finite Element Methods in Mechanical and Aerospace Engineering (4)
Development of stiffness and mass matrices based upon variational principles and application to static, dynamic, and stability design problems in structural and solid mechanics. Architecture of computer codes for linear and nonlinear finite element analysis and basic computer implementation. The use of general purpose finite element structural analysis computer codes. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in MAE 131A or SE 110A. (Not offered every year.)

MAE 140. Linear Circuits (4)
Steady-state and dynamic behavior of linear, lumped-parameter electrical circuits. Kirchoff’s laws. RLC circuits. Node and mesh analysis. Operational amplifiers. Signal acquisition and conditioning. Electric motors. Design applications in engineering. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in Math 20D or 21D, 20F, and Phys 2B. Enrollment restricted to engineering majors only.

MAE 142. Dynamics and Control of Aerospace Vehicles (4)
The dynamics of vehicles in space or air are derived for analysis of the stability properties of spacecraft and aircraft. The theory of flight, lift, drag, dutch roll and phugoid modes of aircraft are discussed. Optimal state space control theory for the design of analog and digital controllers (autopilots). Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 104 and MAE 143B or ECE 171A, or consent of instructor. Enrollment restricted to engineering majors only.

MAE 143A. Signals and Systems (4)
Dynamic modeling and vector differential equations. Concepts of state, input, output. Linearization around equilibria. Laplace transform, solutions to ODEs. Transfer functions and convolution representation of dynamic systems. Discrete signals, difference equations, z-transform. Continuous and discrete Fourier transform. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in Math 20D or 21D, Math 20E, Math 20F, and MAE 105, or consent of instructor.

MAE 143B. Linear Control (4)
Analysis and design of feedback systems in the frequency domain. Transfer functions. Time response specifications. PID controllers and Ziegler-Nichols tuning. Stability via Routh-Hurwitz test. Root locus method. Frequence response: Bode and Nyquist diagrams. Dynamic compensators, phase-lead and phase-lag. Actuator saturation and integrator wind-up. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in MAE 143A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 143C. Digital Control Systems (4)
Discrete time systems: sampling, aliasing, stability, Z-transform, discrete time signals, state space models; state equations, canonical forms, observability, controllability. Pole placement design, observer design, output feedback, linear quadratic regulator design. Implementation: digital approximation, computational and numerical issues. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in MAE 143B.

MAE 144. Embedded Control and Robotics (4)
Each student builds, models, programs, and controls an unstable robotic system built around a small Linux computer. Review/synthesis of: A) modern physical and electrical CAD. B) dynamics, signals and systems, linear circuits; PWMs, H-bridges, quadrature encoders. C) embedded Linux, C, graphical programming; multithreaded applications; bus communication to supporting ICs. D) classical control theory in both continuous-time (CT) and discrete-time (DT); interconnection of CT and DT elements. Program or material fee may apply. Students may not receive credit for both MAE 144 and MAE 143C. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or graduate student, and MAE 143B, or consent of instructor.

MAE 145. Introduction to Robotic Planning and Estimation (4)
This course is an introduction to robotic planning algorithms and programming. Topics: sensor-based planning (bug algorithms), motion planning via decomposition and search (basic search algorithms on graphs, A*), the configuration-space concept, free configuration spaces via sampling, collision detection algorithms, (optimal) planning via sampling (probabilistic trees), environment roadmaps, and (extended) Kalman filtering for robot localization and environment mapping (SLAM). Prerequisites: senior standing and MAE 130B, or consent of instructor.

MAE 149. Sensor Networks (4)
(Cross-listed with ECE 156 and SIO 238.) Characteristics of chemical, biological, seismic and other physical sensors; signal processing techniques supporting distributed detection of salient events; wireless communication and networking protocols supporting formation of robust censor fabrics; current experience with low power, low-cost sensor deployments. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor, or graduate student in science or engineering. (Not offered every year.)

MAE 150. Computer-Aided Design (4)
Computer-aided analysis and design. Design methodology, tolerance analysis, Monte Carlo analysis, kinematics and computer-aided design of linkages, numerical calculations of moments of inertia, design of cams and cam dynamics; finite element analysis, design using Pro-E, Mechanica Motion and Mechanica Structures. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 130A or SE 101A or BENG 110, MAE 107 or SE 121, MAE 3, and senior standing in engineering major, or consent of instructor.

MAE 154. Product Design and Entrepreneurship (4)
This course will teach teams of students how to develop concepts and business plans in the design of new and innovative products. Emphasis will be placed on identifying user needs, concept generation, and prototype fabrication. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor.

MAE 155A. Aerospace Engineering Design I (4)
Fundamental principles of aerospace vehicle design including the conceptual, preliminary, and detailed design phases. Aeronautical or astronautical design project that integrates all appropriate engineering disciplines as well as issues associated with optimization, teamwork, manufacturability, reporting, and professionalism. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 2, MAE 104, MAE 113, MAE 130C, MAE 142, MAE 150, SE 2, and SE 160B, or consent of instructor. Students may enroll concurrently with MAE 113, 142, and 150.

MAE 155B. Aerospace Engineering Design II (4)
The principles of aerospace vehicle design including the conceptual, preliminary, and detailed design phases. Aeronautical or astronautical design project that integrates all appropriate engineering disciplines as well as issues associated with optimization, teamwork, manufacturability, reporting, and professionalism. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 113, MAE 142, MAE 150, MAE 155A, and MAE 170, or consent of instructor.

MAE 156A. Fundamental Principles of Mechanical Design I (4)
Fundamental principles of mechanical design and the design process. Application of engineering science to the design and analysis of mechanical components. Initiation of team design projects that culminate in MAE 156B with a working prototype designed for a real engineering application. Professional ethics discussed. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 3, MAE 130B, MAE 131A, MAE 143B, MAE 150, and MAE 170, or consent of instructor. Open to major code MC 27 only.

MAE 156B. Fundamental Principles of Mechanical Design II (4)
Fundamental principles of mechanical design and the design process. Culmination of a team design project initiated in MAE 156A which results in a working prototype designed for a real engineering application. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 156A in the immediately preceding quarter, MAE 101C, MAE 130C, and MAE 160 or MAE 131B. Open to major code MC 27 only.

MAE 160. Mechanical Behavior of Materials (4)
Elasticity and inelasticity, dislocations and plasticity of crystals, creep, and strengthening mechanisms. Mechanical behavior of ceramics, composites, and polymers. Fracture: mechanical and microstructural. Fatigue. Laboratory demonstrations of selected topics. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in MAE 20, MAE 130A (or SE 101A) and MAE 131A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 165. Fatigue and Failure Analysis of Engineering Components (4)
The engineering and scientific aspects of crack nucleation, slow crack growth, and unstable fracture in crystalline and amorphous solids. Microstructural effects on crack initiation, fatigue crack growth and fracture toughness. Methods of fatigue testing and fracture toughness testing. Fractography and microfractography. Design safe methodologies and failure prevention. Failure analysis of real engineering structures. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Not offered every year.)

MAE 166. Nanomaterials (4)
Basic principles of synthesis techniques, processing, microstructural control and unique physical properties of materials in nanodimensions. Nanowires, quantum dots, thin films, electrical transport, optical behavior, mechanical behavior, and technical applications of nanomaterials. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Not offered every year.)

MAE 167. Wave Dynamics in Materials (4)
Pressure and shear waves in infinite solids. Reflection and diffraction. Rayleigh and Love waves in semi-infinite space. Impulse load on a half space. Waveguides and group velocity. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Not offered every year.)

MAE 170. Experimental Techniques (4)
Principles and practice of measurement and control and the design and conduct of experiments. Technical report writing. Lectures relate to dimensional analysis, error analysis, signal-to-noise problems, filtering, data acquisition and data reduction, as well as background of experiments and statistical analysis. Experiments relate to the use of electronic devices and sensors. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in Phys 2CL. Enrollment restricted to engineering majors only.

MAE 171A. Mechanical Engineering Laboratory I (4)
Design and analysis of experiments in fluid mechanics, solid mechanics, and control engineering. Experiments in wind tunnel, water tunnel, vibration table and material testing machines, and refined electromechanical systems. Laboratory report writing; error analysis; engineering ethics. Prerequisites: MAE 101C or CENG 101B; MAE 143B or CENG 120; MAE 160 or MAE 131B or SE 110B; MAE 130C or SE 101C; MAE 140; and MAE 170.

MAE 171B. Mechanical Engineering Laboratory II (4)
Design and analysis of original experiments in mechanical engineering. Students research projects using experimental facilities in undergraduate laboratories: wind tunnel, water channel, vibration table, and testing machine and control systems. Students propose and design experiments, obtain data, complete engineering analysis and write a major report. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in MAE 171A. (Not offered every year.)

MAE 175A. Aerospace Engineering Laboratory I (4)
Analysis of aerospace engineering systems using experimental facilities in undergraduate laboratories: wind tunnel, water channel, vibration table, and testing machine. Students operate facilities, obtain data, complete engineering analysis and write major reports. Prerequisites: MAE 101C or CENG 101B; MAE 143B or CENG 120; MAE 140; and MAE 170, or consent of instructor.

MAE 180A. Spacecraft Guidance I (4)
Astrodynamics, orbital motion, perturbations, coordinate systems and frames of reference. Geosynchronous orbits, stationkeeping. Orbital maneuvers, fuel consumption, guidance systems. Observation instrument point, tracking, control. Basic rocket dynamics. Navigation, telemetry, re-entry, and aero-assisted maneuvers. Mission design. Students perform analyses based on mission requirements. Prerequisites: upper-division standing in physics, mathematics, or engineering department.

MAE 181. Space Mission Analysis and Design (4)
Space mission concepts, architectures, and analysis. Mission geometry. Astrodynamics. Orbit and constellation design. Space environment. Payload and spacecraft design and sizing. Power sources and distribution. Thermal management. Structural design. Guidance and navigation. Space propulsion. Orbital debris and survivability. Cost modeling and risk analysis. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

MAE 197. Engineering Internship (1–4)
Students work in local industry or hospitals under faculty supervision. Units may not be applied toward graduation requirements. Salaried or unsalaried. Number of units determined by enrollment frequency. First quarter up to four units. Subsequent quarters cannot exceed one unit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department stamp, 2.50 overall GPA minimum, at least ninety units.

MAE 198. Directed Group Study (1–4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular department curriculum, by special arrangement with a faculty member. May be taken P/NP only. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (4)
Independent reading or research on a problem by special arrangement with a faculty member. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 205. Graduate Seminar (1)
Each graduate student in MAE is expected to attend one seminar per quarter, of his or her choice, dealing with current topics in fluid mechanics, solid mechanics, applied plasma physics and fusion, chemical engineering, applied ocean sciences, energy and combustion, environmental engineering, or materials science, and dynamics and controls. Topics will vary. (S/U grades only)

MAE 207. Topics in Engineering Science (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty in which topics of current interest in engineering will be presented. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 208. Mathematics for Engineers (4)
This course will reintroduce the math fundamentals necessary for success in the engineering graduate program in MAE. Topics will include calculus, ODE's, vector calculus, linear algebra, probability and PDE's. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 209. Continuum Mechanics Applied to Medicine/Biology (4)
(Cross-listed with BENG 209.) Introduction to the basic definitions of continuum mechanics and their mathematical formulation at the graduate level with applications to problems in medicine and biology. This course is intended for students with little or no background in mechanics; it is an introduction to the Biomechanics courses BENG 250 A–B in the Department of Bioengineering and to Solid and Fluid Mechanics courses MAE 210A and MAE 231A in the Department of Mechanical and Aerospace Engineering. This course should NOT be taken concurrently with MAE 210A or MAE 231A. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 210A. Fluid Mechanics I (4)
(Cross-listed with CENG 210A.) Basic conservation laws. Flow kinematics. The Navier-Stokes equations and some of its exact solutions. Nondimensional parameters and different flow regimes, vorticity dynamics.

MAE 210B. Fluid Mechanics II (4)
Potential flows, boundary layers, low-Reynolds number flows. Prerequisites: BENG 209 or MAE 209 or MAE 210A; MAE 101A and B; and MAE 110A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 210C. Fluid Mechanics III (4)
Flow instabilities, linear stability theory; introduction to turbulent flows. Prerequisites: MAE 210A–B or consent of instructor.

MAE 211. Introduction to Combustion (4)
Fundamental aspects of flows of reactive gases, with emphasis on processes of combustion, including the relevant thermodynamics, chemical kinetics, fluid mechanics, and transport processes. Topics may include deflagrations, detonations, diffusion flames, ignition, extinction, and propellant combustion. Prerequisites: MAE 101A-B-C (or CENG 101A-B-C), and MAE 110A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 212. Introductory Compressible Flow (4)
Equations of motion for compressible fluids; one-dimensional gas dynamics and wave motion, waves in supersonic flow, including oblique shock waves; flow in ducts, nozzles, and wind tunnels; methods of characteristics. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MAE 213. Mechanics of Propulsion (4)
Fluid mechanics, thermodynamics and combustion processes involved in propulsion of aircraft and rockets by air breathing engines, and solid and liquid propellant rocket engines characteristics and matching of engine components; diffusers, compressors, combustors, turbines, pumps, nozzles. Prerequisites: MAE 101A-B-C, MAE 110A, and MAE 212, or consent of instructor.

MAE 214A. Introduction to Turbulence and Turbulent Mixing (4)
Basic features of turbulent flows. Analytical description of turbulence: random variables, correlations, spectra, Reynolds-averaging, coherent structures. Length and time scales. Kolomogorov similarity theory. Turbulence transport equations. Free shear flows. Homogeneous turbulence. Wall-bounded flows. Mixing of velocity and scalar fields. Prerequisites: MAE 210A or consent of instructor.

MAE 216. Turbulence and Mixing (4)
(Cross-listed with SIO 213.) Mixing mechanisms, their identification, description and modeling. Introduction to turbulence, semi-empirical theories, importance of coherent structures, effects of stratification and rotation on turbulent structure, entrainment and mixing. S/U grades permitted.

MAE 217A. Introduction to Gas Discharge Plasma Physics (4)
Charged particle motion in electromagnetic field, atomic processes in plasmas, electric breakdown of the gases, plasma quasi-neutrality, sheath, probes. Electron kinetics in low-temperature plasma, particle and energy fluxes, DC and RF driven discharges, instabilities of gas discharge plasmas. Prerequisites: Phys 100A-B-C or consent of instructor.

MAE 217B. Introduction to Nonmagnetized Hot Plasma Physics (4)
Coulomb collisions, collisionless approximation for hot plasma dynamics, Vlasov equation, waves in nonmagnetized plasma, dispersion equation, WKB approximation, Landau dumping, plasma instabilities, quasi-linear theory. Prerequisites: MAE 217A or consent of instructor.

MAE 217C. Introduction to Magnetized Hot Plasma Physics (4)
Drifts of magnetized charged particles, charged particle motion in different magnetic configurations, toroidal plasma equilibrium, Grad-Shafranov equation, neoclassical plasma transport in tokamak, waves in homogeneous magnetized plasma, waves in inhomogeneous magnetized plasma, instabilities of magnetized plasma. Prerequisites: MAE 217A and B, or consent of instructor.

MAE 218A. Introduction to High Energy Density Physics (MHD and Pinches) (4)
Equation of state, Saha equilibrium. Shock rarefaction, and blast waves, self-similar motion. Rayleigh-Taylor, Kelvin-Helmholtz, and Richtmyer-Meshkov instabilities. Z-pinch, Bennett equilibrium, radiation collapse, and radiation sources. Prerequisites:MAE 217A, B, and C, or consent of instructor.

MAE 218B. Introduction to High Energy Density Physics (Laser-Plasma Interactions) (4)
Propagation and absorption of laser beam in plasma, ablation pressure. Laser scattering and laser-plasma instabilities (stimulated Raman and Brillouin scattering, filamentation and decay instabilities). Electron heat transport, mechanisms of magnetic field generation. Prerequisites: MAE 217A, B, and C, or consent of instructor.

MAE 220A. Physics of Gases (4)
Thermodynamics of gases for use in gas dynamics. Derivation of thermodynamic functions from statistical mechanics. Applications of classical and quantum statistical mechanics to chemical, thermal, and radiative properties of gases. Equilibrium and nonequilibrium radiation, chemical equilibrium, and elements of chemical kinetics. Laser and reacting-flow applications. Prerequisites: MAE 110A or consent of instructor.

MAE 220B. Physical Gas Dynamics (4)
Velocity distribution functions, the Boltzmann equation, moment equations and the Navier-Stokes equations. The dynamics of molecular collisions. The Chapman-Enskog expansion and transport coefficients: shear and bulk viscosity, heat conduction, molecular and thermal diffusion. Linearizations about equilibrium: applications to acoustics and supersonic flows with relaxation. Prerequisites: MAE 101A-B-C (or CENG 101A-B-C), and MAE 220A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 221A. Heat Transfer (4)
(Cross-listed with CENG 221A.) Conduction, convection, and radiation heat transfer. Development of energy conservation equations. Analytical and numerical solutions to transport problems. Specific topics and applications vary. Prerequisites: MAE 101A-B-C (or CENG 101A-B-C) or consent of instructor.

MAE 221B. Mass Transfer (4)
(Cross-listed with CENG 221B.) Fundamentals of diffusive and convective mass transfer and mass transfer with chemical reaction. Development of mass conservation equations. Analytical and numerical solutions to mass transport problems. Specific topics and applications will vary. Prerequisites: MAE 101A-B-C (or CENG 101A-B-C), or consent of instructor.

MAE 224A. Environmental Fluid Dynamics I (4)
Basics of stratified flows. Linear waves: surface waves, internal gravity waves, dispersion, reflection, mountain waves. Ray tracing. Gravity currents and intrusions. Hydraulic control. Stability of and mixing in stratified shear flows. Recommended preparation: MAE 210A.

MAE 224B. Environmental Fluid Dynamics II (4)
Plumes and thermals. Application to building ventilation. Basics of rotating flows. Geostrophic flow. Thermal wind balance. Ekman boundary layer. Shallow water equations. Normal modes of a stratified fluid. Potential vorticity. Waves in a rotating fluid. Recommended preparation: MAE 210A. Prerequisites: MAE 224A or consent of instructor.

MAE 225A. Nanoscale and Microscale Heat Transfer for Energy Conversion Applications I (4)
An advanced introduction to the principles underlying conduction, convection, and radiation phenomena at the atomic/molecular scale; overview of macroscopic thermal sciences, kinetic theory and fluidics, statistical thermodynamics and quantum theory, thermal properties as a function of dimensionality; experimental methods. Prerequisites: MAE 221A, and MAE 101A-B-C, or consent of instructor.

MAE 228. Selected Topics in Plasma Physics (4)
Collisionless magnetic reconnection, interactions of relativistic laser field with plasma, plasma in astrophysics, computational plasma physics. Prerequisites: MAE 217A-B-C or consent of instructor.

MAE 231A. Foundations of Solid Mechanics (4)
Specification of stress and strain; infinitesimal and finite deformation; conservation equations; typical constitutive equations; minimum potential energy principle.

MAE 231B. Elasticity (4)
Basic field equations. Typical boundary value problems of classical linear elasticity. Problems of plane stress and plane strain. Variational principles. Prerequisites: MAE 209/BENG 209, or MAE 231A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 231C. Inelasticity (4)
(Cross-listed with SE 273.) Overview of inelastic behavior of materials. Models of plasticity, viscoplasticity, viscoelasticity. Micromechanics and modeling of damage. Fatigue phenomena. Fracture mechanics. Processes and models of the failure of materials. Students may not receive credit for both SE 273 and MAE 231C. Prerequisites: graduate standing and MAE 231A and 231B, or SE 271 and 272, or consent of instructor.

MAE 232A. Finite Element Methods in Solid Mechanics I (4)
(Cross-listed with SE 276A.) Finite element methods for linear problems in solid mechanics. Emphasis on the principle of virtual work, finite element stiffness matrices, various finite element formulations and their accuracy, and the numerical implementation required to solve problems in small strain, isotropic elasticity in solid mechanics. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

MAE 232B. Finite Element Methods in Solid Mechanics II (4)
(Cross-listed with SE 276B.) Finite element methods for linear problems in structural dynamics. Beam, plate, and doubly curved shell elements are derived. Strategies for eliminating shear locking problems are introduced. Formulation and numerical solution of the equations of motion for structural dynamics are introduced and the effect of different mass matrix formulations on the solution accuracy is explored. Prerequisites: graduate standing and MAE 232A or SE 276A.

MAE 232C. Finite Element Methods in Solid Mechanics III (4)
(Cross-listed with SE 276C.) Finite element methods for problems with both material and geometrical (large deformations) nonlinearities. The total LaGrangian and the updated LaGrangian formulations are introduced. Basic solution methods for the nonlinear equations are developed and applied to problems in plasticity and hyperelasticity. Prerequisites: graduate standing and MAE 232B or SE 276B.

MAE 233A. Fracture Mechanics (4)
Theoretical strength; stress concentration. Linear and nonlinear fracture mechanics: stress singularity, fracture modes, crack tip plastic zone, dugdale model, the R-curve; power-law materials, the J-integral; fatigue; special topics. Prerequisites: MAE 231A, MAE 231B, or consent of instructor.

MAE 233B. Micromechanics (4)
General theory of transformation strains and corresponding elastic fields; Green’s functions and other solution methods; dislocations; inclusions and inhomogeneities; micromechanics of plastic flow, microcracking, cavitation, and damage in crystalline and other solids. Prerequisites: MAE 231A-B-C or consent of instructor.

MAE 235. Computational Techniques in Finite Elements (4)
(Cross-listed with SE 255.) Practical application of the finite element method to problems in solid mechanics including basic preprocessing and postprocessing. Topics include element types, mesh refinement, boundary conditions, dynamics, eigenvalue problems, and linear and nonlinear solution methods. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

MAE 238. Stress Waves in Solids (4)
Linear wave propagation; plane waves; reflection and refraction; dispersion induced by geometry and by material properties. Application of integral transform methods. Selected topics in nonlinear elastic, anelastic, and anisotropic wave propagation. Prerequisites: MAE 231A-B-C or consent of instructor.

MAE 242. Robot Motion Planning (4)
Modeling, solving, and analyzing planning problems for single robots or agents. Configuration space for motion planning, sampling-based motion planning, combinatorial motion planning, feedback motion planning, differential models, and nonholonomic constraints. Basic decision-theory and dynamic programming, sensor and information spaces.

MAE 247. Cooperative Control of Multi-agent Systems (4)
Tools for the design of cooperative control strategies for multi-agent systems are presented. Topics include continuous and discrete-time evolution models, proximity graphs, performance measures, invariance principles, and coordination algorithms for rendezvous, deployment, flocking, formation of autonomous vehicles and consensus.

MAE 251. Structure and Analysis of Solids (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 227 and Chem 222.) Key concepts in the atomic structure and bonding of solids. Symmetry operations, point groups, lattice types, space groups, inorganic compounds, structure/property comparisons, X-ray diffraction. Ionic, covalent, metallic bonding compared with physical properties. Atomic and molecular orbitals, bands vs. bonds, free electron theory. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 253. Advanced Ceramics (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 236.) Topics include phase equilibria and crystallography, defects and thermodynamics (Kröger-Vink notation), glass scona, electrical and ionic transport behavior, Bronner diagrams, powder synthesis and compaction, sintering theory and grain growth, mechanical optical, magnetic, electrical properties, fuel cells. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 254. Energy Materials and Applications (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 256.) This class will cover the fundamentals/engineering aspects of various energy materials based on metallic, ceramic, semiconductor, and chemical structures, and their applications related to solar cells, fuel cells, batteries, fusion energy, and hydrogen storage will be discussed. Prerequisites: consent of instructor or department stamp.

MAE 255. Boundary Layer and Renewable Energy Meteorology (4)
Radiative and convective heat transfer in the atmosphere. Surface energy balance and the urban heat island. Turbulence and dispersion in the atmospheric boundary layer. Solar and wind energy systems, resource assessment, and intermittency. Prerequisites: MAE 210A or consent of instructor.

MAE 256. Radiative Transfer for Energy Applications (4)
Global insolation heat engine; solar-wind coupling; regional/seasonal insolation patterns; atmospheric radiation balance; RTE models; scattering; optical depth and transmittance of cloud layers; Schwarzschild's equation; absorption/emission lines; rotational, vibrational and electronic transitions; Doppler/pressure broadening; Elsasser/ Malkmus/Edwards models; solution methods. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MAE 260. Fundamentals and Applications of Computational Materials Science (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 260.) Computational methods for MatSci will be discussed, dealing with atomic scale empirical or semiempirical potentials. How and why to develop such potentials for metallic materials will be a focus of the course. Molecular dynamics and Monte Carlo methods will be covered in detail. Applications of these techniques to some example problems in materials science, mechanical deformation, dislocation interactions, nucleation/growth of phases, melting solidification structures, and point defects are presented.

MAE 261. Cardiovascular Fluid Mechanics (4)
Topics in the mechanics of blood flow including analytical solutions for flow in deformable vessels, one-dimensional equations, cardiovascular anatomy, lumped parameter models, vascular trees, scaling laws, and an introduction to the biomechanics and treatment of adult and congenital cardiovascular diseases. Prerequisites: MAE 210A and 290A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 262. Fluid Mechanics of the Cell (4)
Fluids phenomena relevant to the function, environment, and dynamics of biological cells. Topics include: low-Reynolds number flows, cell motility, internal cellular flows, development and morphogenesis, hydrodynamics of suspensions and polymers, rheology, diffusion, hydrodynamics of deformable bodies (vesicles, membranes, filaments), cells under shear flow. Prerequisites: MAE 209 or 210A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 263. Experimental Methods in Cell Mechanics (4)
Methods to measure mechanical aspects of cellular nature and behavior such as intracellular rheology, intracellular force distribution and propagation, cell adhesion strength, generation of propulsive forces during locomotion, interaction with the extracellular matrix, and response to external mechanical stimuli. Prerequisites: MAE 209 or MAE 210A or MAE 131A, or consent of instructor.

MAE 265A. Electronic and Photonic Properties of Materials (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 251A.) The electronic and optical properties of metals, semiconductors, and insulators. The concept of the band structure. Electronic and lattice conductivity. Type I and Type II superconductivity. Optical engineering using photonic band gap crystals in one-, two-, and three-dimensions. Current research frontiers. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 265B. Magnetic Materials: Principles and Applications (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 251B and NANO 251A.) The basis of magnetism: Classical and quantum mechanical points of view. Different kinds of magnetic materials. Magnetic phenomena including anisotropy, magnetostriction, domains, and magnetization dynamics. Current frontiers of nanomagnetics research including thin films and particles. Optical, data storage, and biomedical engineering applications of soft and hard magnetic materials. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 266. Biomaterials and Medical Devices (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 252.) This class will cover biomaterials and biomimetic materials. Metal, ceramic, and polymer biomaterials will be discussed. Emphasis will be on the structure-property relationships, biocompatibility/degradation issues and tissue/material interactions. Synthesis and mechanical testing of biomimetic materials will also be discussed. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 267. Nanomaterials and Properties (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 253.) This course discusses synthesis techniques, processing, microstructural control and unique physical properties of materials in nanodimensions. Topics include nanowires, quantum dots, thin films, electrical transport, electron emission properties, optical behavior, mechanical behavior, and technical applications of nanomaterials. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 271A. Thermodynamics of Solids (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 201A and ECE 238A.) The thermodynamics and statistical mechanics of solids. Basic concepts, equilibrium properties of alloy systems, thermodynamic information from phase diagrams, surfaces and interfaces, crystalline defects. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 271B. Solid State Diffusion and Reaction Kinetics (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 201B and ECE 238B.) Thermally activated processes, Boltzmann factor, homogenous and heterogeneous reactions, solid state diffusion, Fick’s laws, diffusion mechanisms, Kirkendall effect, Boltzmann-Matano analysis, high diffusivity paths. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 271C. Phase Transformations (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 201C and ECE 238C.) Classification of phase transformations; displacive and reconstructive transformations; classical and nonclassical theories of nucleation; Becker-Doering, Volmer-Weber, lattice instabilities, spinodal decomposition. Growth theories; interface migration, stress effects, terrace-ledge mechanisms, epitaxial growth, kinetics and mechanics. Precipitation. Order-disorder transformations. Solidification. Amorphization. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 272. Imperfections in Solids (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 205A.) Point, line, and planar defects in crystalline solids, including vacancies, self interstitials, solute atoms, dislocations, stacking faults, and grain boundaries; effects of imperfections on mechanical properties; interactions of dislocations with point defects; strain hardening by micro-obstacles, precipitation, and alloying elements.

MAE 273A. Dynamic Behavior of Materials (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 213A.) Elastic waves in continuum; longitudinal and shear waves. Surface waves. Plastic waves; shock waves, Rankine-Hugoniot relations. Method of characteristics, differential and difference form of conservation equations; dynamic plasticity and dynamic fracture. Shock wave reflection and interaction. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 276. Mechanics of Soft Materials (4)
(Cross-listed with MATS 231.) Main focus is the large deformations and instabilities in soft materials, such as elastomers, gels, and biomaterials. Some contents in thermodynamics and finite deformation theory are reviewed and summarized. Fundamental theories are applied to study the mechanics of gels, electroactive polymers, and biomaterials. This course intends to use soft material as an example to illustrate how to study the interaction between mechanics and other fields in materials (e.g., electric field, chemical field). Students may not receive credit for both MAE 276 and MATS 231.

MAE 277A. Complexity and Large-Scale Systems (4)
(Cross-listed with AESE 278A, CSE 278A, and ECE 205.) Comprehensive introduction to system and event complexity, software and systems engineering practices for complexity management, agile and plan-driven development, development and management processes and process models, data-, information- and knowledge-management, basics of distributed data and computation. This course will meet from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. every alternating Friday and Saturday. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE or consent of instructor.

MAE 278A. Modeling, Simulation, and Analysis (4)
(Cross-listed with AESE 278C, CSE 278C, and ECE 206.) Model-driven architecture and development concepts, business process and workflow modeling, structured analysis and IDEF modeling methods, object-, component- and service-orientation and the Unified Modeling Language, event- and stream models, colored Petri Nets, executable architectures, distributed simulation for performance analysis. This course will meet from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. every alternating Friday and Saturday. Prerequisites: enrollment in MAS-AESE or consent of instructor.

MAE 280A. Linear Systems Theory (4)
Linear algebra: inner products, outer products, vector norms, matrix norms, least squares problems, Jordan forms, coordinate transformations, positive definite matrices, etc. Properties of linear dynamic systems described by ODEs: observability, controllability, detectability, stabilizability, trackability, optimality. Control systems design: state estimation, pole assignment, linear quadratic control.

MAE 280B. Linear Control Design (4)
Parameterization of all stabilizing output feedback controllers, covariance controllers, H-infinity controllers, and L-2 to L-infinity controllers. Continuous and discrete-time treatment. Alternating projection algorithms for solving output feedback problems. Model reduction. All control design problems reduced to one critical theorem in linear algebra. Prerequisites: MAE 280A.

MAE 281A. Nonlinear Systems (4)
Existence and uniqueness of solutions of EDE’s, sensitivity equations. Stability, direct and converse Lyapunov theorems, LaSalle’s theorem, linearization, invariance theorems. Center manifold theorem. Stability of perturbed systems with vanishing and nonvanishing perturbations, input-to-state ability, comparison method. Input-output stability. Perturbation theory and averaging. Singular perturbations. Circle and Popov criteria. Prerequisites: MAE 280A.

MAE 281B. Nonlinear Control (4)
Small gain theorem, passivity. Describing functions. Nonlinear controllability, feedback linearization, input-state and input-output linearization, zero dynamics. Stabilization, Brockett’s necessary conditions (local), control Lyapunov functions, Sontag’s formula (global). Integrator back stepping, forwarding. Inverse optimality, stability margins. Disturbance attenuation, deterministic and stochastic, nonlinear H-infinity. Nonlinear observers. Prerequisites: MAE 281A.

MAE 283A. Parametric Identification: Theory and Methods (4)
Constructing dynamical models from experimental data. Deterministic and stochastic discrete time signals. Discrete time systems. Nonparametric identification: correlation and spectral analysis. Parametric identification: realization and prediction error methods, least squares estimation, approximate modeling. Experiment design. Frequency domain identification. Recommended preparation: MAE 143C.

MAE 283B. Approximate Identification and Control (4)
Identification for control: approximate identification, estimation of models via closed-loop experiments. Closed-loop identification techniques. Estimation of model uncertainty. Model invalidation techniques. Iterative techniques for model estimation and control design. Prerequisites: MAE 283A.

MAE 284. Robust and Multivariable Control (4)
Multivariable feedback systems: transfer function matrices, Smith-McMillan form, poles, zeros, principal gains, operator norms, limits on performance. Model uncertainties, stability and performance robustness. Design of robust controllers, H_inf and mu synthesis. Controller reduction. Prerequisites: MAE 280A.

MAE 286. Hybrid Systems (4)
Definition of hybrid system. Examples in mechanics, vision, and multi-agent systems. Trajectories of hybrid systems. Chattering, Zeno phenomena. Stability analysis. Arbitrary switching: common Lyapunov functions. Slow switching: dwell time. State-dependent switching: multiple Lyapunov functions, Invariance Principle. Hybrid control design. Applications. Prerequisites: MAE 281A or consent of instructor.

MAE 287. Control of Distributed Parameter Systems (4)
Lyapunov stability; exact solutions to PDEs; boundary control of parabolic PDEs (reaction-advection-diffusion and other equations); boundary observer design; control of complex-valued PDEs (Schrodinger and Gunzburg-Landau equations); boundary control of hyperbolic PDEs (wave equations) and beam equations; control of first-order hyperbolic PDEs and delay equations; control of Navier-Stokes equations; motion planning for PDEs; elements of adaptive control for PDEs and control of nonlinear PDEs. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MAE 288A. Optimal Control (4)
Deterministic methods: Pontryagin’s Maximum Principle, dynamic programming, calculus of variations. Stochastic methods: Gauss-Markov processes, Linear Quadratic control, Markov chains. Linear Quadratic Gaussian Control and the Separation Principle. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MAE 288B. Optimal Estimation (4)
Least Squares and Maximum Likelihood Estimation methods, Gauss-Markov models, State Estimation and Kalman Filtering, prediction and smoothing. The extended Kalman filter. Prerequisites: MAE 280A completed or concurrent, or consent of instructor.

MAE 289A. Mathematical Analysis for Applications (4)
Topics in mathematical analysis, with the emphasis on those of use in applications. The topics may include: metric spaces, open and closed sets, compact sets, continuity, differentiation, series of functions and uniform convergence, convex sets and functions, transforms, and Stokes theorem. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MAE 289B. Real Analysis for Applications (4)
Topics in real analysis, with the emphasis on those of use in applications. May include: countable/uncountable, open and closed sets, topology, Borel sets, sigma algebras, measurable functions, integration (Lebesgue), absolute continuity, function spaces, and fixed-point theorems. Prerequisites: MAE 289A, graduate standing, or consent of instructor.

MAE 289C. Functional Analysis and Applications (4)
Topics in functional analysis, with the emphasis on those of use in applications. May include: function spaces, linear functionals, dual spaces, reflexivity, linear operators, strong and weak convergence, Hahn-Banach Theorem, nonlinear functionals, differential calculus of variations, Pontryagin Maximum Principle. Students cannot obtain credit for MAE 289C if they have taken MAE 289. Prerequisites: MAE 289B, graduate standing, or consent of instructor.

MAE 290A. Efficient Numerical Methods for Simulation, Optimization, and Control (4)
Linear algebra, numerical methods, and numerical analysis. Direct and iterative methods for systems of linear and nonlinear equations, the fundamental matrix decompositions (eigenvector/SVD/Jordan), transform methods (Fourier/Laplace/Z), function approximation, differentiation, integration (quadrature/ODEs), and minimization. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MAE 290B. Numerical Methods for Differential Equations (4)
Numerical solution of differential equations in mathematical physics and engineering, ordinary and partial differential equations. Linear and nonlinear hyperbolic parabolic, and elliptic equations, with emphasis on prototypical cases, the convection-diffusion equation, Laplace’s and Poisson equation. Finite difference methods will be considered in depth, and additional topics. Prerequisites: MAE 290A or consent of instructor.

MAE 290C. Computational Fluid Dynamics (4)
Numerical methods in fluid dynamics and convective transport processes. Numerical solution of the Euler and Navier-Stokes equation. Additional topics will vary according to instructor. Examples include eigenvalue problems in hydrodynamic stability, vortex methods, spectral and panel methods. Students may not receive credit for both MAE 290C and MAE 223. Prerequisites: MAE 210A-B, 290A-B.

MAE 291. Design and Mechanics in Computer Technology (4)
Design and mechanics problems inherent in computer peripherals such as disk files, tape drives, and printers. Formulation and solution of problems involving mechanics, fluid mechanics, and materials; Reynolds equation, slider bearings; friction and wear; actuator design, impact printing; silicon fluid jets. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Not offered every year.)

MAE 292. Computer-Aided Design and Analysis (4)
Introduction to 2-D and 3-D computer-aided design. Design problems may include: ball bearing kinematics, Weibull statistics, nonrepeatable spindle run-out, four bar linkages, beam deflection and vibration, design of magnetic head suspension, hydrodynamic theory of lubrication, air bearings, heat transfer, optical servo, design of ink jet print head. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Not offered every year.)

MAE 293. Flow Control (4)
Intersection of control theory and fluid mechanics. Applications: transition delay, turbulence mitigation, noise reduction, weather forecasting, shape optimization, and UAV’s (perching). Tractable feedback (Riccati-based) formulations via parallel and parabolic flow assumptions. Regularization of variational (adjoint-based) formulations for MPC and MHE. EnKF and EnVE approaches for forecasting. Prerequisites: MAE 290A or consent of instructor.

MAE 294A. Introduction to Applied Mathematics (4)
(Cross-listed with SIO 203A.) Review of exact methods for ordinary differential equations. Expansions about regular and irregular singular points. Introduction to asymptotic expansions. Approximate methods for nonlinear differential equations. Regular and singular perturbation theory. Additional topics depending upon the interests of the instructor.

MAE 294B. Introduction to Applied Mathematics II (4)
(Cross-listed with SIO 203B.) Asymptotic methods: method of steepest descent (if not covered in I) WKB, method of multiple scales, boundary layer theory. Elements of complex analysis. Prerequisites: MAE 294A or SIO 203A or consent of instructor.

MAE 294C. Introduction to Applied Mathematics III (4)
(Cross-listed with SIO 203C.) Partial differential equations: characteristics, similarity solutions, Green’s functions, images, wave equation, diffusion equation, Laplace’s equation. Applications to continuum mechanics, potential fields, and transport phenomena such as diffusion, linear and nonlinear waves, Burger’s equation and shocks. Other topics according to the interests of the instructor. Prerequisites: MAE 294B, or SIO 203B, or SIO 215B, or consent of instructor.

MAE 295. Field Study (1–12)
Provides field study in industry with faculty supervision. Analysis and problem solving using real world applications. Prerequisites: consent of adviser and department; 3.0 GPA.

MAE 296. Independent Study (1–4)
Independent reading or research on a problem as arranged by a designated faculty member. Must be taken for a letter grade only. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MAE 298. Directed Group Study (1–4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in regular department curriculum, by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.)

MAE 299. Graduate Research (1–12)
Independent work by graduate students engaged in research and writing theses. MAE graduate students only. (S/U grades only.)

MAE 501. Teaching Experience (2)
Teaching experience in an appropriate MAE undergraduate course under direction of the faculty member in charge of the course. Lecturing one hour per week in either a problem-solving section or regular lecture. (S/U grade only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor and the MAE department.

MDE 209. Mechanics and Transport Phenomena for Biomedical Device Design (4)
Introduction to the basic definitions of continuum mechanics and their mathematical formulation at the graduate level with applications to problems in medicine and biology. Prerequisites: MDE students only.

MDE 210. Medical Devices: Clinical Perspectives (4)
This course is a seminar series with invited clinician speakers intended to address needs and opportunities for meaningful application of engineering principles in clinical practice, with emphasis on next generation medical devices. Prerequisites: MDE students only.

MDE 225. Biobusiness: Small to Large (4)
In this course you will study and analyze start-up proposals, the genesis of the biotech industry, biotech categories and growth strategies, the process of spinning out viable product concepts from academia, financing techniques, business development, acquisition/IPO valuation methods, and potentially disruptive technologies. Exercises, team presentations, and case studies. Prerequisites: MDE students only.

MDE 230. Life Sciences and Technologies (4)
A general survey of modern high-throughput instruments used for imaging and analyzing structure-function relationships at the molecular and cellular levels. An overview of potential human genomic and systems approaches for designing and validating medical device safety and performance. Prerequisites: MDE students only.

MDE 231A. Fundamentals of Physiology and Anatomy I (2)
A basic introduction to human physiology and anatomy form and function as it relates to clinical perspectives on patient needs. Students may not receive credit for both MDE 231A and MDE 231. Prerequisites: MDE students only.

MDE 231B. Fundamentals of Physiology and Anatomy II (2)
Case studies of integrative physiology to understand how this information is used in designing combination medical devices and instruments for diagnosis or research. Students may not receive credit for both MDE 231A and MDE 231. Prerequisites: MDE 231A. MDE students only.

MDE 240. Embedded System Design (4)
This course gives an introduction to digital signal processing (DSP) techniques and data-based parameter estimation (DBPE) techniques for the measurement, filtering, and analysis of experimental data obtained with embedded systems in medical devices. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. MDE students only.

MDE 260A. Design and Implementation of Medical Device Technology I (1)
Introduction of project-based course in medical device engineering, medical product regulation, quality systems and standards, engineering project management, and business development. Prerequisites: MDE students only.

MDE 260B. Design and Implementation of Medical Device Technology II (2)
Second of a three-quarter sequence, project-based course in medical device engineering, medical product regulation, quality systems and standards, engineering project management, and business development. Students will begin to design a medical device and an engineering strategy. Prerequisites: MDE 260A and consent of instructor. MDE students only.

MDE 260C. Design and Implementation of Medical Device Technology III (1)
Third of a three-quarter sequence, project-based course in medical device engineering, medical product regulation, quality systems and standards, engineering project management, and business development. Students will complete and implement their medical device design and engineering strategy. Prerequisites: MDE 260B and consent of instructor. MDE students only.

MDE 266. Biomaterials for Medical Device Design (4)
This class will cover biomaterials and biomimetic materials. Metal, ceramic, and polymer biomaterials will be discussed. Emphasis will be on the structure-property relationships, biocompatibility/degradation issues, and tissue/material interactions. Synthesis and mechanical testing of biomimetic materials will also be discussed. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. MDE students only.

MDE 292. Computer Aided Design of Medical Devices (4)
Computer-aided analysis and design with applications to medical devices. Solid model representation, finite element analysis for strength and deformation, material selection, kinematics, statistical analysis, and visualization of analytical results. Software packages used will include 3D CAD, FEA solvers, and student generated code. Analytical methods will be applied to case studies of medical devices. Prerequisites: MDE students only.

NANO 1. Nanoengineering Seminar (1)
Overview of nanoengineering. Presentations and discussions of basic knowledge and career opportunities in nanotechnology for professional development. Introduction to campus library resources. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: none.

NANO 4. Experience Nanoengineering (1) 
Introduction to nanoengineering lab-based skills. Hands-on training and experimentation with nanofabrication techniques, integration, and analytical tools. This class is for NANO majors who are incoming freshmen, to be taken their first year. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: department approval required.  

NANO 15. Engineering Computation Using Matlab (4)
Introduction to the solution of engineering problems using computational methods. Formulating problem statements, selecting algorithms, writing computer programs, and analyzing output using Matlab. Computational problems from nanoengineering, chemical engineering, and materials science are introduced. The course requires no prior programming skills. Cross-listed with CENG 15. Prerequisites: none.

NANO 100L. Physical Properties of Materials Lab (4)
Experimental investigation of physical properties of materials such as: thermal expansion coefficient, thermal conductivity, glass transitions in polymers, resonant vibrational response, longitudinal and shear acoustic wave speeds, Curie temperatures, UV-VIS absorption and reflection. Prerequisites: NANO 108.

NANO 101. Introduction to Nanoengineering (4)
Introduction to nanoengineering; nanoscale fabrication: nanolithography and self-assembly; characterization tools; nanomaterials and nanostructures: nanotubes, nanowires, nanoparticles, and nanocomposites; nanoscale and molecular electronics; nanotechnology in magnetic systems; nanotechnology in integrative systems; nanoscale optoelectronics; nanobiotechnology: biomimetic systems, nanomotors, nanofluidics, and nanomedicine. Priority enrollment given to NanoEngineering majors. Prerequisites: Chem 6B, Phys 2B, Math 20C, and NANO 15 or CENG 15 or MAE 8. Department approval required.

NANO 102. Foundations in Nanoengineering: Chemical Principles (4)
Chemical principles involved in synthesis, assembly, and performance of nanostructured materials and devices. Chemical interactions, classical and statistical thermodynamics of small systems, diffusion, carbon-based nanomaterials, supramolecular chemistry, liquid crystals, colloid and polymer chemistry, lipid vesicles, surface modification, surface functionalization, catalysis. Priority enrollment given to NanoEngineering majors. Prerequisites: Chem 6C, Math 20D, NANO 101, PHYS 2D, and NANO 106. Department approval required.

NANO 103. Foundations in Nanoengineering: Biochemical Principles (4)
Principles of biochemistry tailored to nanotechnologies. The structure and function of biomolecules and their specific roles in molecular interactions and signal pathways. Nanoscale detection methods. Prerequisites: BILD 1, Chem 6C, and NANO 101.

NANO 104. Foundations in Nanoengineering: Physical Principles (4)
Introduction to quantum mechanics and nanoelectronics. Wave mechanics, the Schroedinger equation, free and confined electrons, band theory of solids. Nanosolids in 0D, 1D, and 2D. Application to nanoelectronic devices. Priority enrollment given to NanoEngineering majors Prerequisites: Math 20D, NANO 102. Department approval required.

NANO 106. Crystallography of Materials (4)
Fundamentals of crystallography, and practice of methods to study material structure and symmetry. Curie symmetries. Tensors as mathematical description of material properties and symmetry restrictions. Introduction to diffraction methods, including X-ray, neutron, and electron diffraction. Close-packed and other common structures of real-world materials. Derivative and superlattice structures. Prerequisites: Math 20F.

NANO 107. Electronic Devices and Circuits for Nanoengineers (4) 
Overview of electrical devices and CMOS integrated circuits emphasizing fabrication processes, and scaling behavior. Design, and simulation of submicron CMOS circuits including amplifiers active filters digital logic, and memory circuits. Limitations of current technologies and possible impact of nanoelectronic technologies. Prerequisites: NANO 15, NANO 101, Math 20B or Math 20D, and Phys 2B.

NANO 108. Materials Science and Engineering (4) 
Structure and control of materials: metals, ceramics, glasses, semiconductors, polymers to produce useful properties. Atomic structures. Defects in materials, phase diagrams, micro structural control. Mechanical, rheological, electrical, optical and magnetic properties discussed. Time temperature transformation diagrams. Diffusion. Scale dependent material properties. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; restricted to NA25 majors or by department approval.

NANO 110. Molecular Modeling of Nanoscale Systems (4)
Principles and applications of molecular modeling and simulations towards nanoengineering. Topics covered include molecular mechanics, energy minimization, statistical mechanics, molecular dynamics simulations, and Monte Carlo simulations. Students will get hands-on training in running simulations and analyzing simulation results. Prerequisites: Math 20F, NANO 102, NANO 104, and NANO 15 or CENG 15 or MAE 8. Restricted to NA25 majors or by department approval.

NANO 111. Characterization of Nanoengineering Systems (4)
Fundamentals and practice of methods to image, measure, and analyze materials and devices that are structured at the nanometer scale. Optical and electron microscopy; scanning probe methods; photon-, ion-, electron-probe methods, spectroscopic, magnetic, electrochemical, and thermal methods. Prerequisites: NANO 102.

NANO 112. Synthesis and Fabrication of Nanoengineering Systems (4)
Introduction to methods for fabricating materials and devices in nanoengineering. Nano-particle, -vesicle, -tube, and -wire synthesis. Top-down methods including chemical vapor deposition, conventional and advanced lithography, doping, and etching. Bottom-up methods including self-assembly. Integration of heterogeneous structures into functioning devices. Prerequisites: NANO 102, NANO 104, NANO 111.

NANO 114. Probability and Statistical Methods for Engineers (4)
Probability theory, conditional probability, Bayes theorem, discrete random variables, continuous random variables, expectation and variance, central limit theorem, graphical and numerical presentation of data, least squares estimation and regression, confidence intervals, testing hypotheses. Cross-listed with CENG 114. Students may not receive credit for both NANO 114 and CENG 114. Prerequisites: Math 20F and NANO 15 or CENG 15 or MAE 8.

NANO 120A. Nanoengineering System Design I (4)
Principles of product design and the design process. Application and integration of technologies in the design and production of nanoscale components. Engineering economics. Initiation of team design projects to be completed in NANO 120B. Prerequisites: NANO 110.

NANO 120B. Nanoengineering System Design II (4)
Principles of product quality assurance in design and production. Professional ethics. Safety and design for the environment. Culmination of team design projects initiated in NANO 120A with a working prototype designed for a real engineering application. Prerequisites: NANO 120A.

NANO 134. Polymeric Materials (4) 
Foundations of polymeric materials. Topics: structure of polymers; mechanisms of polymer synthesis; characterization methods using calorimetric, mechanical, rheological, and X-ray-based techniques; and electronic, mechanical, and thermodynamic properties. Special classes of polymers: engineering plastics, semiconducting polymers, photoresists, and polymers for medicine. Cross-listed with CENG 134. Students may not receive credit for both CENG 134 and NANO 134. Prerequisites: Chem 6C and Phys 2C.

NANO 141A.  Engineering Mechanics I: Analysis of Equilibrium (4)
Newton's laws. Concepts of force and moment vector. Free body diagrams. Internal and external forces. Equilibrium of concurrent, coplanar, and three-dimensional system of forces. Equilibrium analysis of structural systems, including beams, trusses, and frames. Equilibrium problems with friction. Prerequisites: Math 20C and Phys 2A.

NANO 146. Nanoscale Optical Microscopy and Spectroscopy (4)
Fundamentals in optical imaging and spectroscopy at the nanometer scale. Diffraction-limited techniques, near-field methods, multi-photon imaging and spectroscopy, Raman techniques, Plasmon-enhanced methods, scan-probe techniques, novel sub-diffraction-limit imaging techniques, and energy transfer methods. Prerequisites: NANO 103 and 104.

NANO 148. Thermodynamics of Materials (4)
Fundamental laws of thermodynamics for simple substances; application to flow processes and to non-reacting mixtures; statistical thermodynamics of ideal gases and crystalline solids; chemical and materials thermodynamics; multiphase and multicomponent equilibria in reacting systems; electrochemistry. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

NANO 150. Mechanics of Nanomaterials (4)
Introduction to mechanics of rigid and deformable bodies. Continuum and atomistic models, interatomic forces and intermolecular interactions. Nanomechanics, material defects, elasticity, plasticity, creep, and fracture. Composite materials, nanomaterials, biological materials. Prerequisites: NANO 108.

NANO 156. Nanomaterials (4)
Basic principles of synthesis techniques, processing, microstructural control, and unique physical properties of materials in nanodimensions. Nanowires, quantum dots, thin films, electrical transport, optical behavior, mechanical behavior, and technical applications of nanomaterials. Cross-listed with MAE 166. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

NANO 158. Phase Transformations and Kinetics (4)
Materials and microstructures changes. Understanding of diffusion to enable changes in the chemical distribution and microstructure of materials, rates of diffusion. Phase transformations, effects of temperature and driving force on transformations and microstructure. Prerequisites: NANO 108 and NANO 148.

NANO 158L. Materials Processing Laboratory (4) 
Metal casting processes, solidification, deformation processing, thermal processing: solutionizing, aging, and tempering, joining processes such as welding and brazing. The effect of processing route on microstructure and its effect on mechanical and physical properties will be explored. NanoEngineering majors have priority enrollment. Prerequisites: NANO 158.

NANO 161. Material Selection in Engineering (4)
Selection of materials for engineering systems, based on constitutive analyses of functional requirements and material properties. The role and implications of processing on material selection. Optimizing material selection in a quantitative methodology. NanoEngineering majors receive priority enrollment. Prerequisites: NANO 108. Department approval required.

NANO 164. Advanced Micro- and Nano-materials for Energy Storage and Conversion (4)
Materials for energy storage and conversion in existing and future power systems, including fuel cells and batteries, photovoltaic cells, thermoelectric cells, and hybrids. Prerequisites: NANO 101, NANO 102, NANO 148.

NANO 168. Electrical, Dielectric, and Magnetic Properties of Engineering Materials (4)
Introduction to physical principles of electrical, dielectric, and magnetic properties. Semiconductors, control of defects, thin film, and nanocrystal growth, electronic and optoelectronic devices. Processing-microstructure-property relations of dielectric materials, including piezoelectric, pyroelectric and ferroelectric, and magnetic materials. Prerequisites: NANO 102 and NANO 104.

NANO 174. Mechanical Behavior of Materials (4)
Microscopic and macroscopic aspects of the mechanical behavior of engineering materials, with emphasis on recent development in materials characterization by mechanical methods. The fundamental aspects of plasticity in engineering materials, strengthening mechanisms, and mechanical failure modes of materials systems. Prerequisites: NANO 108.

NANO 174L. Mechanical Behavior Laboratory (4)
Experimental investigation of mechanical behavior of engineering materials. Laboratory exercises emphasize the fundamental relationship between microstructure and mechanical properties, and the evolution of the microstructure as a consequence of rate process. Prerequisites: NANO 174.

NANO 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (4)
Independent reading or research on a problem by special arrangement with a faculty member. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: upper division and department stamp.

NANO 200. Graduate Seminar in Chemical Engineering (1)
Each graduate student in NANO is expected to attend three seminars per quarter, of his or her choice, dealing with current topics in chemical engineering. Topics will vary. Cross-listed with CENG 205. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times.

NANO 201. Introduction to Nanoengineering (4)
Understanding nanotechnology, broad implications, miniaturization: scaling laws; nanoscale physics; types and properties of nanomaterials; nanomechanical oscillators, nano(bio)electronics, nanoscale heat transfer; fluids at the nanoscale; machinery cell; applications of nanotechnology and nanobiotechnology.

NANO 202. Intermolecular and Surface Forces (4)
Development of quantitative understanding of the different intermolecular forces between atoms and molecules and how these forces give rise to interesting phenomena at the nanoscale, such as flocculation, wetting, self-assembly in biological (natural) and synthetic systems. Cross-listed with CENG 212.

NANO 203. Nanoscale Synthesis and Characterization (4)
Nanoscale synthesistop-down and bottom-up; chemical vapor deposition; plasma processes; soft-lithography; self-assembly; layer-by-layer. Characterization; microscopy; scanning probe microscopes; profilometry; reflectometry and ellipsometry; X-ray diffraction; spectroscopies (EDX, SIMS, Mass spec, Raman, XPS); particle size analysis; electrical, optical. Cross-listed with CENG 213.

NANO 204. Nanoscale Physics and Modeling (4)
This course will introduce students to analytical and numerical methods such as statistical mechanisms, molecular simulations, and finite differences and finite element modeling through their application to nanoengineering problems involving polymer and colloiod self-assembly, absorption, phase separation, and diffusion. Cross-listed with CENG 214. Prerequisites: NANO 202.

NANO 205. Nanosystems Integration (4)
Scaling issues and hierarchical assembly of nanoscale components into higher order structures which retain desired properties at microscale and macroscale levels. Novel ways to combine top-down and bottom-up processes for integration of heterogeneous components into higher order structures.

NANO 208. Nanofabrication (4)
Basic engineering principles of nanofabrication. Topics include: photo-electronbeam and nanoimprint lithography, block copolymers and self-assembled monolayers, colloidal assembly, biological nanofabrication. Cross-listed with CENG 208.

NANO 210. Molecular Modeling and Simulations of Nanoscale Systems (4)
Molecular and modeling and simulation techniques like molecular dynamics, Monte Carlo, and Brownian dynamics to model nanoscale systems and phenomena like molecular motors, self-assembly, protein-ligand binding, RNA, folding. Valuable hands-on experience with different simulators.

NANO 212. Computational Modeling of Nanosystems (4)
Various modeling techniques like finite elements, finite differences, and simulation techniques like molecular dynamics and Monte Carlo to model fluid flow, mechanical properties, self-assembly at the nanoscale, and protein, RNA and DNA folding.

NANO 227. Structure and Analysis of Solids (4)
Key concepts in the atomic structure and bonding of solids such as metals, ceramics, and semiconductors. Symmetry operations, point groups, lattice types, space groups, simple and complex inorganic compounds, structure/property comparisons, structure determination with X-ray diffraction. Ionic, covalent, metallic bonding compared with physical properties. Atomic and molecular orbitals, bands verses bonds, free electron theory. Cross-listed with MATS 227, MAE 251 and Chem 222.

NANO 230. Synchrotron Characterization of Nanomaterials (4)
Advanced topics in characterizing nanomaterials using synchrotron X-ray sources. Introduction to synchrotron sources, X-ray interaction with matter, spectroscopic determination of electronic properties of nanomagnetic, structural determination using scattering techniques and X-ray imaging techniques. Cross-listed with CENG 230.

NANO 234. Advanced Nanoscale Fabrication (4)
Engineering principles of nanofabrication. Topics include: photo-, electron beam, and nanoimprint lithography, block copolymers and self-assembled monolayers, colloidal assembly, biological nanofabrication. Relevance to applications in energy, electronics, and medicine will be discussed.

NANO 238. Scanning Probe Microscopy (4)
Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) detectors, imaging, image interpretation, and artifacts, introduction to lenses, electron beam-specimen interactions. Operating principles and capabilities for atomic force microscopy and scanning tunneling microscopy, scanning optical microscopy and scanning transmission electron microscopy.

NANO 239. Nanomanufacturing (4)
Fundamental nanomanufacturing science and engineering, top-down nanomanufacturing processes, bottom-up nanomanufacturing processes, integrated top-down and bottom-up nanofabrication processes, three-dimensional nanomanufacturing, nanomanufacturing systems, nanometrology, nanomanufactured devices for medicine, life sciences, energy, and defense applications.

NANO 241. Organic Nanomaterials (4)
This course will provide an introduction to the physics and chemistry of soft matter, followed by a literature-based critical examination of several ubiquitous classes of organic nano materials and their technological applications. Topics include self-assembled monolayers, block copolymers, liquid crystals, photoresists, organic electronic materials, micelles and vesicles, soft lithography, organic colloids, organic nano composites, and applications in biomedicine and food science. Cross-listed with Chem 241.

NANO 242. Biochemisty and Molecular Biology (4)
Course is designed to give nanoengineering students from a variety of backgrounds a working knowledge of biochemistry and molecular biology. While the course offers biochemistry basics and key themes in molecular biology, it will emphasize the role of engineering innovations.

NANO 243. Nanomedicine (4)
Introduction to nanomedicine; diffusion and drug dispersion; diffusion in biological systems; drug permeation through biological barriers; drug transport by fluid motion; pharmacokinetics of drug distribution; drug delivery systems; nanomedicine in practice: cancers, cardiovascular diseases, immune diseases, and skin diseases. Cross-listed with CENG 207.

NANO 244. Nanomachines and Nanorobots (4)
The structure and operational principles of different nature biomotors will be discussed. Related bio-inspired efforts aimed at developing artificial nanomotors will also be covered, along with the prospects of using biomotors and synthetic nanomotors in engineering environments.

NANO 245. Nanoelectronics (4)
An introduction to the nano electronics and nanospintronics; fundamentals of semiconductors; electronic band structure theory, electron transport in semiconductors and nano structures, nano devices. Prerequisites: NANO 201.

NANO 247A. Advanced BioPhotonics (4)
Basic physics and chemistry of interaction of photons with matter; photonic radiation pressure; advanced optoelectronic detection systems, devices, methods, time-resolved fluorescent, chemiluminescent methods, fluorescent energy transfer techniques, quantum dots, near-field optical techniques, mechanisms of light sensitive biological systems including chloroplasts for photosynthetic energy conversion and basis of vision processes. Cross-listed with BENG 247A and ECE 247A.

NANO 247B. BioElectronics (4)
Topics include photolithographic techniques for high-density DNA microarray production, incorporation of CMOS control into electronic DNA microarrays, direct electronic detection technology, bio-fuel cells, highly integrated devices (lab-on-a-chip, in vivo biosensors, etc.) Form heterogeneous materials and components. Cross-listed with BENG 247B and ECE 247B.

NANO 247C. BioNanotechnology (4)
Nanosensors, nanodevices for clinical diagnostics, biowarfare agent detection; nanostructures for drug delivery; nanoarrays, nanodevices, nanoanalytical devices and systems, methods for modification or functionalization of nanoparticles, nanostructures with biological molecules; nanostructural aspects of fuel cells; biofuel cells; potential use of DNA, other biomolecules. Cross-listed with BENG 247C and ECE 247C.

NANO 250. Mechanics of Nanomaterials (4)
Elements of continuum mechanics; quantum and statistical mechanics; interatomic forces and intermolecular interactions; thermodynamics and diffusion materials; nanomechanics of self-assembly, pattern formation, and hierarchical ordering, defects, thin films, surfaces, and interfaces; plasticity, creep, fracture, and fatigue, nanomechanics, nanorheology, and nanotribology.

NANO 251A. Magnetic Materials: Principles and Applications (4)
The basis of magnetism: classical and quantum mechanical points of view. Different kinds of magnetic materials. Magnetic phenomena including anisotropy, magnetostriction, domains, and magnetization dynamics. Current frontiers of nanomagnetics research, including thin films and particles. Optical, data storage, and biomedical engineering applications of soft and hard magnetic materials. Cross-listed with MAE 265B and MATS 251B.

NANO 252. Biomaterials and Biomimetics (4)
Fundamental ways engineers adopt and adapt ideas from nature and make new engineering materials. Protein-based structural materials; biomineralisation: biosilification, calcium-carbonates, calcium-phosphates, composite mechanics applied to natural materials; biomimetic pattern formation; biomimetic adhesion: attachment devices-mechanisms in nature, biomimetic adhesives; biomimetic flight. Cross-listed with CENG 256.

NANO 253. Nanomaterials and Properties (4)
This course discusses synthesis techniques, processes, microstructural control, and unique physical properties of materials in nanodimensions. Topics include nanowires, quantum dots, thin films, electrical transport, electron emission properties, optical behavior, mechanical behavior, and technical applications of nanomaterials. Cross-listed with MAE 267.

NANO 255. Electrochemistry (4)
Application of electrochemical techniques to chemistry research. Basic electrochemical theory and instrumentation: the diffusion equations, controlled potential, and current methods. Electrochemical kinetics, Butler-Volmer, Marcus-Hush theories, preparative electrochemistry, analytical electrochemistry, solid and polymer electrolytes, semiconductor photoelectrochemistry. Cross-listed with Chem 240.

NANO 256. Microfluids (4)
This course covers the design, microfabrication, operational principles, basic transport processes and diverse applications of microfluidic and nanofluidic (lab-on-a-chip) systems.

NANO 257. Polymer Science and Engineering (4)
Quantitative basic understanding of different branches of polymer science varying from polymer chemistry, characterization, thermodynamics, rheological properties, smart materials, self-assembly in biopolymers (natural) and synthetic polymers, and applications of polymers ranging from medicine to structure. Cross-listed with MATS 257 and BENG 242. Restricted to BE 75, MS 76, CE 75, and NA 75 majors.

NANO 258. Nanoscale Transport Phenomenon (4)
Various nanoscale systems where macroscopic laws of mass, heat, and momentum transfer break down; nonequilibrium statistical mechanics concepts such as transition state and Green-Kubo theories, and molecular simulations for modeling nanoscale transport issues will be introduced.

NANO 259. Heterogeneous Catalysis (4)
Physics and chemistry of heterogeneous catalysis; adsorption-desorption kinetics, chemical bonding, isotherms, kinetic models, selection of catalysts, poisoning, experimental techniques. Cross-listed with CENG 253.

NANO 260. Nanofabrication Reaction Engineering (4)
Chemical reaction kinetics coupled with material and energy transport processes for fabrication of nanostructured materials and devices. Chemical vapor deposition, etching, and patterning of films. Nanoparticle, nanofiber, and nanotube growth. Theory, simulation, and reactor design.

NANO 261. Nanoscale Energy Technology (4)
Examines the role nanotechnology will play in addressing the many scientific and engineering challenges for new energy production. Topics include nanotechnology’s role in improving photovoltaics, fuel-cells, batteries, energy transmission, and conversion of renewable (green) and nonrenewable sources.

NANO 262. Nanosensors (4)
This course illustrates how the ability to tailor the properties of nanomaterials can be used for designing powerful sensing and biosensing devices. Nanosensors based on metal nanoparticles, semiconductor nanowires and nanocrystals, and carbon nanotubes will be covered.

NANO 263. Magnetic Nanodevices (4)
The basis of magnetism: classical and quantum mechanical points of view. Introduction to thin film and nanomagnetism, including interfacial magnetism, coupling and magneto-transport. Application of nanomagnetism in devices including magnetic recording, MRAM, magnetic processing, and biomedical engineering.

NANO 264. Solid-State and Nanochemistry (4)
Course covers concept in nano and solid-state chemistry for graduate students, with the objective of understanding nanomaterials from a chemical perspective. Topics include descriptive crystal chemistry, structure determination, free electron gas and dimensional solids, tight-binding approximation, band structure. Recommended preparation: Background equivalent to NANO 203.

NANO 265. Thermodynamics of Solids (4)
The thermodynamics and statistical mechanics of solids. Basic concepts, equilibrium properties of alloy systems, thermodynamic information from phase diagrams, surfaces and interfaces, crystalline defects. Cross-listed with MATS 201A, MAE 271A and ECE 238A.

NANO 266. Quantum Mechanical Modeling of Materials and Nanostructures (4)
Application of quantum mechanical modeling methods (both solid state and computational chemistry) in the study of materials and nanostructures; density functional theory (DFT) and approximations; Hartree-Fock and beyond HF approximations; hybrid density functional theory; beyond DFT (GW, TDDFT); ab initio molecular dynamics; materials properties (mechanical, electrochemical, electronic, transport, nano-scale effects on properties) from quantum mechanical simulations; high-throughput computation.

NANO 299. Graduate Research in Nanoengineering (1–12)
Graduate research in nanoengineering. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times for a maximum of twelve units. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CENG 1. The Scope of Chemical Engineering (1)
Discussions of basic knowledge of the curriculum and faculty and the opportunities in chemical engineering for professional development. Introduction to campus library and computer resources. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: none.

CENG 4. Experience Chemical Engineering (1) 
Hands-on, team-based laboratory activities to demonstrate modern applications of chemical engineering, and the role of the chemical engineer in academia and industry. Emphasis on teamwork, safe laboratory practices, and student-directed problem solving. This class is for CENG majors who are incoming freshmen, to be taken their first year. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: department approval required.  

CENG 15: Engineering Computation Using Matlab (4)
Introduction to solution of engineering problems using computational methods. Formulating problem statements, selecting algorithms, writing computer programs, and analyzing output using Matlab. Computational problems from nanoengineering, chemical engineering, and materials science are introduced. The course requires no prior programming skills. Cross-listed with NANO 15. Prerequisites: none.

CENG 100. Material and Energy Balances (4)
Introduction to steady and time-dependent material and energy balances using a variety of problem-solving strategies. Concepts include degrees-of-freedom analysis, unit operations, multiunit systems, chemical reaction kinetics and equilibrium, and phase equilibrium. Prerequisites: Chem 6B or consent of instructor.

CENG 101A. Introductory Fluid Mechanics (4)
Kinematics and equation of motion; hydrostatics; Bernoulli’s equation; viscous flows; turbulence, pipe flow; boundary layers and drag in external flows; applications to chemical, structural, and bioengineering. Students may not receive credit for both MAE 101A and CENG 101A. Prerequisites: admission to the major and grades of C– or better in Phys 2A, Math 20D or 21D, and 20E, or consent of instructor.

CENG 101B. Heat Transfer (4)
Conduction, convection, radiation heat transfer; design of heat exchangers. Students may not receive credit for both MAE 101C and CENG 101B. Prerequisites: admission to the major and a grade of C– or better in CENG 101A.

CENG 101C. Mass Transfer (4)
Diffusive and convective mass transfer in solids, liquids, and gases; steady and unsteady state; mass transfer coefficients; applications to chemical engineering and bioengineering. Prerequisites: admission to the major and grade of C– or better in CENG 101A.

CENG 102. Chemical Engineering Thermodynamics (4)
Thermodynamic behavior of pure substances and mixtures. Properties of solutions, phase equilibria. Thermodynamic cycles. Chemical equilibria for homogeneous and heterogeneous systems. Prerequisites: CENG 100, CHEM 6C, and Math 20C, or consent of instructor.

CENG 113. Chemical Reaction Engineering (4)
Principles of chemical reactor analysis and design. Experimental determination of rate equations, design of batch and continuous reactors, optimization of selectivity in multiple reactions, consideration of thermal effects and residence time distribution. Introduction to multi-phase reactors. Prerequisites: CENG 100 and Math 20D, or consent of instructor.

CENG 114. Probability and Statistical Methods for Engineers (4) 
Probability theory, conditional probability, Bayes theorem, discrete random variables, continuous random variables, expectation and variance, central limit theorem, graphical and numerical presentation of data, least squares estimation and regression, confidence intervals, testing hypotheses. Cross-listed with NANO 114. Students may not receive credit for both CENG 114 and NANO 114. Prerequisites: Math 20F and MAE 8 or NANO 15 or CENG 15.

CENG 120. Chemical Process Dynamics and Control (4)
Examination of dynamic linear and linearized models of chemical processes. Stability analysis. Design of PID controllers. Selection of control and manipulated variables. Root locus, Bode and Nyquist plots. Cascade, feed-forward and ratio controls. Prerequisites: CENG 100, CENG 101B, CENG 113, Math 20D, and CENG 15 or MAE 8 or NANO 15. Enrollment restricted to majors CE25, NA25, MC25, MC27, MC28, MC29.

CENG 122. Separation Processes (4)
Principles of analysis and design of systems for separation of components from a mixture. Topics will include staged operations (distillation, liquid-liquid extraction), and continuous operations (gas absorption, membrane separation) under equilibrium and nonequilibrium conditions. Prerequisites: admission to the major and grades of C– or better in CENG 100, CENG 102, and CENG 101C.

CENG 124A. Chemical Plant and Process Design I (4)
Principles of chemical process design and economics. Process flow diagrams and cost estimation. Computer-aided design and analysis. Representation of the structure of complex, interconnected chemical processes with recycle streams. Ethics and professionalism. Health, safety, and the environmental issues. Prerequisites: admission to chemical engineering major and grades of C– or better in CENG 113 and CENG 122, or consent of instructor.

CENG 124B. Chemical Plant and Process Design II (4)
Engineering and economic analysis of integrated chemical processes, equipment, and systems. Cost estimation, heat and mass transfer equipment design and costs. Comprehensive integrated plant design. Optimal design. Profitability. Prerequisites: admission to chemical engineering major and grade of C– or better in CENG 124A.

CENG 134. Polymeric Materials (4).
Foundations of polymeric materials. Topics: structure of polymers; mechanisms of polymer synthesis; characterization methods using calorimetric, mechanical, rheological, and X-ray-based techniques; and electronic, mechanical, and thermodynamic properties. Special classes of polymers: engineering plastics, semiconducting polymers, photoresists, and polymers for medicine. Cross-listed with NANO 134. Students may not receive credit for both CENG 134 and NANO 134. Prerequisites: Chem 6C and Phys 2C.

CENG 157. Process Technology in the Semiconductor Industry (4) 
Brief introduction to solid-state materials and devices. Crystal growth and purification. Thin film technology. Application of chemical processing to the manufacture of semiconductor devices. Topics to be covered: physics of solids, unit operations of solid state materials (bulk crystal growth, oxidation, vacuum science, chemical and physical vapor deposition, epitaxy, doping, etching). Prerequisites: CENG 101A, CENG 101B, and CENG 101C.

CENG 176A. Chemical Engineering Process Laboratory I (4)
Laboratory projects in the areas of applied chemical research and unit operations. Emphasis on applications of engineering concepts and fundamentals to solution of practical and research problems. Prerequisites: CENG 113, CENG 122, and MAE 170, or consent of instructor.

CENG 176B. Chemical Engineering Process Laboratory II (4)
Training in planning research projects, execution of experimental work, and articulation (both oral and written) of the research plan and results in the areas of applied chemical technology and engineering operations related to mass, momentum, and heat transfer. Prerequisites: CENG 176A.

CENG 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (4-4)
Independent reading or research on a problem by special arrangement with a faculty member. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

CENG 205. Graduate Seminar in Chemical Engineering (1)
Each graduate student in chemical engineering is expected to attend one seminar per quarter, of his or her choice, dealing with current topics in chemical engineering. Topics will vary.

CENG 207. Nanomedicine (4)
Introduction to nanomedicine; diffusion and drug dispersion; diffusion in biological systems; drug permeation through biological barriers; drug transport by fluid motion; pharmacokinetics of drug distribution; drug delivery systems; nanomedicine in practice: cancers, cardiovascular diseases, immune diseases, and skin diseases.

CENG 208. Nanofabrication (4)
Basic engineering principles of nanofabrication. Topics include: photo, electron beam, and nanoimprint lithography, block copolymers and self-assembled monolayers, colloidal assembly, biological nanofabrication.

CENG 210A. Fluid Mechanics I (4)
Basic conservation laws, flow kinematics. The Navier-Stokes equations and some of its exact solutions, nondimensional parameters and different flow regimes, vorticity dynamics. Cross-listed with MAE 210A. Prerequisites: MAE 101A-B and MAE 110A.

CENG 211. Introduction to Nanoengineering (4)
Understanding nanotechnology, broad implications; miniaturization: scaling laws; nanoscale physics; types and properties of nanomaterials; nanomechanical oscillators, nano(bio)electronics, nanoscale heat transfer; fluids at nanoscale; machinery cell; applications of nanobiotechnology and nanobiotechnology.

CENG 212. Intermolecular and Surface Forces (4)
Development of quantitative understanding of the different intermolecular forces between atoms and molecules and how these forces give rise to interesting phenomena at the nanoscale, such as flocculation, wetting, and self-assembly in biological (natural) and synthetic systems.

CENG 213. Nanoscale Synthesis and Characterization (4)
Examination of nanoscale synthesis—top-down and bottom-up; physical deposition; chemical vapor deposition; plasma processes; sol-gel processing; soft-lithography; self-assembly and layer-by-layer; molecular synthesis. Nanoscale characterization; microscopy (optical and electron: SEM, TEM); scanning probe microscopes (SEM, AFM); profilometry; reflectometry, and ellipsometry; X-ray diffraction; spectroscopies (EDX, SIMS, Mass spec, Raman, XPS); particle size analysis; electrical, optical, magnetic, mechanical, thermal.

CENG 214. Nanoscale Physics and Modeling (4)
Expanded mathematical analysis of topics introduced in CENG 212. Introduction of both analytical and numerical methods through application to problems in nanoengineering. Nanoscale systems of interest include colloidal systems, block-copolymer based self-assembled materials, molecular motors made out of DNA, RNA, or proteins, etc. Nanoscale phenomena including self-assembly at the nanoscale, phase separation within confined spaces, diffusion through nanopores and nanoslits, etc. Modeling techniques include quantum mechanics, diffusion and kinetics theories, molecular dynamics, etc. Prerequisites: CENG 212.

CENG 215. Nanosystems Integration (4)
Discussion of scaling issues and how to carry out the effective hierarchical assembly of diverse molecular and nanoscale components into higher order structures that retain the desired electronic/photonic, structural, mechanical, or catalytic properties at the microscale and macroscale levels. Novel ways to combine the best aspects of both top-down and bottom-up processes to create a totally unique paradigm change for the integration of heterogeneous molecules and nanocomponents into higher order structures. 

CENG 221A. Heat Transfer (4)
Conduction, convection, and radiation heat transfer development of energy conservation equations. Analytical and numerical solutions to heat transport problems. Specific topics and applications vary. Cross-listed with MAE 221A. Prerequisites: MAE 101A-B-C or CENG 101A-B-C or consent of instructor.

CENG 221B. Mass Transfer (4)
Fundamentals of diffusive and convective mass transfer and mass transfer with chemical reaction. Development of mass conservation equations. Analytical and numerical solutions to mass transport problems. Specific topics and applications will vary. Cross-listed with MAE 221B. Prerequisites: MAE 101A-B-C or CENG 101A-B-C.

CENG 230. Synchrotron Characterization of Nanomaterials (4)
Advanced topics in characterizing nanomaterials using synchrotron X-ray sources. Introduction to synchrotron sources, X-ray interaction with matter, spectroscopic determination of electronic properties of nanomagnetic, structural determination using scattering techniques and X-ray imaging techniques. Cross-listed with NANO 230.

CENG 251. Thermodynamics (4)
Principles of thermodynamics of single and multicomponent systems. Phase equilibria. Estimation, calculation, and correlation of properties of liquids and gases.

CENG 252. Chemical Reaction Engineering (4)
Analysis of chemical rate processes; complex kinetic systems. Chemical reactor properties in steady state and transient operations; optimal design policies. The interaction of chemical and physical transport processes in affecting reactor design and operating characteristics. Uniqueness/multiplicity and stability in reactor systems. Applications of the heterogeneous reactor systems.

CENG 253. Heterogeneous Catalysis (4)
Physics and chemistry of heterogeneous catalysis. Adsorption/desorption kinetics, chemical bonding, isotherms, kinetic models, selection of catalysts, poisoning, experimental techniques. Cross-listed with NANO 259.

CENG 254. Biochemical Engineering Fundamentals (4)
Introduction to microbiology as relevant to the main topic, biological reactor analysis. Fermentation and enzyme technology.

CENG 255. Electrochemical Engineering (4)
Fundamentals of electrochemistry and electrochemical engineering. Structure of the double layer, cell potential and electrochemical thermodynamics, charge transfer kinetics, electrochemical transport phenomena, and introduction to colloidal chemistry. Applications such as corrosion prevention, electroplating, reactor design, batteries, and fuel cells.

CENG 299. Graduate Research in Chemical Engineering (1–12)
S/U grades only. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

SE 1. Introduction to Structures and Design (4)
Introduction to structural components, systems from aerospace, civil, mechanical, marine and offshore areas. Structural action, the design process. History of structural engineering. Role and responsibility of structural engineers in society. Engineering economics, costs-benefits analysis. Implications on safety. Professional ethics. Priority enrollment given to structural engineering majors.

SE 2. Structural Materials (3)
Properties and structures of engineering materials, including metals and alloys, ceramics, cements and concretes, polymers, and composites. Elastic deformation, plastic deformation, fracture, fatigue, wearing, and corrosion. Selection of engineering materials based on performance and cost requirements. Prerequisites: Chem 6A, Phys 2A.

SE 2L. Structural Materials Lab (1)
Materials testing and/or processing for metals and alloys, polymers and composites, cements, and wood. Materials selection and structural design to meet functional and cost requirements. Structural construction and testing. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: Chem 6A, Phys 2A and SE 2.

SE 3. Graphical Communication for Engineering Design (4)
Use of computer graphics (CAD software) to communicate engineering designs. Includes visualization, sketching, 2D and 3D graphics standards, dimensioning, tolerance, assemblies, and prototyping/testing with light manufacturing methods. Project/system management software, i.e., building information modeling (BIM), will be introduced. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: none

SE 7.  Spatial Visualization (1)
Spatial visualization is the ability to manipulate 2D and 3D shapes in one’s mind. In this course, students will perform exercises that increase their spatial visualization skills. P/NP grades only. Students may not receive credit for SE 7 and MAE 7. Prerequisites: none.

SE 9. Algorithms and Programming for Structural Engineering (4)
Introduction to the Matlab environment. Variables and types, statements, functions, blocks, loops, and branches. Algorithm development. Functions, function handles, input and output arguments. Data encapsulation and object-oriented programming. Toolboxes and libraries. Models from physics (mechanics and thermodynamics) are used in exercises and projects. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in Math 20D and Math 20F (20F may be concurrent).

SE 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Prerequisites: open to freshmen only.

SE 99H. Independent Study (1)
Independent study or research under direction of a faculty member. Prerequisites: student must be of first year standing and a Regents Scholar. Consent of instructor or department stamp.

SE 101A. Mechanics I: Statics (4)
Principles of statics using vectors. Two- and three-dimensional equilibrium of statically determinate structures under discrete and distributed loading including hydrostatics; internal forces and concept of stress; free body diagrams; moment, product of inertia; analysis of trusses and beams. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in Math 20C and Phys 2A.

SE 101B. Mechanics II: Dynamics (4)
Kinematics and kinetics of particles in two- and three-dimensional motion. Newton’s equations of motion. Energy and momentum methods. Impulsive motion and impact. Systems of particles. Kinetics and kinematics of rigid bodies in 2-D. Introduction to 3-D dynamics of rigid bodies. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in SE 101A (or MAE 130A).

SE 101C. Mechanics III: Vibrations (4)
Free and forced vibrations of damped 1-DOF systems; vibrations isolation, impact and packaging problems. Analysis of discrete MDOF systems using matrix representation; normal mode of frequencies and modal matrix formulation. Lagrange’s equations. Modal superposition for analysis of continuous vibrating systems. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in Math 20F and SE 101B (or MAE 130B).

SE 103. Conceptual Structural Design (4)
Introduction to structural design concepts, structural performance, materials, load cases, factors of safety, and aesthetics through team-based projects; development of design theories and approaches; application examples from aerospace, civil, and marine systems; introduction to basic visualization and modeling applications. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: SE 2, SE 2L, SE 9, and SE 101A or MAE 130A.

SE 104. Structural Materials (4)
Properties and structures of engineering materials, including metals and alloys, ceramics, cements and concretes, wood, polymers, and composites. Elastic deformation, plastic deformation, fracture, fatigue, creep. Selection of engineering materials based on performance and cost requirements. Measurement techniques. Prerequisites: Chem 6A and SE 101A or MAE 130A.

SE 104L. Structural Materials Lab (1)
Materials testing for cement and concrete, metals and alloys, polymers and composites, and wood. Materials selection and structural design to meet functional and cost requirements. Structural construction and testing. Materials measurement techniques. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 104.

SE 110A. Solid Mechanics I (4)
Concepts of stress and strain. Hooke’s law. Stress transformation. Axial loading of bars. Torsion of circular shafts. Torsion of thin-walled members. Pure bending of beams. Unsymmetric bending of beams. Shear stresses in beams. Shear stresses in thin-walled beams. Shear center. Differential equation of the deflection curve. Deflections and slopes of beams from integration methods. Statically determinate and indeterminate problems. Cross-listed with MAE 131A. Students may not receive credit for SE 110A or MAE 131A and SE 110A/MAE 131A. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in Math 20D and SE 101A (or MAE 130A).

SE 110B. Solid Mechanics II (4)
Advanced concepts in the mechanics of deformable bodies. Unsymmetrical bending of symmetrical and unsymmetrical sections. Bending of curved beams. Shear center and torsional analysis of open and closed sections. Stability analysis of columns, lateral buckling. Application of the theory of elasticity in rectangular coordinates. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in SE 110A (or MAE 131A), SE majors.

SE 115. Fluid Mechanics for Structural Engineering (4)
Fluid statics, hydrostatic forces; integral and differential forms of conservation equations for mass, momentum, and energy; Bernoulli equation; dimensional analysis; viscous pipe flow; external flow, boundary layers; open channel flow. Prerequisites: Phys 2A and Math 20D, or consent of instructor.

SE 120. Engineering Graphics & Computer Aided Structural Design (4)
Engineering graphics, solid modeling, CAD applications including 2-D and 3-D transformations, 3-D viewing, wire frame and solid models, Hidden surface elimination. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: SE 102 and SE 103, SE majors.

SE 121A. Introduction to Computing for Engineers (4)
Introduction to engineering computing. Interpolation, integration, differentiation. Ordinary differential equations. Nonlinear algebraic equations. Systems of linear algebraic equations. Representation of data in the computer. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 1, SE 9 and SE 101A or MAE 130A.

SE 121B. Computing Projects in Structural Engineering (4)
Exploration of numerical algorithms in engineering computations. Centered around computing projects. Matrix eigenvalue problems, boundary value problems, solution of systems of nonlinear algebraic equations, optimization. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 101C or MAE 130C and SE 121A.

SE 125. Statistics, Probability and Reliability (4)
Probability theory. Statistics, data analysis and inferential statistics, distributions, confidence intervals. Introduction to structural reliability and random phenomena. Applications to components and systems. Prerequisites: SE majors.

SE 130A–B. Structural Analysis (4)
Classical methods of analysis for statically indeterminate structures. Development of computer codes for the analysis of civil, mechanical, and aerospace structures from the matrix formulation of the classical structural theory, through the direct stiffness formulation, to production-type structural analysis programs. Prerequisites: grades of C– or better in SE 110A (or MAE 131A). SE 130A for SE 130B. Priority enrollment given to structural engineering majors.

SE 131. Finite Element Analysis (4)
Development of finite element models based upon the Galerkin method. Application to static and dynamic heat conduction and stress analysis. Formulation of initial boundary value problem models, development of finite element formulas, solution methods, and error analysis and interpretation of results. Prerequisites: SE 101C or MAE 130C, SE 121, SE 130B.

SE 140. Structures and Materials Laboratory (4)
Introduction to concepts, procedures, and key issues of engineering design. Problem formulation, concept design, configuration design, parametric design, and documentation. Project management, team working, ethics, and human factors. Term project in model structure design. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: SE 103, SE 130B, and senior standing in the major.

SE 140A. Professional Issues and Design for Civil Structures I (4)
Part I of multidisciplinary team experience to design, analyze, build, and test civil/geotechnical engineering components and systems considering codes, regulations, alternative design solutions, economics, sustainability, constructability, reliability, and aesthetics. Professionalism, technical communication, project management, teamwork, and ethics in engineering practice. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 3, SE 130B, SE 150, and SE 180.

SE 140B. Professional Issues and Design for Civil Structures II (4)
Part II of multidisciplinary team experience to design, analyze, build, and test civil/geotechnical engineering components and systems considering codes, regulations, alternative design solutions, economics, sustainability, constructability, reliability, and aesthetics. Professionalism, technical communication, project management, teamwork, and ethics in engineering practice. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 140A.

SE 142. Design of Composite Structures (4)
Introduction to advanced composite materials and their applications. Fiber and matrix properties, micromechanics, stiffness, ply-by-ply stress, hygrothermal behavior, and failure prediction. Lab activity will involve design, analysis, fabrication, and testing of composite structure. Prerequisites: SE 110A (or MAE 131A), SE 110B, and SE 160A.

SE 143A. Aerospace Structural Design I (4)
Conceptual and preliminary structural design of aircraft and space vehicles. Minimum-weight design of primary structures based upon mission requirements and configuration constraints. Multicriteria decision making. Team projects include layout, material selection, component sizing, fabrication, and cost. Oral presentations. Written reports. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 3, SE 142, and SE 160B.

SE 143B. Aerospace Structural Design II (4)
Detailed structural design of aircraft and space vehicles. Composite material design considerations. Multidisciplinary design optimization. Introduction to aerospace computer-aided design and analysis tools. Team projects include the analysis, fabrication, and testing of a flight vehicle component. Oral presentations. Written reports. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 143A.

SE 150. Design of Steel Structures (4)
Design concepts and loadings for structural systems. Working stress, ultimate strength design theories. Properties of structural steel. Elastic design of tension members, beams, and columns. Design of bolted and welded concentric and eccentric connections, and composite floors. Introduction to plastic design. Prerequisites: SE 130A.  

SE 151A. Design of Reinforced Concrete (4)
Concrete and reinforcement properties. Service and ultimate limit state analysis and design. Design and detailing of structural components. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in SE 103 and SE 130A.

SE 151B. Design of Prestressed Concrete (4)
Time-dependent and independent properties of concrete and reinforcing material. Concept and application of prestressed concrete. Service and ultimate limit state analysis and design of prestressed concrete structures and components. Detailing of components. Calculation of deflection and prestress losses. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in SE 151A.

SE 152. Seismic Design of Structures (4)
Seismic design philosophy. Ductility concepts. Lateral force resisting systems. Mechanisms of nonlinear deformation. Methods of analysis. Detailing of structural steel and reinforced concrete elements. Lessons learned from past earthquakes. Multistory building design project. Prerequisites: SE 130B, SE 150, and SE 151A.

SE 154. Design of Timber Structures (4)
Properties of wood and lumber grades. Beam design. Design of axially loaded members. Design of beam-column. Properties of plywood and structural-use panels. Design of horizontal diaphragms. Design of shear walls. Design of nailed and bolted connections. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in SE 103 and SE 130A; SE major.

SE 160A. Aerospace Structural Mechanics I (4)
Aircraft and spacecraft flight loads and operational envelopes, three-dimensional stress/strain relations, metallic and composite materials, failure theories, three-dimensional space trusses and stiffened shear panels, combined extension-bend-twist behavior of thin-walled multicell aircraft and space vehicle structures, modulus-weighted section properties, shear center. Prerequisites:SE 2, SE 2L, SE 101B (or MAE 130B), and SE 110A (or MAE 131A). Priority enrollment given to engineering majors.

SE 160B. Aerospace Structural Mechanics II (4)
Analysis of aerospace structures via work-energy principles and finite element analysis. Bending of metallic and laminated composite plates and shells. Static vibration, and buckling analysis of simple and built-up aircraft structures. Introduction to wing divergence and flutter, fastener analysis. Prerequisites: SE 101C (or MAE 130C) and SE 160A. Priority enrollment given to engineering majors.

SE 163. Nondestructive Evaluation (4)
Damage detection, materials characterization. Introduction to nondestructive evaluation. Impedance-based methods, ultrasonics, acoustic, thermography, shearography, liquid penetrant, proof testing, stress coatings, vibrational techniques. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in SE 110A and SE 110B or consent of instructor; SE major.

SE 165. Structural Health Monitoring (4)
A modern paradigm of structural health monitoring as it applies to structural and mechanical systems is presented. Concepts in data acquisition, feature extraction, data normalization, and statistical modeling will be introduced in an integrated context. MATLAB-based exercise. Term project. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 101C (or MAE 130C).

SE 168. Structural System Testing and Model Correlation (4)
Dynamic/model testing of structures: test planning/execution, actuation, sensing, and data acquisition, signal processing, data conditioning, test troubleshooting. Methods of updating finite element structural models to correlate with dynamic test results. Model/test correlation assessment in industrial practice. Knowledge of Matlab strongly encouraged. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in SE 101C (or MAE 130C) and SE 131.

SE 171. Aerospace Structures Repair (4)
Review methods used to repair aerospace structures. Emphasis on primary load-bearing airframe structures and analysis/design of substantiate repairs. Identification of structural/corrosion distress, fatigue cracking, damage tolerance, integrity and durability of built-up members, patching, health monitoring. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 130B or SE 160A or consent of instructor.

SE 180. Earthquake Engineering (4)
Elements of seismicity and seismology. Seismic hazards. Dynamic analysis of structures underground motion. Elastic and inelastic response spectra. Modal analysis, nonlinear time-history analysis. Earthquake resistant design. Seismic detailing. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in SE 110A, and SE 130A. Priority enrollment given to structural engineering majors.

SE 181. Geotechnical Engineering (4)
General introduction to physical and engineering properties of soils. Soil classification and identification methods. Compaction and construction control. Total and effective stress. Permeability, seepage, and consolidation phenomena. Shear strength of sand and clay. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in SE 110A or MAE 131A; SE major.

SE 182. Foundation Engineering (4)
Application of soil mechanics to the analysis, design, and construction of foundations for structures. Soil exploration, sampling, and in-situ testing techniques. Stress distribution and settlement of structures. Bearing capacities of shallow foundations. Axial and lateral capacity of deep foundations, earth pressures on retaining walls. Prerequisites: grade of C– or better in SE 181; SE major.

SE 184. Ground Improvement (4)
Concepts underpinning mechanical, hydraulic, chemical and inclusion-based methods of ground improvement will be discussed. Students will be able to understand the advantages, disadvantages and limitations of the various methods; and develop a conceptual design for the most appropriate improvement strategy.  Prerequisites: SE 181.

SE 192. Senior Seminar (1)
The Senior Seminar is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members to explore an intellectual topic in structural engineering. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to twenty students with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: SE major. Department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

SE 195. Teaching (2–4)
Teaching and tutorial assistance in a SE course under supervision of instructor. Not more than four units may be used to satisfy graduation requirements. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: B average in major, upper-division standing, and consent of department chair. Department stamp required.

SE 197. Engineering Internship (1–4)
An enrichment program, available to a limited number of undergraduate students, which provides work experience with industry, government offices, etc., under the supervision of a faculty member and industrial supervisor. Coordination of the Engineering Internship is conducted through UC San Diego’s Academic Internship Program. Prerequisites: completion of ninety units with a 2.5 GPA and consent of department chair. Department stamp required.

SE 198. Directed Study Group (4)
Directed group study, on a topic or in a field not included in the regular department curriculum, by special arrangement with a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor or department stamp.

SE 199. Independent Study (1–4)
Independent reading or research on a problem by special arrangement with a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor or department stamp.

SE 200. Applied Mathematics in Structural Engineering (4)
This course is designed to give beginning students the basic preparation in mathematical methods required for graduate Structural Engineering courses. Topics include: linear algebra; systems of ordinary differential equations; diffusion and wave propagation problems; integral transforms; and calculus of variations. Prerequisites: graduate standing or approval of instructor.

SE 201A. Advanced Structural Analysis (4)
Application of advanced analytical concepts to structural engineering problems. Analysis of frame structures using matrix methods and introduction to the finite element method. Displacement-based and force-based beam element formulations. Development of computer programs for structural analysis. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SE 201B. Nonlinear Structural Analysis (4)
The course emphasizes the principles behind modern nonlinear structural analysis software. It deals with the theory, computer implementation, and applications of methods of material and geometric nonlinear analysis. Emphasis is on 2D and 3D frame structures modeled using 1D (beam-column) elements. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 201A or equivalent, or consent of instructor.

SE 202. Structural Stability (4)
Static, dynamic, and energy-based techniques and predicting elastic stability. Linear and nonlinear analysis of classical and shear deformable beams and plates. Ritz, Galerkin, and finite element approaches for frames and reinforced shells. Nonconservative aerodynamic (divergence flutter) and follower forces. Recommended preparation: SE 101A-C and SE 110A or equivalent background in solid mechanics and structural dynamics. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SE 203. Structural Dynamics (4)
Response of discrete linear structural systems to harmonic, periodic and transient excitations. Lagrangian mechanics. Linearization of the equations of motion. Free and forced vibrations of multi degree-of-freedom structures. Normal mode, frequency response and numerical methods. Continuous systems. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SE 204. Advanced Structural Dynamics (4)
Free-and forced-vibration of continuous systems such as axial and torsional vibrations of bars and transverse vibrations of various beams, membranes, and plates. Euler-Lagrange formulation using variational calculus. Rayleigh-Ritz method for approximation. Applications in vibration suppression/isolation. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SE 205. Nonlinear Mechanical Vibrations (4)
Advanced analytical techniques to understand nonlinearity in mechanical vibration. Phase plane analysis instability, and bifurcations. Application in nonlinear structural resonance. Introduction to chaotic dynamics, advanced time series analysis, and using chaotic dynamics in applications such as structural damage assessment. Prerequisites: SE 203 or consent of instructor; graduate standing.

SE 206. Random Vibrations (4)
Introduction to probability theory and random processes. Correlation and power spectral density functions. Estimation of correlation functions, ergodicity. Stochastic dynamic analysis of structures subjected to stationary and nonstationary fandom excitations. Crossings, first-excursion probability, distributions of peaks and extremes. Recommended preparation: Basic Knowledge of Probability Theory (SE 125 or equivalent). Prerequisites: MAE 237 or SE 203; graduate standing. 

SE 207. Topics in Structural Engineering (4)
A course to be given at the discretion of the faculty in which topics of current interest in structural engineering will be presented.

SE 211. Advanced Structural Concrete (4)
Properties of reinforcing steels; concrete technology; creep, shrinkage and relaxation; Mohr-Coulomb failure criteria for concrete; confinement, momentcurvature and force-displacement responses; plastic design; code compliant seismic design philosophy; code compliant seismic design of structural walls. Use of computer resources.  Recommended preparation: SE 151A and SE 151B or equivalent background in basic RC/PC design. Prerequisites: consent of instructor; department approval required.

SE 212. Advanced Structural Steel Design (4)
Load and Resistance Factor Design (LRFD) philosophy. Behavior and design of steel elements for global and local buckling. Background of seismic codes. Ductility requirements and capability design concept. Seismic design of steel moment frames and braced frames. Prerequisites: SE 201 and SE 150, or equivalent course, or consent of instructor.

SE 213. Bridge Design (4)
Design and analysis of bridge structures, construction methods, load conditions. Load paths and distribution of dead and live loads. Service, strength, and extreme event limit states and other load and resistance factor design (LRFD) principles. Design of pre-stressed concrete bridges. Special problems in analysis—concrete box girders, curved and skewed bridges, environmental and seismic loads. Conceptual/preliminary bridge design project. Recommended preparation: SE 223 (Advanced Seismic Design of Structures). Prerequisites: SE 201A and SE 211.

SE 214. Masonry Structures (4)
Analysis and design of unreinforcced and reinforced masonry structure using advanced analytical techniques and design philosophies. Material properties, stability, and buckling of unreinforced masonry. Flexural strength, shear strength, stiffness, and ductility of reinforced masonry elements. Design for seismic loads. Prerequisites: SE 151A, B, or equivalent basic reinforced concrete course, or consent of instructor; graduate standing.

SE 215. Cable Structures (4)
The course deals with cable structures from a structural mechanics point of view. The theoretical and practical aspects of the application of cables to moorings, guyed structures, suspension bridges, cable-stayed bridges, and suspended membranes are discussed. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SE 220. Seismic Isolation and Energy Dissipation (4)
Concepts, advantages, and limitations of seismic isolation techniques; fundamentals of dynamic response under seismic excitation; spectral analysis; damping; energy approach; application to buildings and structures. Prerequisites: background in structural dynamics, or consent of instructor.

SE 221. Earthquake Engineering (4)
Introduction to plate tectonics and seismology. Rupture mechanism, measures of magnitude and intensity, earthquake occurrence and relation to geologic, tectonic processes. Probabilistic seismic hazard analysis. Strong earthquake ground motion; site effects on ground motion; structural response; soil-structure interaction; design criteria; code requirements. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 203 or consent of instructor; graduate standing.

SE 222. Geotechnical Earthquake Engineering (4)
Influence of soil conditions on ground motion characteristics; dynamic behavior of soils, computation of ground response using wave propagation analysis and finite element analysis; evaluation and mitigation of soil liquefaction; soil-structure interaction; lateral pressures on earth retaining structures; analysis of slope stability. Recommended preparation: SE 181 or equivalent. Prerequisites: department approval and graduate standing.

SE 223. Advanced Seismic Design of Structures (4)
Fundamental concepts in seismic design. Innovative earthquake resistant system. Passive energy dissipation systems. Metallic, friction, viscoelastic dampers. Self-centering devices. Tuned-mass dampers. Theory of seismic isolation. Metallic bearings. Lead-extrusion bearings. Sliding bearings. Laminated rubber bearings. Lead-rubber bearings. Prerequisites: department approval and graduate standing.

SE 224. Structural Reliability and Risk Analysis (4)
Review of probability theory and random processes. Fundamentals of structural reliability theory. First- and second-order, and simulation methods of reliability analysis. Structural component and system reliability. Reliability sensitivity measures. Bayesian reliability analysis methods. Bases for probabilistic design codes. Use of computer resources. Recommended preparation: basic knowledge of probability theory (e.g., SE 125). Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SE 226. Geotechnical Groundwater Engineering (4)
This course will treat quantitative aspects of the flow of uncontaminated groundwater as it influences the practice of geotechnical engineering. We will cover flow through porous media, generalized Darcy's law, groundwater modeling, confined and unconfined systems, well hydraulics, land subsidence, and construction dewatering. Prerequisites: SE 241 or consent of instructor.

SE 233. Computational Techniques in Finite Elements (4)
Practical application of the finite element method to problems in solid mechanics including basic preprocessing and postprocessing. Topics include element types, mesh refinement, boundary conditions, dynamics, eigenvalue problems, and linear and nonlinear solution methods.

SE 235. Wave Propagation in Elastic Media (4)
Wave propagation in elastic media with emphasis on waves in unbound media and on uniform and layered half-spaces. Fundamental aspects of elastodynamics. Application to strong-motion seismology, earthquake engineering, dynamics of foundations, computational wave propagation, and nondestructive evaluations. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SE 236. Wave Propagation in Continuous Structural Elements (4)
Propagation of elastic waves in thin structural elements such as strings, rods, beams, membranes, plates, and shells. An approximate strength-of-materials approach is used to consider propagation of elastic waves in these elements and obtain the dynamic response to transient loads. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SE 241. Advanced Soil Mechanics (4)
Advanced treatment of topics in soil mechanics, including state of stress, pore pressure, consolidation and settlement analysis, shear strength of cohesionless and cohesive soils, mechanisms of ground improvement, and slope stability analysis. Concepts in course reinforced by laboratory experiments.

SE 242. Advanced Foundation Engineering (4)
Advanced treatment of topics in foundation engineering, including earth pressure theories, design of earth retaining structures, bearing capacity, ground improvement for foundation support, analysis and design of shallow and deep foundations, including drilled piers and driven piles.

SE 243. Soil-Structure Interaction (4)
Advanced treatment of the dynamic interaction between soils and structures.  Dynamic response of shallow and embedded foundations. Kinematic and inertial interaction. General computational and approximate analytical methods of analysis. Prerequisites: SE 200 and SE 203; graduate standing.  

SE 244. Numerical Methods in Geomechanics (4)
Application of finite element method to static and dynamic analysis of geotechnical structures. One-, 2-, and 3-D static and seismic response of earth structures/slopes/Foundation systems. Pore-pressure generation/effects during cycle loading. System identification using strong motion downhole-array data. Use of computer resources required. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SE 247. Ground Improvement (4)
Concepts underpinning mechanical, hydraulic, chemical and inclusion-based methods of ground improvement will be discussed. Students will be able to understand the advantages, disadvantages and limitations of the various methods; and develop a conceptual design for the most appropriate improvement strategy. Recommended Preparation: SE 181 or equivalent background in the physics and engineering properties of soil. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SE 250. Stability of Earth Slopes and Retaining Walls (4)
Fundamental and advanced concepts of stability analysis for earth slopes and retaining walls with soil backfill. Topics: shear strength, effective/total stress analysis, infinite/finite slopes, reinforced soil slopes, lateral earth pressure, retaining wall design and reinforced soil retaining walls. Recommended preparation: SE 181 or equivalent background. Prerequisites: department approval and graduate standing.

SE 251A. Processing of Polymers and Composites (4)
Introduction to processing and fabrication methods of polymers and composite materials. Processing techniques; facilities and equipment; material-processing-microstructure interaction; materials selection; form and quality control. Extrusion; injection molding; blow molding; compression molding; thermoforming; casting; foaming. Wet layup; sprayup; autoclave cure, SMC; RTM; resin infusion; winding and fiber placement; pultrusion. Process induced defects and environmental considerations. Cross-listed with MATS 261A. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SE 251B. Mechanical Behaviors of Polymers and Composites (4)
Material science oriented course on polymers and composites. Mechanical properties of polymers; micromechanisms of elastic and plastic deformations, fracture, and fatigue of polymers and composites. Cross-listed with MATS 261B. Prerequisites: graduate standing required.

SE 252. Experimental Mechanics and NDE (4)
Requirements for strain measurements, electrical resistance strain gages, fiberoptic strain gages, wave propagation, ultrasonic testing, impact-echo, acoustic emission, infrared thermography, vibrational testing. Applications to materials characterization, defect detection, and health monitoring of structural components. Recommended preparation: SE 101A (or MAE 130A), SE 110A (or MAE 131A), and SE 110B (or MAE 131B). Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department approval required.

SE 253A. Mechanics of Laminated Composite Structures I (4)
Graduate-level introductory course on mechanics of composites and anisotropic materials. Overview of composite materials and processes, 3-D properties and stress-strain relationships, micromechanics, classical laminated plate theory, basic failure criteria, thermal/moisture/CTE. Students may not receive credit for both SE 253A and SE 250. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SE 253B. Mechanics of Laminated Composite Structures II (4)
Advanced topics, with prerequisite being SE 253A, or equivalent. Macro- and micro-material modeling, classical and shear deformable laminate beam and plate theories developed via energy principles, Ritz, Galerkin, and Finite element based solutions, advanced failure theories, fracture, holes/notches and hole-size effect, interlaminar stresses, free-edge problems, impact, damage tolerance, fatigue, elastic tailoring, thermally stabile/zero CTE structures, etc. Prerequisites: SE 253A or equivalent, graduate standing.

SE 253C. Mechanics of Laminated Anisotropy Plates and Shells (4)
Static/dynamic/elastic stability of laminated anisotropic plates and cylindrical shells.  Theories:  thin-plate (classical lamination theory), first-and third- order shear-deformable (Reissner-Mindlin and Reddy) thick plates, and refined layer-wise theories.  Solution methods:  exact, approximate (Ritz, Galerkin) and finite element method.  Additional topics: sandwich construction, elastic couplings, theormal response, shear factor determination, fiber/interlaminar stress recovery, strength/safety. Prerequisites: SE 253B; graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SE 254. FRPs in Civil Structures (4)
Strengthening of existing reinforced concrete structures with fiber reinforced composites. Mechanics of Fiber Reinforced Plastic lamina, bond strength of FRP-to-concrete joints, shear and flexural strengthening of beams and walls, increased strength and ductility of axially loaded columns, and seismic retrofit of columns. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: SE 253A; graduate standing.

SE 255. Textile Composite Structures (4)
Introduction to textile structure and behavior, mechanics of yarns and fabrics as relevant to structural composites and geotechnical applications. Mechanics of textiles and fabric-based composites. Applications in fiber reinforced composites, coated textile structures, geotextiles.

SE 260A. Aerospace Structural Mechanics I (4)
Aircraft and spacecraft flight loads and operational envelopes, three-dimensional stress/strain relations, metallic and composite materials, failure theories, three-dimensional space trusses and stiffened shear panels, combined extension-bend-twist behavior of thin-walled multicell aircraft and space vehicle structures, modulus-weighted section properties, shear center. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SE 260B. Aerospace Structural Mechanics II (4)
Analysis of aerospace structures via work-energy principles and finite element analysis. Bending of metallic and laminated composite plates and shells. Static vibration, and buckling analysis of simple and built-up aircraft structures. Introduction to wing divergence and flutter, fastener analysis. Prerequisites: SE 260A; graduate standing.

SE 261. Aerospace Engineering Design (4)
Advanced topics in the design of weight-critical aerospace structures. Topics include: static, dynamic and environmental load definitions; metallics and polymeric composite material selection; semi-monocoque analysis techniques, and bolted/bonded connections. Design procedures for sizing the structural components of aircraft and spacecraft will be reviewed.

SE 262. Aerospace Structures Repair (4)
Review methods used to repair aerospace structures. Emphasis on primary load-bearing airframe structures and analysis/design of substantiate repairs. Identification of structural/corrosion distress, fatigue cracking, damage tolerance, integrity and durability of built-up members, patching, health monitoring. Use of computer resources. Prerequisites: department approval required.

SE 265. Structural Health Monitoring (4)
A modern paradigm of structural health monitoring as it applies to structural and mechanical systems is presented. Concepts in data acquisition, feature extraction, data normalization, and statistical modeling will be introduced in an integrated context. Matlab-based exercises. Term project. Prerequisites: graduate student, undergraduate vibrations or structural dynamics course.

SE 268. Structural System Testing and Model Correlation (4)
Dynamic/model testing of structures: test planning/execution, actuation, sensing, and data acquisition, signal processing, data conditioning, test troubleshooting. Methods of updating finite element structural models to correlate with dynamic test results. Model/test correlation assessment in industrial practice. Recommended preparation:  vibrations, finite element analysis, and knowledge of Matlab. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SE 271. Solid Mechanics for Structural and Aerospace Engineering (4)
Application of principles of solid mechanics to structural components and systems, description of stresses, strains, and deformation. Use of conservation equations and principle of minimum potential energy. Development of constitutive equations for metallic cementitious and polymeric materials. Prerequisites: SE 110A or consent of instructor.

SE 272. Theory of Elasticity (4)
Development, formulation, and application of field equations of elasticity and variational principles for structural applications in civil and aerospace area. Use of plane stress and plane strain formulation, solution of typical boundary value problems. Prerequisites: SE 271 or consent of instructor.

SE 273. Anelasticity (4)
Mechanical models of viscoelastic, plastic, and viscoplastic behavior in simple shear or uniaxial stress. Constitutive relations for three-dimensional states of stress and strain. Application to selected technological problems. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SE 271 and SE 272, or MAE 231A and MAE 231B, or consent of instructor.

SE 274. Nonlinear Finite Element Methods for Solid Mechanics (4)
Modeling of mechanical deformation processes in solids and structures by the finite element method. PDE models of deformations in solids and structures. Weak form. Weighted residual method. Material models for 3-D solids and rods, beams, shells: elasticity, plasticity, viscoplasticity. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SE 276A. Finite Element Methods in Solid Mechanics I (4)
Finite element methods for linear problems in solid mechanics. Emphasis on the principle of virtual work, finite element stiffness matrices, various finite element formulations and their accuracy and the numerical implementation required to solve problems in small strain, isotropic elasticity in solid mechanics.

SE 276B. Finite Element Methods in Solid Mechanics (4)
Finite element methods for linear problems in structural dynamics. Beam, plate, and doubly curved shell elements are derived. Strategies for eliminating shear locking problems are introduced. Formulation and numerical solution of the equations of motion for structural dynamics are introduced and the effect of different mass matrix formulations on the solution accuracy is explored.

SE 276C. Finite Element Methods in Solid Mechanics III (4)
Finite element methods for problems with both material and geometrical (large deformations) nonlinearities. The total LaGrangian and the updated LaGrangian formulations are introduced. Basic solution methods for the nonlinear equations are developed and applied to problems in plasticity and hyperelasticity. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SE 276A or MAE 232A and MAE 231A or SE 271.

SE 277. Error Control in Finite Element Analysis (4)
This course will provide an overview of the latest technology for evaluating and improving the accuracy and validity of linear and nonlinear finite element models, solution verification, finite element model validation, sensitivity analysis, uncertainty analysis, and test-analysis correlation. Prerequisites: SE 232B or MAE 232B.

SE 278A. Finite Elements for Fluid Mechanics (4)
Development and application of advanced computational techniques for fluid flow. Stabilized and variational multiscale methods for finite element and related discretizations are stressed. Applications involve advection-diffusion equations and systems, and incompressible and compressible Navier-Stokes equations. Turbulence modeling will also be covered. Prerequisites: MAE 232A or SE 276A or consent of instructor; graduate standing.

SE 278B. Computational Fluid-Structure Interaction (4)
Conservation laws on general moving domains. Arbitrary Lagrange-Eulerian (ALE) and space-time approaches to fluid-structure interaction are covered. Suitable discretizations, mesh motion, and discrete solution strategies are discussed. Prerequisites: SE 278A.

SE 279. Meshfree Methods for Linear and Nonlinear Mechanics (4)
Meshfree approximation theories (moving least-squares, reproducing kernel, partition of unity, radial basis), Galerkin meshfree methods, collocation meshfree methods, imposition of boundary conditions, domain integration, stability, nonlinear meshfree method for hyperelasticity and plasticity, meshfree methods for fracture and plate/shell problems. Prerequisites: SE 276A or MAE 232A; graduate standing.

SE 290. Seminar in Earthquake Engineering (2)
Weekly seminar and discussion by faculty, visitors, postdoctoral research fellows and graduate students concerning research topics in earthquake engineering and related subjects. May be repeated for credit. (S/U grades only.)

SE 296. Independent Study (4)
Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

SE 298. Directed Group Study (1–4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in regular department curriculum, by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

SE 299. Graduate Research (1–12)
(S/U grades permitted.)

SE 501. Teaching Experience (2)
Teaching experience in an appropriate SE undergraduate course under direction of the faculty member in charge of the course. Lecturing one hour per week in either a problem-solving section or regular lecture. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and the department. (S/U grades permitted.)

ENVR 30. Environmental Issues: Natural Sciences (4)
Examines global and regional environmental issues. The approach is to consider the scientific basis for policy options. Simple principles of chemistry and biology are introduced. The scope of problems includes: air and water pollution, climate modification, solid waste disposal, hazardous waste treatment, and environmental impact assessment. Prerequisites: none.

ENVR 87. Environmental Studies Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

ENVR 102. Selected Topics in Environmental Studies (4)
An interdisciplinary course focusing on one of a variety of topics related to environmental studies such as environmental policy and politics, foreign study in environmental problems, environmental history, nature writers, ethics and the environment. May be repeated three times for credit as topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ENVR 110. Environmental Law (4)
Explores environmental policy in the United States and the ways in which it is reflected in law. The social and political issues addressed include environmental justice and environmental racism, as well as the role of government in implementing environmental law. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ENVR 120. Coastal Ecology (4)
Explores the diverse ecosystems of coastal San Diego County (salt marsh, rocky intertidal, sandy beach, etc.) in the classroom and in the field with attention to basic principles of field ecology, natural history, and techniques for collecting ecological data. Course and/or materials fee may apply. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ENVR 130. Environmental Issues: Social Sciences (4)
Explores contemporary environmental issues from the perspective of the social sciences. It includes the cultural framing of environmental issues and appropriate social action, the analysis of economic incentives and constraints, and a comparison of policy approaches. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ENVR 140. Wilderness and Human Values (4)
“Wilderness” plays a central role in the consciousness of American environmentalists and serves as focal point for public policies, recreation, and political activism. This course explores its evolving historical, philosophical, ecological, and aesthetic meanings and includes guest speakers and a field component. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

ENVR 141. Wilderness and Human Values Workshop (2)
A course to prepare students to serve as discussion leaders for ENVR 140, Wilderness and Human Values. Includes reading, discussion, library and online research, and field trips. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department stamp.

ENVR 195. Apprentice Teaching (0-4)
Instructor will define assistant’s responsibilities in preparing class presentations, leading students’ discussions, and evaluating students’ work. May be taken two times for credit.

ENVR 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Directed group research and study, normally with a focus on areas not otherwise covered in the curriculum. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. Department stamp required. May be taken three times for credit as topics vary.

ENVR 199. Independent Study (4)
Independent study in a topic not generally covered in the regular curriculum. Prerequisites: consent of instructor, director of Environmental Studies. May be taken two times for credit as content varies. Department stamp required.

ENVR 500. Apprentice Teaching in Environmental Studies (4)
A course in which teaching assistants are aided in learning proper teaching methods by means of supervision of their work by the faculty: handling of discussions, preparation and grading of examinations and other written exercises, and student relations. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

ESYS 10. Introduction to Environmental Systems (4)
This course explores the interdisciplinary character of environmental issues through an examination of a particular topic (climate change, for example) from numerous disciplinary perspectives (e.g., biology, chemistry, physics, political science, and economics). Prerequisites: none. (W)

ESYS 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate college, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students with preference given to entering freshmen.

ESYS 90. Perspectives on Environmental Issues (1)
Provides an introduction to environmental systems. Faculty members from departments in the natural sciences, geosciences, and social sciences will offer perspectives in these areas. (F)

ESYS 101. Environmental Biology (4)
This course surveys biochemical and physiological processes governing the relationship between organisms and their environments, such as those involved in element cycling and cellular homeostasis. The course introduces biological perspectives on human activities ranging from antibiotic use to genetic engineering. Prerequisites: BILD 1 or 2 or equivalent, or consent of instructor. (F)

ESYS 102. The Solid and Fluid Earth (4)
Earth’s dynamic physical systems interact in complex ways with profound impact on our environment. Processes such as volcanism and weathering enable geochemical exchange between solid and fluid (ocean and atmosphere) systems. Sea level and climate changes interface with tectonic processes. Prerequisites: Math 10A or Math 20A, Chem 6A, Physics 1A or 2A, or consent of instructor. (W)

ESYS 103/MAE 124. Environmental Challenges: Science and Solutions (4)
This course explores the impacts of human, social, economic, and industrial activity on the environment. It highlights the central roles in ensuring sustainable development played by market forces, technological innovation, and government regulation on local, national, and global scales. Prerequisites: Math 10A-C or Math 20B or consent of instructor. (S)

ESYS 190A. Senior Project (8)
All majors are required to complete an integrative Senior Project in their senior year. The Senior Project is designed by the student to focus on an interdisciplinary environmental problem or research topic and is developed either individually or as part of a team over two quarters. Appropriate topics could include biodiversity conservation, environmental health, and/or global change. An important component of the Senior Project is an off-campus or laboratory internship. Prerequisites: ESYS 103 and upper-division standing, departmental approval, majors only. (F,W)

ESYS 190B. Environmental Systems Senior Seminar (4)
The seminar provides a venue for the development, presentation, and evaluation of the Environmental Systems Integrative Project. The seminar will include work on research methods as well as paper presentation skills. Prerequisites: Completion of ESYS 190A or ESYS 190A(W) sequence, senior standing and majors only. (S)

ESYS 199. Independent Study (2-4)
Individually guided readings or projects in the area of environmental systems.

ETHN 1. Introduction to Ethnic Studies: Land and Labor (4)
This course examines key historical events and debates in the field that center around land and labor, including disputes about territory and natural resources, slavery and other forms of unfree labor, labor migration and recruitment, and US and transnational borders. Students may not receive credit for both ETHN 1A and ETHN 1.

ETHN 2. Introduction to Ethnic Studies: Circulations of Difference (4)
Focusing on historical and contemporary migration and the circulation of commodities, knowledge, bodies, and culture, this course looks at how racial formation in the U.S. and transnationally is shaped and contested by such movements. Students may not receive credit for both ETHN 1B and ETHN 2.

ETHN 3. Introduction to Ethnic Studies: Making Culture (4)
Through examining the historical and contemporary politics of representation in both popular and community-focused media, film, art, music, and literature, this course tracks racial formation through studying the sphere of cultural production, consumption, and contestation. Students may not receive credit for both ETHN 1C and ETHN 3.

ETHN 20. Introduction to Asian American History (4)
This course introduces students to key issues in Asian American lives, with emphasis on the global historical context of migration; changing ethnic and racial consciousness; economic, social, and political status; cultural production; and family and gender relations.

ETHN 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

ETHN 97. Field Studies in Racial and Ethnic Communities (1–4)
Supervised community fieldwork on topics of importance to racial and ethnic communities in the San Diego County region. Regular individual meetings with faculty sponsor and final project and/or written report are required. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of at least thirty units of undergraduate study at UC San Diego, minimum 3.0 GPA at UC San Diego, consent of instructor, and completed and approved Special Studies Form.

ETHN 98. Directed Group Studies (1–4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular department curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of at least thirty units of undergraduate study at UC San Diego, minimum 3.0 GPA at UC San Diego, consent of instructor, and completed and approved Special Studies Form.

ETHN 99. Independent Study (1–4)
Directed study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular department curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of at least thirty units of undergraduate study at UC San Diego, minimum 3.0 GPA at UC San Diego, consent of instructor, and completed and approved Special Studies Form.

ETHN 100A. Ethnic Studies: Theoretical Approaches (4)
An advanced survey of key issues, themes, and debates in the field of critical ethnic studies focusing on the connection between race and social structures. Students will use diverse theoretical frameworks to identify and interpret contemporary and historical social problems. Prerequisites: ETHN 1 or ETHN 2 or ETHN 3, ethnic studies majors or minors, or consent of instructor.

ETHN 100B. Interdisciplinary Methodologies (4)
An introduction to interdisciplinary research methodologies in critical ethnic studies. By developing a critical analysis of the politics of knowledge production, students will learn to identify different methodological approaches in the field and to evaluate their use in practical application. Prerequisites: ETHN 100A, ethnic studies major or minor, or consent of instructor.

ETHN 100C. Social Justice Praxis (4)
An intensive capstone experience for ethnic studies majors, this course combines an advanced exploration of praxis-based approaches to social justice with practicum-based independent campus, community, creative, or research projects. Prerequisites: ETHN 100A and ETHN 100B, ethnic studies major or minor, or consent of instructor.

ETHN 100H. Honors Research Design (4)
This discussion-based course will focus on the application of advanced research methods to the design of extensive, independent research-based projects. Prerequisites: ETHN 100A and ETHN 100B. Department approval required.

ETHN 101. Ethnic Images in Film (4)
An upper-division lecture course studying representations of ethnicity in the American cinema. Topics include ethnic images as narrative devices, the social implications of ethnic images, and the role of film in shaping and reflecting societal power relations.

ETHN 102. Science and Technology in Society: Race/Gender/Class (4)
This course examines the role of science and technology in forming popular conceptions of race, gender and class, and vice versa. We also consider how some populations benefit from the results of experimentation while others come to be its subjects.

ETHN 103. Environmental Racism (4)
This course will examine the concept of environmental racism, the empirical evidence of its widespread existence, and the efforts by government, residents, workers, and activists to combat it. We will examine those forces that create environmental injustices in order to understand its causes as well as its consequences. Students are expected to learn and apply several concepts and social scientific theories to the course material.

ETHN 104. Race, Space, and Segregation (4)
Through in-depth studies of housing segregation, urban renewal and displacement, neighborhood race effects, and the location of hazards and amenities, this course examines how space becomes racialized and how race becomes spatialized in the contemporary United States.

ETHN 105. Ethnic Diversity and the City (4)
(Cross-listed with USP 104.) This course will examine the city as a crucible of ethnic identity, exploring both the racial and ethnic dimensions of urban life in the U.S. from the Civil War to the present.

ETHN 106. Life, Death, and the Human (4)
Using interdisciplinary approaches, this course examines some of the contexts in which the conditions of life and death become sites of political, economic, and cultural significance, and how categories of difference impact access to the protections of ‘humanity.’

ETHN 107. Fieldwork in Racial and Ethnic Communities (4)
(Cross-listed with USP 130.) This is a research course examining social, economic, and political issues in ethnic and racial communities through a variety of research methods that may include interviews and archival, library, and historical research.

ETHN 108. Race, Culture, and Social Change (4)
(Cross-listed with MUS 151.) Aggrieved groups often generate distinctive forms of cultural expression by turning negative ascription into positive affirmation and by transforming segregation into congregation. This course examines the role of cultural expressions in struggles for social change by these communities inside and outside the United States.

ETHN 109. Race and Social Movements (4)
This course explores collective mobilizations for resources, recognition, and power by members of aggrieved racialized groups, past and present. Emphasis will be placed on the conditions that generate collective movements, the strategies and ideologies that these movements have developed, and on the prospect for collective mobilization for change within aggrieved communities in the present and future.

ETHN 110. Cultural Worldviews of Indigenous America (4)
Places Native Americans/indigenous people's ways of living, knowing, and understanding the world in relation to settler-immigrant societies in North America. Students gain analytical tools for thinking about world views through themes of cosmology, land, kinship, and identity formation.

ETHN 111. Native American Literature (4)
This course analyzes Native American written and oral traditions. Students will read chronicles and commentaries on published texts, historic speeches, trickster narratives, oratorical and prophetic tribal epics, and will delve into the methodological problems posed by tribal literature in translation.

ETHN 112A. History of Native Americans in the United States I (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 108A.) This course examines the history of Native Americans in the United States, with emphasis on the lifeways, mores, warfare, cultural adaptation, and relations with the European colonial powers and the emerging United States until 1870.

ETHN 112B. History of Native Americans in the United States II (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 108B.) This course examines the history of Native Americans in the United States, with emphasis on the lifeways, mores, warfare, cultural adaptation, and relations with the United States from 1870 to the present.

ETHN 113. Decolonizing Education (4)
This course considers decolonial theories of education in relation to classroom pedagogy, focusing on US urban high schools.

ETHN 114A. Representing Native America (4)
History and theory: Introduction to the history and theory of museum representation of American Indians in order to explore its relation to colonialism and decolonization. Study of Plains Indian drawings from 1860 to 1890 will allow the class to create new approaches to designing a museum exhibition.

ETHN 114B. Representing Native America—Exhibition Design (4)
The class will work in teams to design all aspects of an actual museum exhibition of Plains Indian drawings from 1860–1890, turning theory into practice. In some quarters, the exhibition will be installed in a San Diego museum directly after completion of the course. Prerequisites: ETHN 114A.

ETHN 115. Monsters, Orphans, and Robots (4)
This course considers dark agencies, queer threats, and how they seep through cracks in containers meant to disable them. This class will be writing intensive with an artistic production component. Recommended: ETHN 100 is recommended prior to enrollment in this course.

ETHN 116. The United States–Mexico Border in Comparative Perspective (4)
This course critically explores the US–Mexico frontier and the social-cultural issues on both sides of the international demarcation. Social-historical and political-economic patterns illuminate border life, ethnic identity, social diversity, and cultural expression. Border ethnography is complemented by film and music.

ETHN 117. Organic Social Movements (4)
Examination of local responses to global change and social disruption through the examination of organic movements in indigenous societies. In-depth analysis of the Kuna Indians of San Blas, Panama; Maya-Zapatistas of Chiapas, Mexico; and Micronesians of the western Pacific.

ETHN 118. Contemporary Immigration Issues (4)
This course examines the diversity of today’s immigrants—their social origins and contexts of exit and their adaptation experiences and contexts of incorporation.

ETHN 119. Race in the Americas (4)
This course explores the genesis, evolution, and contradictions of racially heterogeneous societies in the Americas, from European conquest to the present. Topics: the social history of Native Americans, blacks, and Asians, their interactions with European settlers, and racial, sexual, and class divisions.

ETHN 120. Race and Performance: The Politics of Popular Culture (4)
This course explores how racial categories and ideologies have been constructed through performance and displays of the body in the United States and other sites. Racialized performances, whether self-displays or coerced displays, such as world’s fairs, museums, minstrelsy, film, ethnography, and tourist performances are considered.

ETHN 121. Contemporary Asian American History (4)
The course will study changes in Asian American communities as a result of renewed immigration since 1965; the influx of refugees from Vietnam, Kampuchea, and Laos; the impact of contemporary social movements on Asian Americans’ current economic, social, and political status.

ETHN 122. Asian American Culture and Identity (4)
A survey of Asian American cultural expressions in literature, art, and music to understand the social experiences that helped forge Asian American identity. Topics: culture conflict, media portrayals, assimilation pressures, the model minority myth, and interethnic and class relations.

ETHN 123. Asian American Politics (4)
This course will examine the development of Asian American politics by studying the historical and contemporary factors, such as political and economic exclusion, that have contributed to the importance and complexity of ethnicity as a mobilizing force in politics.

ETHN 124. Asian American Literature (4)
(Cross-listed with LTEN 181.) Selected topics in the literature by men and women of Asian descent who live and write in the United States. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

ETHN 125. Asian American History (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 124.) Explore how Asian Americans were involved in the political, economic and cultural formation of United States society. Topics include migration; labor systems; gender, sexuality and social organization; racial ideologies and anti-Asian movements; and nationalism and debates over citizenship.

ETHN 126. Comparative Filipino and Vietnamese American Identities and Communities (4)
This course compares the historical and contemporary social, political, and economic experiences of Filipino and Vietnamese Americans, paying particular attention to the impact of US wars in the Philippines and in Vietnam on their respective lives.

ETHN 127. Sexuality and Nation (4)
(Cross-listed with CGS 112.) This course explores the nexus of sex, race, ethnicity, gender, and nation and considers their influence on identity, sexuality, migration, movement, and borders and other social, cultural, and political issues that these constructs affect.

ETHN 128. Hip-Hop: The Politics of Culture (4)
(Cross-listed with MUS 152.) Examination of hip-hop’s technology, lyrics, and dance and its influences in graffiti, film, music video, fiction, advertising, gender, corporate investment, government, and censorship with a critical focus on race, gender, and popular culture and the politics of creative expression.

ETHN 129. Asian and Latina Immigrant Workers in the Global Economy (4)
(Cross-listed with USP 135.) This course will explore the social, political, and economic implications of global economic restructuring, immigration policies, and welfare reform on Asian and Latina immigrant women in the United States. We will critically examine these larger social forces from the perspectives of Latina and Asian immigrant women workers, incorporating theories of race, class, and gender to provide a careful reading of the experiences of immigrant women on the global assembly line.

ETHN 130. Social and Economic History of the Southwest I (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 158.) This course examines the history of the Spanish and Mexican Borderlands (what became the US Southwest) from roughly 1400 to the end of the US-Mexican War in 1848, focusing specifically on the area’s social, cultural, and political development.

ETHN 131. Social and Economic History of the Southwest II (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 159.) This course examines the history of the American Southwest from the U.S.-Mexican War in 1846–48 to the present, focusing on immigration, racial and ethnic conflict, and the growth of Chicano national identity.

ETHN 132. Chicano Dramatic Literature (4)
(Cross-listed with TDHT 110.) Focusing on the contemporary evolution of Chicano dramatic literature, the course will analyze playwrights and theatre groups that express the Chicano experience in the United States, examining relevant actors, plays, and documentaries for their contributions to the developing Chicano theatre movement.

ETHN 133. Hispanic American Dramatic Literature (4)
(Cross-listed with TDHT 111.) This course examines the plays of leading Cuban American, Puerto Rican, and Chicano playwrights in an effort to understand the experiences of these Hispanic American groups in the United States.

ETHN 134. Immigration and Ethnicity in Modern American Society (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 180.) Comparative study of immigration and ethnic group formation in the United States from 1880 to the present. Topics include immigrant adaptation, competing theories about the experiences of different ethnic groups, and the persistence of ethnic attachments in modern American society. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ETHN 135A. Early Latino/a-Chicano/a Cultural Production: 1848 to 1960 (4)
(Cross-listed with LTSP 150A.) Cross-disciplinary study of nineteenth- and early twentieth-century Latino/a-Chicano/a literature, folklore, music, testimonio, or other cultural practices. Specific periods covered will fall between the immediate aftermath of the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo to the Cuban revolution. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or LTSP 50B or LTSP 50C, or consent of instructor.

ETHN 135B. Contemporary Latino/a-Chicano/a Cultural Production: 1960 to Present (4)
(Cross-listed with LTSP 150B.) Cross-disciplinary study of late twentieth-century Latino/a-Chicano/a literature, the visual and performing arts, film, or other cultural practices. Specific periods covered will fall between the Kennedy years to the era of neoliberalism and the creation of “Hispanic” or Latino/a identities. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites:LTSP 50A or LTSP 50B or LTSP 50C, or consent of instructor.

ETHN 136. The Science and Critical Analysis of Environmental Justice (4)
﻿(Cross-listed with SIO 114.) Introduction to the scientific basis and critical analysis of environmental justice, with an emphasis on case studies, activism, and community engagement. This course will prepare students to critique and develop scientific models, research designs, and measurements consistent with environmental justice. Students may not receive credit for both ETHN 136 and SIO 114.

ETHN 137. Special Topics: Latina Issues and Cultural Production (4)
(Cross-listed with CGS 137.) This course will focus on the intersection of labor, class, race, ethnicity, gender, sexuality, and immigration in Latina cultural production. Examined from a socioeconomic, feminist, and cultural perspective, class readings will allow for historically grounded analyses of these issues. Course may be repeated as topics vary.

ETHN 139. Chicano Literature in English (4)
(Cross-listed with LTEN 180.) Introduction to the literature in English by the Chicano population, the men and women of Mexican descent who live and write in the United States. Primary focus on the contemporary period.

ETHN 141. Gandhi in the Modern World: From Civil Rights to the Arab Spring (4)
Martin Luther King was inspired by Gandhi, but in his own time, Gandhi was as controversial as he was revered. Nonviolence was not widely accepted as a form of political protest. This course explores Gandhi’s complex legacy of nonviolence for places and peoples embroiled in conflict.

ETHN 142. Medicine, Race, and the Global Politics of Inequality (4)
Globalization fosters both the transmission of AIDS, cholera, tuberculosis, and other infectious diseases and gross inequalities in the resources available to prevent and cure them. This course focuses on how race, ethnicity, gender, sexuality, class, and nation both shape and are shaped by the social construction of health and disease worldwide.

ETHN 143. Chicana/o Film and Media Studies (4)
This course is a historical survey of Chicana and Chicano media from roughly 1950 to the present. The goals of the course include learning about Chicana/o history, politics, and culture through different media and gaining the critical tools to analyze Chicana/o media and media more broadly.

ETHN 146A. Ensemble (4)
(Cross-listed with TDAC 120.) An intensive theatre practicum designed to generate theatre created by an ensemble, with particular emphasis upon the analysis of text. Students will explore and analyze scripts and authors. Ensemble segments include black theatre, Chicano theatre, feminist theatre, and commedia dell’arte. May be taken for credit two times.

ETHN 147. Black Feminisms, Past and Present (4)
(Cross-listed with CGS 147.) An advanced introduction to historical and contemporary black feminisms in the United States and transnationally. Students will explore the theory and practice of black feminists/womanists and analyze the significance of black feminism to contemporary understandings of race, class, gender, and sexuality.

ETHN 148. Latino/a and Chicano/a Literature (4)
(Cross-listed with LTSP 154.) This course will study the representation of a variety of social issues (immigration, racism, class differences, violence, inter/intra-ethnic relations, etc.) in works written in Spanish by Latino/a and Chicano/a writers. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or LTSP 50B or LTSP 50C, or consent of instructor.

ETHN 149. African American History in the Twentieth Century (4)
This course examines the transformation of African America across the expanse of the long twentieth century: imperialism, migration, urbanization, desegregation, and deindustrialization. Special emphasis will be placed on issues of culture, international relations, and urban politics.

ETHN 150. Visuality, Sexuality, and Race (4)
(Cross-listed with CGS 150.) Examines the role of the visual in power relations; the production of what we “see” regarding race and sexuality; the interconnected history of the casta system, plantation slavery, visuality and contemporary society; decolonial and queer counternarratives to visuality.

ETHN 151. Ethnic Politics in America (4)
This course will survey the political effects of immigration, ethnic mobilization, and community building in America, and the contemporary role of ethnicity in politics and intergroup relations.

ETHN 152. Law and Civil Rights (4)
In this course students explore the relationship between race, class, and law as it applies to civil rights both in a historical and a contemporary context. Topics include racism and the law, history of the Fourteenth Amendment, equal protection, school desegregation, and affirmative action.

ETHN 153. Citizenship and Civil Rights in the Twentieth Century (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 136.) This course traces the history of the institution of United States citizenship in the last century, tracing changing notions of racial, cultural, and gender differences, the evolution of the civil rights struggle, and changes in laws governing citizenship and access to rights.

ETHN 154. History of Mexican America (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 113.) This course explores the history of the largest minority population in the United States, focusing on the legacies of the Mexican War, the history of Mexican immigration and U.S.-Mexican relations, and the struggle for citizenship and civil rights.

ETHN 155. US Militarism (4)
This course considers rationales for and responses to American military expansion as well as its social, environmental, and cultural consequences. We will examine racialized, gendered, and sexualized aspects of militarized institutions and practices, including militarized colonialism, tourism, and sex work. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or instructor approval.

ETHN 155GS. Critical Perspectives on the Vietnam War (4)
This course examines the impact of the Vietnam War on three populations: Americans, Vietnamese in Vietnam, and Viet Kieu (overseas Vietnamese). We will supplement scholarly texts on the war with films, literature, and visits to war museums and monuments. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: students must apply and be accepted into the Global Seminars program.

ETHN 157. Madness and Urbanization (4)
(Cross-listed with USP 149.) This course will provide a historical and theoretical orientation for contemporary studies of the experience of mental illness and mental health-care policy in the American city, with critical attention to racial and ethnic disparities in diagnosis, treatment, and outcomes. 

ETHN 158. Native American Intellectuals in the Twentieth Century (4)
This course examines Native American intellectuals' work. It provides a broad historical perspective on the development of twentieth-century Native American political thinking and discusses the recurring issues, problems, and themes inherent to Indian-white relations, as seen from Indian perspectives.

ETHN 159. Topics in African American History (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 183.) A colloquium dealing with special topics in the history of people of African descent in the United States. Themes will vary from quarter to quarter. Requirements will vary for undergraduate, MA, and PhD students. Graduate students will be required to submit a more substantial piece of work.

ETHN 160. Global Indigenous Studies (4)
Focusing on transregional relationships to land and decolonization in the Pacific, Caribbean, and the Americas, this course is a comparative study of cultural and political phenomena that shape indigenous communities globally. We will examine enduring legacies of colonialism, nationalism, and Western normativities, and explore indigenous activism within the decolonial movement.

ETHN 162. Practicum in California Tribal Law and Journalism (4)
Work with California native tribal groups, leaders, and members to identify common, pressing questions surrounding Indian law. In partnership with legal experts, develop and disseminate new media programs and useful documents accessible to native communities throughout California.

ETHN 163E. Decolonial Theory (4)
Decolonial Theory will focus on historical and contemporary intellectual work produced by activists from colonized regions of the world. This course will be international in scope, but attentive to local struggles.

ETHN 163F. Playing Indian: Native American and First Nations Cinema (4)
﻿(Cross-listed with TDGE 131.) This course examines recent movies by Native American/First Nations artists that labor to deconstruct and critique reductive stereotypes about America’s First Peoples in Hollywood cinema. Carving spaces of “visual sovereignty” (Raheja), these films propose complex narratives and characterizations of indigeneity. Students may not receive credit for TDGE 131 and ETHN 163F.

ETHN 163G. Indigenous Theatre and Performance (4)
﻿(Cross-listed with TDHT 120.) This theoretical and embodied course examines a selection of indigenous plays and performances (dance, hip hop) and helps students develop the critical vocabulary and contextual knowledge necessary to productively engage with the political and artistic interventions performed by these works. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Students may not receive credit for TDHT 120 and ETHN 163G.

ETHN 164. African Americans and the Mass Media (4)
(Cross-listed with MUS 153.) This course will examine the media representations of African Americans from slavery through the twentieth century. Attention will be paid to the emergence and transmission of enduring stereotypes, and their relationship to changing social, political, and economic frameworks in the United States. The course will also consider African Americans’ responses to and interpretations of these mediated images.

ETHN 165. Sex and Gender in African American Communities (4)
(Cross-listed with CGS 165.) This course will investigate the changing constructions of sex, gender, and sexuality in African American communities defined by historical period, region, and class. Topics will include the sexual division of labor, myths of black sexuality, the rise of black feminism, black masculinity, and queer politics.  

ETHN 166. Arab/Muslim American Identity and Culture (4)
(Cross-listed with LTEN 179.) This class explores (self) representations of Muslim and Arab Americans in US popular culture with a focus on the twentieth and twenty-first centuries. Topics include: the racing of religion, “the war on terror” in the media, feminism and Islam, immigration, race, and citizenship. May be repeated for credit three times when content varies.

ETHN 168. Comparative Ethnic Literature (4)
(Cross-listed with LTEN 178.) A lecture-discussion course that juxtaposes the experience of two or more US ethnic groups and examines their relationship with the dominant culture. Students will analyze a variety of texts representing the history of ethnicity in this country. Topics will vary.

ETHN 169. Origins of the Atlantic World, c. 1450–1650 (4)
An examination of interactions among the peoples of western Europe, Africa, and the Americas that transformed the Atlantic basin into an interconnected “Atlantic World.” Topics will include maritime technology and the European Age of Discovery, colonization in the Americas, the beginnings of the transatlantic slave trade, and early development of plantation slavery in the New World. Students may not receive credit for both ETHN 170A and 169.

ETHN 170. Slavery and the Atlantic World (4)
The development of the Atlantic slave trade and the spread of racial slavery in the Americas before 1800. Explores the diversity of slave labor in the Americas and the different slave cultures African Americans produced under the constraints of slavery. Students may not receive credit for both ETHN 170 and 170B.

ETHN 172. Afro-American Prose (4)
(Cross-listed with LTEN 183.) Students will analyze and discuss the novel, the personal narrative, and other prose genres, with particular emphasis on the developing characters of Afro-American narrative and the cultural and social circumstances that influence their development.

ETHN 173GS. Gender, Sexuality, and War (4)
This course examines the effects of war and militarism on women's lives, focusing in particular on the experiences of Vietnamese women during and in the aftermath of the Vietnam War. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: students must apply and be accepted into the Global Seminars program.

ETHN 174. Themes in Afro-American Literature (4)
(Cross-listed with LTEN 185.) This course focuses on the influence of slavery upon African American writers. Our concern is not upon what slavery was but upon what it is within the works and what these texts reveal about themselves, their authors, and their audiences.

ETHN 175. Literature of the Harlem Renaissance (4)
(Cross-listed with LTEN 186.) The Harlem Renaissance (1917–39) focuses on the emergence of the “New Negro” and the impact of this concept on black literature, art, and music. Writers studied include Claude McKay, Zora N. Hurston, and Langston Hughes. Special emphasis on new themes and forms.

ETHN 177. Listening to the World (4)
This course considers the history of listening to the music of the world in Western culture. We will critically examine how the history of perception directs us to listen for familiar and different sounds in music. No musical training required.

ETHN 178. Blues: An Oral Tradition (4)
(Cross-listed with MUS 126.) This course will examine the development of the blues from its roots in work-songs and the minstrel show to its flowering in the Mississippi Delta to the development of urban blues and the close relationship of the blues with jazz, rhythm and blues, and rock and roll.

ETHN 179A. Jazz Roots and Early Development (1900–1943) (4)
(Cross-listed with MUS 127A.) This course will trace the early development of jazz and the diverse traditions that helped create this uniquely American art form. We will witness the emergence of Louis Armstrong in New Orleans and examine the composer’s role in jazz with Jelly Roll Morton and Duke Ellington.

ETHN 179B. Jazz Since 1946: Freedom and Form (4)
(Cross-listed with MUS 127B.) This course will examine the evolution of jazz from 1943 to the present. The course will survey the contrasting and competing styles in jazz from bebop to cool to the avant-garde and fusion.

ETHN 182. Race, Gender, and Sexuality in Fantasy and Science Fiction (4)
This course focuses on race, gender, and sexuality in twentieth- and twenty-first-century fantasy and science fiction. We will study literature, film, music, television, video games, and the Internet in order to situate such speculative visions in historical and transmedia contexts.

ETHN 183. Gender, Race, Ethnicity, and Class (4)
(Cross-listed with CGS 114.) Gender is often neglected in studies of ethnic/racial politics. This seminar explores the relationship of race, ethnicity, class, and gender by examining the participation of working class women of color in community politics and how they challenge mainstream political theory.

ETHN 187. Latina/o Sexualities (4)
(Cross-listed with CGS 115.) The construction and articulation of Latina/o sexualities will be explored in this course through interdisciplinary and comparative perspectives. We will discuss how immigration, class, and norms of ethnicity, race, and gender determine the construction, expression, and reframing of Latina/o sexualities.

ETHN 188. African Americans, Religion, and the City (4)
(Cross-listed with USP 132.) This course details the history of African American migration to urban areas after World War I and World War II and explores the role of religion in their lives as well as the impact that their religious experiences had upon the cities in which they lived.

ETHN 180. Topics in Mexican American History (4)
(Cross-listed with HIUS 167.) This colloquium studies the racial representation of Mexican Americans in the United States from the nineteenth century to the present, examining critically the theories and methods of the humanities and social sciences.

ETHN 184. Black Intellectuals in the Twentieth Century (4)
An analysis of black cultural and intellectual production since 1895. Course will explore how race and race-consciousness have influenced the dialogue between ideas and social experience; and how other factors—i.e., age, gender, and class—affected scholars’ insights.

ETHN 185. Discourse, Power, and Inequality (4)
While discourse analysis has transformed numerous disciplines, a gap separates perspectives that envision discourse as practices that construct inequality from approaches that treat discourse as everyday language. This course engages both perspectives critically in analyzing law, medicine, and popular culture.

ETHN 189. Special Topics in Ethnic Studies (4)
A reading and discussion course that explores special topics in ethnic studies. Themes will vary from quarter to quarter; therefore, course may be repeated three times as long as topics vary.

ETHN 190. Research Methods: Studying Racial and Ethnic Communities (4)
(Cross-listed with USP 129.) The course offers students the basic research methods with which to study ethnic and racial communities. The various topics to be explored include human and physical geography, transportation, employment, economic structure, cultural values, housing, health, education, and intergroup relations.

ETHN 196H. Honors Thesis (4)
Independent study to complete an honors thesis under the supervision of a faculty member who serves as thesis adviser. Prerequisites: ETHN 100A and ETHN 100B and ETHN 100H. Department approval required.

ETHN 197. Fieldwork in Racial and Ethnic Communities (4)
This course comprises supervised community fieldwork on topics of importance to racial and ethnic communities in the greater San Diego area. Regular individual meetings with faculty sponsor and written reports are required. (May be repeated for credit.)

ETHN 198. Directed Group Studies (4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular department curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. (May be repeated for credit.)

ETHN 199. Supervised Independent Study and Research (4)
Individual research on a topic that leads to the writing of a major paper. (May be repeated for credit.)

ETHN 200A. Departures: A Genealogy of Critical Racial and Ethnic Studies (4)
Introduction to critical racial and ethnic studies and how this perspective departs from traditional constructions of race and culture; examination of relevant studies to identify themes, concepts, and formulations that indicate the critical departures that characterize the field. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 200B. Formulations: Interdisciplinarity and Knowledge Production in Ethnic Studies (4)
This course uses model studies to explore how comparative and relational problems are posed as research projects, how research questions are constructed, and how they employ theory to frame the project and establish what is at stake in the research. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 200C. Projects (Proseminar): Research in Ethnic Studies (4)
Students examine research designs presented by faculty and advanced graduate students to study how to conceive of and pose research questions, integrate theoretical and methodological models, and conceptualize their own research project. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 201. Historical Methods and Archives (4)
This course seeks to develop research skills in historical methods; to understand techniques and tools historians use to create historical narratives using archival and historical sources; and to compare and relate the value of these to ethnic studies research. Students may not receive credit for both ETHN 240 and ETHN 201. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 202. Qualitative Methods/Ethnography (4)
This course focuses on conceptual and methodological frameworks of ethnography and qualitative inquiry, including research design, grounded theory, the field note journal, participant observation, and interviewing; major themes include the role of indigenous/insider researchers, ethics of involvement, and community collaboration. Students may not receive credit for both ETHN 242 and ETHN 202. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 203. Cultural Studies and Cultural Production (4)
This course will train students in approaches to interdisciplinary research concerned with power and the production of knowledge, with a focus on conducting multimedia field research, applying discourse analysis, and recognizing forms of data across disciplinary divides. Students may not receive credit for both ETHN 241 and ETHN 203. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 230. Departmental Colloquium (1)
This course is a forum for the presentation of recent research by guests, faculty, and students. This course may be taken for credit six times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 252. Race, Gender, and Space (4)
This course offers scholars of race, gender, and sexuality an introduction to spatial theory and geographic methodologies. Particular attention will be given to theories of spatial formation, the interplay of social and spatial mobility and containment, and alternative spatio-political imaginaries. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 255. Race and Psychoanalysis (4)
This seminar explores the centrality of race to the formation of the discipline of psychoanalysis as well as the relevance of psychoanalysis to the study of race, gender, and sexuality. We will read key texts by Freud, Lacan, and Fanon and follow the development of their ideas in the works of late twentieth and twenty-first century scholars like Spillers, Marriott, Judy, Seshadri-Crooks, Eng, and Mercer. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

ETHN 256. Gender, Sexuality, and Race (4)
This course studies the body cross-culturally as the site for the construction of gender, sex, ethnic, and racial identities. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 257A-B. Social Theory (4-4)
An intensive survey of social and cultural theory, focusing on how constructions of science, language, politics, and social inequality shaped early modernity, romantic nationalism, Marxism, cultural relativity, psychoanalysis, and fin de siècle social thought. The second quarter surveys poststructuralist, postmodern, feminist, subaltern studies, globalization, and other critiques. ETHN 257A is not a prerequisite for ETHN 257B.

ETHN 259. Comparative Conquests, Colonization, and Resistance in the Americas (4)
This course will offer a comparative survey of the impact of European interactions with native nations and populations in the New World, from Peru to Canada. Readings will emphasize modes of initial interaction, patterns of European colonization, and native adaptation and resistance, and broader changes in native culture and cosmology as a result of conquest and colonization.

ETHN 260. Transnationalism and Borderlands: The Local and Global (4)
This course critically reviews the analytical frameworks of transnationalism and borderlands. The goals are to assess traditional and current social science practice on immigration, identity, and community studies, and to understand how diverse peoples engage and participate in global processes.

ETHN 265. Critical Immigration and Refugee Studies (4)
This course surveys the field of immigration and refugee studies and introduces students to recent theories and cutting-edge research in the field. Key topics: gender and migration; diaspora and transnationalism; immigration, race, and citizenship; and globalization and immigrant labor. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 266. Popular Culture and Pedagogy (4)
This course examines popular culture as a site of domination and resistance, and pedagogy broadly as (always political) educational projects in a variety of social contexts with a focus on youth popular culture in US urban public schools. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 267. History and Memory (4)
We analyze how concepts of power and memory are appropriated in diverse narratives: literature, theatre, personal testimonies, monuments, museums, memorials; and examine how mutually constituted processes of remembering/forgetting work to produce official discourses of nationalism, colonialism, violence, and construction of subaltern subjectivities. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 268. Theories and Cultures of US Imperialism (4)
How did the United States become an empire? This course approaches the historical and contemporary problem of the United States as an imperial power through analyses of hierarchies and cultures at home and outside of formal US borders. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

ETHN 270. Indigenous Epistemologies and their Disruptions (4)
This seminar will explore indigenous epistemologies, their ontological dimensions, the methodological issues surrounding related research, and their significance in relation to the production of knowledge and the histories, presents, and futures of Native American and Indigenous people. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 275. Marxist Thought (4)
This seminar examines critical engagements between scholarship from postcolonial, feminist and other radical Marxist traditions. We focus on philosophical and political debates stemming from issues of race and gender, tracing them in Marx's texts and their historical contexts. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 280. Black Thought: Roots and Routes (4)
This course explores major currents in black intellectual history, and some paths less well tread, structured thematically, geographically, and chronologically from the nineteenth century to the present. Students read foundational primary sources and contemporary scholarly studies of African diasporic texts. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

ETHN 289. Topics in Ethnic Studies Research (4)
This course is a research seminar on themes of contemporary and historic importance in ethnic studies. Themes will be determined by instructor. Course may be repeated three times for credit.

ETHN 291A. Comprehensive Research Preparation: The Literature Review (4)
Using key theoretical approaches, debates, and frameworks of ethnic studies, students develop a critical analysis of how existing scholarship within the field of ethnic studies informs a specific research question, topic, or object of study; this literature review demonstrates comprehensive and holistic knowledge of critical approaches and constructs a coherent theoretical framework that effectively summarizes, synthesizes, and assesses a particular body of relevant ethnic studies literature.

ETHN 291B. Comprehensive Research Preparation: The Methodologies Paper (4)
Implementing interdisciplinary research methods, students produce independent, generative research germane to the study of race and ethnicity. Students write a twenty- to twenty-five-page critical paper that poses an appropriate research question; engages relevant literature to provide a conceptual framework; develops and incorporates appropriate research methodologies; and constructs a critical, thorough, and cohesive argument based on the collection, organization, interpretation, and analysis of evidence. Prerequisites: ETHN 291A.

ETHN 298. Directed Reading (1–12)
This is an independent research or individual guided tutorial in an area not covered by present course offerings. This course may be repeated for an indefinite number of times due to the independent nature of the content of the course.

ETHN 299. Thesis Research (1–12)
Open to graduate students conducting doctoral thesis research. This course may be repeated for an indefinite number of times due to the independent nature of thesis research and writing.

ETHN 500. Apprentice Teaching in Ethnic Studies (4)
A course in which teaching assistants are aided in learning proper teaching methods by means of supervision of their work by the faculty: handling of discussions, preparation and grading of examinations and other written exercises, and student relations.

FPMU 40. Introduction to Public Health (4)
This course provides an introduction to the infrastructure of public health; the analytical tools employed by public health practitioners; bio-psychosocial perspectives of public health problems; health promotion/disease prevention; quality assessment in public health; and legal and ethical concerns.

FPMU 50. Primary Care and Public Health (4)
This course explores historical and current interactions, achievements and challenges of primary care and public health. It will analyze the impact of common medical conditions such as obesity, diabetes, mental health disorders, and others on individuals, their families, and society.

FPMU 101. Epidemiology (4)
This course covers the basic principles of epidemiology, with applications to investigations of noninfectious (“chronic”) and infectious diseases. Explores various study designs appropriate for disease surveillance and studies of etiology and prevention. Prerequisites: FPMU 40; PSYC 60 or MATH 11; and upper-division standing.

FPMU 102. Biostatistics in Public Health (4)
Fundamentals of biostatistics and basic methods for analysis of continuous and binary outcomes for one, two, or several groups. Includes: summarizing and displaying data; probability; statistical distributions; central limit theorem, confidence intervals, hypothesis testing; comparing means of continuous variables between two groups; comparing proportions between two groups; simple and multiple linear regression. Hands-on data analysis using software and statistical applications in public health. Prerequisites: FPMU 40; PSYC 60 or MATH 11 or MATH 3C or MATH 10A or MATH 10B; and upper-division standing.

FPMU 110. Health Behavior and Chronic Diseases (4)
This course introduces health behavior concepts through applications to chronic disease prevention. The focus is on smoking, dietary behaviors, and physical activity and is organized around relationships to health, measurement, influencing factors, interventions, and translation to public health practice. Prerequisites: FPMU 40 and upper-division standing.

FPMU 120. Health Policies for Healthy Lifestyles (4)
This course covers the rationale for and effectiveness of policies to influence nutrition, physical activity, and substance use behavior. Policies include legalization, taxation, labeling, produce manufacturing, warning labels, licensing, marketing, and counter-marketing practices and restrictions on use. Prerequisites: FPMU 110 and upper-division standing.

FPMU 130. Environmental and Occupational Health (4)
This core public health course addresses the fundamentals of environmental and occupational health, including identification of hazards, basic toxicology, risk assessment, prevention/protection, and regulatory/control policies. Specific environmental and occupational hazards and relevant case studies will be presented. Prerequisites: FPMU 50, FPMU 101 and upper-division standing.

FPMU 180A. Advanced Practicum I (2)
Emphasizes key public health concepts including program planning, research design, and written/oral communication skills. Seminar done in combination with research, internship, or overseas experiences, completed after FPMU 180A. Open to public health majors with upper-division standing. Prerequisites: FPMU 40, FPMU 50, FPMU 101, and FPMU 110. Department approval required. Restricted to upper-division public health majors only (FP25). 3.0 cumulative GPA. 3.3 GPA in FPMU 40, 50, 101A, and 110.

FPMU 180B. Advanced Practicum II (2)
Seminar participants will interpret and contextualize findings from research, internship, or overseas experiences planned in 180A and completed prior or concurrently with 180B. Oral and written presentations will focus on challenges of research and of program implementation, evaluation, and sustainability. Prerequisites: FPMU 180A, FPMU 102, and FPMU 120. Department approval required. Restricted to public health majors only (FP25). 3.0 cumulative GPA. 3.3 GPA in FPMU 40, 50, 101A, 101B, 110, and 120.

FPMU 199. Independent Study (2-4)
Individual undergraduate study or research not covered by the present course offerings. Study or research must be under the direction of a faculty member in the Department of Family Medicine and Public Health and approval must be secured from the faculty member prior to registering. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, completion of ninety units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 2.5, consent of instructor, and a completed and approved Special Studies form.

FPM 231. Exposure Assessment and Biomarkers in Epidemiology (2)
To address how exposure assessment accuracies or biases can influence study outcomes and conclusions in epidemiology. Special emphasis will be on biomarkers as recent measures of exposure.

FPM 233. Clinical Nutrition (2)
Clinical nutrition is the study of nutrition and diet as related to the prevention and treatment of human disease. Nutrition is an interdisciplinary field of study, built on a foundation of biomedical and behavioral sciences. This course emphasizes class discussion of clinical topics and assigned readings in current areas of research and practice (i.e., diet and cancer, vitamin and other diet supplements), with case studies and illustrative class exercises.

FPM 237. Microarray Technology and Informatics (2)
This course is an introduction to microarray technology and analysis of gene expression data. This ten-lecture course will cover a range of microarray topics including platform types. Image processing, experimental design, and statistical analysis and application in medicine and health sciences.

FPM 238. Introduction to Clinical Family Medicine (1-7)
Introduction to clinical ambulatory medicine where students spend one afternoon per week in a physician’s practice participating in patient care commensurate with their training. Students may opt to continue the course over successive quarters or enroll full time during the summer for up to four weeks. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: medical student status.

FPM 244. Clinical and Public Health Elective, Baja California, Mexico (2)
(Cross-listed with MED 248) Integrated clinical and public health experience with U.S. and Mexican graduate student and faculty teams over three to four days in Baja California, Mexico; emphasis on common clinical and public health problems in underserved populations. Minimal working knowledge of Spanish recommended. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: UC San Diego SOM student and graduate students with consent of instructor.

FPM 246. Occupational/Environmental Health (2)
An introduction to the history and epidemiology of work-related disease. A review of occupational-related health problems, i.e., heart disease, pneumoconiosis, peripheral neuropathy, sterility, birth defects, psychiatric problems. Emphasis on the occupational history in the diagnosis of job-related disease and disability. Major modalities of prevention and control will be presented and the role of health practitioners, government, management and labor will be reviewed. The course will include guest lecturers, films, videotapes and field visits to local industries and/or clinicians treating occupational diseases. Prerequisites: SM 208.

FPM 247. Clinical Epidemiology Seminar (2)
This seminar is designed to expand the student’s understanding of clinical epidemiology by investigating several major controversial issues, such as treatment of breast cancer, oral hypoglycemic in diabetes, and dietary habits as a risk factor for coronary artery disease. The seminar will address clinical and methodological issues in the epidemiology of various chronic diseases.

FPM 257. Cancer: Cause and Prevention (2)
This course will provide an overview of the problem of cancer and its avoidable causes. It covers some of the hottest topics currently facing cancer prevention professional as they try to prevent cancer from occurring in the first place and delay its progression.

FPM 258A. Public Health Doctoral Lecture Series I (2)
This first quarter of a three quarter sequence combines didactic instruction, interactive sessions and student presentations. Topics cover study design, ethics, data analysis and management techniques, and qualitative research will be presented. Focus: lectures (different from II or III). Prerequisites: Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health graduate student, SOM student.

FPM 258B. Public Health Doctoral Lecture Series II (2)
This second quarter of a three quarter sequence combines didactic instruction, interactive sessions and student presentations. Topics cover study design, ethics, data analysis and management techniques, and qualitative research will be presented. Focus: lectures (different from I or III). Prerequisites: Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health graduate student, SOM student, FPM 258A.

FPM 258C. Public Health Doctoral Lecture Series III (2)
This third quarter of a three quarter sequence combines didactic instruction, interactive sessions and student presentations. Topics cover study design, ethics, data analysis and management techniques, and qualitative research will be presented. Focus: lectures (different from I or II). Prerequisites: Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health graduate student, SOM student, FPM 258B.

FPM 259A. Applied Epidemiology—Scientific Analysis (4)
Students will explore an epidemiologic research question by reviewing relevant published literature, and then design and conduct appropriate data analysis using a pre-existing dataset. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health graduate students.

FPM 259B. Applied Epidemiology—Scientific Writing (4)
Students will learn the principles of scientific writing, review examples of scientific literature, and then complete a manuscript suitable for publication based on their project from FPM 259A. May be taken for credit two times.  Prerequisites: Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health graduate student, FPM 259A.

FPM 259C. Applied Epidemiology—Scientific Presentations (4)
Students will learn the principles of scientific presentations, for the classroom, and for scientific meetings (both oral and poster presentations). Students will then prepare and deliver presentations based on their project from FPM 259A. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health graduate student, FPM 259B.

FPM 270. Cultural Perceptions of Health and Disease (4)
To improve knowledge about health and illness within cultural contexts, including review and discussions of epidemiologic studies describing health indicators/beliefs/practices. Students interact with experts in cross-cultural health research to explore ethnicity/culture in health care delivery and utilization, and disease risk. Prerequisites: medical or graduate student. Other students admitted with consent of instructor.

FPM 272. Community Advocacy (4)
The UC San Diego Student-Run Free Clinic Project operates in partnership with two community programs for the homeless and an inner-city elementary school. Students participate in didactic sessions learning principles of working with the underserved and are supervised in clinical, health education, and administrative roles at the clinic sites. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: medical student.

FPM 276. Health Behavior Interventions I (4)
Course will include a discussion of intervention goals suggested by major theories of health behavior change. Common communication modes and messages will be studied, including examples using small group settings, mass media, legislation, and telephone counseling. Prerequisites: must be enrolled in the SDSU/UC San Diego Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health.

FPM 277. Health Behavior Interventions II (4)
This course focuses on critical analyses of success and failure of behavior theories as applied to interventions in multiple fields (e.g. smoking, dietary behavior, and physical activity). It covers individual and population approaches to behavior change. Prerequisites: must be enrolled in the UC San Diego/SDSU Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health (PU 75 and PU 76).

FPM 278. Scale Development for Behavioral Health Measurement (4)
Course will present theory and methods for developing scales to assess health behavior constructs (e.g., self-efficacy, social support). Prerequisites: must be enrolled in the SDSU/UC San Diego Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health. Graduate level statistics or research methods class.

FPM 280A. Practicum in Health Behavior I (4)
Students will learn about grant writing, project management, and preparation of manuscripts for publication and presentations for scientific meetings, and also work individually with a faculty mentor to learn how to conduct a health behavior intervention. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: must be enrolled in the SDSU/UC San Diego Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health (PU75 and PU75). Courses must be completed in sequence (e.g., A before B and B before C).

FPM 280B. Practicum in Health Behavior II (4)
Students will learn about grant writing, project management, and preparation of manuscripts for publication and presentations for scientific meetings, and also work individually with a faculty mentor in preparing manuscripts using data from a specific health behavior intervention. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: must be enrolled in the SDSU/UC San Diego Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health (PU75 and PU75). Courses must be completed in sequence (e.g., A before B and B before C).

FPM 280C. Practicum in Health Behavior III (4)
Students will learn about grant writing, project management, and preparation of manuscripts for publication and presentations for scientific meetings, and also work individually with a faculty mentor in analyzing existing data sets. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: must be enrolled in the SDSU/UC San Diego Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health (PU75 and PU75). Courses must be completed in sequence (e.g., A before B and B before C).

FPM 285. Clinical Trials: Issues and Dilemmas in Clinical Trials (2)
(Cross-listed with NEU 285) This course provides a methodological perspective on clinical trials. Topics will include ethics, design of Phase I–IV trials, randomization/blinding, bias and sample-size power. Lectures will also cover “application” with eminent UC San Diego trialists describing conduct, design and statistical issues of specific studies. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: medical or graduate student standing.

FPM 286. Free Clinic II (2 or 4)
The Free Clinic Project operates at three community-based sites. In this class, students, under faculty supervision, provide clinical services and learn administrative, health education and leadership. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit as many times as desired. Prerequisites: FPM 272.

FPM 288. Introduction to Qualitative Research Methods (4)
Focus on qualitative methods addressing both theoretical and practical dimensions of conducting qualitative research. Identify research questions for which qualitative methods are appropriate, and to critique qualitative research in terms of design, interview techniques, analysis, and interpretation. 

FPM 290. Health Policy and Health Behaviors in the United States (3)
This course summarizes characteristics of the US health-care system and how it motivates health behaviors that negatively or positively affect outcomes. Also addressed are contemporary health policy issues related to health behaviors (e.g. smoking, dietary behavior, and physical activity). Prerequisites: must be enrolled in the UC San Diego/SDSU Joint Doctoral Program in Public Health (PU75, PU76 and PU77) or consent of the instructor.

FPM 291. Dissemination and Implementation Science in Health: An Introduction (4)
Focus on disseminating and scaling up health interventions in real-world settings. Interactive didactic sessions and guest lectures on implementation of research principles, approaches, and methods. Will design a proposal to implement or scale-up a clinical or public health intervention.

FILM 87. Film Studies Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. Prerequisites: none.


GLBH 150A. Global Health Capstone Seminar I (4)

GLBH 150A. Global Health Capstone Seminar I (4)
Course will consist of intensive reading and discussion in fields related to each student’s primary interest and building on their Global Health Field Experience. The course is oriented toward producing a senior thesis that serves as credential for students applying for postgraduate or professional training. Prerequisites: departmental approval required.

GLBH 150B. Global Health Capstone Seminar II (4)
Course will be a workshop with critical input from all participants focused on preparing a senior thesis. The course is oriented toward producing a senior thesis that serves as credential for students applying for postgraduate or professional training. Prerequisites: GLBH 150A; departmental approval required.

GLBH 181. Essentials of Global Health (4)
Illustrates and explores ecologic settings and frameworks for study and understanding of global health and international health policy. Students acquire understanding of diverse determinants and trends of disease in various settings and interrelationships between socio-cultural-economic development and health. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

GLBH 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Directed group study for students to elaborate the intellectual analysis and critique of the required field experience for students enrolled in the Global Health minor. Prerequisites: departmental authorization required.

GLBH 199. Independent Study in Global Health Field Experience (4)
Independent study opportunity for students to elaborate the intellectual analysis and critique of the required field experience for students enrolled in the Global Health minor. Prerequisites: departmental authorization required.

IRGN 199. Independent Research/Study (2-4)
Independent research/study under the guidance of a faculty member of GPS. Prerequisites: consent of undergraduate advising office and instructor.

IRCO 400. Policy-Making Processes (4)
This course is designed to teach students how to “read” a country’s political and economic system. The course will examine how the evolution of different institutional frameworks in the countries of the Pacific region influences the way in which political choices are made. Prerequisites: GPS students only.

IRCO 401. Managerial Economics (4)
Survey of basic tools in economics. Examination of how commodity demand is determined, what affects supply of the commodity, how price is determined, when optimal market allocation of resources and failure occur, and basic topics concerning the aggregate economy.

IRCO 403. International Economics (4)
The theory and mechanics of international economics. Included will be such topics as real trade theory, international movements of capital, the effects of trade and capital flows on domestic economies, and policies toward trade and foreign investment.

IRCO 410. International Politics and Security (4)
Development of analytic tools for understanding international relations with applications to contemporary problems such as the environment, nuclear proliferation, human rights, humanitarian interventions, and the roots of conflict and cooperation among countries.

IRCO 412. Globalization, the World System, and the Pacific (4)
This course examines globalization and other economic and political factors that shape the international relations of the Pacific Rim. Specific topics include financial market integration, state cooperation and intervention, and case studies of individual countries.

IRCO 415. Finance and Accounting for Policy Makers (4)
This course covers concepts and applications of accounting and finance necessary for policymakers in for-profit, nonprofit, and public sectors. The course content consists of three parts: (1) basic financial accounting and financial analysis, (2) the effect of time value of money on investment decisions, and (3) the effects of risk on financial decisions. No credit will be allowed for IRCO 415 if a student has taken IRCO 420 and/or IRCO 421. Prerequisites: major codes IR76, IR77, IR78, IS32, IS33 or consent of instructor.

IRCO 453. Quantitative Methods I (4)
This course is designed to provide proficiency in quantitative methods that are used for optimization and decision making. The use of spreadsheets is applied to data analysis and problem solving. Statistical theory and regression analysis are introduced. Prerequisites: major codes IR76, IR77, IR78, IR79, IS32, IS33, or consent of the instructor.

IRCO 454. Quantitative Methods II (4)
This course covers elements from statistics that are central to business decision making under uncertainty. In particular, regression analysis and estimation will be applied to problems of forecasting and optimization. Prerequisites: GPS students only.

IRCO 463. Strategy and Negotiation (4)
This class introduces the fundamentals of corporate strategy, based on case studies requiring corporate analysis; and the principles of negotiation, based on exercises and class learning. Both sections of this class are highly applied, and require intensive out-of-class preparation and teamwork that help students acquire skills in analytical thinking, strategic action planning, and hands-on negotiations. Prerequisites: IRCO 400, 401, 403, 410, 412, 420, 421, 453, and 454.

IRCO 467. Policy Responses to Global Problems (4)
This capstone is designed to test the analytic skills acquired in the GPS program, using them to explain complex real-world problems: security, persistent recurring conflict, persistent inequality and intergenerational debt, women’s rights, environmental change, energy/resource systems, and financial contagion. Emphasis will be placed on determining the nature and dimension of the problem, exploring a range of solutions and assessing the capacity of public institutions. Non-GPS students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRCO 467 and IRGN 490 Special Topics course with same course title.

IRCO 468: Evaluating Technological Innovation (4)
This capstone is intended as a culminating intellectual experience for students, particularly those in economics-oriented tracks. Students will learn to analyze “what works,” integrating a technical understanding of innovation with rigorous statistical analysis. The first half of the course focuses on building a set of science/engineering tools, and the second half on building statistical tools of analysis. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: IRGN 446 or consent of instructors.

IRCO 400. Policy-Making Processes (4)
This course is designed to teach students how to “read” a country’s political and economic system. The course will examine how the evolution of different institutional frameworks in the countries of the Pacific region influences the way in which political choices are made. Prerequisites: GPS students only.

IRCO 401. Managerial Economics (4)
Survey of basic tools in economics. Examination of how commodity demand is determined, what affects supply of the commodity, how price is determined, when optimal market allocation of resources and failure occur, and basic topics concerning the aggregate economy.

IRCO 404. Market Failures and Policy Interventions (4)
Builds on IRCO 401 Managerial Economics. Applies economic reasoning to public issues, policies, and programs, with a focus on the logic of policy interventions in the market. It considers incentives and organizations; models of economic behavior, including markets, the absence of markets, and interventions; the price system; policy objectives and instruments.

IRCO 405. Policy and Political Decision Making in the U.S. (4)
This course studies the structure of American government and the political dimensions of policy problems. Emphasis will be on the study of institutions and the influences and constraints on decision making, interaction between branches of government, government and society, and the international context in which US policy makers must work. Attention will be given to considering the U.S. with a comparative perspective.

IRCO 406. Public Finance and Taxation (4)
This course introduces principles of taxation and expenditure analysis, public budgeting, and assessment of budget priorities. It will introduce students to concepts related to how public finance affects the private economy, how governments raise funds (and account for their expenditures to the public, foreign investors, and international organizations), and the major public policy tools for governing public finance. 

IRCO 407. Policy Analysis and Decision Theory (4)
This course introduces students to the methods of policy analysis and decision making theory, including methods to assemble panel data to capture the impact of new policy on observable data, decision making theory, uncertainty, decision criteria, expected utility, and risk.

IRCO 453. Quantitative Methods I (4)
This course is designed to provide proficiency in quantitative methods that are used for optimization and decision making. The use of spreadsheets is applied to data analysis and problem solving. Statistical theory and regression analysis are introduced. Prerequisites: major codes IR76, IR77, IR78, IR79, IS32, IS33, or consent of the instructor.

IRCO 454. Quantitative Methods II (4)
This course covers elements from statistics that are central to business decision making under uncertainty. In particular, regression analysis and estimation will be applied to problems of forecasting and optimization. Prerequisites: GPS students only.

IRCO 462. Public Policy Capstone (4)
The capstone paper should demonstrate mastery of the three components of a public policy program: 1) development of the methodologies for rigorous data collection and policy analysis; 2) an in-depth understanding of the regulatory and legal politics and processes surrounding the student’s chosen policy area; and, 3) mastery of the details of the particular issue area and policies intended or that were intended as solutions. Paper may focus on policy interest of the student or of a client. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to major code IR79 only.

IRCO 481. The Politics of International and National Policy Making (4)
This course provides an introduction to the international political economy of the Pacific Rim. The course covers important international developments, such as regionalism, as well as domestic decision making processes.

IRCO 482. Economies of the Pacific Rim (4)
This course studies major economies of the Pacific region by combining standard tools in economics with institutional background on each economy. Special attention is given to the challenges that economic globalization poses on the economic relations among those economies.

IRCO 483. Workshop on Policy Issues in the Pacific Rim (4)
Capstone class: Students collaborate on long-term projects analyzing important political, economic, and business issues in the Pacific regions using the tools acquired through other courses at GPS. Prerequisites: IRCO 481 and 482 or consent of the instructor.

IRGN 400. International Relations of Asia-Pacific (4)
International relations and developing international political economies of nations bordering the Pacific. Topics include: the “Pacific Basin” concept; the U.S. and “hegemonic-stability” theory; legacies of the Korean War and Sino-Soviet dispute; immigration patterns and their consequences; and Japan’s foreign policy.

IRGN 402. International Political Economy: Money and Finance (4)
Examination of effects of national policies and international collaboration on public and private international financial institutions, in particular the management of international debt crises, economic policy coordination, and the role of international lender of last resort.

IRGN 403. China Security, Technology, and Innovation (4)
This course examines China's aspirations and historical efforts to become a world-class technological and military power. Of particular interest are the technological foundations of China's security relating to its military power and long-term economic and strategic competitiveness and sources of its technological innovation. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 433 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title.

IRGN 404. Chinese Politics (4)
This course will analyze post-1949 Chinese politics, including political institutions, the policy making process, and citizen political behavior. Special attention will be given to the prospects for political reform in China.

IRGN 405. U.S.-China Relations (4)
Can the United States and China manage to develop a constructive relationship or are they headed toward a hostile relationship? This course addresses this question by examining the domestic and international influences on the foreign policies of both countries and key issues in the bilateral relationship. Students also do policy projects.

IRGN 406. Finance and Development (4)
This course analyzes the roles of money and financial institutions in the economy. The first part of the course focuses on microeconomics and the financial system. The topics include money, financial markets, financial intermediaries, banking regulations, and bank runs. The second part of the course focuses on the microeconomics aspects of financial institutions. The topics include financial development, financial liberalization, and their effects on the economy, especially economic growth and development. Prerequisites: IRCO 403 and IRCO 421 or consent of instructor.

IRGN 407. Policy Implementation Process (4)
Course builds on Policy-Making Processes class by focusing on nonelected officials’ role in setting and implementing policy. Ideally, elected officials make policies that unbiased, technically proficient bureaucrats carry out. Course provides insight into why the real world departs from this. Prerequisites: IRCO 400.

IRGN 408. Korean Security (4)
This course will consider major security issues on the Korean peninsula, including the evolution of the US-South Korea alliance and the management of the current nuclear crisis. A distinctive feature of the course will be a consideration of the political economy of recent developments on the peninsula, particularly with respect to North Korea, and an extended discussion of the logic and strategy of engagement.

IRGN 409. Economic Policy in Latin America (4)
This course seeks to enhance the students’ understanding of the main policy alternatives open to the largest Latin American countries. Development and stabilization policies are analyzed, emphasizing the current debate between conventional and heterodox policy packages and their impact on decision making. Prerequisites: IRCO 401, IRCO 403.

IRGN 410. Corporate Governance (4)
Why do corporate governance systems—the way firms are run, the relationships among managers, stockholders, and workers—differ widely around the world? This course examines the various explanations for these striking differences and the consequences. Prerequisites: graduate level or consent of instructor.

IRGN 411. Business and Management in Japan (4)
This course introduces the main aspects of Japanese business and industrial organization (keiretsu), Japanese management practices, and the representation and influence of business interests in the Japanese political economy.

IRGN 412. Comparative Development of the East Asian Economies (4)
This course studies the economic development, current economic issues, and future prospects and challenges of East Asia, broadly defined as China, Japan, Korea, and Southeast Asia. The course focuses on the comparative development experience across the economies, regional economic integration, and economic interactions among the economies in the region. Prerequisites: major codes IR76, IR77, IR78, IS32, IS33 or consent of instructor.

IRGN 413. Corporate Strategy and the Environment (4)
This seminar examines the ability of firms to increase shareholder value through improved environmental performance. Topics include product differentiation, strategic use of regulations, the “Porter hypothesis,” and environmental management systems. Readings include case studies and research articles. Prerequisites: IRCO 401, 421, 453, 454.

IRGN 414. Economics of Energy Policy (4)
This course examines the theoretical and empirical questions around the supply and demand markets, and the use for energy in firms and households. We will consider the environmental consequences and regulations of use. The course emphasizes the application of economic theory to energy issues. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 414 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title. Prerequisites: IRCO 401, 453, and 454.

IRGN 415. The Economics of Trade Policy (4)
This course explores the rationales and consequences of trade related government interventions from an economic perspective. We will cover classical trade theory, “new” trade theory, the process of global multilateral trade integration, and the political economy roots of trade policy. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 415 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title.

IRGN 416. Postwar Politics in Japan (4)
Overview of postwar politics in Japan, including American Occupation reforms, political institutions, major political factors, mass and elite, and political behavior. Special attention will be paid to the issue of Japan’s changing democracy.

IRGN 418. Green Technology: Policy and Science (4)
The course looks at clean energy and related technologies, including a high-level understanding of the science, policy, and market forces governing innovation. Students will develop an understanding of the renewable energy sector and the market variability of new technology. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 418 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title.

IRGN 419. Risk Management (4)
This course provides an introduction to derivative assets such as options, futures, and swap contracts. The main emphasis is on their valuation, use in hedging, and role as components of liabilities that mitigate risk and agency problems in business firms. Prerequisites: IRCO 421.

IRGN 420. Marketing (4)
This course develops the microeconomic foundations of market exchange by examining the marketing details of transactions: demand and product differentiation, incomplete and incorrect information, search and promotion costs. Students will learn to deduce firm and consumer motives from observed behavior. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 420 and IRGN 220 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title.

IRGN 421. Financial Institutions (4)
This course studies how the financial system works to support economic growth most of the time, but also how it gets into crisis and puts the economy into a recession. Course emphasizes the importance and incentive problems inherent in financial transactions. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 422. Investments (4)
An analysis of the risk/return characteristics of different assets as perceived by different investors and their implications for security price behavior, emphasizing real world capital market behavior. International aspects include the role of exchange rate risk and international diversification. Prerequisites: IRCO 415, 453, and 454.

IRGN 423. Corporate Social Responsibility (4)
Nongovernmental organizations monitor compliance with norms through shareholder activism, consumer pressures, political protest, creating “brands,” and legal action. Course examines these strategies to determine what works best, and how organizations and individuals can influence corporations to “do the right thing.”

IRGN 424. Corporate Finance (4)
The topics covered are dividend policy and capital structure, options, debt financing, and short and long-term in financial planning. Course format will be mostly lectures, with occasional cases. Some international aspects of corporate finance will also be discussed. Prerequisites:IRCO 401, 403, 415, 453, and 454 or consent of instructor.

IRGN 426. Doing Business in the Pacific Rim (4)
This case-based course examines the complexities and challenges of doing business in selected Pacific Rim countries. Each week focuses on a particular case in a specific country. Reading will be decision-oriented and focused on corporate strategy. Students will be required to reach a conclusion and recommend a course of action as an active decision-maker in the case. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 427. International Law and Regulation (4)
This course will introduce students to the major techniques for managing international problems through legal and administrative regulation. The class will offer an overview of the main theories relevant to policy, such as the choice and design of treaties and other legal instruments. Cases will be drawn from economics, finance, development, security, human rights and environment. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. 

IRGN 428. The Politics of Energy and Environmental Regulation (4)
The class introduces students to major theoretical perspectives that are used to show how societies design and implement policies related to energy, and applies these theories to major issues in energy policy, including ethanol, climate change, and energy security. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 428 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 429. Geopolitics, Insurgency, and Weak States (4)
This course acquaints students with the leading theories on the causes and consequences of civil war since 1945, and the challenges associated with rebuilding social structures after catastrophic collapse. It will also provide a number of hands-on examples of how “new media” work to speed the process of political mobilization, coalition formation, the persistence of clandestine networks, and issues of transparency and translation, with particular implications for urban warfare and insurgency. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 430. Human Rights, Public Policy, and International Relations (4)
Prepares students to analyze the causes of repression and the effectiveness of political intervention. Attention will focus on the evaluation of the design, implementation, and effectiveness of human rights policy, including international organizations, democracy, trade, and social movement advocacy. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 431. Fiscal and Monetary Policy (4)
Effects of fiscal and monetary policies on aggregate variables such as output, nominal and real interest rates, price level, and employment. Additional topics include the inflation/ unemployment trade-off, budget deficit, and economic growth.

IRGN 432. Immigration and Immigration Policy (4)
This course examines the role of immigration in the globalization of the Pacific Rim economies. Topics include the economic forces behind immigration; the impact of immigration on wages, employment, and industry structure in the sending and receiving countries; and the nature, scope, and political economy of immigration policy. Prerequisites: IRCO 401 or consent of instructor.

IRGN 433. Debating US Security Policy  (4)
Course engages central debates regarding US grand strategy and encourages analysis of regional crisis-spots using replicable open-source data. Emphasis is on deploying theoretical arguments in the service of a policy agenda and tensions between rival schools of theory in the context of contemporary politics. Topics include nuclear nonproliferation, humanitarian military interventions, democracy promotion, “War on Terror,” and policy towards “rogue” and unrecognized states. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 433 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with same course title. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 434. Humanitarian Interventions (4)
This course encourages sustained debate about US interventions into conflict and post-conflict settings abroad since the end of the Cold War. We will consider the broad trends in international politics, with particular focus on the nature of “unipolarity,” “Responsibility to Protect,” and the politics of border regions. We will look at both governmental and nongovernmental actors.

IRGN 435. Topics in International Trade (4)
This course develops new analytical models of international trade and examines their relevance for trade policy. Topics include setting trade policy where firms have global market power; the interaction between international trade, innovation, and economic growth; regional economic policy, dynamic industry clusters, and information technology; and new trade theory and the world distribution of income. Prerequisites: IRCO 401 and 403, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 436. Doing Business in Latin America (4)
This course examines the current business environment in Latin America, taking into account political, economic and cultural factors. The course will be based on case studies, supplemented with guest lectures from business executives and discussions of selected readings. Students will be required to develop a business plan as a major part of the grade for the course. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 436 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title.

IRGN 438. Operations and Technology Management (4)
This course introduces the operations function of organizations, where the products and services that customers buy are made. It covers design and analysis of a variety of operating systems, emphasizing capacity, cost, quality, and matching customer needs. Technology is central to operations in most industries and must be effectively managed. Recommended preparation: IRCO 453 and IRCO 454 or equivalent knowledge of modeling and probability. Prerequisites: IRCO 453 and 454, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 440. Managerial Accounting and Control (4)
Focus on planning, managing, controlling, and evaluating costs for competitive advantage in global markets. Key topics will include cost structure, cost-based managerial decision making, strategic cost management, JIT/TQC cost management, and accounting control systems. Prerequisites: IRCO 415 or consent of instructor.

IRGN 441. Government and Regulation (4)
This course goes beyond the debates of the role of the market and the state in the process of economic growth and political development, seeking to provide an understanding of the complex interaction between political incentives, regulatory decisions and their implementation. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 441 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title.

IRGN 442. Foundations of Strategic Studies (4)
This course surveys the major contours of intellectual debates and conceptual frameworks that structure the field of international security studies. It introduces students to important strategic thinkers in order to analyze issues in the use of force. Topics include the development of strategic thought, theories on the course of war, the organizational and political nature of militaries, assessment of military effectiveness, and the peculiar problems of nuclear and unconventional warfare.

IRGN 443. GIS and Spatial Data Analysis (4)
This course provides an introduction to GIS and spatial data analysis for applied social science research. Students will work in ArcGIS to manipulate different types of georeferenced data, visualize data, import/export data from Excel and STATA, and conduct spatial analysis. Course looks to motivate geography as an important lens through which to study society. Recommended preparation: Basic knowledge of statistics and regression (ordinary least squares) is assumed, as is familiarity with STATA software.

IRGN 444. Product Development (4)
This course examines how high-tech companies develop successful products. Emphasizes interplay between business and technology issues, including marketing, finance, manufacturing, prototyping, testing, and design. Student teams develop novel products, from concept to working prototype, including a business plan for launching the product. Discussion of concurrent engineering, rapid prototyping, industrial design, and other design methodologies.

IRGN 445. Cuba: Revolution and Reform (4)
This course focuses on contemporary Cuba, its politics, economics, and foreign policy, and assesses the social gains of the revolution and the challenges of reforming socialism. The course also takes a brief look at the origins of the revolution and the role of Castro, explores Cuba-related social media, and examines current U.S.-Cuba relations. Recommended preparation: Spanish proficiency is recommended.

IRGN 446. Applied Data Analysis and Statistical Decision Making (4)
The goal of the course is to teach how to evaluate quantitative information in business and economics contexts, and to make sound managerial decisions in complex situations. Much of the problems and the course work will involve statistical software and spreadsheet analysis of data. The course covers various applied multivariate statistical methods beyond basics. Prerequisites: IRCO 453 and 454, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 447. Organizations (4)
The course will use a broad set of readings and case studies on a diverse range of organizations. Using the economic theories surrounding organizational behavior, our central interest will be to understand how the incentives for collective action are structured. Prerequisites: IRCO 401 and IRCO 403 or consent of the instructor.

IRGN 448. Civil Society and Development (4)
To explore the roles that civil society/NGOs/the third sector can play in advancing political, social, and economic progress in developing countries. To consider the strengths and weaknesses, capacities, and limitations of NGOs in developing countries. To provide students with experience in evaluating NGOs and in making professional recommendations to enhance their ability to make a difference. To prepare students to take leadership roles—whether in government, the private sector, or NGOs—in promoting civil-society participation in development.

IRGN 449. The Making of US Foreign Policy (4)
Analysis of the interests, structure and procedures of the main executive branch agencies involved in the formulation of foreign policy, and of the roles of Congress, the media, public opinion, and nongovernmental actors. Case studies and “daily briefings” to prepare students to perform professionally in the foreign policy arena.

IRGN 450. Social Justice, Public Policy, and Development (4)
This course explores three topics: 1) democracy, which is primarily about procedural justice; 2) social policy, which is primarily about distributive justice; and, 3) corruption, which is a breach of formal justice. We will consider potential conflicts and reconciliation between justice and development, approaching various issues not just theoretically and conceptually, but also empirically and quantitatively. The course uses cross-national quantitative studies and case studies. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 451. Economic Development (4)
This course examines comparative patterns of industrialization and agricultural modernization with a focus on certain common features of the modernization process and widely varying endowments, policies, and experiences, of different countries. Prerequisites: IRCO 401 and 403, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 453. Sustainable Development (4)
The course will cover the concept of sustainable development, ways in which sustainable development can be measured, evaluation of environmental damages and benefits, and the role of discounting, and will analyze cases demonstrating failure of the market.

IRGN 454. Current Issues in U.S.-Latin American Relations (4)
Issues to be actively debated include the collective defense of democracy, coping with revolutionary change, counter-narcotics, anti-corruption, international finance, trade, and U.S.-Mexican and U.S.-Brazilian relations. In each case, students analyze the strengths and weaknesses of current US policy and advocate alternative options.

IRGN 455. Financing the Chinese Miracle (4)
This course investigates both the risks and the institutional and political underpinnings of financial deepening and financial repression in China. Students will keep track of the latest financial developments in China and learn to predict which will have consequences for the future evolution of the Chinese financial system.

IRGN 456. Program Design and Evaluation (4)
Introduction to elements of program design and evaluation. Examines principles and guidelines used in creating a program and evaluating its success or failure. International case studies are explored. Students have the opportunity to develop their own program and evaluate projects.

IRGN 457. Cost-Benefit Analysis (4)
Examination of public policy analysis, such as cost-benefit analysis and project evaluation, for use in policy formation. Sustainable development will receive particular attention. Case studies emphasizing the environment, agriculture and food, and economic development will be included.

IRGN 458. International Environmental Policy and Politics (4)
This course analyzes multilateral environmental agreements and negotiating positions of key countries on climate change, biodiversity conservation, sustainable development, and other subjects. It explores the challenges countries face to balance economic development objectives with global environmental concerns.

IRGN 460. The Politics of U.S.-Japan Economic Relations (4)
This course will analyze how the domestic politics of each country, their international negotiations, and their interaction concerning economic issues have affected the U.S.-Japan relationship. Both the politics of cooperation and integration, and trade friction and conflict will be addressed in part through study of specific cases.

IRGN 461. Doing Business in China (4)
This course describes the Chinese commercial, organizational, and cultural environment. Case studies of foreign businesses in China are examined, and the opportunities and pitfalls of operation in China are considered. Negotiation with Chinese counterparts is covered through a negotiation exercise. The focus is on mainland China, but some attention is given to business in Hong Kong and Taiwan as well. Students are required to prepare business plans for proposed Chinese ventures.

IRGN 462. Economies in Southeast Asia (4)
This course focuses on the long-run and current economic issues of Southeast Asia. The topics are economic growth, human capital, inequality and poverty, social institutions, the business sector, the financial sector, government, the external sector, and regional and interregional economic relations. For each topic, we will discuss the issues from selected countries in the region in more detail. Prerequisites: IRCO 401 and IRCO 403 or consent of instructor.

IRGN 463. Politics of Southeast Asia (4)
This course provides an introduction to five Southeast Asian countries: Indonesia, Thailand, Malaysia, the Philippines, and Vietnam. The focus will be on national level of political and economic issues in these countries. In addition, a number of region-wide issues will also be examined such as: Chinese business groups and networks; clientelism and corruption; regional trade and investment linkages; democratization; and the implications of political change for future economic development. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

IRGN 464. Designing Field Experiments (4)
This course covers the applied practice of quantitative impact evaluation. The benchmark methodology will be randomized controlled trials. The broader set of non-experimental tools will be understood through the ways they differ from random assignment. Practical issues in research and survey design will be discussed. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 464 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title. Prerequisites: IRCO 453, 454, 468, and IRGN 446, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 465. Management of Nonprofit Organizations (4)
Analyzes the particular environment in which nonprofit organizations define and achieve their objectives. Management tools are applied to existing nonprofits and to student projects.

IRGN 467. Chinese Environmental and Energy Policy (4)
This course will focus on three dimensions of Chinese environmental and energy policy. First, we will introduce the causes and consequences of environmental and energy problems. Second, we will examine Chinese environmental and energy governance: institutions, laws, and regulations for environmental protection, energy production and consumption. Third, we will explore the practices of the Chinese government to address the emerging environmental and energy options, focusing on climate change. Non-GPS students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 468. International Health Economics (4)
Course provides an overview of health economics, focusing on developing countries. We will examine both how standard economics concepts and methods can be used to understand incentives and decision making in health related transactions and their application to health policy. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Prerequisites: IRCO 401, 453 and 454.

IRGN 469. Comparative Grand Strategy and Defense Policy (4)
This course surveys theoretical explanations for why states choose the strategies they do and how they implement their diplomatic and military policies in order to carry out those strategies. Different explanatory factors are found in the international system, domestic politics, and the political-economy of military power, and they can interact in surprising ways. These general theories are examined through comparative analysis of the great World War II powers and the contemporary strategic debate. Department approval required. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 470. International Business (4)
This course introduces basic concepts of international business decision making. It covers entry modes, headquarter tasks and organization charts, strategic planning for foreign subsidiaries, international HR management and payroll, international taxation, and an introduction to transfer pricing.

IRGN 471. Japanese Economy (4)
A broad survey of the Japanese economy, together with in-depth examination of some distinctively Japanese phenomena such as savings behavior, financial structure, industrial organization, and labor markets. Prerequisites: IRCO 401 and 403, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 472. Latin American Environmental and Energy Policy (4)
This course examines the human dimension of environmental change, focusing on topics such as biodiversity conservation, climate change, land use systems, deforestation and the institutions of regulation. The course uses Latin America as its central focus but, for comparative perspective, uses cases from Asia and Africa. Non-GPS students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 473. Political Economy of Energy in Asia (4)
This course examines the political economy of energy in Asia across a number of key themes, including the interaction between the economics and politics of energy markets, the search for energy security through cooperation and competition, the challenges of managing difficult energy policy choices and trade-offs, and the challenges of sustainable energy development. Emphasis will be placed on the oil industry and its pivotal role in global energy use, pricing, and geopolitics. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 474. Applied Financial Accounting (4)
The objective of this course is to develop an understanding of accounting procedures and learn how to judge corporate financial statements. Through case studies, students will learn to interpret the numbers and make inferences about the financial health of a company. The course includes a comparison of best practices and an introduction to International Financial Reporting Standards.

IRGN 476. Chinese Sources and Methods (4)
This course involves intense engagement with original Chinese sources as a way to explore the evolution of the Chinese Communist Party and the contemporary Chinese economy. Students will be exposed to government, media, and statistical sources. Recommended preparation: At least second year, college-level proficiency in Mandarin Chinese is expected.

IRGN 477. Cyber Security (4)
Course on the challenges of improving cyber security in the United States and globally. Topics to include the technical challenges involving cyber security, an understanding of the range of threats, fundamental problems of designing prudent national policies that are politically feasible, and the possibilities and limitations regarding the designing of prudent cooperative strategies. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 477 and IRGN 290 or 490, Special Topics, course with same course title.

IRGN 478. Japanese Foreign Policy (4)
Examines the domestic and strategic sources of Japan’s foreign policy in the postwar era. Unlike IRGN 460, this course emphasizes Japan’s foreign economic policy in regional and global multilateral organizations, and the major security issues it confronts with its Asian neighbors.

IRGN 479. Politics and Institutions in Latin America (4)
Overview of Latin American politics and the “rules of the game,” both formal and informal. Key topics include military rule, presidentialism, and clientelism in the region as a whole, with special emphasis on Argentina, Brazil, Chile, and Mexico. Prerequisites: IRCO 400 or consent of instructor.

IRGN 480: Comparative Development of the Latin American Economies (4)
This course studies the development, current economic issues, and future prospects and challenges of Latin America, broadly defined to include Mexico, and Central and South America. The course focuses on the comparative development experience across the economies, regional economic integration, and economic interactions among the economies of the region. Prerequisites: major codes IR75, IR76, IR77, IR78, IS32, IS33, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 481. Managing Country Risk in the Modern Multinational Corporation (4)
Examines ways to analyze, assess, and reduce country risk.

IRGN 482. International Strategies Toward Fragile States (4)
Explanation and evaluation of international actors—for example, international organizations, aid donors, NGOs—toward fragile states and the response by domestic actors within those states. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 482 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title.

IRGN 483. Food Security (4)
The course will introduce students to the world food economy and its drivers. The first part of the course will consider the forces governing food prices and supply. The second part uses quantitative assessment of policy changes. The third part frames future constraints to food security. Recommended preparation: IRCO 454, knowledge of regression analysis, and STATA.

IRGN 484. Korean Politics (4)
This course will examine characteristics and distinctive aspects of contemporary Korean society and politics. Emphasis will be placed on continuity and change in social values, political culture and leadership, economic growth and its impact, and democratization and its future prospects. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

IRGN 485. The Korean Economy (4)
Analytical review of South Korea’s economic performance. Examination of major policy changes (e.g., shifts toward export promotion, heavy and chemical industries promotion); Korea’s industrial structure including the role of large enterprises (chaebol); role of government; links between Korea and other countries.

IRGN 486. Economic and Social Development of China (4)
This course examines China’s development experience from a generally economic standpoint. Contents include: patterns of traditional Chinese society and economy; geography and resource constraints, impact of the West and Japan; development since 1949 and contemporary problems and options.

IRGN 488. Environmental and Regulatory Economics (4)
This course provides a broad overview of environmental and regulatory economics and its interface with public policy. This course will be grounded in microeconomic theory with applications to specific cases. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Students may not receive credit for both IRGN 488 and IRGN 290 or 490 Special Topics course with the same course title. Prerequisites: IRCO 401, 453 and 454.

IRGN 489. The Economics of Nonmarket Valuation (4)
Government policies with respect to cultural amenities, the environment, health, and transportation generate benefits and costs not directly priced by the market. This course covers the range of techniques economists utilize to place a monetary value on nonmarket outputs. Non-GPS graduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. Prerequisites: IRCO 401, 453 and 454.

IRGN 490. Special Topics in Pacific International Affairs (4)
A seminar course at an advanced level on a special topic in Pacific international affairs. May be repeated for credit.

IRGN 493. Excel Skills for Professional Proficiency (2)
An Excel skills course tailored specifically to GPS classes and applicable to accounting, QM, finance, and second year courses such as corporate finance, investments, applied financial management, and strategy and negotiation, among others. The course is also designed to help prepare students for the professional world by training in critical job skills competencies in Excel. (S/U grades only.) Department approval required. Non-GPS students may enroll with consent of instructor.

IRGN 497. Internship (2)
Independent research that draws on an internship with an organization relevant to career track and/or regional specialization. Nature of the required product to be determined by professor supervising the course. May be repeated for credit.

IRGN 498. Directed Group Study (2)
Directed reading in a selected area. The content of each course is to be decided by the professor directing the course with the approval of the student’s faculty adviser. May be repeated for credit.

IRGN 499. Independent Research (2-12)
Independent research under the guidance of a faculty member of GPS. May be repeated for credit.

IRLA 400A-B-C. Low Intermediate Chinese Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at a low-intermediate level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Chinese language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 401A-B-C. Intermediate Chinese Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at an intermediate level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Chinese language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 402A-B-C. Advanced Intermediate Chinese Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at an advanced-intermediate level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Chinese language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 410A-B-C. Low Intermediate Japanese Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at a low-intermediate level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Japanese language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 411A-B-C. Intermediate Japanese Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at an intermediate level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Japanese language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 412A-B-C. Advanced Intermediate Japanese Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at an advanced-intermediate level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Japanese language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 413A-B-C. Advanced Japanese Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at an advanced level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Japanese language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 441A-B-C. Intermediate Spanish Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at an intermediate level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Spanish language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 442A-B-C. Advanced Intermediate Spanish Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at an advanced-intermediate level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Spanish language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 443A-B-C. Advanced Spanish Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at an advanced level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Spanish language skills through a combination of classes, language laboratories, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 444A-B-C. Superior Level Spanish Language for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students at a superior level of proficiency to maintain and improve their Spanish language skills through individual training with an instructor. Prerequisites: GPS majors only, or by consent of instructor.

IRLA 460A-B-C. Basic Bahasa Indonesia for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students with basic knowledge and skills of Bahasa Indonesia to further develop communicative skills through a combination of classes, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only or consent of instructor.

IRLA 461 A-B-C. Low Intermediate Bahasa Indonesian for Professional Proficiency (4-4-4)
This course is designed to enable students with low to intermediate knowledge and skills of Bahasa Indonesia to further develop communicative skills through a combination of classes, exercises, and other language experiences. Prerequisites: GPS majors only or consent of instructor

IRGN 202. International Political Economy: Money and Finance (4)
Examination of effects of national policies and international collaboration on public and private international financial institutions, in particular the management of international debt crises, economic policy coordination, and the role of international lender of last resort.

IRGN 204. International Relations of Asia-Pacific (4)
International relations and developing international political economies of nations bordering the Pacific. Topics include: the “Pacific Basin” concept; the U.S. and “hegemonic-stability” theory; legacies of the Korean War and Sino-Soviet dispute; immigration patterns and their consequences; and Japan’s foreign policy.

IRGN 205. U.S.-China Relations (4)
Can the United States and China manage to develop a constructive relationship or are they headed toward a hostile relationship? This course addresses this question by examining the domestic and international influences on the foreign policies of both countries and key issues in the bilateral relationship. Students also do policy projects.

IRGN 207. Policy Implementation Process (4)
This course builds on the core Policy-Making Processes class by focusing on nonelected officials’ role in setting and implementing policy. Ideally, elected officials make policies that unbiased, technically proficient bureaucrats carry out. This course provides some insights into why the real world departs from this. Prerequisites: IRCO 400.

IRGN 209. Marketing (4)
This course develops the microeconomics foundations of market exchange by explicitly examining the marketing details of transactions: demand and product differentiation, incomplete and incorrect information, search costs and promotion costs. It is argued that within this theoretical framework (i.e., model) most observed marketing behavior can be reconciled. The primary objective of this course is to learn to deduce firm and consumer motives from observed behavior. Prerequisites: IRGN 221 and 243, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 213. Risk Management (4)
This course provides an introduction to derivative assets such as options, futures, and swap contracts. The main emphases are on their valuation, use in the hedging, and role as components of liabilities that mitigate risk and agency problems in business firms. Prerequisites: IRCO 421.

IRGN 214. Corporate Governance (4)
Why do corporate governance systems—the way firms are run, the relationship among managers, stockholders, and workers—differ widely around the world? This course examines the various explanations for these striking differences and the consequences. Prerequisites: graduate level or consent of instructor.

IRGN 216. Post War Politics in Japan (4)
Overview of postwar politics in Japan, including American Occupation reforms, political institutions, major political factors, mass and elite, and political behavior. Special attention will be paid to the issue of Japan’s changing democracy.

IRGN 222. Investments (4)
An analysis of the risk/return characteristics of different assets as perceived by different investors and their implications for security price behavior, emphasizing real world capital market behavior. International aspects include the role of exchange rate risk and international diversification. Prerequisites: IRCO 421, 453, and 454.

IRGN 224. Corporate Finance (4)
The topics covered are dividend policy and capital structure, options, debt financing, and short and long-term in financial planning. Course format will be mostly lectures with occasional cases. Some international aspects of corporate finance will also be discussed. Prerequisites: IRGN 221, 243, IRCO 420, 421, 453, and 454, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 229. Business and Management in Japan (4)
This course introduces the main aspects of Japanese business and industrial organization (keiretsu), Japanese management practices, and the representation and influence of business interests in the Japanese political economy.

IRGN 231. Fiscal and Monetary Policy (4)
Effects of fiscal and monetary policies on aggregate variables such as output, nominal and real interest rates, price level, and employment. Additional topics include the inflation/unemployment trade-off, budget deficit, and economic growth.

IRGN 235. Topics in International Trade (4)
This course develops new analytical models of international trade and examines their relevance for trade policy. Topics include setting trade policy where firms have global market power; the interaction between international trade, innovation, and economic growth; regional economic policy, dynamic industry clusters, and information technology; and new trade theory and the world distribution of income. Prerequisites: IRCO 401 and 403, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 238. Operations and Technology Management (4)
This course provides a comprehensive introduction to the fundamental decisions and trade-offs associated with the control of a firm’s operations function. It analyzes production processes, quality control, inventory and materials planning, kanban, and just-in-time principles. Prerequisites: IRCO 453 and 454, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 240. Applied Data Analysis and Statistical Decision Making (4)
The goal of the course is to teach how to evaluate quantitative information in business and economics contexts, and to make sound managerial decisions in complex situations. Much of the problems and the course work will involve statistical software and spreadsheet analysis of data. The course covers various applied multivariate statistical methods beyond basics. Prerequisites: IRCO 453 and 454, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 244. Product Development (4)
This course examines how high-tech companies develop successful products. Emphasizes interplay between business and technology issues, including marketing, finance, manufacturing, prototyping, testing, and design. Student teams develop novel products, from concept to working prototype, including a business plan for launching the product. Discussion of concurrent engineering, rapid prototyping, industrial design, and other design methodologies.

IRGN 249. Making US Foreign Policy (4)
Analysis of the interests, structure, and procedures of the main executive branch agencies involved in the formulation of foreign policy, and of the roles of Congress, the media, public opinion, and nongovernmental actors. Case studies and “daily briefings” to prepare students to perform professionally in the foreign policy arena. Prerequisites: IRGN 210 or consent of instructor. Suggested: IRGN 211.

IRGN 250. The Politics of U.S.-Japan Economic Relations (4)
This course will analyze how the domestic politics of each country, their international negotiations, and their interaction concerning economic issues have affected the U.S.-Japan relationship. Both the politics of cooperation and integration, and trade friction and conflict will be addressed in part through study of specific cases.

IRGN 251. Economic Development (4)
This course examines comparative patterns of industrialization and agricultural modernization with a focus on certain common features of the modernization process and widely varying endowments, policies, and experiences of different countries. Prerequisites: IRGN 221 and 243, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 256. Program Design and Evaluation (4)
Introduction to elements of program design and evaluation. Examines principles and guidelines used in creating a program and evaluating its success or failure. International case studies are explored. Students have the opportunity to develop their own program and evaluate projects.

IRGN 257. Cost Benefit Analysis (4)
Examination of public policy analysis, such as cost-benefit analysis and project evaluation, for use in policy formation. Sustainable development will receive particular attention. Case studies emphasizing the environment, agriculture and food, and economic development will be included.

IRGN 258. International Environmental Policy and Politics (4)
This course analyzes multilateral environmental agreements and negotiating positions of key countries on climate change, biodiversity conservation, sustainable development, and other subjects. It explores the challenges countries face to balance economic development objectives with global environmental concerns.

IRGN 260. Economic and Social Development of China (4)
This course examines China’s development experience from a generally economic standpoint. Contents include: patterns of traditional Chinese society and economy; geography and resource constraints, impact of the West and Japan; development since 1949, and contemporary problems and options.

IRGN 261. Chinese Politics (4)
This course will analyze post-1949 Chinese politics, including political institutions, the policy-making process, and citizen political behavior. Special attention will be given to the prospects for political reform in China.

IRGN 263. Political Economy of Southeast Asia (4)
This course provides an introduction to five Southeast Asian countries: Indonesia, Thailand, Malaysia, the Philippines, and Vietnam. The focus will be on national level political and economic issues in these countries. In addition, we will also be examining a number of region-wide issues: Chinese business groups and networks; clientelism and corruption; regional trade and investment linkages; democratization; and the implications of political change for future economic development. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

IRGN 264. Economies in Southeast Asia (4)
This course focuses on the long-run and current economic issues of Southeast Asia. The topics are economic growth, human capital, inequality and poverty, social institutions, the business sector, the financial sector, government, the external sector, and regional and interregional economic relations. For each topic, we will discuss the issues from selected countries in the region in more detail.

IRGN 265. Management of Nonprofit Organizations (4)
Analyzes the particular environment in which nonprofit organizations define and achieve their objectives. Management tools are applied to existing nonprofits and to student projects.

IRGN 271. Japanese Economy (4)
A broad survey of the Japanese Economy, together with in-depth examination of some distinctively Japanese phenomena such as savings behavior, financial structure, industrial organization, and labor markets. Prerequisites: IRGN 221 and 243, or consent of instructor.

IRGN 273. Current Issues in U.S.-Latin American Relations (4)
Issues to be actively debated include the collective defense of democracy, coping with revolutionary change, counter-narcotics, anti-corruption, international finance, trade, and U.S.-Mexican and U.S.-Brazilian relations. In each case, students analyze the strengths and weaknesses of current US policy and advocate alternative options. Prerequisites: IRCO 210 or consent of instructor.

IRGN 274. Economic Policy in Latin America (4)
This course seeks to enhance the students’ understanding of the main policy alternatives open to the largest Latin American countries. Development and stabilization policies are analyzed, emphasizing the current debate between conventional and heterodox policy packages and their impact on decision making. Prerequisites: IRGN 221 and 243.

IRGN 278. Japanese Foreign Policy (4)
Examines the domestic and strategic sources of Japan’s foreign policy in the postwar era. Unlike IRGN 460, this course emphasizes Japan’s foreign economic policy in regional and global multilateral organizations, and the major security issues it confronts with its Asian neighbors.

IRGN 281. Country Risk Analysis (4)
Examines ways to analyze, assess, and reduce country risk.

IRGN 284. Korean Politics (4)
This course will examine characteristics and distinctive aspects of contemporary Korean society and politics. Emphasis will be placed on continuity and change in social values, political culture and leadership, economic growth and its impact, and democratization and its future prospects. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

IRGN 285. The Korean Economy (4)
Analytical review of South Korea’s economic performance. Examination of major policy changes (e.g., shifts toward export-promotion, heavy and chemical industrial promotion), Korea’s industrial structure including the role of large enterprise (chaebol); role of government; links between Korea and other countries.

IRGN 287. Politics and Institutions in Latin America (4)
Overview of Latin American politics and the “rules of the game,” both formal and informal. Key topics include military rule, presidentialism, and clientelism in the region as a whole, with special emphasis on Argentina, Brazil, Chile, and Mexico. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

IRGN 290. Special Topics in Pacific International Affairs (4)
A seminar course at an advanced level on a special topic in Pacific international affairs. May be repeated for credit.

IRGN 298. Directed Group Study (2)
Directed reading in selected area. The content of each course is to be decided by the professor directing the course with the approval of the student’s faculty adviser. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of faculty adviser.

IRGN 299. Independent Research (2–12)
Independent research under the guidance of a faculty member in GPS. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of faculty adviser.

LHCO 202. Strategic Management and Organizational Change (4)
This course examines principles and applications of strategic management and the change management concepts necessary to effectively apply these principles in healthcare organizations. The course provides a structured, stepwise approach to the strategic management process and includes methods for assessing key features of organizational environments and competitive situations, approaches for developing strategic plans, and processes for insuring the successful implementation of strategy. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 203. Using and Managing Information and Information Technologies (4)
Designed to familiarize health administrators and professionals with the principles of information systems design and management for health care. Provides an understanding of current trends in information technologies for health care and management issues unique to it. Includes hands-on computer lab.

LHCO 204. Conflict Resolution, Negotiation, and Team Building (2)
This course studies key management concepts and roles of management and how they apply in successful, dynamic organizations. The course examines competencies of effective managers in developing customer focus, planning, selecting and developing individuals and teams, communicating, managing resources, using technology and being adaptable. Students will be exposed to the theory and process of effective negotiation as well as various teambuilding and conflict resolution strategies in a variety of contexts. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 206. Topics in Financial Management and Decision Making (2)
This course presents real-life applications in healthcare provider organizations of financial management and decision making. Topics include budgeting, uses of financial reports, development of long-range financial forecasts, benchmarking, business plan development, and actuarial analysis in projecting healthcare delivery costs.

LHCO 209. Outcomes and Quality Improvement (4)
A critical overview of the tools used to measure outcomes and quality of care, development and use of practical guidelines, advantages and disadvantages of various methods, and the use of such analysis in administrative decision making.Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 212. Statistics and Applied Decision Making (2)
Students will learn statistical methods and their most common applications in healthcare management. Topics covered include data presentation, sampling, the development and use of confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, analysis of variance and simple regression. We will also explore elementary probability theory and decision making under uncertainty. Students who have taken LHCO 208 may not receive credit for LHCO 212. Prerequisites: admission to MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 213. Financial Accounting and Analysis (2)
Students will learn the use of financial information within a healthcare organization. Topics covered will include capital structure, working capital and cash management, the time value of money, and capital budgeting. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 214. Practical Business Communication Skills for Healthcare Professionals (2)
This course focuses on developing effective business communication skills for professionals in managerial/senior roles in health care. Writing scenarios include: preparing briefings and updates using presentation software and/or briefing packets; organizing data; constructing proposals and reports; solicitations; coordinating projects via e-mail; and drafting and editing group documents. On-the-job examples from the student’s workplace are used throughout the course. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 215. Modern Health Care (2)
Describes and analyzes the healthcare delivery system in the U.S. Participants gain understanding of the health policy process and how health care is financed. Organizational structures of institutions and professional groups are assessed. Actions taken by employers, insurers, consumers, and government, and the effects on physicians and provider organizations are analyzed. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 216. Healthcare Leadership (4)
Describes the critical knowledge and skills needed to be effective leaders in today’s complex healthcare environment. Sessions cover conflict resolution, leadership and negotiation skills, strategic planning, and ethics. Guest speakers include business leaders and entrepreneurs from the local healthcare industry. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 217. Project Management for Healthcare Professionals (2)
Covers core body of knowledge and skills of project management specific to the healthcare industry. Students learn how to define, plan, and execute a project on time, on budget and within performance specifications. Topics include project life cycle, definition, and charter creation; assembling high performance teams; risk analysis; and project closure. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 218. Professional Development Seminar: Mentorship and Assessment (2)
Faculty member directs a student’s study in development of mentorship and leadership skills as related to student’s research interest. Readings, assignments, and formalized career assessment and mentoring sessions designed to integrate course work with the development of the student’s ISP proposal on an applied research topic. This course is taken in the last quarter prior to enrollment in LHCO 298 Independent Study Project course. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 219. Process Improvement in Health Care (4)
Students learn and apply concepts and techniques of business process analysis and improvements as building blocks for operations improvement strategies in health care. Students will analyze and improve processes in various contexts using different process improvement tools from simple process-mapping to computer-based process-modeling. Use of fundamental and sophisticated analytical techniques to design and manage efficient and effective operations and processes will be covered. The importance of balancing technical/analytical and organizational/behavioral aspects of business process improvements will be highlighted. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 220. Topics in Health Law (2)
The survey course introduces students to the relationship of law to health care, including liability, government regulation, financial and ethical issues, contracting, and negotiation and dispute resolution. The course will incorporate the most current trends related to health law and feature guest speakers on relevant topics. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program or consent of department.

LHCO 298.  Independent Study Project in the Management of Health Care (4)
The Independent Study Project (ISP) is the cornerstone of the MAS Program. Students will be involved in a high-level applied research project that integrates what they have learned in their formal course work. The ISP will be an independent and creative scholarly activity in an area related to one or more of the topics covered in the formal curriculum. Students’ work will be evaluated by a committee consisting of faculty and, when appropriate, industry advisers.Prerequisites: LHCO 218, admission to the MAS in the Leadership of Healthcare Organizations Program, or consent of department.

HLAW 207A. Principles in Health Law and Policy A (4.5)
The course offers a broad introduction to the legal aspects of American health care, through an in-depth analysis of selected contemporary issues at the intersection of health care and legal systems. It draws heavily on the experiences of the participants as well as the faculty. The course attends to how and why the law came to be (legal policy), how it is used (legal process), and how it affects the shape, cost, and quality of health care in America (legal impact). Part A emphasizes “private” law topics—the legal environment within which the private participants in health care interact with each other. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Health Policy and Law program or consent of department.

HLAW 207B. Principles of Health Law and Policy B (4.5)
This course presents a comprehensive view of modern issues at the intersection of health care and law, with an emphasis on improving understanding and synergy between the professions. The course stresses foundational understanding of how health law and policy is formulated and the application of health law and policy in current practice. A portion of the class is devoted to group work where students select and study issues in depth to build a framework for resolving enduring challenges in the field. A variety of timely topics on the health law system and procedures/processes, such as Medicare and Medi-Cal coverage, are introduced to reinforce understanding. Part B emphasizes “public” law—the law concerning government’s own activities and programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Health Policy and Law program or consent of department; HLAW-207A.

HLAW 210. Applied Health Law and Policy (3)
The course focuses on legal issues from the viewpoint of the administrator or chief clinical officer, including the patient record/HIT/HIPAA. The course gives emphasis to practical application and knowledge/skills to prepare the students for job search or career transition. Prerequisites: admission to MAS Health Policy and Law program, or consent of department.

HLAW 212. Special Topics in Health Law (2)
Given at the discretion of the faculty, topics of interest in health law will be presented for in-depth review and discussion by visiting or resident faculty members. The module will cover seminar topics related to health-care issues. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: admission to MAS Health Policy and Law program or consent of department.

HLAW 213. Current Topics in Health Policy and Law (3)
Under the guidance of faculty, this survey course features a speaker series of experts covering a range of the most current topics in health policy and law. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Health Policy and Law program or consent of the department.

HLAW 215. Comparative Study of Health-care Systems (3)
Assesses the major models for provision and financing of health care in the U.S. and the world today. Students gain an understanding of the health policy process and how health care is financed as well as learn to evaluate health policies according to range of criteria for cost, quality, and equity. Advantages and disadvantages of the various ways of organizing and financing health care are considered. Actions taken by employers, insurers, consumers, and government and the effects on physicians and provider organizations are analyzed. Prerequisites: admission to MAS Health Policy and Law program, or consent of department.

HLAW 216. Bioethics and Medical Practice (3)
Course examines bioethics from a clinical perspective using medical literature and case law to cover a range of topics such as the principles and theories of bioethics, truth telling and confidentiality, informed consent, research on animals and human subjects, technology and reproduction, surrogacy, abortion and fetal rights, maternal/fetal conflict, the right to die, physician-assisted suicide and euthanasia, medical decision making for incompetent patients, and the changing nature of the doctor-patient relationship. Medical ethical issues in health-care policy at the national and global level are also discussed including allocation of scarce medical resources, compulsory public health measures, clinical research in the developing world, and cross-cultural medical practice. Prerequisites: admission to MAS Health Policy and Law program, or consent of department.

HLAW 219A. Global Health Policy A: Foundations (3)
Students will learn fundamental principles and concepts of global health policy, law, and governance. The course will emphasize that global health policy challenges require a multidisciplinary approach involving a broad set of stakeholders and that local, national, and global health policy are all intertwined. Prerequisites: admission to MAS in Health Policy and Law program, or consent of department.

HLAW 219B. Global Health Policy B: Advanced Topics (3)
This course examines advanced current topics in global health policy using a combination of instruction, student participation, and policy simulation. Topics examined are cross-cutting across local, national, regional, and international health policy-making with practical examples of why more coordinated global health governance is needed. Prerequisites: admission to MAS in Health Policy and Law program, or consent of department.  

HLAW 298. Directed Studies in Health Law (2)
Faculty member will direct a student’s study in selected professional development topics in health law. Specific content will be tailored to the student’s particular needs and area of interest. Students must make arrangements with the program and individual faculty member prior to enrolling in the course each time. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: admission to the MAS Health Policy and Law program or consent of department.

HLAW 298A-C. Health Law Research Forum (1-1-1)
This course series focuses on developing students’ research and scholarly writing skills for their Independent Study Projects (ISP). Topics include refining the research question, collecting/analyzing data, understanding research methodology, forming the ISP committee, and producing a viable ISP proposal. Prerequisites: admission to MAS Health Policy and Law program or consent of instructor and courses have to be taken in order from A to C.

HLAW 299. Independent Study Project in Health Law (3)
Students will be involved in a high-level applied research project. The project will cover an area of health law related to topics covered in the formal curriculum. Students’ work will be evaluated by a committee of faculty and may include industry advisors when appropriate. Prerequisites: HLAW 298A-C; admission to MAS Health Policy and Law program or consent of instructor.

HILD 2A-B-C. United States (4-4-4)
A year-long lower-division course that will provide students with a background in United States history from colonial times to the present, concentrating on social, economic, and political developments. (Satisfies Muir College humanities requirement and American History and Institutions requirement.)

HILD 7A-B-C. Race and Ethnicity in the United States (4-4-4)
Lectures and discussions surveying the topics of race, slavery, demographic patterns, ethnic variety, rural and urban life in the U.S.A., with special focus on European, Asian, and Mexican immigration.

HILD 7A. Race and Ethnicity in the United States (4)
A lecture-discussion course on the comparative ethnic history of the United States. Of central concern will be the African American, slavery, race, oppression, mass migrations, ethnicity, city life in industrial America, and power and protest in modern America.

HILD 7B. Race and Ethnicity in the United States (4)
A lecture-discussion course on the comparative ethnic history of the United States. Of central concern will be the Asian-American and white ethnic groups, race, oppression, mass migrations, ethnicity, city life in industrial America, and power and protest in modern America.

HILD 7C. Race and Ethnicity in the United States (4)
A lecture-discussion course on the comparative ethnic history of the United States. Of central concern will be the Mexican-American, race, oppression, mass migrations, ethnicity, city life in industrial America, and power and protest in modern America.

HILD 10-11-12. East Asia (4-4-4)
A lower-division survey that compares and contrasts the development of China and Japan from ancient times to the present. Themes include the nature of traditional East Asian society and culture, East Asian responses to political and economic challenges posed by an industrialized West, and war, revolution and modernization in the twentieth century.

HILD 10. East Asia: The Great Tradition (4)
The evolution of East Asian civilization from the first writing through classical Hei’an Japan and late imperial Song China. Primary and secondary readings on basic ideas, institutions and practices of the Confucian, Daoist, and Buddhist paths and of the state and family.

HILD 11. East Asia and the West, 1279–1911 (4)
From the Mongol conquests to China’s last dynasty and Japan’s annexation of Korea, this course examines political, institutional, and cultural ruptures and continuities as the East Asian countries responded to the challenges of Western imperialism with defense, reform, conservative reaction and creative imitation.

HILD 12. Twentieth-Century East Asia (4)
Examines the emergence of a regionally dominant Japan before and after World War II; the process of revolution and state-building in China during the Nationalist and Communist eras; and Korea’s encounter with colonialism, nationalism, war, revolution and industrialization.

HILD 14. Film and History in Latin America (4)
Students watch films on Latin America and compare them to historical research on similar episodes or issues. Films will vary each year but will focus on the social and psychological consequences of colonialism, forced labor, religious beliefs, and “Modernization.”

HILD 30. History of Public Health (4)
Explores the history of public health, from the plague hospitals of Renaissance Italy to the current and future prospects for global health initiatives, emphasizing the complex biological, cultural, and social dimensions of health, sickness, and medicine across time and space.

HIAF 111. Modern Africa since 1880 (4)
A survey of African history dealing with the European scramble for territory, primary resistance movements, the rise of nationalism and the response of metropolitan powers, the transfer of power, self-rule and military coups, and the quest for identity and unity.

HIAF 112. West Africa since 1880 (4)
West Africa from the nineteenth century onwards and examines the broad outlines of historical developments in the sub-region through the twentieth century, including such themes as religious, political, and social changes.

HIAF 113. Small Wars and the Global Order: Africa and Asia (4)
Examines the traumas, interrelation, and global repercussions of national conflicts (‘small wars’) in the postcolonial world. Focus on Africa and Asia from the Cold War to the present with particular attention to the intersection of foreign interests, insurgency, and geopolitics.

HIAF 120. History of South Africa (4)
The origins and the interaction between the peoples of South Africa. Special attention will be devoted to industrial development, urbanization, African and Afrikaner nationalism, and the origin and development of apartheid and its consequences.

HIAF 123. West Africa from Earliest Times to 1800 (4)
Plant and animal domestication, ironworking and the distribution of ethnic/language groups, urbanization, regional and long-distance commerce, and the rise of medieval kingdoms. +

HIAF 199. Independent Study in African History (4)
Directed readings for undergraduates. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and academic adviser required.

HIEA 111. Japan: Twelfth to Mid-Nineteenth Centuries (4)
Covers important political issues—such as the medieval decentralization of state power, unification in the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, the Tokugawa system of rule, and conflicts between rulers and ruled—while examining long-term changes in economy, society, and culture. +

HIEA 112. Japan: From the Mid-Nineteenth Century through the US Occupation (4)
Topics include the Meiji Restoration, nationalism, industrialization, imperialism, Taisho Democracy, and the Occupation. Special attention will be given to the costs as well as benefits of “modernization” and the relations between dominant and subordinated cultures and groups within Japan.

HIEA 113. The Fifteen-Year War in Asia and the Pacific (4)
Lecture-discussion course approaching the 1931–1945 war through various “local,” rather than simply national, experiences. Perspectives examined include those of marginalized groups within Japan, Japanese Americans, Pacific Islanders, and other elites and nonelites in Asian and Pacific settings.

HIEA 114. Postwar Japan (4)
Examines social, cultural, political, and economic transformations and continuities in Japan since World War II. Emphases will differ by instructor.

HIEA 115. Social and Cultural History of Twentieth-Century Japan (4)
Japanese culture and society changed dramatically during the twentieth century. This course will focus on the transformation of cultural codes into what we know as “Japanese,” the politics of culture, and the interaction between individuals and society.

HIEA 116. Japan-U.S. Relations (4)
Survey of relations between Japan and the United States in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries. Although the focus will be on these nation-states, the course will be framed within the global transformation of societies. Topics include cultural frameworks, political and economic changes, colonialism and imperialism, and migration.

HIEA 117. Ghosts in Japan (4)
By examining the roles of ghosts in Japanese belief systems in a nonscientific age, this course addresses topics including folk beliefs and ghost stories, religiosity, early science, tools of amelioration and authoritative knowledge, and the relationship between myth and history.

HIEA 120. Classical Chinese Philosophy and Culture (4)
The relation of social, political, and economic developments to the philosophical and religious traditions of China c. 1200 BC to 400 AD, including Confucianism, Daoism, Legalism, correlative cosmology, and ideas about fate, spirits, and health. Previous course work on China helpful but not required. +

HIEA 121. Medieval Chinese Culture and Society (4)
This course covers the period from the sixth century to the thirteenth century, the time of the glorious T’angand Sung dynasties. We focus on the “medieval revolution” that changed the political, economic, and social life of the empire. As much as possible, we study these changes from the eyes of the people who lived throughout them—aristocrats, peasants, soldiers, merchants, women.  

HIEA 122. Late Imperial Chinese Culture and Society (4)
Using primary and secondary sources, we survey the interactions of ideas and institutions in the commercial economy of China from the tenth through the eighteenth centuries, and consider their impact on the lives of individuals. Previous course work on China helpful but not required. +

HIEA 123. China in the Ming Period (1368–1644) (4)
Narrates the history of the Ming dynasty. Explores the worldview and experiences of Ming men and women from the emperor and scholar-officials down to farmers and riff-raff, through translated primary and accessible secondary sources on politics, religion, family, economy, etc. Recommended preparation: HILD 11. + 

HIEA 124. Life in Ming China (1369–1644) (4)
We read primary and secondary sources to explore the experiences, worldview, and relationships of Ming men and women, variously including emperors and empresses, scholar-officials, upper-class wives, merchants, weavers, painters, eunuchs, Daoists, fighting monks, farmers, actors, gardeners, courtesans, soldiers, and pirates. +

HIEA 125. Women and Gender in East Asia (4)
The impact of modern transformations on female roles and gender relations in China, Japan, and Korea, focusing on the late imperial/early modern periods through the twentieth century.

HIEA 126. The Silk Road in Chinese and Japanese History (4)
This course studies the peoples, cultures, religions, economics, arts, and technologies of the trade routes known collectively as the Silk Road from c. 200 BCE to 1000 CE. We will use an interdisciplinary approach. Primary sources will include written texts and visual materials. We will examine these trade routes as an early example of globalization. +

HIEA 128. History of Material Culture in China (4)
Introduction to material culture in China from a historical perspective. Consider Chinese primary sources (including both historical texts and objects) from the point of view of the new interdisciplinary field of material culture studies. +

HIEA 129. Faces of the Chinese Past (4)
Through the biographies and autobiographies of prominent and ordinary men and women from antiquity to today, this course explores the relation of the individual to social structures, class and gender in personal experience, and the production of primary and secondary sources. +

HIEA 130. End of the Chinese Empire, 1800–1911 (4)
From the Opium War to the 1911 Revolution. Key topics include ethnic identity under Manchu rule, the impact of Western imperialism, the Taiping and other rebellions, overseas Chinese, social change and currents of reform, and the rise of Chinese nationalism.

HIEA 131. China in War and Revolution, 1911–1949 (4)
An exploration of the formative period of the twentieth-century Chinese Revolution: the New Culture Movement, modern urban culture, the nature of Nationalist (Guomindang) rule, war with Japan, revolutionary nationalism, and the Chinese Communist rise to power.

HIEA 132. History of the People’s Republic of China (4)
This course analyzes the history of the PRC from 1949 to the present. Special emphasis is placed on the problem of postrevolutionary institutionalization, the role of ideology, the tension between city and countryside, Maoism, the Great Leap Forward, the Cultural Revolution.

HIEA 133. Twentieth-Century China: Cultural History (4)
This course looks at how the historical problems of twentieth-century China are treated in the popular and elite cultures of the Nationalist and Communist eras. Special emphasis is placed on film and fiction.

HIEA 134. History of Thought and Religion in China: Confucianism (4)
Course will take up one of the main traditions of Chinese thought or religion , Confucianism, and trace it from its origins to the present. The course will explain the system of thought and trace it as it changes through history and within human lives and institutions. +

HIEA 135. History of Thought and Religion in China: Buddhism (4)
Course will take up one of the main traditions of Chinese thought or religion, Buddhism, and trace it from its origins to the present. The course will explain the system of thought and trace it as it changes through history and within human lives and institutions. +

HIEA 136. History of Thought and Religion in China: Daoism (4)
Course will take up one of the main traditions of Chinese thought or religion, Daoism, and trace it from its origins to the present. The course will explain the system of thought and trace it as it changes through history and within human lives and institutions. +

HIEA 137. Women and the Family in Chinese History (4)
The course explores the institutions of family and marriage, and women’s roles and experiences within the family and beyond, from classical times to the early twentieth century. +

HIEA 138. Women and the Chinese Revolution (4)
Examines women’s roles and experiences in the twentieth-century Chinese revolution, the ways in which women participated in the process of historical change, the question of to what extent the revolution “liberated” women from “Confucian tradition.”

HIEA 140. China in the Contemporary World (4)
Examines China’s attempts to manage the movements of people, ideas, and trade across its borders since 1900. How much control do individual countries such as China have over global processes? Special emphasis will be placed on global contexts and the impacts of China's decision to reintegrate its society and economy with capitalist countries since 1978. Recommended preparation: previous course work on China helpful but not required.

HIEA 144. Topics in East Asian History (4)
Selected topics in East Asian History. Course may be taken for credit up to three times as topics vary.

HIEA 150. Modern Korea, 1800–1945 (4)
This course examines Korea’s entrance into the modern world.  It utilizes both textual and audio-visual materials to explore local engagements with global phenomenon, such as imperialism, nationalism, capitalism, and socialism.  HILD 10, 11, and/or 12 recommended.

HIEA 151. The Two Koreas, 1945–Present (4)
This course traces the peninsula’s division into two rival regimes.  It utilizes both textual and audio-visual materials to reveal the varied experiences of North and South Koreans with authoritarianism, industrialization, and globalization. HILD 10, 11, and/or 12 recommended.

HIEA 152. History and Cultures of the Korean Diaspora (4)
This course places the Korean diaspora in national, regional, and global frames from the imperial age to our globalized present. It traces migrant experiences and community formations on the peninsula and in Japan, the U.S., China, and the former USSR.

HIEA 153. Social and Cultural History of Twentieth-Century Korea (4)
This course explores the cultural and social structures that dominated twentieth-century Korea: imperialism, ethnonationalism, heteropatriarchy, capitalism, socialism, and militarism. It also uses individual and collective engagements with these hegemonic structures to demonstrate contentious interactions between individuals and society.

HIEA 163/263. Cinema and Society in Twentieth-Century China (4)
This colloquium will explore the relationship between cinema and society in twentieth-century China. The emphasis will be on the social, political, and cultural impact of filmmaking. The specific period under examination (1930s, 1940s, post-1949) may vary each quarter. Graduate students will be expected to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HIEA 164/264. Seminar in Late Imperial Chinese History (4)
Pairs primary sources with scholarship built on them to illuminate later imperial state, society, and individual lives, and to show how historians generate and answer questions. Topics vary; may be repeated for credit. Graduate students will be expected to submit an additional paper or project. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp. +

HIEA 166/266. Creating Ming Histories (4)
The Ming (1368–1644) is often considered expanding Europe’s opposite: absolutist, closed, and stagnant. Reading new scholarship in conjunction with its primary sources, we’ll explore the period’s dynamic politics and competitive society, and the production of historical knowledge. Graduate students will be required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HIEA 168/268. Topics in Classical and Medieval Chinese History (4)
Chinese society, thought, religion, culture, economy and politics from the Shang through the Song dynasties, through primary and secondary sources. Topics vary; may be repeated for credit. Requirements differ for undergraduate, MA and PhD students. Graduate students will be required to submit a more substantial piece of work or an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor and department stamp. +

HIEA 171/271. Society and Culture in Premodern China (4)
Explores premodern Chinese society and culture through the reading and discussion of classics and masterpieces in history. Examines how values and ideas were represented in the texts and how they differed, developed, or shifted over time. Requirements will vary for undergraduate, MA, and PhD students. Graduate students are required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing, department stamp. +

HIEA 180. Topics in Modern Korean History (4)
This colloquium will examine selected topics in modern Korean history through both primary sources (in translation) and secondary sources. Topics will vary year to year. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department stamp.

HIEA 199. Independent Study in East Asian History (4)
Directed reading for undergraduates under the supervision of various faculty members. Prerequisites: consent of instructor required.

HIEU 101. Greece in the Classical Age (4)
The social, political, and cultural history of the ancient Greek world from the Persian Wars to the death of Alexander the Great (480–323 BC). +

HIEU 101A. Ancient Greek Civilization (4)
The social, political, and cultural history of the ancient Greek world from the earliest settlements to the empire of Alexander the Great (c. 2000–323 BC). +

HIEU 102. Roman History (4)
This course treats the history of Rome from the foundation of the city in the eighth century BC until the end of the Flavian dynasty in 96 AD. It focuses particularly on the political, social, and cultural elements that fueled Roman development and expansion.

HIEU 103. Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire (4)
This course discusses the history of imperial Rome and its successor states between the second and seventh centuries AD. It considers whether the Roman Empire fell or if one should instead speak of Roman continuity amidst political and religious change.

HIEU 104. Byzantine Empire (4)
A survey course of the history of the Byzantine state from the reign of Constantine to the fall of Constantinople. This course will emphasize the importance of the Byzantine state within a larger European focus, its relationship to the emerging Arab states, its political and cultural contributions to Russia and the late medieval west. +

HIEU 104A. The Byzantine Empire, 3rd–7th centuries (4)
This course is devoted to the Early Byzantine Empire from Constantine through the challenges and transformations of the seventh century, examining the rise and triumph of Christianity, war, diplomacy, the rise of Islam, climate change, epidemic and natural disasters. Students cannot receive credit for both HIEU 104 and HIEU 104A. Recommended preparation: HIEU 105. +

HIEU 104B. The Byzantine Empire, 7th–11th centuries (4)
This course covers the Middle Byzantine Empire from the seventh to the eleventh century, examining the impact of Islam; Iconoclasm; the conversion of the Slavs and the rise of Bulgaria and Russia; religious and intellectual developments; court culture and ceremonial. Students cannot receive credit for both HIEU 104 and HIEU 104B. Recommended preparation: HIEU 104A. +

HIEU 104C. The Byzantine Empire, 11th–15th centuries (4)
This course covers the Later Byzantine Empire from the eleventh through the fifteenth century, examining the eleventh century crisis; the rise of the West and the Crusades; the Komnenian revolution; Slavic empires; the Palaiologan Renaissance; Mongols and Ottomans; the Byzantine diaspora. Students cannot receive credit for both HIEU 104 and HIEU 104C. Recommended preparation: HIEU 104A and/or HIEU 104B. +

HIEU 105. The Early Christian Church (4)
A study of the origin and development of early Christian thought, literature, and institution from the New Testament period to the Council of Chalcedon. +

HIEU 107. Pagan Europe and its Christian Aftermath (4)
Cross-listed with RELI 147. This course explores the history of how Western Europe was converted from its indigenous pagan religions to the imported religion we know as Christianity. We will discuss conversion by choice and by force, partial or blended conversions, and the relationships between belief and culture. Students may not receive credit for both HIEU 107 and RELI 147. +

HIEU 109. Blood, Soil, Boundaries: Nationalism in Europe (4)
This course will explore the history of nationalism as idea and political movement in European history, from the French Revolution to the present. +

HIEU 110. The Rise of Europe (4)
The development of European society and culture from the decline of the Roman Empire to 1050.

HIEU 111. Europe in the Middle Ages (4)
The development of European society and culture from 1050 to 1400.

HIEU 115. The Pursuit of the Millennium (4)
The year 2000 provokes questions about the transformation of time, culture, and society. Taking the year 1000 as a touchstone, this class examines the history of apocalyptic expectations in the Middle Ages through a close scrutiny of both texts and art. +

HIEU 116A. Greece and the Balkans in the Age of Ottoman Expansion (4)
This course examines the history of Greece and the Balkans (1350–1683). Topics covered: the rise of the Ottoman Empire, conquest of the Balkans, the Ottoman system of rule, religious life, rural and urban society, law and order, and material culture. +

HIEU 116B. Greece and the Balkans in the Age of Nationalism
This course examines the history of Greece and the Balkans (1683–1914). Topics covered: social and economic development in the eighteenth century, nationalism, independence wars, state-nation formation, interstate relations, the Eastern Question, rural society, urbanization, emigration, and the Balkan Wars. Students may not get credit for both HIEU 116B and HIEU 117A.

HIEU 116CD. Greece and the Balkans during the Twentieth Century (4)
This course examines the history of Greece and the Balkans (1914–2001). Topics covered: World War I, population exchanges, authoritarianism, modernization, World War II, civil wars, Cold War, Greek-Turkish relations. Cyprus collapse of communism, 1990s conflicts, and EU expansion. Students may not get credit for both HIEU 116C and HIEU 116CD, or HIEU 116CD and HIEU 117B.

HIEU 117A. Greece and the Balkans in the Age of Nationalism (4)
This course examines the history of Greece and the Balkans (1683–1914). Topics covered: social and economic development in the eighteenth century, nationalism, independence wars, state-nation formation, interstate relations, the Eastern Question, rural society, urbanization, emigration, and the Balkan Wars.

HIEU 117B. Greece and the Balkans during the Twentieth Century (4)
This course examines the history of Greece and the Balkans (1914–2001). Topics covered: World War I, population exchanges, authoritarianism, modernization, World War II, resistance, civil wars, Cold War, Greek-Turkish relations, Cyprus, collapse of Communism, 1990s conflicts, and EU expansion.

HIEU 118. Americanization in Europe (4)
Examines problems surrounding the transfer of American culture, values, and styles to Europe in the twentieth and twenty-first centuries. Topics may include: consumer society, popular culture, commercial and business practices, “McDonaldization,” political and military influence, democratization, and resistance to Americanization. Students may not receive credit for both HIEU 117S and HIEU 118.

HIEU 120. The Renaissance in Italy (4)
The social, political, and cultural transformation of late-medieval Italy from the heyday of mercantile expansion before the plague to the dissolution of the Italian state system with the French invasions of 1494. Special focus upon family, associational life and factionalism in the city, the development of the techniques of capitalist accumulation, and the spread of humanism. +

HIEU 125. Reformation Europe (4)
The intellectual and social history of the Reformation and Counter-Reformation from the French invasions to the Edict of Nantes. Emphasis is upon reform from below and above, the transformation of grass-roots spirituality into institutional control. +

HIEU 127. Sport in the Modern World (4)
This course looks at the phenomenon of sport in all of its social, cultural, political, and economic aspects. The starting point will be the emergence of modern sport in nineteenth-century Britain, but the focus will be global. Since the approach will be topical rather than chronological, students should already have a good knowledge of world history in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries.

HIEU 128. Europe since 1945 (4)
An analysis of European history since the end of the Second World War. Focus is on political, social, economic, and cultural developments within European societies as well as on Europe’s relationship with the wider world (the Cold War, decolonization).

HIEU 129. Paris, Past and Present (4)
This course surveys the historical and cultural significance of Paris from about 1500 to the present. The focus is on interactions between political, architectural, and urban evolutions, and the changing populations of Paris in times of war, revolutions, and peace. +

HIEU 130. Europe in the Eighteenth Century (4)
A lecture-discussion course focusing on Europe from 1688 to 1789. Emphasis is on the social, cultural, and intellectual history of France, Germany, and England. Topics considered will include family life, urban and rural production and unrest, the poor, absolutism, and the Enlightenment from Voltaire to Rousseau. +

HIEU 131. The French Revolution: 1789–1814 (4)
This course examines the Revolution in France and its impact in Europe and the Caribbean. Special emphasis will be given to the origins of the Revolution, the development of political and popular radicalism and symbolism from 1789 to 1794, the role of political participants (e.g., women, sans-culottes, Robespierre), and the legacy of revolutionary wars and the Napeoleonic system on Europe. +

HIEU 132. Germany from Luther to Bismarck (4)
How Germany, from being a maze of tiny states rife with religious conflict, became a nation. Did the nations-building process lead to Nazism? +

HIEU 134. The Formation of the Russian Empire, 800–1855 (4)
State-building and imperial expansion among the peoples of the East Slavic lands of Europe and Asia from the origins of the Russian state in ninth-century Kiev, through Peter the Great’s empire up to the middle of the nineteenth century. +

HIEU 135. Sun, Sea, Sand, and Sex: Tourism and Tourists in the Contemporary World (4)
Major developments in modern tourism history, focusing on post-1945 Europe in its broader global context. Topics include tourism's relationship to cultural change and transfers, globalization, international politics, business, economics, wealth distribution, the environment, sexuality and sex tourism, and national identity.

HIEU 136B. European Society and Social Thought, 1870–1989 (4)
A lecture and discussion course on European political and cultural development and theory from 1870–1989. Important writings will be considered both as responses to and as provocations for political and cultural change.

HIEU 137. History of Colonialism: From New Imperialism to Decolonization (4)
This course surveys the age of colonialism in the nineteenth and twentieth century. The course will focus on the debates on colonialism in the metropolis as well as on the conflicts inside the colonies. Considerable emphasis will be placed on colonialism in Africa.

HIEU 141. European Diplomatic History, 1870–1945 (4)
European imperialism, alliances, and the outbreak of the First World War. The postwar settlement and its breakdown. The advent of Hitler and the disarray of the western democracies. The Second World War and the emergence of the super powers.

HIEU 142. European Intellectual History, 1780–1870 (4)
European thought from the late Enlightenment and the French Revolution to Marx and Baudelaire, emphasizing the origins of romanticism, idealism, and positivism in England, Germany, and France.

HIEU 143. European Intellectual History, 1870–1945 (4)
A lecture-discussion course on the crisis of bourgeois culture, the redefinition of Marxist ideology, and the transformation of modern social theory. Readings will include Nietzsche, Sorel, Weber, Freud, and Musil. (This course satisfies the minor in the Humanities Program.)

HIEU 144. Topics in European History (4)
Selected topics in European history. Course may be taken for credit up to three times as topics vary.

HIEU 145. The Holocaust as Public History (4)
We will study historical accounts, memoirs, diaries, and oral histories to master the Holocaust epoch. We will contrast scholarly narratives to personal experience as different ways to learn about the past. Students will design projects for public education.

HIEU 146. Fascism, Communism, and the Crisis of Liberal Democracy: Europe 1919–1945 (4)
A consideration of the political, social, and cultural crisis that faced Western liberal democracies in the interwar period, with emphasis on the mass movements that opposed bourgeois liberalism from both the left and the right.

HIEU 147. Women and Gender in Early Modern Europe (4)
This course examines the history of European women and gender issues from about 1500 to 1700. Three major themes are covered: intellectual and cultural trends; the nature of the human body and work roles; and, spiritual beliefs, experiences, and practices. +

HIEU 148. How Woman Changed Europe from Queens to the Victorians (4)
This course examines European women and gender issues from about 1700 to 1871. Major themes covered are: intellectual and cultural trends (e.g., education and politics); attitudes toward female and male bodies and work roles; and spiritual beliefs and practices. Students may not receive credit for both HIEU 148 and HIEU 148D.

HIEU 149. History of Women in Europe: 1870 to the Present (4)
This course explores the history of women across classes from 1870 to the present, with an emphasis on the variety of women’s experience and the efforts towards and obstacles to empowerment. Topics include: women and the state, science and gender, feminist movements and the evolution of women’s work.

HIEU 150. Modern British History (4)
Emphasis on changes in social structure and corresponding shifts in political power. The expansion and the end of empire. Two World Wars and the erosion of economic leadership.

HIEU 151. Spain since 1808 (4)
Social, political, cultural history of Spain since Napoleon. Features second Spanish Republic, the Civil War, Franco era, and transition to democracy.

HIEU 152. The Worst of Times: Everyday Life in Authoritarian and Dictatorial Societies (4)
Examines how ordinary citizens coped with the problems of life under Europe’s authoritarian regimes. Topics may include Nazism, fascism, and quasi-fascist societies (e.g., Franco’s Spain, Salazar’s Portugal), and communist practice from Leninism to Stalinism to the milder Titoism of Yugoslavia.

HIEU 153. Topics in Modern European History (4)
Selected topics in modern European history. Course may be taken for credit up to three times as topic vary.

HIEU 154. Modern German History: From Bismarck to Hitler (4)
An analysis of the volatile course of German history from unification to the collapse of the Nazi dictatorship. Focus is on domestic developments inside Germany as well as on their impact on European and global politics in the twentieth century.

HIEU 156. History of the Soviet Union, 1905–1991 (4)
This course explores war, revolution, development, and terror in the Soviet Union from 1905–1991.

HIEU 157. Religion and the Law in Modern European History (4)
Comparative examination of the relationship between religious commitments and legal norms in Europe from the Reformation to the present. Topics may include government sponsorship; religious expression; conflicts with secular law; religious rights as human rights; and religious and cultural politics.

HIEU 158. Why Hitler? How Auschwitz? (4)
Why did Germany in 1919 produce an Adolf Hitler; how did the Nazis take power in 1933; and why did the Third Reich last until 1945? Why did the war against the Jews become industrial and absolute?

HIEU 159. Three Centuries of Zionism, 1648–1948 (4)
For centuries the land of Israel was present in Jewish minds and hearts. Why and how did the return to Zion become a reality? Which were the vicissitudes of Jewish life in Palestine?

HIEU 160. Topics in Ancient Greek History (4)
Selected topics in ancient Greek history. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department approval required. +

HIEU 161/261. Topics in Roman History (4)
Selected topics in Roman history. May be taken for credit three times as topics will vary. Prerequisites: upper-division and department stamp.

HIEU 162/262. Topics in Byzantine History (4)
Selected topics in Byzantine history. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division and department stamp.

HIEU 163/263. Special Topics in Medieval History (4)
Intensive study of special problems or periods in the history of medieval Europe. Topics vary from year to year, and students may therefore repeat the course for credit. Prerequisites: background in European history and upper-division standing. +

HIEU 171/271. Special Topics in Twentieth-Century Europe (4)
This course alternates with HIEU 170. Topics will vary from year to year. Prerequisites: background in European history.

HIEU 172/272. Comparative European Fascism (4)
This course will be a comparative and thematic examination of the fascist movement and regimes in Europe from the 1920s to the 1940s. In particular, it will focus on the emergence of the two major fascist movements in Italy and Germany. Graduate students will be required to submit a more substantial piece of work with in-depth analysis and with an increased number of sources cited. A typical undergraduate paper would be ten pages, whereas a typical graduate paper would require engagement with primary sources, more extensive reading of secondary material, and be about twenty pages. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HIEU 174/274. The Holocaust: A Psychological Approach (4)
An examination of how traditional moral concerns and human compassion came to be abandoned and how the mass murder of the Jews was organized and carried out. The focus of this course will be on the perpetrators. Requirements will vary for undergraduate MA and PhD students. Graduate students are required to submit a more substantial piece of work. Prerequisites: upper-division or consent of instructor. Department stamp required.

HIEU 176/276. Politics in the Jewish Past (4)
This seminar addresses Jewish civic autonomy in the late medieval era, the terms of emancipation in the European states, the politics of Jewish socialists, the costs of assimilation, and the consequences of a successful Zionist state in 1948. Graduate students will be required to submit a more substantial piece of work with in-depth analysis and with an increased number of sources cited. A typical undergraduate paper would be ten pages, whereas a typical graduate paper would require engagement with primary sources, more extensive reading of secondary material, and be about twenty pages. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HIEU 178/278. Soviet History (4)
Topics will vary from year to year. Graduate students are required to submit a more substantial paper. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HIEU 181/281. Immigration, Ethnicity, and Identity in Contemporary European Society (4)
Comparative study of immigration and migration in Europe since 1945. Topics include (im)migrant adaptation, assimilation, and identity; labor systems, opposition to and regulation of migration; competing concepts of nationality and citizenship, conflicts over Muslim immigration; and implications for European integration. Students may not receive credit for both HIEU 181/281 and ERC 101. Graduate students will be expected to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HIEU 182/282. The Muslim Experience in Contemporary European Society (4)
Comparative study of Islam in Europe since 1945. Topics include indigenous populations; immigration; Islamic law/church-state questions; EU expansion/integration; gender issues; terrorism; Islamophobia; “Europeanizing” Islam; the historical tradition of European-Muslim encounter and its present political/cultural issues. Graduate students will be required to do an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HIEU 183/283. Social History and Anthropology of the Mediterranean (4)
This seminar examines the social history and anthropology of the Mediterranean. Topics covered are the Mediterranean debate, rural economy, peasant society, gender relations, honor and shame, rural violence, class formation, and emigration. The seminar introduces the methodology of historical anthropology. Graduate students will be expected to complete an additional paper or project. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HIEU 184/284. Yugoslavia: Before, During, and After (4)
Examines the multiethnic Yugoslav states that existed from 1918 until the 1990s. Topics include interethnic relations, foreign affairs, Tito’s revisionist communism, the consumerist Yugoslav Dream, culture and society, the violent break-up of the 1990s, and the post-Yugoslav order. Graduate students will be required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HIEU 198. Directed Group Study (1, 2, 3, 4)
Directed group study on European history under the supervision of a member of the faculty on a topic not generally included in the regular curriculum. Students must make arrangements with individual faculty members. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, completion of at least ninety units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 2.95, a completed and approved Special Studies form, and department stamp.

HIEU 199. Independent Study in European History (4)
Directed readings for undergraduates under the supervision of various faculty members. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HILA 100. Latin America—Colonial Transformations (4)
Lecture-discussion survey of Latin America from the pre-Columbian era to 1825. It addresses such issues as the nature of indigenous cultures, the implanting of colonial institutions, native resistance and adaptations, late colonial growth and the onset of independence. +

HILA 101. Latin America: The Construction of Independence 1810–1898 (4)
Lecture-discussion survey of Latin America in the nineteenth century. It addresses such issues as the collapse of colonial practices in the society and economy as well as the creation of national governments, political instability, disparities among regions within particular countries, and of economies oriented toward the export of goods to Europe and the United States.

HILA 102. Latin America in the Twentieth Century (4)
This course surveys the history of the region by focusing on two interrelated phenomena: the absence of democracy in most nations and the region’s economic dependence on more advanced countries, especially the United States. Among the topics discussed will be the Mexican Revolution, the military in politics, labor movements, the wars in Central America, liberation theology, and the current debt crisis.

HILA 103. Revolution in Modern Latin America (4)
A political, economic, and social examination of the causes and consequences of the Mexican, Cuban, and Nicaraguan revolutions. Also examine guerrilla movements that failed to gain power in their respective countries, namely the Shining Path in Peru, FARC in Colombia, and the Zapatistas in Mexico.

HILA 106. Changes and Continuities in Latin American History (4)
Reviews the historical processes Latin American countries underwent after political independence from Spain/Portugal in the nineteenth century. Each country built its future, but there also were continuities. Assessing changes and continuities and their present-day consequences will be our goal.

HILA 110. Lord and Peasant in Latin America (4)
Examination of the historical roots of population problems, social conflict, and revolution in Latin America, with emphasis on man-land relationships. Special emphasis on modern reform efforts and on Mexico, Cuba, Brazil, and Argentina. Lecture, discussion, reading, and films.

HILA 114. Dictatorships in Latin America (4)
How did dictatorships come about? Who were the authoritarian leaders? How did they organize their regimes and what were the consequences? Recent publications on dictators in Latin America allow for comparisons across countries and throughout time to answer those questions.

HILA 115. The Latin American City, a History (4)
A survey of the development of urban forms of Latin America and of the role that cities played in the region as administrative and economic centers. After a brief survey of pre-Columbian centers, the lectures will trace the development of cities as outposts of the Iberian empires and as “city-states” that formed the nuclei of new nations after 1810. The course concentrates primarily on the cities of South America, but some references will be made to Mexico City. It ends with a discussion of modern social ills and Third World urbanization. Lima, Santiago de Chile, Buenos Aires, Rio de Janeiro, and Sao Paulo are its principal examples.

HILA 117. Indians, Blacks, and Whites: Family Relations in Latin America (4)
The development of family structures and relations among different ethnic groups. State and economy define and are defined by family relations. Thus this family approach also provides an understanding to broader socioeconomic processes and cultural issues.

HILA 120. History of Argentina (4)
A survey from the colonial period to the present, with an emphasis on the nineteenth and twentieth centuries. Among the topics covered: the expansion of the frontier, the creation of a cosmopolitan, predominately European culture, and the failure of industrialization to provide an economic basis for democracy.

HILA 121A. History of Brazil through 1889 (4)
This course covers many of the most transformative and fascinating social, political, and racial phenomena in Brazilian society through 1889, including indigenous life, Portuguese colonization, slavery and abolition, royal exile, independence and Empire, the birth of the Republic, war, social unrest, and ideals of modernization.

HILA 121B. History of Brazil, 1889 to Present (4)
This course examines factors that shed light on Brazil's label as a rising nation. In part, we will cover Brazil's two dictatorships, labor struggles, racial issues, immigration from Asia and Europe, environmental concerns, and emergence as economic and political powerhouse.

HILA 122. Cuba: From Colony to Socialist Republic (4)
A lecture-discussion course on the historical roots of revolutionary Cuba, with special emphasis on the impact of the United States on the island’s development and society.

HILA 123. The Incas and Their Ancestors (4)
The Incas called their realm Tahuantinsuyu (Land of the Four Quarters). But the Incas were only one of the many ethnic groups in the Andean region. Many different other groups became a part of the Tahuantinsuyu in the wake of Inca expansion. Over the past decade, new and fascinating information on these processes have been published, and allow for a rereading of Inca history between 900 and 1535.

HILA 124. The History of Chile 1880–Present (4)
The course surveys Chile’s basic developments beginning with the era of nitrate exports. Students will have the opportunity to address a specific issue of his or her own choosing and develop the topic for class presentation and a final paper. The course will cover politics, cultural changes, class struggles, Allende’s revolutionary movement, and Pinochet’s dictatorship to the present.

HILA 124A. History of Women and Gender in Latin America (4)
A broad historical overview of Hispanic-American women’s history focusing on issues of gender, sexuality, and the family as they relate to women, as well as the historiographical issues in Latin American and Chicana women’s history.

HILA 126. From Columbus to Castro: Caribbean Culture and Society (4)
Exploration of the relationships between socioeconomic and cultural development in Caribbean history; slavery and empire; nationalism and migration; vodun and Rastafarianism, and the literary arts.

HILA 131. A History of Mexico (4)
A century of Mexican history, 1821–1924: the quest for political unity and economic solvency, the forging of a nationality, the Gilded Age and aftermath, the ambivalent Revolution of Zapata and his enemies.

HILA 132. A History of Contemporary Mexico (4)
The paradox of a conservative state as heir to a legendary social upheaval, with special emphasis on the mural art renaissance, the school crusade, the economic dilemma, and the failure to eradicate poverty and inequality. Lectures and discussion.

HILA 134. Indians of Colonial Latin America (4)
This course surveys the history of the native peoples of Mexico and the Andes from Iberian contact to the late colonial period (1492–1800). It focuses on changes and continuities in postconquest society, exploring topics such as gender, sexuality, and resistance.  

HILA 144. Topics in Latin American History (4)
Selected topics in Latin American history. Course may be taken for credit up to three times as topics vary (the course subtitle will be different for each distinct topic). Students who repeat the same topic in HILA 144 will have the duplicate credit removed from their academic record.

HILA 145. People and Nature in Amazonia: An Unwritten History (4)
Recordings of Amazonia’s past before Iberian adventurers searched for El Dorado are scarce. Environmental significance and the continued existence of large fluvial societies, read through the lenses of chroniclers, scientists, missionaries, and colonizers, allows a reconstruction of humankind’s relationship to nature.

HILA 161/261. History of Women in Latin America (4)
A broad historical overview of Hispanic American women’s history of focusing on the issues of gender, sexuality, and the family as they relate to women, as well as the historiographical issues in Latin American and Chicana women’s history.

HILA 162/262. Special Topics in Latin American History (4)
Topics will vary from year to year or quarter to quarter. May be repeated for an infinite number of times due to the nature of the content of the course always changing. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HILA 163/263. The History of Chile 1880–Present (4)
The course surveys Chile’s basic developments beginning with the era of nitrate exports. Students will have the opportunity to address a specific issue of his/her own choosing and develop the topic for class presentation and a final paper. Graduate students are expected to submit a more substantial piece of work. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HILA 164/264. Women’s Work and Family Life in Latin America (4)
Inside or outside the household, women have always worked. Where do we find Latin American women? How has the labor market changed? How was and is women’s work perceived? What were the consequences of changing work patterns on family life? Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HILA 167/267. Scholarship on Latin American History in the Colonial Period (4)
Introduction to the historiography on Latin America for the colonial period from Spanish and Portuguese conquests to the Wars of Independence. Requirements will vary for undergraduate, MS, and PhD students. Graduate students are required to submit an additional research paper. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; reading knowledge of Spanish; department stamp. +

HILA 168/268. Scholarship on Latin American History in the Nineteenth Century (4)
Introduction to the historiography on Latin America for the nineteenth century: world economy, nation-state building, agrarian processes, incipient industrialization, political and cultural thought, and social structure. Requirements will vary for undergraduate, MA, and PhD students. Graduate students are required to submit an additional research paper. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; reading knowledge of Spanish; department stamp.

HILA 169/269. Scholarship on Latin American History in the Twentieth Century (4)
Introduction to the historiography on Latin America for the twentieth century: agrarian reforms, unionization, industrialization by import substitution, the political left, social development, and international relations. Requirements will vary for undergraduate, MA, and PhD students. Graduate students are required to submit an additional research paper. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; reading knowledge of Spanish; department stamp.

HILA 199. Independent Study in Latin American History (4)
Directed readings for undergraduates under the supervision of various faculty members. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department stamp.

HINE 100. The Hebrew Bible and History (4)
The history and literature of ancient Israel c. 1300 to 300 BCE. Reading from the Bible, historical and archaeological surveys, and studies of authorship. +

HINE 101. The Religion of Ancient Israel (4)
Based on biblical and nonbiblical sources, a reconstruction of Israelite institutions, beliefs, and practices and their evolution over time. +

HINE 102. The Jews in Their Homeland in Antiquity (4)
The Jews in Israel from the sixth century BCE to the seventh century CE. Statehood, nationalism, and autonomy within the framework of the Persian empire, the Hellenistic kingdoms, and the Roman-Byzantine empire. Cultural and religious developments will be explored. +

HINE 103. The Jewish Diaspora in Antiquity (4)
The Jews outside their homeland and in pre-Islamic times, concentrating on the Greco-Roman West and the Parthian-Sasanian East. Topics include assimilation and survival; anti-Semitism and missionizing; patterns of organization and autonomy; cultural and religious developments. +

HINE 104. Sex in the Bible (4)
Cross-listed with JUDA 136. This course examines biblical attitudes toward hetero- and homosexuality, rape, incest, bestiality, prostitution, marriage, and adultery in a variety of texts drawn from the Old Testament.

HINE 108. The Middle East before Islam (4)
The peoples, politics, and cultures of Southwest Asia and Egypt from the sixth century BCE to the seventh century CE. The Achemenid Empire, the Ptolemaic and Seleucid kingdoms, the Roman Orient, the Parthian and Sasanian states. +

HINE 112A. Great Stories from the Hebrew Bible (4)
A close reading of select prose narratives from the Hebrew Bible/Old Testament. +

HINE 112AL. Great Stories from the Hebrew Bible/Foreign Language (1)
Students with advanced Hebrew can study the texts in HINE 112A in the original language.

HINE 112B. Great Poems from the Hebrew Bible (4)
A close reading of select poetic passages from the Hebrew Bible/Old Testament. +

HINE 112BL. Great Poems from the Hebrew Bible/Foreign Language (1)
Students with advanced Hebrew can study the texts in HINE 112B in the original language.

HINE 113. Ancient Near East Mythology (4)
Course will analyze and compare major myths from Egypt, Israel, Ugarit, and Mesopotamia, employing a variety of modern approaches. +

HINE 114. History of the Islamic Middle East (4)
A survey of the Middle East from the rise of Islam to the region’s economic, political, and cultural integration into the West (mid-nineteenth century). Emphasis on socioeconomic and political change in the early Arab empires and the Ottoman state. +

HINE 116. The Middle East in the Age of European Empires (1798–1914) (4)
Examines the contacts of the late Ottoman Empire and Qajar Iran with Europe from the Napoleonic invasion of Egypt to World War I, the diverse facets of the relationship with the West, and the reshaping of the institutions of the Islamic states and societies.

HINE 118. The Middle East in the Twentieth Century (4)
An introduction to the history of the Middle East since 1914. Themes such as nationalism, imperialism, the oil revolution, and religious revivalism will be treated within a broad chronological and comparative framework drawing on the experience of selected countries.

HINE 119. US Mid-East Policy Post-WWII (4)
An examination of post-WWII Middle East conflicts, including the Israeli-Arab conflicts, the Lebanese Civil War, and the Gulf War of the 1980s. The roles of the superpowers and Middle Eastern states during the period.

HINE 120. The Middle East in the New Century (4)
An examination of the conflicts, changes, and continuities in the Middle East since 2000. The course includes inspection of the US role in Iraq and the region generally.

HINE 126. Iranian Revolution in Historical Perspective (4)
Iran’s social and political history in the twentieth century with emphasis on the Constitutional movement of the late Qajar period, formation and development of the Pahlavi state, anatomy of the 1978–79 Revolution, and a survey of the Islamic Republic.

HINE 127. History of Modern Turkey (4)
Eastern problems on the example of Turkey and with special attention to collective identities, state-society dynamics, foreign and regional policies, and varieties of modernity.

HINE 130. Introduction to the Old Testament: The Historical Books (4)
Cross-listed with JUDA 130. This course will study the historical books of the Hebrew Bible (in English), Genesis through 2 Kings, through a literary-historical approach: how, when, and why the Hebrew Bible came to be written down, its relationship with known historical facts, and the archaeological record. Students may not receive credit for both HINE 130 and JUDA 130. (Formerly known as JUDA 100A.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

HINE 131. Introduction to the Old Testament: The Poetic Books (4)
Cross-listed with JUDA 131. This course will study the prophetic and poetic books of the Hebrew Bible (in English), through a literary-historical approach. Students may not receive credit for both HINE 131 and JUDA 131. (Formerly known as JUDA 100B.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

HINE 135GS. Introduction to Contemporary Israeli Society and Culture (4)
This course introduces the students to contemporary Israeli society. Among the topics explored: Israeli-Arab conflict; relations between European, Arab, Russian, and Ethiopian Jews; between secular and religious Jews; between Jews and Arabs; and between Israel and World Jewry.

HINE 136GS. Zionism and Post Zionism (4)
This course explores the evolution of Zionism from its late nineteenth-century origins to the present. Among the topics explored: political, cultural, spiritual and social varieties of Zionism; and the contending narratives about its nature, meaning, and accomplishments.

HINE 144. Topics in Middle Eastern History (4)
Selected topics in the history of the Middle East. May be taken for credit three times.

HINE 160/260. Special Topics in the Bible and Ancient Near East (4)
The study of a single book, period, or issue on the Bible, in the context of the ancient Near Eastern world. Requirements will vary for undergraduate, master’s, and doctoral students. Graduate students may be required to submit a more substantial piece of work. Prerequisites: department stamp required. +

HINE 162/262. Anthropology and the Hebrew Bible (4)
This course approaches the Hebrew Bible (Old Testament) from the perspective of cultural anthropology. Institutions studied will include the family, rites of passage, food taboos, warfare, animism, demons, sorcery, and animal sacrifice. Formerly HINE 111; students may not receive credit for HINE 111 and HINE 162/262. Graduate students will be required to complete an extra paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp. +

HINE 165/265. The Colonial Mandates in the Middle East (4)
A colloquium focusing on the problems and patterns in the emergence of modern Middle Eastern states since 1920. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HINE 166/266. Nationalism in the Middle East (4)
Growth of nationalism in relation to imperialism, religion, and revolution in the nineteenth- and twentieth-century Middle East. Emergence of cultural and political ethnic consciousness in the Ottoman state. Comparative study of Arab, Iranian, and Turkish nationalism as well as Zionism. Prerequisites: department stamp or consent of instructor.

HINE 170/270. Special Topics in Jewish History (4)
This course studies a period or theme in Jewish history. Topics will vary from year to year. Prerequisites: department stamp required.

HINE 186/286. Special Topics in Middle Eastern History (4)
Focused study of historical roots of contemporary problems in the Middle East: Islamic modernism and Islamist movements; contacts with the West; ethnic and religious minorities; role of the military; economic resources and development. Department stamp and permission of instructor.

HINE 199. Independent Study in Near Eastern History (4)
Directed readings for undergraduates under the supervision of various faculty members. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HISC 102. Technology in World History (4)
Technology as an agent of change. How have humans harnessed the power of nature? What factors have contributed to successes and failures? How has technology changed human life? How should we evaluate the quality of these changes?

HISC 103. Gender and Science in Historical Perspective (4)
History of women’s struggles and strategies for access and equality in professional science. Questions related to gender bias in science—as a social institution and as an epistemological enterprise—will be addressed in light of the historical and biographical readings.

HISC 104. History of Popular Science (4)
Historical aspects of the popularization of science. The changing relation between expert science and popular understanding. The reciprocal impact of scientific discoveries and theories, and popular conceptions of the natural world.

HISC 105. History of Environmentalism (4)
History of human effects on the natural environment, with emphasis on understanding the roles of the physical and biological sciences in providing insights into environmental processes.

HISC 106. The Scientific Revolution (4)
A cultural history of the formation of early modern science in the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries: the social forms of scientific life; the construction and meaning of the new cosmologies from Copernicus to Newton; the science of politics and the politics of science; the origins of experimental practice; how Sir Isaac Newton restored law and order to the West. +

HISC 107. The Emergence of Modern Science (4)
The development of the modern conception of the sciences, and of the modern social and institutional structure of scientific activity, chiefly in Europe, during the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries.

HISC 108. Life Sciences in the Twentieth Century (4)
The history of twentieth-century life sciences, with an emphasis on the way in which model organisms such as fruit flies, guinea pigs, bacteriophage, and zebra fish shaped the quest to unlock the secrets of heredity, evolution, and development.

HISC 110.  Historical Encounters of Science and Religion (4)
There was no such thing as a single, unchanging relationship between science and religion, and this is a course about it. Topics include the “Conflict Thesis,” natural theology, the Galileo Affair, Darwinism, the antievolution crusade, creationism, secularization, atheism, and psychoanalysis.

HISC 111. The Atomic Bomb and the Atomic Age (4)
Development of nuclear science and weapons—1930s to present—including the discovery of radioactivity and fission, the Manhattan project, the bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki and end of WWII, the H-bomb, and legacies of nuclear proliferation, environmental damage, and radioactive waste.

HISC 114. The Darwinian Legacy (4)
The Origin of Species by means of Natural Selection, and its scientific, intellectual, and political legacies. Topics include social Darwinism, eugenics, Nazi racial hygiene, population control, neo-Malthusianism in the modern environmental movement.

HISC 115. History of Modern Medicine (4)
Explores the origin of clinical method, the hospital, internal surgery, and the medical laboratory, as well as the historical roots of debates over health-care reform, genetic determinism, and the medicalization of society.

HISC 116. History of Bioethics (4)
The story behind the postwar rise of bioethics—medical scandals breaking in the mass media, the development of novel technologies for saving and prolonging life, the emergence of new diseases, the unprecedented scope for manipulation opened up by biology.

HISC 117. History of the Neurosciences (4)
A survey of the history of the neurosciences from the seventeenth century to the present, exploring the political, philosophical, cultural, aesthetic and ethical aspects of research into the workings of the human brain.

HISC 118. History of Sexology (4)
Analyzes the history of sexology as a series of episodes in the science of human difference, from the European reception of the first translation of the Kama Sutra in 1883 to the search for the “gay gene” in the 1990s.

HISC 119. Biology and Society (4)
This course explores contemporary issues in biology, ethics, and society. We will start by examining early cases of biopolitics, like social Darwinism and eugenics, and proceed to more recent issues, such as genetic engineering, patenting life, and the pharmaceutical industry.

HISC 120A. Technology in America I (4)
The role of technology in American history through the Civil War. Indigenous and colonial development, transportation infrastructures, and industrialization are explored to understand the connections among technology, society, and culture. +

HISC 130. Technology in the Twentieth Century (4)
Major technological developments in the twentieth century, including the rise and decline of technologies, unexpected hazards and unanticipated consequences, and why some technologies fail.

HISC 131. Science, Technology, and Law (4)
Science and law are two of the most powerful establishments of modern Western culture. Science organizes our knowledge of the world; law directs our action in it. Will explore the historical roots of the interplay between them.

HISC 144. Topics in Science Studies (4)
Selected topics in the history of science. Course can be taken for credit up to three times as topics will vary.

HISC 160/260. Historical Approaches to the Study of Science (4)
Major recent publications in the history of science will be discussed and analyzed; the topics will range in period from the seventeenth century to the twentieth, and will deal with all major branches of natural science. Special topics. Topics will vary from year to year. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HISC 163/263. History, Science, and Politics of Climate Change (4)
The complex historical development of human understanding of global climate change, including key scientific work, and the cultural dimensions of proof and persuasion. Special emphasis on the differential political acceptance of the scientific evidence in the U.S. and the world. Graduate students are required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing. Department stamp required.

HISC 165. Topics in Twentieth-Century Science and Culture (4)
This seminar explores topics at the interface of science, technology, and culture, from the late nineteenth century to the present. Topics change yearly; may be repeated for credit with instructor’s permission. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HISC 166/266. The Galileo Affair (4)
Galileo’s condemnation by the Catholic Church in 1633 is a well-known but misunderstood episode. Was Galileo punished for holding dangerous scientific views? Personal arrogance? Disobedience? Religious transgressions? Readings in original sources, recent historical interpretations. Graduate students will be expected to submit a more substantial piece of work. +

HISC 167/267. Gender and Science (4)
Why have women been traditionally excluded from science? How has this affected scientific knowledge? How have scientists constructed gendered representations not only of women, but also of science and nature? We will address these questions from perspectives including history, philosophy, and psychoanalytic theory. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HISC 173/273. Seminar on Darwin and Darwinisms (4)
Examines evolutionary theory before Darwin, the development of the theory of natural selection, the ongoing challenge from Lamarckism, nineteenth-century social Darwinism, the emergence of the neo-Darwinist synthesis, and the recent controversies over evolutionary psychology and creationism. Graduate students are expected to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HISC 174/274. History of Localization of Brain Function (4)
From the beginnings of brain anatomy in the 1660s to the current rage for functional magnetic resonance imaging studies, this class investigates philosophical, ethical, and cultural dimensions of the quest to localize psychological phenomena in the physical brain. Graduate students are required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HISC 175/275. The Historical Sciences in the Nineteenth Century (4)
A critical analysis of the host of “historical sciences” that developed over the course of the long nineteenth century, from archaeology and paleontology to psychoanalysis and craniotomy, including the science of history itself. Graduate students will be required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HISC 177. Science and the Enlightenment (4)
In 1784, Kant asked, “What is Enlightenment?” In this course we will pursue this question, which has remained hotly debated ever since. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department stamp.

HISC 180/280. Science and Public Policy (4)
This course will explore the evolution of the institutions, ideologies, procedures, standards, and expertise that modern democratic societies have used in applying science to generate and legitimate public policy.

HISC 199. Independent Study in the History of Science (4)
Directed readings for undergraduates under the supervision of various faculty members. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HITO 87. Special Freshman Seminar (1)
A seminar intended for exposing undergraduate students, especially freshmen, to exciting research programs conducted by department faculty. Enrollment is limited. Topic will vary quarter by quarter.

HITO 99. Independent Study on History Topics (1, 2, 3, 4)
Independent study for undergraduates with lower-division standing under the supervision of a member of the faculty on a topic not generally included in the regular curriculum. Students must make arrangements with individual faculty members. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of thirty units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0, and a completed and approved Special Studies form.

HITO 101. Jews, Christians, and Muslims (4)
The course will explore the cultural, religious, and social relationships between the three major religious groups in the medieval Mediterranean: Muslims, Christians, and Jews from the sixth through sixteenth centuries AD.

HITO 104. The Jews and Judaism in the Ancient and Medieval Worlds (4)
The political and cultural history of the Jews through the early modern period. Life under ancient empires, Christianity and Islam. The post-biblical development of the Jewish religion and its eventual crystallization into the classical, rabbinic model. +

HITO 105. Jewish Modernity from 1648 to 1948 (4)
Topics include the political emancipation of the Jews of Europe; the emergence of Reform, Conservative, and Modern Orthodox Judaism; Hasidism; modern anti-Semitism; Jewish socialism; Zionism; the Holocaust; the American Jewish community; the State of Israel.

HITO 106. Love and Family in the Jewish Past (4)
This course explores Jewish women’s experiences from the seventeenth century to the present, covering Europe, the United States, and Israel. Examines work, marriage, motherhood, spirituality, education, community, and politics across three centuries and three continents. Prerequisites: MMW 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 21 or 22; or WCWP 10A or 10B; or CAT 1, 2, or 3; or DOC 1, 2 or 3; or HILD 2A, 2B, 2C, 7A, 7B, 7C, 10, 11, 12, or 14; or MCWP 40, 41, 50 or 125; or HUM 1, 2, 3, 4, or 5.

HITO 107. Holocaust Video Production (4)
Students will produce creative video projects by conducting interviews and drawing from relevant texts, lectures, archival resources, and other materials to expand and deepen their understanding of the Holocaust and help contribute to the body of work documenting this period in history.

HITO 117. World History 1200–1800 (4)
This course examines the interaction between sections of the globe after 1200. It emphasizes factors operating on a transcontinental scale (disease, climate, migration) and historical/cultural phenomena that bridge distance (religion, trade, urban systems). This is not narrative history, but a study of developments that operated on a global scale and constituted the first phase of globalization. +

HITO 119/HMNR 100. Human Rights l: Introduction to Human Rights and Global Justice (4)
Explores where human rights come from and what they mean by integrating them into a history of modern society, from the Conquest of the Americas and the origins of the Enlightenment, to the Holocaust and the contemporary human rights regime.

HITO 124. Mystical Traditions (4)
The course examines multiform mystical traditions in world religions and cultures, including Greco-Roman philosophy, Judaism, Christianity, Islam, Hinduism, and Buddhism by studying classics of mystical literature and secondary sources; also addressed are mystical beliefs and practices in contemporary society.

HITO 126. A History of Childhood (4)
This course will examine the different ways that attitudes toward children have changed throughout history. By focusing on the way that the child was understood, we will examine the changing role of the family, the role of culture in human development, and the impact of industrialization and modern institutions on the child and childhood.

HITO 133. War and Society: The Second World War (4)
An examination of the Second World War in Europe, Asia, and the United States. Focus will be on the domestic impact of the war on the belligerent countries as well as on the experiences of ordinary soldiers and civilians.

HITO 134. International Law—War Crimes and Genocide (4)
Comparative study of genocide and war crimes, stressing European developments since 1900 with reference to cases elsewhere. Topics include historical precedents; evolving legal concepts; and enforcement mechanisms. Emphasis on the Holocaust, the USSR under Stalin, ex-Yugoslavia, and the Armenian genocide. Students may not receive credit for both HITO 134 and ERC 102.

HITO 136. Jews and African Americans:  Slavery, Diaspora, Ghetto (4)
Explore contrasts and parallels between African Americans and Jews from the seventeenth century to the present. Investigate slavery, the Civil War, shared music, political movements, urban geography, and longings to return to a homeland in Africa or Palestine.

HITO 140. History of Emotions (4)
An examination of the history of emotions from the early modern period to the present with a focus on Europe and North America. Analysis of different approaches to emotions as well as of specific emotions (love, honor, shame, fear, guilt).

HITO 150GS. The Scottish Enlightenment and the Founding of the United States (4)
A lecture-discussion course on the philosophical, political, and economic ideas that shaped the Scottish Enlightenment in the eighteenth century, especially the ideas of David Hume, Adam Smith, and John Witherspoon, and their impact upon the American Revolution and the Constitution of the United States.

HITO 155. Race, Sport, and Inequality in the Twentieth Century (4)
This course tracks the worldwide interplay of sport and race. We begin with patterns of exclusion and participation on the part of African Americans, Latinos, and Native Americans. We then examine patterns of inequality across the globe.

HITO 156. Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion in the United States and Europe: Multiple Multiculturalisms (4)
Comparative study of American and European multicultural politics and policy, focusing on developments since 1945. Coverage includes policies aimed at members of the African American, Native American, Latino/Chicano/Hispanic, and Asian/Pacific Islander communities and comparable European groups.

HITO 164/264. Jews and Other Ethnics in the American Past (4)
In this course we compare the Jewish experience to other religious minorities in American history. Topics include motives and rates of immigration, education and work patterns, religious experiences, women’s roles, family life, and representations in popular and high culture.

HITO 165/265. Topics—LGBT History (4)
Topics will examine lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer identities, communities, culture, and politics. May be repeated for credit two times, provided each course is a separate topic, for a maximum of twelve units. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department stamp.

HITO 166/266. Death Penalty Global Perspectives since 1492 (4)
From early modern witches, rebels, and heretics to hyper-modern gangsters, terrorists, and serial killers, applying capital punishment to foreign nationals and ethnic minorities has sustained a global conversation about the sanctity of human life and the meaning of citizenship in the Americas and Europe. Graduate students must complete an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HITO 168/268. The U.S. and Germany from the 1890s to the 1960s: Transitional Relations and Competing Modernities (4)
The course analyzes mutual influences and exchanges between the U.S. and Germany from the late nineteenth to the mid-twentieth century. Topics include imperialism and racism, social thought and intellectual migration, economic relations, feminism, and youth cultures, war, and occupation. Graduate students must complete an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HITO 172/272. War in the Twentieth Century: A Psychological Approach (4)
Reckoning by novelists, essayists, and biographers with the phenomenon of contemporary warfare as an unprecedented experience and an abiding threat. Graduate students are required to submit a more substantial piece of work. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HITO 178/278. A History of Seafaring in the Age of Sail (4)
Taught in conjunction with the San Diego Maritime Museum, this course investigates life at sea from the age of discovery to the advent of the steamship. We will investigate discovery, technology, piracy, fisheries, commerce, naval conflict, sea-board life, and seaport activity. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HITO 180/280. Housing in the Developing World (4)
The majority of the world’s citizens now live in cities; this course examines the evolution of housing architecture and finance in the twentieth-century context of rapid urbanization, dissolving empire, industrialization, and globalization. Graduate students will submit a more substantial piece of work with in-depth analysis and with an increased number of sources cited. A typical undergraduate paper would be ten pages, whereas a typical graduate paper would require engagement with primary sources, more extensive reading of secondary material, and be about twenty pages. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and consent of instructor.

HITO 192. Senior Seminar in History (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in history (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

HITO 193/POLI 194/COM GEN 194/USP 194. Research Seminar in Washington, DC (6)
Course attached to six-unit internship taken by student participating in the UCDC program. Involves weekly seminar meetings with faculty and teaching assistant and a substantial historical research paper. Prerequisites: department stamp required; participating in UCDC program.

HITO 194. History Honors (4)
A program of independent study providing candidates for history honors an opportunity to develop, in consultation with an adviser, a preliminary proposal for the honors essay. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of this quarter. A final grade will be given for both quarters at the end of HITO 195. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. Department stamp required.

HITO 195. The Honors Essay (4)
Independent study under the supervision of a faculty member leading to the preparation of an honors essay. A letter grade for both HITO 194 and 195 will be given at the completion of this quarter. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. Department stamp required.

HITO 196. Honors Seminar (4)
The nature and uses of history are explored through the study of the historian’s craft based on critical analysis of historical literature relating to selected topics of concern to all historians. Required of all candidates for history honors and open to other interested students with the instructor’s consent. Department stamp required.

HITO 198. Directed Group Study (1–4)
Directed group study on a topic not generally included in the regular curriculum. Students must make arrangements with individual faculty members. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing, completion of at least ninety units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum G.P.A. of 2.5, and a completed and approved Special Studies form.

HITO 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (4)
Independent study on a topic not generally included in the regular curriculum. Students must make arrangements with individual faculty members. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HIUS 103. The United States and the Pacific World (4)
This course reconsiders US history from a Pacific world perspective, from the eighteenth century to the present. Themes include comparative colonialism and empire; race, gender, and indigeneity; militarism and tourism; labor migration and resistance.

HIUS 104. The Revolutionary Atlantic (4)
The upheavals that transformed the early modern Atlantic emphasizing the United States, Caribbean, and Great Britain. Topics: struggles to define democracy, the reorganization of the Atlantic state system, the Enlightenment, and international responses to the American and French Revolutions. +

HIUS 106A. American Foreign Relations, to 1900 (4)
Course examines range of public and private interactions between the United States and the world, from the founding of the republic to the Spanish-American War. Topics include origins of federal foreign policy making power, territorial and commercial and ideological expansionism.

HIUS 106B. American Foreign Relations, since 1900 (4)
Examines foreign relations of the United States from acquisition of a formal overseas empire in the aftermath of the Spanish-American War to the end of the Cold War. Topics cover a range of public and private interactions with the world.

HIUS 108A/ETHN 112A. History of Native Americans in the United States I (4)
This course examines the history of the Native Americans in the United States with emphasis on the lifeways, mores, warfare, cultural adaptation, and relations with the European colonial powers and the emerging United States until 1870. +

HIUS 108B/ETHN 112B. History of Native Americans in the United States II (4)
This course examines the history of the Native Americans in the United States with emphasis on the lifeways, mores, warfare, cultural adaptation, and relations with the United States from 1870 to the present.

HIUS 110. America and the World: Revolution to World War I (4)
A lecture course that explores the evolution of the interaction between the United States and the world from the American Revolution to the First World War, with particular emphasis upon the role of diplomacy, war, and economic change.

HIUS 111. America and the World: World War I to the Present (4)
A lecture course that explores the evolution of the interaction between the United States and the world from 1914 to the present, with special attention to the era of the Great Depression, the Cold War, Vietnam, and the post 9/11 war on terror.

HIUS 112. The US Civil War (4)
The course addresses the causes, course, and consequences of the US Civil War. We will explore such themes as how Unionists and Confederates mobilized their populations and dealt with dissension, the war’s effects on gender and race relations, and the transformation of the federal government.

HIUS 113/ETHN 154. History of Mexican America (4)
This course explores the history of the largest minority population in the United States, focusing on the legacies of the Mexican War, the history of Mexican immigration and US-Mexican relations, and the struggle for citizenship and civil rights.

HIUS 114A. California History 1542–1850 (4)
This course surveys the history of California from the period just before Spanish contact in 1542 through California's admission to the Union in 1850.+

HIUS 114B. California History, 1850–Present (4)
This course surveys the history of California from 1850 to the present.

HIUS 115. History of Sexuality in the United States (4)
Constructions of sex and sexuality in the United States from the time of precontact Native America to the present, focusing on sexual behaviors, sexual ideologies, and the uses of sexuality for social control.

HIUS 117. History of Los Angeles (4)
This course examines the history of Los Angeles from the early nineteenth century to the present. Particular issues to be addressed include urbanization, ethnicity, politics, technological change, and cultural diversification.

HIUS 118. How Jews Became American (4)
This course explores the history of Jews in America from the colonial period to the present, focusing on both the development of Jewish communities primarily as a result of immigration and evolving relations between Jews and the larger American society.

HIUS 120. Peace Movements in America (4)
Topics will include Quaker origins of the American peace movements and examples of opposition to wars in the twentieth century from World Wars I and II, Vietnam, anti-nuclear movements, and intervention in Central America to Iraq.

HIUS 122. History and Hollywood: America and the Movies since the Great Depression (4)
A lecture-discussion course utilizing written texts and films to explore major themes in American politics and culture from the Great Depression through the 1990s. Topics will include the wars of America, McCarthyism, the counter-culture of the 1960s, and the transformation of race and gender relations.

HIUS 123/USP 167. History of New York City (4)
New York City breathes history. Whether it is in the music, the literature, or the architecture, the city informs our most basic conceptions of American identity. This course examines the evolution of Gotham from the colonial era to today.

HIUS 124/ETHN 125. Asian American History (4)
Explore how Asian Americans were involved in the political, economic, and cultural formation of United States society. Topics include migration; labor systems; gender, sexuality and social organization; racial ideologies and anti-Asian movements; and nationalism and debates over citizenship.

HIUS 126. The History of Race in the United States (4)
Examines key periods, events, and processes throughout the twentieth century that shaped the way Americans thought about race. Also examines the historical development of the category of race and racism, as well as how it is lived in everyday life.

HIUS 128. African American Legal History (4)
This course sketches the shifting experience persons of African descent have had with the law in the United States. Films, cases, articles, and book excerpts are used to convey the complex nature of this four hundred year journey.

HIUS 129/USP 106. The History of Race and Ethnicity in American Cities (4)
This class examines the history of racial and ethnic groups in American cities. It looks at major forces of change such as immigration to cities, political empowerment, and social movements, as well as urban policies such as housing segregation.

HIUS 130. Cultural History from 1607 to 1865 (4)
This course will explore connections between American culture and the transformations of class relations, gender ideology, and political thought. Topics will include the transformations of religious perspectives and practices, republican art and architecture, artisan and working class culture, the changing place of art and artists in American society, antebellum reform movements, antislavery and proslavery thought. +

HIUS 131. Cultural History from 1865 to 1917 (4)
This course will focus on the transformation of work and leisure and the development of consumer culture. Students consider connections among culture, class, racial and gender ideologies, and politics. Topics include labor management and radicalism, organized sports, museums, commercial entertainment, world fairs, reactionary movements, and imperialism.

HIUS 133. The Golden Age of Piracy (4)
This interdisciplinary lecture course focuses on the history and literature of global piracy in the English-speaking world from Sir Francis Drake to Blackbeard and how this Golden Age was remembered in the popular fiction of the nineteenth and twentieth centuries. +

HIUS 134. From Bebop to Hip-Hop: African American Cultural History since 1945 (4)
Explore the politics of black culture in the postwar period. Topics include: the dynamic interplay of social factors (migration, civil rights, black power, deindustrialization, globalization) and the production of African American culture, including music, film, and literature.

HIUS 135. The Atlantic World, 1492–1803 (4)
This course focuses on the role the Atlantic played in bringing together in both volatile and beneficial ways the remarkably different cultures of four continents from the Columbian Exchange to the Haitian Revolution. Students may not receive credit for HIUS 135 and 135A or 135B. +

HIUS 136/ETHN 153. Citizenship and Civil Rights in the Twentieth Century (4)
This course traces the history of the institution of US citizenship in the last century, tracing changing notions of racial, cultural, and gender differences, the evolution of the civil rights struggle, and changes in laws governing citizenship and access to rights.

HIUS 139/ETHN 149. African American History in the Twentieth Century (4)
This course examines the transformation of African America across the expanse of the long twentieth century: imperialism, migration, urbanization, desegregation, and deindustrialization. Special emphasis will be placed on issues of culture, international relations, and urban politics.

HIUS 140/ECON 158. Economic History of the United States I (4)
The United States as a raw materials producer, as an agrarian society, and as an industrial nation. Emphasis on the logic of the growth process, the social and political tensions accompanying expansion, and nineteenth- and early twentieth-century transformations of American capitalism.

HIUS 141/ECON 159. Economic History of the United States II (4)
The United States as modern industrial nation. Emphasis on the logic of the growth process, the social and political tensions accompanying expansion, and twentieth-century transformations of American capitalism.

HIUS 142A. United States in the Twentieth Century, 1900–1945 (4)
Examines the political, economic, and social history of the American people from the turn of the twentieth century to the end of World War II. Topics: progressive movement, impact of the Great Depression, and the consequences of two world wars.

HIUS 142B. United States in the Twentieth Century, 1945 to the Present (4)
Examines the political, economic and social history of the American people from the end of World War II to present. Topics: origins of the Cold War, struggle for racial justice and the rise of American conservatism since the 1980s.

HIUS 143. The Built Environment in the Twentieth Century (4)
An examination of urban and regional planning as well as piecemeal change in the built environment. Topics include urban and suburban housing, work environments, public spaces, transportation and utility infrastructures, utopianism.

HIUS 144. Topics in US History (4)
Selected topics in US history. Course may be taken for credit up to three times as topics vary. 

HIUS 145. From New Era to New Deal (4)
This course will examine the economic, social, and political changes underway in the United States from 1917 to 1945. Topics will include the 1920s, the Great Depression, the New Deal and the consequences of two World Wars. 

HIUS 146. Race, Riots, and Violence in the U.S. (4)
Examining the history of urban riots in the U.S. since the late nineteenth century. Exploring how different groups of Americans have constructed competing notions of race, gender, labor, and national belonging by participating in street violence.

HIUS 148/USP 103. The American City in the Twentieth Century (4)
This course focuses on the phenomenon of modern American urbanization. Case studies of individual cities will help illustrate the social, political, and environmental consequences of rapid urban expansion, as well as the ways in which urban problems have been dealt with historically.

HIUS 149. The United States in the 1960s (4)
An overview of the social and political developments that polarized American society in the tumultuous decade of the 1960s. Themes include the social impact of the postwar baby boom, the domestic and foreign policy implications of the Cold War; the evolution of the civil rights and women’s movements; and the transformation of American popular culture.

HIUS 150. American Legal History to 1865 (4)
The history of American law and legal institutions. This quarter focuses on crime and punishment in the colonial era, the emergence of theories of popular sovereignty, the forging of the Constitution and American federalism, the relationship between law and economic change, and the crisis of slavery and Union. +

HIUS 151. American Legal History since 1865 (4)
The history of American law and legal institutions. This course examines race relations and law, the rise of big business, the origins of the modern welfare state during the Great Depression, the crisis of civil liberties produced by two world wars and McCarthyism, and the Constitutional revolution wrought by the Warren Court. HIUS 150 is not a prerequisite for HIUS 151.

HIUS 152A. A Constitutional History of the United States to 1865 (4)
The historical development of constitutional thought and practice in the United States from the era of the American Revolution through the Civil War, with special attention to the role of the Supreme Court under Chief Justices Marshall and Taney.

HIUS 152B. A Constitutional History of the United States since 1865 (4)
The historical development of constitutional thought and practice in the United States since 1865, with special attention to the role of the Supreme Court from Chief Justices Chase to Rehnquist. +

HIUS 153. American Political Trials (4)
Survey of politicized criminal trials and impeachments from Colonial times to the 1880s. Examines politically motivated prosecutions and trials that became subjects of political controversy, were exploited by defendants for political purposes, or had their outcomes determined by political considerations. +

HIUS 155. From Zoot Suits to Hip-Hop: Race and Popular Culture since World War II (4)
Tracing popular cultural production and consumption in the U.S. since World War II. It historicizes popular culture as an arena where social relations are negotiated and where race, class, and gender identities are constructed, transformed, and contested.

HIUS 155A. Religion and Law in American History: Foundations to the Civil War (4)
Selected problems in the history of the relationship between religious beliefs and practice and legal institutions in the Anglo-American world. Topics include the English background, religion in the age of the American Revolution and the antebellum period. +

HIUS 155B. Religion and Law in American History: Civil War to the Present (4)
Selected problems in the history of the relationship between religious beliefs and practice and legal institutions in America from the Civil War to the present. Topics include the religion and government aid; sacred duties and the law; and religion and cultural politics.

HIUS 156. American Women, American Womanhood (4)
This course explores the emergence of a dominant ideology of womanhood in America in the early nineteenth century and contrasts the ideal with the historically diverse experience of women of different races and classes, from settlement to 1870. Topics include witchcraft, evangelicalism, cult of domesticity, sexuality, rise of industrial capitalism and the transformation of women’s work, Civil War, and the first feminist movement. +

HIUS 157. American Women, American Womanhood 1870 to Present (4)
This course explores the making of the ideology of womanhood in modern America and the diversity of American women’s experience from 1870 to the present. Topics include the suffrage movement, the struggle for reproductive rights and the ERA; immigrant and working-class women, women’s work, and labor organization; education, the modern feminist movement and the contemporary politics of reproduction, including abortion and surrogate motherhood. +

HIUS 158/ETHN 130. Social and Economic History of the Southwest I (4)
This course examines the history of the Spanish and Mexican borderlands (what became the US Southwest) from roughly 1400 to the end of the U.S.-Mexico War in 1848, focusing specifically on the area’s social, cultural, and political development. +

HIUS 159/ETHN 131. Social and Economic History of the Southwest II (4)
Cross-listed as Ethnic Studies 131. This course examines the history of the American Southwest from the U.S.-Mexican War in 1846–48 to the present, focusing on immigration, racial and ethnic conflict, and the growth of Chicano national identity.

HIUS 160/260. Colloquium on the American Empire (4)
Course explores the concept of an American Empire by examination of the literature on the topic. Particular attention will be on the work since 9/11/01. Students are expected to produce original work concerning the definition and/or existence of an American Empire. Graduate students are expected to submit an additional piece of work. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. Department stamp required.

HIUS 162/262. The American West (4)
This seminar will trace major themes in the history of the American West. Topics will include ethnicity, the environment, urbanization, demographics, and shifting concepts surrounding the significance of the West. Graduate students will be required to submit additional work in order to receive graduate credit for the course. Prerequisites: department stamp required.

HIUS 167/267/ETHN 180. Topics in Mexican-American History (4)
This colloquium studies the racial representation of Mexican Americans in the United States from the nineteenth century to the present, examining critically the theories and methods of the humanities and social sciences. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

HIUS 169/269. Topics in American Legal and Constitutional History (4)
A reading and discussion course on topics that vary from year to year, including American federalism, the history of civil liberties, and the Supreme Court. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HIUS 174. Race Wars in American Culture (4)
This seminar will examine racial formation in relation to US wars in American history. Topics include “manifest destiny” and the frontier; radicalism and the “Red Scare”; the border patrol; civil rights movements; the “war on drugs” and mass incarceration. Prerequisites: department approval.

HIUS 176/276. Race and Sexual Politics (4)
This seminar will explore the histories of sexual relations, politics, and cultures that both cross and define racial boundaries in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries. Reading will focus on the United States as well as take up studies sited in Canada and Latin America. Graduate students are expected to submit a more substantial piece of work. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HIUS 178/278 The Atlantic World, 1400–1800 (4)
This course explains the origin of the Atlantic as a zone of interaction for Europeans, indigenous Americans, and Africans, and evaluates the consequences of the interaction over several centuries by exploring contests over political power and economic/demographic change. Graduate students will submit a more substantial piece of work with in-depth analysis and with an increased number of sources cited. A typical undergraduate paper would be ten pages, whereas a typical graduate paper would require engagement with primary sources, more extensive reading of secondary material, and be about twenty pages. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp. +

HIUS 180/ETHN 134. Immigration and Ethnicity in Modern American Society (4)
Comparative study of immigration and ethnic-group formation in the United States from 1880 to the present. Topics include immigrant adaptation, competing theories about the experiences of different ethnic groups, and the persistence of ethnic attachments in modern American society. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

HIUS 181/281. Topics in Twentieth Century United States History (4)
A colloquium dealing with special topics in US history from 1900 to the present. Themes will vary from year to year. Prerequisites: department stamp or consent of instructor.

HIUS 183. Topics in African American History (4)
A colloquium dealing with special topics in the history of people of African descent in the United States. Course may be taken for credit up to three times, as topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Prerequisites: department stamp or consent of instructor.

HIUS 185/285. In the Public Interest (4)
In this seminar, we will examine the shifting boundary between what constitutes a public and a private concern in twentieth-century US history. We will consider issues such as civil rights, immigration, health care, and the regulation of financial institutions. Prerequisites: department stamp required for HIUS 185. Instructor approval required for HIUS 285.

HIUS 186. Topics in US Economic History (4)
Selected topics in US economic history.  Course may be taken for credit a total of three times, as topics vary. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

HIUS 188/288. Topics in Culture and Politics (4)
Colloquium on select topics in culture and politics in the United States. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Graduate students will be required to submit an additional piece of work. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HIUS 199. Independent Study in United States History (4)
Directed readings for undergraduates under the supervision of various faculty members. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department stamp required.

HIGR 200. History and Theory (4)
An introductory graduate course for students in all fields. Themes include cross-field historiography and theory, interdisciplinary approaches to history and historical method. (May be taken twice for credit, if the reading list is significantly different.)

HIGR 205. Feminist Historical Studies (4)
An introduction to feminist historical studies, this course is designed for interested graduate students from all history field groups. Graduate students from other disciplines are also encouraged to participate. The course will provide students a rigorous training in women’s history, in the feminist theories that undergird that scholarship, and in the emergent field of gender analysis. The particular content of the course will change from year to year, but each course will include theoretical texts, historical case studies, and primary sources. Readings will be drawn from different times and places. This course is strongly recommended for those preparing minor fields in women’s history. The course can be repeated twice for credit.

HIGR 205. Historical Scholarship on Women and Gender (4)
An introduction to historical scholarship on women and gender, this cross-field course is designed for graduate students from all fields in history as well as from other related disciplines. The course will introduce major themes, debates, and theoretical approaches to women's and gender history. The content of the course will change from year to year, but will include theoretical texts, historical case studies from different times and places, and primary sources. May be taken for credit two times.

HIGR 206. Histories of the Body (4)
Historical topics related to the human body, as a target of regulation, a site for the production of knowledge, the locus of an identity shaped by race, gender, and sexuality, and/or in terms of movement across geopolitical boundaries.

HIGR 207. Nationalism, Colonialism, and Race (4)
A transdisciplinary and comparative course on the interplay of nationalism, colonialism, and race (as well as class and gender/sexuality) in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries.

HIGR 209. Historical Pedagogy (4)
An introductory graduate course for students in all field groups. The seminar introduces students to useful skills, methods, and techniques for teaching history. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: department approval required.

HIGR 210. Historical Scholarship on Modern Chinese History (4)
This course will introduce students to the monographic literature and the main historiographic controversies of modern Chinese history.

HIGR 211. Historical Scholarship on Modern Japanese History (4)
This course will introduce students to the monographic literature and the main historiographic controversies of modern Japanese history.

HIGR 212. Historical Scholarship on Modern East Asian History (4)
This course will introduce students to the monographic literature and the main historiographic controversies of modern East Asian history.

HIGR 215A-B. Research Seminar in Modern Chinese History (4-4)
A two-quarter research seminar in Chinese history. A paper, based on original research, will be due in the second quarter. Seminar topics will vary. Reading knowledge of Chinese is expected. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of the first quarter. Final grade will not be given until the end of the second quarter. Prerequisites: 215A is a prerequisite for 215B.

HIGR 216A-B. Research Seminar in Modern Japanese History (4-4)
A two-quarter research seminar in Japanese history. A paper, based on original research, will be due in the second quarter. Seminar topics will vary. Reading knowledge of Japanese is expected. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of the first quarter. Final grade will not be given until the end of the second quarter. Prerequisites: 216A is a prerequisite for 216B.

HIGR 217A. Historical Scholarship on Premodern Chinese History: Foundations—China before Buddhism (4)
Ancient society differed dramatically from the imperial, bureaucratic, commercial, Buddhist China of later times. Yet the texts and artifacts of antiquity echoed powerfully through the centuries. We will study foundational texts, practices, and objects in their own contexts and also consider their later uses.

HIGR 217B. Historical Scholarship on Premodern Chinese History: Han Dynasty through the Song Dynasty (4)
Course introduces history and society during the Chinese Middle Ages (c. 200 BCE–1200 CE), including the Han, Six, Tang, and Song Dynasties. Examination of the birth and development of China’s great religions, Buddhism and Daoism, and the international culture of the Silk Road, and political and cultural systems that still resonate in China today.

HIGR 217C. Historical Scholarship on Premodern Chinese History: Late Imperial Chinese History, 1200–1800 (4)
Course introduces major topics in scholarship on the Yuan, Ming, and Qing periods. It is intended to prepare graduate students to teach the history of late imperial China.

HIGR 218A. Graduate Seminar in Premodern Chinese History (4)
Course subject varies among periods before 1900. 218A includes secondary scholarship studied for content, method, and structure; research methods and resources; and development of the research topic. In 218B students write an original research paper using primary sources. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Reading knowledge of Chinese.

HIGR 218B. Graduate Seminar in Premodern Chinese History (4)
Course subject varies among periods before 1900. 218A includes secondary scholarship studied for content, method, and structure; research methods and resources; and development of the research topic. In 218B students write an original research paper using primary sources. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Reading knowledge of Chinese. HIGR 218A.

HIGR 220. Historical Scholarship on European History, 1500–1715 (4)
Introduction to the historiography on Renaissance, Reformation, and early modern Europe: an overview of methodologies with emphasis on sources and critical approaches. Required for all beginning European history graduate students.

HIGR 221. Historical Scholarship on European History, 1715–1850 (4)
Selected topics in European history from the early modern to the modern era. Readings and discussions focus on issues of methodology and interpretation. Required for all beginning European history graduate students.

HIGR 222. Historical Scholarship on European History, since 1850 (4)
Critical evaluation of selected topics in the period of modern Europe from the mid-nineteenth century to the present. Required for all beginning European history graduate students.

HIGR 225. Readings in Modern Russian History (4)
Students will read major works on revolutionary Russian and Soviet history. Attention will be paid to both classic and revisionist works.

HIGR 228. Historical Scholarship on Greece and the Balkans, 1768–1923 (4)
Critical evaluation of selected topics on Greece and the Balkans during the late Ottoman period (1768–1923). Attention will be paid to both classic and revisionist works. May be taken for credit three times.

HIGR 229. Historical Scholarship on Greece and the Balkans, 1923–2000 (4)
Critical evaluation of selected topics on Greece and the Balkans during the twentieth century. Attention will be paid to both classic and revisionist works. May be taken for credit three times.

HIGR 230A-B. Research Seminar in European History (4-4)
A two-quarter research seminar in European history. A paper, based on original research, will be due in the second quarter. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of the first quarter. Final grade will not be given until the end of the second quarter. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: 230A is a prerequisite for 230B.

HIGR 231A-B. Research Seminar in Modern European History (4-4)
Selected topics in the period of the nineteenth and twentieth centuries. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of the first quarter. Final grade will not be given until the end of the second quarter. Prerequisites: 231A is a prerequisite for 231B.

HIGR 234. Eastern Mediterranean Archaeology: New Perspectives (4)
This graduate seminar examines the archaeology of the eastern Mediterranean world from the Neolithic through Ottoman times. The seminar is thematically organized examining current methods and theories that apply to state-of-the-art research in one of the “foundational” culture-historical regions in the world. Topics may include: archaeometry, archaeometallurgy, colonization, dating methods, settlement patterns and survey methodology, paleoclimate reconstruction, and geoarchaeology. Students may not receive credit for HIGR 234 and ANTH 207.

HIGR 236A-B. Research Seminar in History of Science (4-4)
A two-quarter research seminar comprising intensive study of a specific topic in the history of science. The first quarter will be devoted to readings and discussions; the second chiefly to the writing of individual research papers. Topics vary from year to year, and students may therefore repeat the course for credit. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of the first quarter. Final grade will not be given until the end of the second quarter.

HIGR 237. Topics in the History of Ocean Sciences (4)
Cross-listed with SIO 201. Intensive study of specific problems in the history of the ocean sciences, and of related earth and atmospheric sciences, in the modern period. Topics vary from year to year, and students may therefore repeat the course for credit.

HIGR 238. Introduction to Science Studies (4)
Cross-listed as Communication 225A, Philosophy 209A, and Sociology 255A. Study and discussion of classic work in history of science, sociology of science and philosophy of science, and of work that attempts to develop a unified science studies approach. Required for all students in the Science Studies Program. Prerequisites: enrollment in Science Studies Program.

HIGR 239. Seminar in Science Studies (4)
Cross-listed as Communication 225B, Philosophy 209B, and Sociology 255B. Study and discussion of selected topics in the science studies field. Required for all students in the Science Studies Program. May be repeated as course content changes annually. Prerequisites: enrollment in Science Studies Program.

HIGR 240. Colloquium in Science Studies (4)
Cross-listed as Communication 225C, Philosophy 209C, and Sociology 255C. A forum for the presentation and discussion of research in progress in science studies, by graduate students, faculty, and visitors. Required for all students in the Science Studies Program. May be repeated as course content changes annually. Prerequisites: enrollment in the Science Studies Program.

HIGR 241. Advanced Approaches to Science Studies (4)
Cross-listed as COGR 225D, PHIL 209D, SOCG 255D. Focus on recent literature in the history, philosophy, and sociology of science, technology, and medicine. Required of all students in the Science Studies Program. Prerequisites: HIGR 238 is a prerequisite for HIGR 241; enrollment in Science Studies Program or instructor’s permission.

HIGR 244. Introduction to Sound Studies (4)
Study and discussion of classic and recent scholarship on sound production and cultures of listening. Emphasizes historical literature but also includes works in literary studies, art history, music, and other fields. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

HIGR 245. Revolution, Empire, and State Violence in Latin America and the Caribbean (4)
This seminar traces the history of revolution and repression in modern Latin America and the Caribbean. We will spend one to two weeks on each of the following revolutions: Haiti (1791), Mexico (1910), Cuba (1959), and Central America (1970s–80s).

HIGR 245A-B-C. Historical Scholarship on Latin American History (4-4-4)
Introduction to the literature of Latin American history. A three-quarter sequence of readings and discussions taught each quarter by members of the staff. Required for all beginning students for a graduate degree specializing in Latin American history; open and strongly recommended to other students using Latin American history as a secondary field for a graduate degree. HIGR 245A covers the colonial period, from conquest to independence to today; HIGR 245B covers South America from independence to today; HIGR 245C covers Mexico, Cuba, and Central America from independence to today. The three quarters need not be taken in sequence. Reading knowledge of Spanish is required.

HIGR 247A-B. Research Seminar in Colonial Latin America (4-4)
A two-quarter course involving readings and research on sixteenth- through eighteenth-century Latin America. Students are expected to compose a paper based on original research that is due in the second quarter. Reading knowledge of Spanish required. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of the first quarter. Final grade will not be given until the end of the second quarter.

HIGR 248A-B. Research Seminar in Latin America, National Period (4-4)
A two-quarter course involving readings and research; the first quarter is devoted to the nineteenth and the second quarter to the twentieth century. Students are expected to compose a paper based on original research that is due in the second quarter. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of the first quarter. Final grade will not be given until the end of the second quarter. Reading knowledge of Spanish and/or Portuguese is helpful but not required.

HIGR 252. History, Social Evolution, and Intellectuals in the Andes: Mariátegui, Haya de la Torre, and Arguedas (4)
The course will study three major twentieth-century interpreters of Andean history and society. Mariátegui is Latin America’s most original socialist intellectual; Haya de la Torre is the founder of Peru’s most important party; and Arguedas was the most profound interpreter of the role of Indian peasants in the Andean nations.

HIGR 254. Historical Scholarship in Ancient History (4)
Introduction to the bibliography, methodology, and ancillary disciplines for the study of ancient history together with readings and discussion on selected topics within the field. May be taken for credit three times.

HIGR 255. Readings in Ancient Greek History (4)
An in-depth examination of selected topics in ancient Greek history. May be taken for credit three times.

HIGR 256. Readings in Ancient Roman History (4)
An in-depth examination of original readings written in the Roman period. Topics will vary. May be taken for credit three times.

HIGR 257A. Historical Scholarship on Modern Middle East, Eighteenth to Twentieth Century (4)
Readings in the historiographical literature on the late Ottoman Empire (eighteenth to twentieth century). Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

HIGR 257B. Historical Scholarship on Modern Middle East, Colonial Period (4)
Readings in the historiographical literature on Middle Eastern states in the colonial period. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

HIGR 257C. Historical Scholarship on Modern Middle East, Postcolonial Eras (4)
Readings in the historiographical literature on the Middle East in the national/postcolonial eras. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

HIGR 258. Historical Scholarship in Medieval History (4)
Introduction to the bibliography, methodology, and ancillary disciplines for the study of medieval history together with readings and discussion on selected topics within the field. May be taken for credit three times.

HIGR 259. Special Topics in Ancient History (4)
Readings in modern scholarship concerning ancient Greek or Roman history. Topics will vary. May be taken for credit six times.

HIGR 265A-B-C. Historical Scholarship on American History (4-4-4)
A three-quarter sequence of readings and discussions on the bibliographical and monographic literature of American history from the colonial period to the present. Taught by different members of the staff each quarter, the course is required of all beginning graduate students in American history.

HIGR 267A-B. Research Seminar in United States History (4-4)
Readings and discussion in selected areas of American history for advanced graduate students. An IP (in progress) grade will be awarded the first quarter. The second quarter will be devoted to the presentation, discussion, and evaluation of work in progress. A final grade will be awarded at the end of the second quarter. Prerequisites: 267A is a prerequisite for 267B.

HIGR 275A. Research Seminar in Middle Eastern History (4)
HIGR 275A is the first quarter of a two-quarter research seminar in Middle Eastern history. Seminar topics will vary. Reading knowledge of Arabic or Turkish is expected. A paper, based on original research, will be due at the end of the second quarter. Final grade will not be given until the end of the second quarter. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

HIGR 275B. Research Seminar in Middle Eastern History (4)
HIGR 275B is the second quarter of a two-quarter research seminar in Middle Eastern history. Seminar topics will vary. Reading knowledge of Arabic or Turkish is expected. A paper, based on original research, will be due at the end of the quarter. Final grade will be awarded for HIGR 275A and B at the end of the second quarter. Prerequisites: 275A and graduate standing or consent of instructor.

HIGR 280. Global History: Approaches to the Early Modern Era (4)
Introduction to methods, theories, and critiques of writing early modern global/world history. It seeks to familiarize students with the main historiographical debates and defining narratives about the first phase of intensifying global connectivity that commenced in the fifteenth century. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing and department stamp.

HIGR 281. Global History: Approaches to the Modern Era (4)
Introduction to methods, theories, and critiques of writing global/world history in the modern era. Will survey how scholars of diverse disciplinary backgrounds have analyzed global change since the nineteenth century. It assesses the methodological and theoretical contributions of several analysts, the concepts through which they have explained and typified modes of interaction across global space, and the problems posed by studying connectivity. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing and department stamp.

HIGR 295. Thesis Seminar (4)
For students advanced to candidacy to the doctorate. Discussion, criticism, and revision of drafts of chapters of theses and of work to be submitted for publication.

HIGR 298. Directed Reading (1–12)
Guided and supervised reading in the literature of the several fields of history. This course may be repeated for an indefinite number of times due to the independent nature of the content of the course. (S/U grades permitted.)

HIGR 299. PhD Thesis Direction (1–12)
Independent work by graduate students engaged in research and writing of doctoral theses. This course may be repeated for an indefinite number of times due to the independent nature of thesis writing and research. (S/U grades only.)

HIGR 500. Apprentice Teaching in History (1–4)
A course in which teaching assistants are aided in learning proper teaching methods by means of supervision of their work by the faculty: handling of discussions, preparation and grading of examinations and other written exercises, and student relations. (S/U grades only.)

HDP 1. Introduction to Human Development (4)
This course introduces students to the central issues in the basic areas in human development. The course will explain relationships between biological, cognitive, social, and cultural aspects of development across the life span.

HDP 98. Directed Group Study (1–2)
Directed group study, on a topic or in a field not included in the department curriculum, by arrangement with a faculty member. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Pass/Not Pass grades only. Enrollment requires prior consent of the instructor; students must have at least thirty units completed and a minimum 3.0 GPA. Student may enroll for no more than a total of two units in one quarter. Cannot be used towards HDP major credit. Prerequisites: 3.0 GPA and at least thirty units completed.

HDP 99. Independent Study in Human Development (2–4)
Independent study and research under the direction of a human development program, or affiliated, faculty member. Pass/Not Pass only. Cannot be used towards HDP major credit. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of thirty units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0, and a completed and approved Special Studies form: UC San Diego Application for Enrollment Special Studies Courses 97, 98, 99.

HDP 110. Brain and Behavioral Development (4)
The purpose of this course is to familiarize students with basic mechanisms of brain and behavioral development from embryology through aging. Multiple levels of analysis will be discussed, including the effects of hormones on behavior, developmental events at the level of cells, structures, and neural systems, and the neural basis of cognition, social, perceptual, and language development. Prerequisites: HDP 1 or PSYC 101.

HDP 115. Media and Design of Social Learning Contexts (6)
(Same as COMM 102C) A combined lecture/lab course cross-listed in communication and human development. Students attend lecture, write field notes, and spend three hours per week in specially designed after-school setting working with children and designing new educational media and producing special projects. Prerequisites: HDP 1 or COMM 100A.

HDP 120. Language Development (4)
Examination of children’s acquisition of language from babbling to the formation of sentences. Topics covered include: prelinguistic gestures, relationships between babbling and sound systems, speech perception, linking words with objects, rule overgeneralization, bilingualism, nature vs. nurture, individual differences, cultural differences. Prerequisites: HDP 1 or LIGN 4.

HDP 121. The Developing Mind (4)
(Same as COGS 110.) This course examines changes in thinking and perceiving the physical and social world from birth through childhood. Evidence of significant changes in encoding information, forming mental representations, and solving problems is culled from psychological research, cross-cultural studies, and cognitive science. Prerequisites: HDP 1 or COGS 1.

HDP 122. Social Development (4)
This course covers topics in social development research. Content will address general principles such as the mutual influences of caregivers and children upon each other and the interplay of person and context. Discussion areas will include attachment, parenting styles, gender differences, aggression, social cognition, social components of achievement motivation, and development of conscience. Prerequisites: HDP 1.

HDP 133. Sociocultural Foundations of Human Development (4)
This course will provide students with an understanding of the social and cultural foundations of human development. The topics will be explored with both national and international comparisons from infancy through adolescence. Prerequisites: HDP 1 or PSYC 1.

HDP 135. Practicum in Child Development (6)
(Same as COMM 102D) A combined lecture and laboratory course for students in psychology, communication, and human development. Student backgrounds should include a background in general psychology or communication. Students will be expected to spend four hours a week in a supervised practical after-school setting at one of the community field sites involving children. Additional time will be devoted to readings and class prep, as well as six hours a week transcribing field notes and writing a paper on some aspect of the fieldwork experience as it relates to class lectures and readings. Prerequisites: HDP 1 or COMM 100A or PSYC 101.

HDP 150. Senior Seminar (4)
Seminar for graduating HDP seniors. Readings and discussion of special topics in human development. Provides advanced-level study on subfields of human development. Topics vary quarterly. (May repeat when topics vary.) Prerequisites: Senior standing, plus completion of all other HDP major requirements and HDP 181. Department approval required. (F,W,S)

HDP 160. Special Topics Seminar in Human Development (4)
Special topics in human development are discussed. (May repeat when topics vary.) Prerequisites: department approval.

HDP 171. Diverse Communities in a Life-span Approach to Human Development (4)
HDP 171 provides an introduction to the scholarship and practice in the field of cultural competency. Through relevant readings, associated assignments, and guest speakers from the community, students will acquire the knowledge and skills necessary for doing substantive research in diverse cultural contexts. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

HDP 181. Experimental Projects in Human Development Research (6)
This laboratory course in human development is designed around a variety of intensive experimental projects. With lectures providing background information on research methods and child development, each assignment will include data collection and/or analysis, and a written laboratory report. Prerequisites: HDP 1, Statistics, and must be a declared HDP major. (F,W,S)

HDP 191. Field Research in Human Development (6)
This course combines lectures on research methodology (three hours/week) with an applied field research experience (four hours/week) conducted at a preapproved study site. Required: completion of a field notebook, review paper, oral presentation, and final paper. Students must submit the pre-enrollment questionnaire one academic year prior to enrollment. See Human Development Program website for details. Prerequisites: HDP 1, HDP 181. Department approval required. (F,W,S)

HDP 193. Advanced Research in Human Development (4)
Specialized research project under the direction of a human development affiliated faculty member. May be taken for one or two quarters of credit. Prerequisites: declared HDP major, overall GPA of 2.8, ninety units completed, three HDP core courses completed, and consent of instructor.

HDP 194A-B-C. Honors Thesis (4-4-4)
Students will take part in a weekly research seminar. In addition, they will plan and carry out a three-quarter research project under the guidance of a faculty member. The project will form the basis for their senior honors thesis. Prerequisites: overall GPA of 3.2, and a 3.5 GPA for courses taken in the human development major; an advanced course in statistics or experimental design, and consent of instructor.

HDP 195. Instructional Apprentice in Human Development (4)
Introduction to teaching within the discipline of human development. Students will attend lecture, be responsible for assisting the instructor with course preparation, and will lead a discussion section of one of the lower-division courses in the human development program. Limited to upper-division students majoring in human development with consent of instructor. Pass/Not Pass only. Prerequisites: declared HDP major, overall GPA of 3.0, 90 units completed, and consent of instructor.

HDP 199. Independent Study in Human Development (4)
Independent study and research under the direction of a faculty member. Pass/Not Pass only. Prerequisites: consent of the instructor, completion of at least ninety undergraduate units with a minimum of 2.5 GPA, and a completed and approved Special Studies form.

HMNR 100/HITO 119. Introduction to Human Rights and Global Justice (4)
Explores where human rights come from and what they mean by integrating them into a history of modern society, from the Conquest of the Americas and the origins of the Enlightenment, to the Holocaust and the contemporary human rights regime.

HMNR 101/ANSC 140. Human Rights II: Contemporary Issues (4)
Interdisciplinary discussion that outlines the structure and functioning of the contemporary human rights regime, and then delves into the relationship between selected human rights protections—against genocide, torture, enslavement, political persecution, etc.—and their violation, from early Cold War to the present.

HUM 1. The Foundations of Western Civilization: Israel and Greece (6)
Texts from the Hebrew Bible and from Greek epic, history, drama, and philosophy in their cultural context. Revelle students must take course for letter grade. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the UC Entry Level Writing requirement. (W)

HUM 2. Rome, Christianity, and the Middle Ages (6)
The Roman Empire, the Christian transformation of the classical world in late antiquity, and the rise of a European culture during the Middle Ages. Representative texts from Latin authors, early Christian literature, the Germanic tradition, and the high Middle Ages. Revelle students must take course for letter grade. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the UC Entry Level Writing requirement. (S)

HUM 3. Renaissance, Reformation, and Early Modern Europe (4)
The revival of classical culture and values and the reaction against medieval ideas concerning the place of human beings in the world. The Protestant Reformation and its intellectual and political consequences. The philosophical background to the scientific revolution. Revelle students must take course for letter grade. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the UC Entry Level Writing requirement. (F)

HUM 4. Enlightenment, Romanticism, Revolution (1660–1848) (4)
The enlightenment’s revisions of traditional thought; the rise of classical liberalism; the era of the first modern political revolutions; romantic ideas of nature and human life. Revelle students must take course for letter grade. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the UC Entry Level Writing requirement. (W)

HUM 5. Modern Culture (1848–present) (4)
Challenges to liberalism posed by such movements as socialism, imperialism, and nationalism; the growth of new forms of self-expression and new conceptions of individual psychology. Revelle students must take course for letter grade. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the UC Entry Level Writing requirement. (S)

HUM 195. Methods of Teaching Humanities (4)
An introduction to teaching humanities. Students are required to attend weekly discussions on methods of teaching humanities, and will teach discussion sections of one of the humanities courses. Attendance at lecture of the course in which the student is participating is required. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (W, S)

HUM 199. Special Studies (2–4)
Individually guided readings or projects in area of humanities not normally covered in standard curriculum. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

HUM 200. Seminar in the Humanities (4)
Selected topics in the history, literature, and thought of Mediterranean antiquity and its successor-cultures. Emphasis on identifying both common themes and cultural distinctiveness. Discussion of pedagogical approaches to this material. Required of all graduate instructional assistants in the humanities sequence. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (F)

INTL 97. Internship (1)
Independent research connected to an internship with an organization relevant to the career interests of a student of international studies. Topic of the required research to be determined by the supervising faculty member. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit eight times. Prerequisites: departmental approval required.

INTL 101. Culture and Society in International Perspective (4)
Analysis of the cultural and social development of the modern era from the perspective of interaction among societies. Particular attention is paid to the definition, representation, and negotiation of social and cultural boundaries over time. Prerequisites: sophomore standing or above and completion of at least one quarter of a university-level writing course.

INTL 102. Economics, Politics, and International Change (4)
Examination of the domestic and international sources of economic and political change. Topics include the rise of the nation-state, comparative economic development, authoritarian and democratic regimes, international and civil conflict, globalization and its domestic and international implications. Prerequisites: sophomore standing or above and completion of at least one quarter of a university-level writing course.

INTL 190. Seminar in International Studies (4)
Required seminar for International Studies seniors. Readings and discussion of topics in international and comparative studies from an interdisciplinary perspective. Emphasis on independent work and completion of a research paper. Prerequisites: international studies major; successful completion of INTL 101 and 102.

INTL 190H. Honors Seminar in International Studies (4)
Required of all honors students in International Studies. Reading and discussion of international topics and cooperative studies from an interdisciplinary perspective. Emphasis on research design and completion of research outline in preparation for INTL 196H. Prerequisites: international studies major with 3.5 major GPA; department application process required; senior standing; INTL 101; INTL 102.

INTL 196H. International Studies Honors Program (4)
Open only to seniors who have completed INTL 190H. Completion of an honors thesis under the supervision of a member of the International Studies faculty. Prerequisites: international studies major with 3.5 GPA; department approval; senior standing; INTL 190H.

INTL 197. Internship (1)
Independent research connected to an internship with an organization relevant to the career interests of a student of international studies. Topic of the required research to be determined by the supervising faculty member. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit eight times. Prerequisites: department approval required; junior and senior standing.

10A-B-C. First-Year Japanese
(No prior study of Japanese language is required for 10A.) Prerequisites for B and C: previous course or consent of instructor.

20A-B-C. Second-Year Japanese
Prerequisites: previous course or consent of instructor.

130A-B-C. Third-Year Japanese
Prerequisites: previous course or consent of instructor.

140A-B-C. Fourth-Year Japanese
Prerequisites: previous course or consent of instructor.

150A-B-C. Advanced Japanese
Prerequisites: previous course or consent of instructor.

JAPN 135A. Japanese for Professional Purposes (4)
Training in oral and written communication skills for professional settings in Japanese. Broad aspects of cultural issues in Japanese organizations are introduced and comparison of American and Japanese cultural business patterns will be conducted. Prerequisites: JAPN 20C, Second Year Japanese III, or consent of instructor.

JAPN 135B. Japanese for Professional Purposes II (4)
Continuation of training in oral and written communication skills for professional settings in Japanese. Broad aspects of cultural issues in Japanese organizations are introduced and comparison of American and Japanese cultural business patterns will be conducted. Prerequisites: JAPN 135A, Japanese for Professional Purposes, or consent of instructor.

JAPN 135C. Japanese for Professional Purposes III (4)
Continuation of training in oral and written communication skills for professional settings in Japanese. Broad aspects of cultural issues in Japanese organizations are introduced and comparison of American and Japanese cultural business patterns will be conducted. Prerequisites: JAPN 135B, Japanese for Professional Purposes II.

LTEA 130. Earlier Japanese Literature in Translation
(Quarter offerings will vary among A. General Literature; B. Poetry; C. Prose Fiction; D. Drama; and E. Essays, travelogues, diaries, etc.)

LTEA 132. Later Japanese Literature in Translation
(Quarter offerings will vary among A. General Literature; B. Poetry; C. Prose Fiction; D. Drama and Film; and E. Essays, criticism, etc.)

Jewish Studies 1. Beginning Hebrew (5)
Acquisition of basic vocabulary, fundamentals of Hebrew grammar, conversation, and reading.

Jewish Studies 2. Intermediate Hebrew (5)
Continued study of vocabulary and grammar, emphasis on fluency in conversation, and reading.

Jewish Studies 3. Intermediate Hebrew, Continued (5)
Vocabulary, grammar, conversation, introduction to literary and nonliterary texts.

Jewish Studies 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit four times. Seminars are open to sophomores, juniors, and seniors on a space available basis.

Jewish Studies 101. Introduction to Hebrew Texts (4)
Reading and analysis of texts from Biblical through modern authors, study of advanced vocabulary and grammar. Course taught in Hebrew and in English.

Jewish Studies 102. Intermediate Hebrew Texts (4)
Further reading and analysis of Hebrew literature from a range of periods. Advanced grammar and vocabulary. Course taught in Hebrew and in English.

Jewish Studies 103. Advanced Hebrew Texts (4)
Synthesis of fluency, reading, and grammatical skills. Reading of texts from a range of periods.

Jewish Studies 110. Introduction to Judaism (4)
An introductory survey of Jewish history, literature, and culture from antiquity to contemporary times. Topics include sacred texts; the variety of groups and views of Judaism; the historical and geographical movements of the Jewish people; and the intersection of religion, ethnicity, and culture.

Jewish Studies 111. Topics in Judaic Studies (4)
Study of a particular period, theme, or literature in Jewish civilization. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

Jewish Studies 130. Introduction to the Old Testament: The Historical Books (4)
This course will study the historical books of the Hebrew Bible (in English), Genesis through 2 Kings, through a literary-historical approach: how, when, and why the Hebrew Bible came to be written down, its relationship with known historical facts, and the archaeological record. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

Jewish Studies 131. Introduction to the Old Testament: The Poetic Books (4)
This course will study the prophetic and poetic books of the Hebrew Bible (in English), through a literary-historical approach. Topics include: prophecy, social justice, monotheism, suffering, humor, and love. Prerequisites: JUDA 100A; upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

Jewish Studies 196A. Jewish Studies Honors Course (4)
First quarter of honors thesis research for students accepted into honors program. Research is conducted under the supervision of a faculty member selected with the approval of the director of the Jewish Studies Program. Prerequisites: admission to Jewish Studies Honors Program; JUDA 100, JUDA 103, HITO 104, HITO 105; upper-division electives in Jewish studies; at least junior standing; overall 3.3 GPA; 3.5 in Jewish studies.

Jewish Studies 196B. Jewish Studies Honors Course (4)
Second quarter of honors thesis research for students accepted into honors program. Research is conducted under the supervision of a faculty member selected with the approval of the director of the Jewish Studies Program. Prerequisites: admission to Jewish Studies Honors Program; previous enrollment in JUDA 196A; JUDA 100, JUDA 103, HITO 104, HITO 105; upper-division electives in Jewish studies; at least junior standing; overall 3.3 GPA; 3.5 in Jewish studies.

Jewish Studies 198. Directed Group Study in Jewish Studies (1-4)
Directed group study on a topic not generally included in the regular curriculum. Student must make arrangements with individual faculty members. (P/NP only)

Jewish Studies 199. Independent Study in Jewish Studies (1-4)
Independent study on a topic not generally included in the regular curriculum. Student must make arrangements with individual faculty members. (P/NP only)

LATI 1A. Zapotec Conversation and Analysis I (4)
Presentation and practice of the grammatical structures of Valley Zapotec, an indigenous language from Mexico. Course focus on listening, speaking, and writing. Students gain basic knowledge of grammatical principles in order to understand the structure and rules of the language.

LATI 1B. Zapotec Conversation and Analysis II (4)
Presentation and practice of the grammatical structures of Valley Zapotec, an indigenous language from Mexico. Course teaches comprehensive vocabulary through listening, speaking, reading, and writing activities. Course also focuses on oral proficiency/grammar, including verb conjugation and other grammatical structures. Prerequisites: LATI 1A.

LATI 1C. Zapotec Conversation and Analysis III (4)
Presentation and practice of the grammatical structures of Valley Zapotec, an indigenous language from Mexico. Course gives students an advanced understanding of written and spoken Valley Zapotec through reading, conversation, group presentations, and composition. Prerequisites: LATI 1B.

LATI 50. Introduction to Latin America (4)
Interdisciplinary overview of society and culture in Latin America—including Mexico, the Caribbean, and South America: legacies of conquest, patterns of economic development, changing roles of women, expressions of popular culture, cycles of political change, and U.S.–Latin American relations.

LATI 50XL. Foreign Language Discussion—Introduction to Latin America (1)
Students will exercise advanced foreign language skills to discuss materials and the correspondingly numbered Latin American Studies foreign area course. This section is taught by the course instructor, has no final exam, and does not affect the grade in the core course, LATI 50.

LATI 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

LATI 122A. Field Research Methods for Migration Studies: Seminar (4)
Introductory survey of methods used by social and health scientists to gather primary research data on international migrant and refugee populations, including sample surveys, unstructured interviewing, and ethnographic observation. Basic fieldwork practices, ethics, and problem-solving techniques will also be covered. Students may not receive credit for both SOCI 122A and LATI 122A. Recommended: advanced competency in conversational Spanish. Prerequisites: permission of instructor (department authorization required).

LATI 122B. Field Research Methods for Migration Studies: Practicum (12)
Students will collect survey and qualitative data among Mexican migrants to the United States and potential migrants, participate in team research, organize data collected for analysis, and submit a detailed outline of an article to be based on field data. Students may not receive credit for both SOCI 122B and LATI 122B. Recommended: advanced competency in conversational Spanish. Prerequisites: LATI 122A; permission of instructor (department authorization required).

LATI 122C. Field Research Methods for Migration Studies: Data Analysis (4)
Continuation of SOCI 122B. Students analyze primary data they have collected in field research sites and coauthor an article for publication. Methods for organizing and processing field data, techniques of quantitative data analysis, and report preparation conventions will be covered. Students may not receive credit for both SOCI 122C and LATI 122C. Prerequisites: LATI 122B; permission of instructor (department authorization required).

LATI 180. Special Topics in Latin American Studies (4)
Readings and discussion of substantive issues and research in Latin American studies. Topics may include the study of a specific society or a particular issue in comparative cross-national perspective. Topics will vary from year to year. Prerequisites: LATI 50 or permission of instructor, upper-division standing.

LATI 190. Senior Seminar (4)
Research seminar on selected topics in the study of Latin America; all students will be required to prepare and present independent research papers. (Honors students will present drafts of senior research theses, of no less than fifty pages in length; non-honors students will present final versions of analytical papers of approximately twenty-five to forty pages in length.) Prerequisites: satisfactory completion of LATI 50 and a working knowledge of Spanish.

LATI 191. Honors Seminar (4)
Independent reading and research under direction of a member of the faculty group in Latin American Studies; goal is to provide honors students with an opportunity to complete senior research thesis (to be defended before three-person interdisciplinary faculty committee). Prerequisites: successful completion of LATI 50, working knowledge of Spanish; minimum GPA of 3.5 in the major.

LATI 199. Individual Study (4)
Guided and supervised reading of the literature on Latin America in the interdisciplinary areas of anthropology, communications, economics, history, literature, political science, and sociology. For students majoring in Latin American Studies, reading will focus around potential topics for senior papers; for honors students in Latin American Studies, reading will culminate in formulation of a prospectus for the research thesis. Prerequisites: LATI 50 and working knowledge of Spanish.

LATI 200. Core Seminar on Interdisciplinary Research and Methodology in Latin American Studies (4)
A team-taught course wherein members of the faculty group in Latin American Studies present diverse disciplinary and thematic approaches to the region. Topics vary from year to year. Grades are based on discussions and on a series of analytical papers. Prerequisites: enrollment in the master’s degree program in Latin American Studies or permission of instructor.

LATI 222A. Field Research Methods for Migration Studies: Seminar (4)
Survey of methods used by social and health scientists to gather primary data on international migrant and refugee populations, including sample surveys, unstructured interviewing, and ethnographic observation. Students serve as team leaders, design questionnaires, and conduct literature reviews. Prerequisites: permission of instructor, advanced competence in conversational Spanish (department authorization required).

LATI 222B. Field Research Methods for Migration Studies: Practicum (12)
Students collect survey and qualitative data in Mexican migrants’ communities of origin and destination, serve as team leaders, organize field data collection within specific subpopulations, and prepare a detailed outline of a proposed journal article to be based on field data. Prerequisites: LATI 222A, permission of instructor, advanced competence in conversational Spanish (department authorization required).

LATI 222C. Field Research Methods for Migration Studies: Data Analysis (4)
Serving as team leaders, students design and execute analysis of data they have collected in Mexican and US field research sites, and coauthor a publishable article. Methods for organizing field data, advanced techniques of quantitative and qualitative data analysis, and report preparation conventions are covered. Prerequisites: LATI 222B, permission of instructor (department authorization required).

LATI 298. Directed Reading (1–12)
Guided and supervised reading of the literature of the several areas included in the interdisciplinary fields of anthropology, communications, economics, history, literature, political science, and sociology. Prerequisites: graduate standing in Latin American Studies.

LATI 299. Independent Research (1–12)
Independent work by graduate students engaged in thesis research and writing under the direct supervision of a faculty adviser.

LATI 500. Teaching Apprenticeship (1-4)
The course is designed for teaching assistants to learn effective teaching methods through supervision and mentorship by the faculty. Student will learn handling of discussions; preparation and grading of examinations and other written exercises; and student relations.

LAWS 101. Contemporary Legal Issues (4)
This course will deal in depth each year with a different legal issue of contemporary significance, viewed from the perspectives of political science, history, sociology, and philosophy. Required for students completing the Law and Society minor. May be repeated for credit once, for a maximum total of eight units. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

LAWS 102S. Crimes, Civil Wrongs, and Constitution (4)
Through lectures and discussions on several controversial topics, students are introduced to the subjects taught in the first year of law school. They learn briefing, case analysis, and the Socratic method of instruction, engage in role-playing exercises, and take law-school examinations. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

LIGN 3. Language as a Social and Cultural Phenomenon (4)
The role of language in thought, myth, ritual, advertising, politics, and the law. Language variation, change, and loss; multilingualism, pidginization and creolization; language planning, standardization, and prescriptivism; writing systems. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 4. Language as a Cognitive System (4)
Fundamental issues in language and cognition. Differences between animal communication, sign systems, and human language; origins and evolution of language; neural basis of language; language acquisition in children and adults. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 5. The Linguistics of Invented Languages (4)
Introduction to the study of language through the investigation of invented languages, whether conscious (Elvish, Klingon, Esperanto) or unconscious (creoles, twin/sibling languages). Students will participate in the invention of a language fragment. Topics discussed include language structure, history, culture, and writing systems. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 7. Sign Language and Its Culture (4)
Deaf history since the eighteenth century. The structure of American Sign Language and comparison with oral languages. ASL poetry and narrative and Deaf people’s system of cultural knowledge. Basic questions concerning the nature of language and its relation to culture. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 8. Languages and Cultures in America (4)
Language in American culture and society. Standard and nonstandard English in school, media, pop-culture, politics; bilingualism and education; cultural perception of language issues over time; languages and cultures in the “melting pot,” including Native American, Hispanic, African American, Deaf. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 17. Making and Breaking Codes (4)
A rigorous analysis of symbolic systems and their interpretations. Students will learn to encode and decode information using progressively more sophisticated methods; topics covered include ancient and modern phonetic writing systems, hieroglyphics, computer languages, and ciphers (secret codes). Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

LIGN 101. Introduction to the Study of Language (4)
Language is what makes us human, but how does it work? This course focuses on speech sounds and sound patterns, how words are formed, organized into sentences, and understood, how language changes, and how it is learned. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 105. Law and Language (4)
The interpretation of language in understanding the law: 1) the language of courtroom interaction (hearsay, jury instructions); 2) written legal language (contracts, ambiguity, legal fictions); 3) language-based issues in the law (First Amendment, libel and slander). Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 108. Languages of Africa (4)
Africa is home to an astonishing variety of languages. This course investigates the characteristics of the major language families as well as population movements and language contact, and how governments attempt to regulate language use. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 110. Phonetics (4)
The study of sounds that are used in human languages. How speech sounds are physically produced; acoustics of speech; speech perception; practical training in phonetic transcription and in interpreting visual representations of the acoustic signal. The class covers both English and its dialects and languages other than English. Prerequisites: LIGN 101, concurrent enrollment in LIGN 101, or consent of instructor.

LIGN 111. Phonology I (4)
Why does one language sound different from another? This course analyzes how languages organize sounds into different patterns, how those sounds interact, and how they fit into larger units, such as syllables. Focus on a wide variety of languages and problem solving. Prerequisites: LIGN 110.

LIGN 112. Speech Sounds and Speech Disorders (4)
How do we measure differences in the way sounds are produced and perceived? This course focuses on measuring and analyzing the acoustic and auditory properties of sounds as they occur in nonpathological and pathological speech. Prerequisites: LIGN 110 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 119. First and Second Language Learning: From Childhood through Adolescence (4)
(Same as EDS 119) An examination of how human language learning ability develops and changes over the first two decades of life, including discussion of factors that may affect this ability. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

LIGN 120. Morphology (4)
How do some languages express with one word complex meanings that English needs several words to express? Discovery of underlying principles of word formation through problem solving and analysis of data from a wide variety of languages. Prerequisites: LIGN 101 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 121. Syntax I (4)
What universal principles determine how words combine into phrases and sentences? Introduction to research methods and results. Emphasis on how argumentation in problem-solving can be used in the development of theories of language. Prerequisites: LIGN 101 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 130. Semantics (4)
Introduction to the formal study of meaning. What is the meaning of a word? What is the meaning of a sentence? Which role does the context play in determining linguistic meaning? Prerequisites: LIGN 101 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 141. Language Structures (4)
Detailed investigation of the structure of one or more languages. May be repeated for credit as topics vary. Prerequisites: LIGN 101 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 143. The Structure of Spanish (4)
Surveys aspects of Spanish phonetics, phonology, morphology, and syntax. Topics include dialect differences between Latin American and Peninsular Spanish (both from a historical and contemporary viewpoint), gender classes, verbal morphology, and clause structure. Prerequisites: LIGN 101 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 144. Discourse Analysis: American Sign Language and Performing Arts (4)
A discourse-centered examination of ASL verbal arts: rhyme, meter, rhythm, handedness, nonmanual signals, and spatial mapping; creation of scene and mood; properties of character, dialogue, narration, and voice; cultural tropes; poetic constructions in everyday genres; transcription, body memory and performance. Prerequisites: LISL 1C/1CX or consent of instructor.

LIGN 146. Sociolinguistics in Deaf Communities (4)
An examination of sociolinguistic research on Deaf communities throughout the world, including: sociohistorical contexts for phonological, lexical and syntactic variation, contact between languages, multilingualism, language policies and planning, second language learning, language attitudes, and discourse analysis of specific social contexts. Course will be conducted in ASL. Prerequisites: LISL 1C/1CX or consent of instructor. (Not offered in 2015–16.)

LIGN 148. Psycholinguistics of Sign Language (4)
The study of how sign languages are structured, and how they are understood and produced by adults. Topics include the contrast between gesture and language, sign language acquisition, brain processing, sociolinguistics, and the role of sign language in reading. Prerequisites: LISL 1C/1CX or LIGN 101 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 150. Historical Linguistics (4)
Language is constantly changing. This course investigates the nature of language change, how to determine a language’s history, its relationship to other languages, and the search for common ancestors or “proto-language.” Prerequisites: LIGN 101 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 152. Indigenous Languages of the Americas (4)
This course is an introduction to the study of the indigenous languages of the Americas. Its goals are to offer orientation in a broad field and to prepare students for possible future research. Topics covered include grammatical structures, genetic classification, characteristics of major language families, and factors affecting language use and mother tongue transmission of these languages in contemporary societies. Recommended preparation: LIGN 101.

LIGN 155. Evolution of Language (4)
History of thought on language origins, genetic, neural, anatomical, and gestural theories of language evolution in relation to prior hominid and other species, the role of generational differences in language acquisition, and computational models. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

LIGN 160. Pragmatics (4)
An introduction to the context-dependent aspects of language meaning. Topics include given versus new information, Gricean maxims and rules of conversation, presupposition, implicature, reference and cognitive status, discourse coherence and structure, and speech acts. Prerequisites: LIGN 101 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 165. Computational Linguistics (4)
An introduction to the fundamental concepts of computational linguistics, in which we study natural language syntax and semantics from an interpretation perspective, describe methods for programming computer systems to perform such interpretation, and survey applications of computational linguistics technology. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 170. Psycholinguistics (4)
The study of how humans learn, represent, comprehend, and produce language. Topics include visual and auditory recognition of words, sentence comprehension, reading, sentence production, language acquisition, neural representation of language, bilingualism, and language disorders. Prerequisites: LIGN 101, or upper-division standing, or consent of instructor.

LIGN 171. Child Language Acquisition (4)
A central cognitive, developmental mystery is how children learn their first language. Overview of research in the learning of sound systems, word forms and word meanings, and word combinations. Exploration of the relation between cognitive and language development. Prerequisites: LIGN 101, or upper-division standing, or consent of instructor.

LIGN 174. Gender and Language in Society (4)
(Same as SOCI 116.) This course examines how language contributes to the social construction of gender identities, and how gender impacts language use and ideologies. Topics include the ways language and gender interact across the life span, within ethnolinguistic minority communities in the US, across sexual orientations and cultures. Recommended preparation: LIGN 101, or upper-division standing, or consent of instructor.

LIGN 175. Sociolinguistics (4)
The study of language in its social context, with emphasis on the different types of linguistic variation and the principles underlying them. Dialects, registers, gender-based linguistic differences, multilingualism, pidginization and creolization, factors influencing linguistic choice, formal models of variation; emphasis is given both to socially determined differences within the U.S. and US ethnic groups and to cross-cultural differences in language use and variation. Prerequisites: LIGN 101 or consent of instructor.

LIGN 176. Language of Politics and Advertising (4)
How can we explain the difference between what is literally said versus what is actually conveyed in the language of law, politics, and advertising? How people’s ordinary command of language and their reasoning skills are used to manipulate them. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 177. Multilingualism (4)
Official and minority languages, pidgins and Creoles, language planning, bilingual education and literacy, code switching, and language attrition. Prerequisites: LIGN 101, or upper-division standing, or consent of instructor.

LIGN 179. Second Language Acquisition Research (4)
This course will investigate topics in second language acquisition including the critical period, the processing and neural representation of language in bilinguals, theories of second language acquisition and creolization, exceptional language learners, and parallels with first language acquisition. Prerequisites: LIGN 101, or upper-division standing, or consent of instructor.

LIGN 180. Language Representation in the Brain (4)
The mind/body problem, modularity, basic neuroanatomy, cerebral lateralization, re-evaluation of classical language areas, aphasia, dyslexia, the KE family and FOXP2 gene, mirror neurons, sign language, brain development, cortical plasticity, and localization studies of language processing (electrical stimulation, MEG, fMRI, and PET). Students may not receive credit for both LIGN 172 and LIGN 180. Prerequisites: LIGN 101, or upper-division standing, or consent of instructor.

LIGN 181. Language Processing in the Brain (4)
Modularity and models of language processing, basic neurophysiology, EEG/MEG, linguistic event-related brain potentials (ERPs), cross-linguistic functional significance of ERP components and their MEG correlates: N400, N400-700, lexical processing negativity, slow anterior negative potentials, (early) left anterior negativity, and late positivity. Prerequisites: LIGN 101, or upper-division standing, or consent of instructor.

LIGN 192. Senior Seminar in Linguistics (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in linguistics (at the upper-division level). Senior Seminars may be offered in all campus departments. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

LIGN 195. Apprentice Teaching (0–4)
Students lead a class section of a lower-division linguistics course. They also attend a weekly meeting on teaching methods. (This course does not count toward minor or major.) May be repeated for credit, up to a maximum of four units. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor, advanced standing.

LIGN 197. Linguistics Internship (2 or 4)
The student will undertake a program of practical research in a supervised work environment. Topics to be researched may vary, but in each case the course will provide skills for carrying out these studies. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

LIGN 199. Independent Study in Linguistics (2 or 4)
The student undertakes a program of research or advanced reading in linguistics under the supervision of a faculty member of the Department of Linguistics. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor. May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 199H. Honors Independent Study in Linguistics (4)
The student undertakes a program of research and advanced reading in linguistics under the supervision of a faculty member in the Department of Linguistics. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: admission to Honors Program.

LIGN 200. Research Forum (2)
A forum for discussion of current issues. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 210. Phonetics (4)
This is an introduction to articulatory, acoustic, and auditory phonetics. Major phonetic theories in these areas, and the relationship between phonetics and phonology are discussed. The course also covers experimental design and methodology and provides hands-on experience with laboratory equipment. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 211. Phonology (4)
Introduction to the description and analysis of the sound patterns of language and to the construction of theoretical models, including cognitive rules, representations, and constraints.

LIGN 214. Topics in Phonetics (4)
This course examines recent developments in controversial areas of phonetics. Topics will vary and will address issues in speech production (articulation, acoustics), speech perception, phonetic theory, and the relationship between phonetics and phonology. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: LIGN 210 and LIGN 211.

LIGN 215. Topics in Phonology (4)
Discussion of a topic of current phonological interest, with a focus on descriptive, analytical, and theoretical issues in phonology and phonological theory.

LIGN 220. Morphology (4)
Theories of word structure are examined and confronted with data from a variety of languages: derivational and inflectional morphology, the morphology/phonology, and morphology/syntax interfaces.

LIGN 221. Syntax (4)
An introduction to syntactic phenomena, argumentation, analyses, and theoretical models. Phenomena to be discussed include phrase structure, argument structure, binding, control, and A- and A'-dependencies.

LIGN 225. Topics in Syntax (4)
Descriptive and theoretical problems in syntactic analysis. Theoretical consequences of alternative analyses. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LIGN 228. Probabilistic Models of Cognition (4)
(Same as Psychology 232.) Computational theories of human cognition, particularly Bayesian approaches. Techniques may include directed graphical models; hierarchical models; nonparametric models; probabilistic programming languages. Topics may include decision making; perception; causal reasoning; categorization; language. Recommended preparation: previous experience with statistics, machine learning, and/or functional programming helpful.

LIGN 230. Semantics (4)
Theories of semantic structure. The relation of meaning to grammar, and how it is to be accommodated in an overall model of linguistic organization. The application of formal semantics to the description of natural language.

LIGN 232. Semantic Development (4)
(Same as Psychology 235.) This course will explore the development of concepts and linguistic meaning via classic case studies in semantics, including word learning, quantifier acquisition, and the foundations of mathematics. The course will draw on evidence from linguistics, the philosophy of language, and developmental psychology.

LIGN 235. Topics in Semantics (2–4)
Advanced material in special areas of the study of meaning and its relation to formal aspects of human language. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary.

LIGN 238. Topics in Cognitive Linguistics (0–4)
(Same as Cognitive Science 238.) Basic concepts, empirical findings, and recent developments in cognitive and functional linguistics. Language viewed dynamically in relation to conceptualization, discourse, meaning construction, and cognitive processing. As topics vary, may be repeated for credit.

LIGN 240. Field Methods (4)
Techniques of discovering the structure of a language through elicitation of data from native speaker consultants. Phonemic, morphemic, and syntactic analysis. Prerequisites: LIGN 110 or equivalent.

LIGN 241. Fieldwork (4)
Fieldwork continuing the research of the previous quarter; student-directed elicitations on topics of interest. Prerequisites: LIGN 240.

LIGN 245. Computational Corpus Linguistics (4)
Introduction to computational corpus tools for performing empirically grounded linguistic investigations. Annotated and unannotated corpora; annotation schemes. Searching using regular expressions. UNIX tools. The PERL programming language. Publically available language processing systems.

LIGN 247. Topics in Pragmatics (2–4)
Advanced material covering particular topics relating to the theoretical analysis of the pragmatics of natural languages. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

LIGN 248. Topics in Morphology (4)
Descriptive and theoretical problems in morphology. Theoretical and empirical consequences of alternative analyses. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LIGN 220.

LIGN 251. Probabilistic Methods in Linguistics (4)
Probabilistic approaches to language knowledge, acquisition, and use. Quantitative analysis of linguistic data. Quantitative models in linguistic theory. Covers basic probability theory and tools of statistical analysis for language, including linear regression, ANOVA, generalized linear models (e.g., logistic regression), data visualization. Familiarity with probability theory highly encouraged.

LIGN 252. Advanced Probabilistic Models of Language (4)
Probabilistic techniques for data analysis and modeling of linguistics cognition. Hierarchical (mixed-effects) regression, graphical models, Bayesian methods, latent-variable models, non-parametric models, probabilistic grammars. Course covers both mathematical foundations and working with datasets using state-of-the-art computational tools. Recommended prerequisite: LIGN 251 or equivalent course with emphasis on probabilistic methods in linguistics. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

LIGN 255. Topics in Language Evolution (4)
The study of human language evolution from a variety of perspectives: anatomical, comparative, computational, cultural, experimental, generational, genetic, gestural, historical, neural, phonetic/phonological, pragmatic, semantic, semiotic, syntactic, etc. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary.

LIGN 256. Statistical Natural Language Processing (4)
(Same as CSE 256.) Introduction to modern statistical approaches to natural language processing: part-of-speech tagging, word-sense disambiguation and parsing, using Markov models, hidden Markov models, and probabilistic context-free grammars. Recommended prerequisites: one of LIGN 165, LIGN 245, CSE 151, CSE 250A, CSE 254. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

LIGN 272. Topics in Neurolinguistics (4)
Issues of language representation and neural instantiation that arise in studies of neural imaging, language disorders, multilingualism and second language acquisition, animal communication, and the origins and evolution of language. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LIGN 274. Computational Psycholinguistics (4)
Investigation of problems in psycholinguistics—the study of how humans learn, represent, comprehend, and produce language—from a computational perspective. Research article readings covering word-level, sentence-level, and discourse-level processing. Prior background in psycholinguistics and/or computational linguistics highly recommended.

LIGN 279. Topics in Language Acquisition (4)
Language acquisition is central to theories about human development, cognition, brain organization, and language origins and change. Topics include the role of input and critical periods on language outcome and processing, neural organization, and sign language creation. Prerequisites: none.

LIGN 280. Sign Language Research (4)
An overview of sign language research in terms of how it informs language theory. Topics include the structure of ASL, acquisition, psycholinguistic and neurolinguistic processing of sign language in comparison to spoken language, critical period effects, and language evolution. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

LIGN 281. Language Acquisition Theory and Research (4)
Children’s first language acquisition and how it illuminates linguistic, cognitive, and neurolingusitic theory. Topics include past and current research with a focus on design, methodology, and data analysis in child language.

LIGN 282. Biology and Environment in Language Acquisition (4)
How the environment and the biology of language, including sensory motor modality and neural development, affect language development. Topics include the paradigms used to study the critical period for language.

LIGN 283. Language and Conceptual Development (4)
(Same as Psychology 260.) This class will investigate case studies in conceptual development that interact with language acquisition, including domains such as time, space, number, and theory of mind. The approach of the class will be to explore the chosen case study from the perspective of philosophy, linguistics, psychology, anthropology, and comparative psychology, with a particular focus on how conceptual development is affected by the acquisition of language.

LIGN 293. Research Practicum (0–4)
Gathering and interpreting data, formulating research questions and hypotheses, making the predictions of hypotheses explicit, finding relevant evidence, and organizing research results into suitable form for presentation in abstracts, talks, and research papers. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 296. Directed Research (1–8)
Individual research. May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 299. Doctoral Research (1–12)
Directed research on dissertation topic for students who have been admitted to candidacy for the PhD degree. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: advancement to candidacy.

LIGN 502. Apprentice Teaching of Linguistics (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in the department’s linguistics courses, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques, and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. The student must be serving as a teaching assistant in a LIGN course to receive credit.

LIGN 503. Apprentice Teaching of American Sign Language (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in American Sign Language, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 504. Apprentice Teaching of French (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in French, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 505. Apprentice Teaching of German (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in German, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 506. Apprentice Teaching of Italian (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in Italian, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 507. Apprentice Teaching of Spanish (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in Spanish, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 508. Apprentice Teaching of Language/Directed Study (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in language directed study, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, directing study of various uncommonly taught languages, sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 509. Apprentice Teaching, Head Teaching Assistant (1–4)
This course, designed for a graduate student serving as Head Teaching Assistant in the Linguistics Language Program, includes discussion of teaching methods and materials, and classroom observation, directing study of various uncommonly taught languages, sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course.

LIGN 510. Apprentice Teaching of Arabic (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in Arabic, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 511. Apprentice Teaching of Portuguese (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in Portuguese, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 512. Apprentice Teaching of Heritage Korean (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in Heritage Korean, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 513. Apprentice Teaching of Heritage Vietnamese (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in Heritage Vietnamese, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 514. Apprentice Teaching of Heritage Persian (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in Heritage Persian, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

LIGN 515. Apprentice Teaching of Heritage Filipino (1–4)
The course, designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in Heritage Filipino, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. (S/U grades only.) May be repeated for credit.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 1A. American Sign Language Conversation (2.5)
Small tutorial meetings with a signer of American Sign Language (ASL). Conversational practice organized around common everyday communicative situations. Must be taken with LISL 1AX. Prerequisites: no prior study of ASL.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 1AX. Analysis of American Sign Language (2.5)
Study of American Sign Language (ASL) and analysis of its syntactic, morphological, and phonological features. Readings and discussions of cultural information. The course is taught entirely in ASL. Must be taken with LISL 1A. Prerequisites: no prior study of ASL.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 1B. American Sign Language Conversation (2.5)
Small tutorial meetings with a signer of American Sign Language (ASL). Conversational practice organized around common everyday communicative situations. Must be taken with LISL 1BX. Prerequisites: LISL 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISL 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 1BX. Analysis of American Sign Language (2.5)
Study of American Sign Language (ASL) and analysis of its syntactic, morphological, and phonological features. Readings and discussions of cultural information. The course is taught entirely in ASL. Must be taken with LISL 1B. Prerequisites: LISL 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISL 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 1C. American Sign Language Conversation (2.5)
Small tutorial meetings with a signer of American Sign Language (ASL). Conversational practice organized around common everyday communicative situations. Must be taken with LISL 1CX. Prerequisites: LISL 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISL 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 1CX. Analysis of American Sign Language (2.5)
Study of American Sign Language (ASL) and analysis of its syntactic, morphological, and phonological features. Readings and discussions of cultural information. The course is taught entirely in ASL. Must be taken with LISL 1C. Prerequisites: LISL 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISL 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 1D. American Sign Language Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in American Sign Language. Emphasis on developing signing fluency and greater cultural awareness. Practice of the principal language functions needed for successful communication. Must be taken in conjunction with LISL 1DX. Successful completion of LISL 1D and LISL 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Eleanor Roosevelt and Revelle Colleges. Prerequisites: LISL 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISL 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 1DX. Analysis of American Sign Language (2.5)
Practice of the grammatical functions indispensable for comprehensible communication in the language. The course is taught entirely in American Sign Language. Must be taken in conjunction with LISL 1D. Successful completion of LISL 1D and LISL 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Eleanor Roosevelt and Revelle Colleges. Prerequisites: LISL 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISL 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 1E. Intermediate American Sign Language Conversation (4)
Course aims to improve language skills through discussion of topics relevant to the Deaf community. Central topics will include education and American Sign Language (ASL) literature. Conducted entirely in American Sign Language. Prerequisites: LISL 1D and LISL 1DX with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/American Sign Language (LISL) 5A, 5B, 5C. Fundamentals of American Sign Language (5)
This course concentrates on those language skills essential for communication: signing, comprehension, grammar analysis, and deaf culture. UC San Diego students: LISL 5A is equivalent to LISL 1A/1AX, LISL 5B to LISL 1B/BX, and LISL 5C to LISL 1C/1CX. Enrollment is limited. Prerequisites: none for 5A; for 5B two or more years of ASL in high school or the first semester of college-level ASL. (Offered in Summer Session only.)

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1A. Arabic Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1AX. Prerequisites: no prior study of Arabic.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1AX. Analysis of Arabic (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. This course is taught entirely in Arabic. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1A. Prerequisites: no prior study of Arabic.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1B. Arabic Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1BX. Prerequisites: LIAB 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIAB 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1BX. Analysis of Arabic (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. This course is taught entirely in Arabic. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1B. Prerequisites: LIAB 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIAB 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1C. Arabic Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1CX. Prerequisites: LIAB 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIAB 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1CX. Analysis of Arabic (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. This course is taught entirely in Arabic. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1C. Prerequisites: LIAB 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIAB 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1D. Arabic Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1DX. Successful completion of LIAB 1D and 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Revelle and Eleanor Roosevelt Colleges. Prerequisites: LIAB 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIAB 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1DX. Analysis of Arabic (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. This course is taught entirely in Arabic. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1D. Successful completion of LIAB 1D and 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Revelle and Eleanor Roosevelt Colleges. Prerequisites: LIAB 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIAB 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1E. Arabic Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1EX. Prerequisites: LIAB 1D with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent, and LIAB 1DX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1EX. Arabic Conversation (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in Arabic. Must be taken in conjunction with LIAB 1E. Prerequisites: LIAB 1D with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent, and LIAB 1DX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Arabic (LIAB) 1F. Intermediate Arabic Conversation and Analysis (4)
A course to increase the proficiency level of students who have completed LIAB 1E/1EX or who are at an equivalent level. Attention to listening comprehension, conversation, vocabulary building, reading, grammar analysis, and culture. Prerequisites: LIAB 1E or equivalent or LIAB 1EX.

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 1A. French Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIFR 1AX. Prerequisites: no prior study of French.

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 1AX. Analysis of French (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in French. Must be taken in conjunction with LIFR 1A. Prerequisites: no prior study of French.

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 1B. French Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIFR 1BX. Prerequisites: LIFR 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIFR 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 1BX. Analysis of French (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in French. Must be taken in conjunction with LIFR 1B. Prerequisites: LIFR 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIFR 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 1C. French Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIFR 1CX. Prerequisites: LIFR 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIFR 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 1CX. Analysis of French (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in French. Must be taken in conjunction with LIFR 1C. Prerequisites: LIFR 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIFR 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 1D. French Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in French. Emphasis on speaking, reading, writing, and culture. Practice of the language functions needed for successful communication. Must be taken in conjunction with LIFR 1DX. Successful completion of LIFR 1D and LIFR 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Eleanor Roosevelt and Revelle Colleges. Prerequisites: LIFR 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIFR 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 1DX. Analysis of French (2.5)
Practice of the grammatical functions indispensable for comprehensible communication in the language. The course is taught entirely in French. Must be taken in conjunction with LIFR 1D. Successful completion of LIFR 1D and LIFR 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Eleanor Roosevelt and Revelle Colleges. Prerequisites: LIFR 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIFR 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 5B, 5C, 5D. Fundamentals of French (5)
This course concentrates on those language skills essential for communication: listening comprehension, conversation, reading, writing, and grammar analysis. UC San Diego students: LIFR 5A is equivalent to LIFR 1A/1AX, LIFR 5B to LIFR 1B/1BX, LIFR 5C to LIFR 1C/1CX, and LIFR 5D to LIFR 1D/1DX. Enrollment is limited. Prerequisites: none for 5A; for 5B, two or more years of French in high school or the first semester of college-level French. (Offered in Summer Session only.)

Linguistics/French (LIFR) 11. Elementary French Reading (2–4)
A self-instructional program designed to prepare graduate students to meet reading requirements in French. After a one-week introduction to French orthography/ sound correspondence, students work with a self-instructional textbook. Midterm and final examinations. (F,W,S)

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 1A. German Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIGM 1AX. Prerequisites: no prior study of German.

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 1AX. Analysis of German (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in German. Must be taken with LIGM 1A. Prerequisites: no prior study of German.

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 1B. German Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIGM 1BX. Prerequisites: LIGM 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIGM 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 1BX. Analysis of German (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in German. Must be taken with LIGM 1B. Prerequisites: LIGM 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIGM 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 1C. German Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIGM 1CX. Prerequisites: LIGM 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIGM 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 1CX. Analysis of German (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in German. Must be taken with LIGM 1C. Prerequisites: LIGM 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIGM 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 1D. German Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in German. Emphasis on speaking, reading, writing, and culture. Practice of the language functions needed for successful communication. Must be taken in conjunction with LIGM 1DX. Successful completion of LIGM 1D and LIGM 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Eleanor Roosevelt and Revelle Colleges. Prerequisites: LIGM 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIGM 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 1DX. Analysis of German (2.5)
Practice of the grammatical functions indispensable for comprehensible communication in the language. The course is taught entirely in German. Must be taken in conjunction with LIGM 1D. Successful completion of LIGM 1D and LIGM 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Eleanor Roosevelt and Revelle Colleges. Prerequisites: LIGM 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIGM 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 11. Elementary German Reading (2–4)
A self-instructional program designed to prepare graduate students to meet reading requirements in German. After a one-week introduction to German orthography/sound correspondences, students work with a self-instructional textbook. Midterm and final examinations. (F,W,S)

Linguistics/German (LIGM) 5A, 5B, 5C, 5D. Fundamentals of German (5)
This course concentrates on those language skills essential for communication: listening comprehension, reading, writing, and grammar analysis. UC San Diego students: LIGM 5A is equivalent to LIGM 1A/1AX, LIGM 5B to LIGM 1B/1BX, and LIGM 5C to LIGM 1C/1CX. Enrollment is limited. Prerequisites: none for 5A; for 5B, two or more years of German in high school or the first semester of college-level German. (Offered in Summer Session only.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 16. Arabic Literacy for Arabic Speakers (4)
For students who already comprehend informal spoken Arabic but who have little or no reading and writing skills. Topics include the Arabic alphabet, basic reading and writing, and differences between colloquial and written Arabic. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 17. Persian Literacy for Persian Speakers (4)
For students who already comprehend informal spoken Persian but who have little or no reading and writing skills. Topics include the Persian alphabet, basic reading and writing, and differences between colloquial and written Persian. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 112F. Filipino for Filipino Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Filipino but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and family life/festivals; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Filipino. May not receive credit for both LIHL112 and LIHL112F. Courses may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 112W. Filipino for Filipino Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Filipino but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and media/arts; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Filipino. May not receive credit for both LIHL112 and LIHL112W. Courses may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 112P. Filipino for Filipino Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Filipino but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and entertainment/culture; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Filipino. May not receive credit for both LIHL112 and LIHL112P. Courses may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 132F. Advanced Filipino for Filipino Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on domestic culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Filipino. LIHL 132F, LIHL 132W, and LIHL 132P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 132W. Advanced Filipino for Filipino Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on media/arts. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Filipino. LIHL 132F, LIHL 132W, and LIHL 132P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 132P. Advanced Filipino for Filipino Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on entertainment/culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Filipino. LIHL 132F, LIHL 132W, and LIHL 132P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 113. Armenian for Armenian Speakers (4)
For students who already comprehend informal spoken Armenian but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and culture; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Armenian. Some speaking ability in Armenian recommended. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Not offered in 2015–16.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 114F. Vietnamese for Vietnamese Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Vietnamese but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and family life/festivals; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Vietnamese. LIHL 114F, LIHL 114W, and LIHL 114P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 114W. Vietnamese for Vietnamese Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Vietnamese but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and media/arts; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Vietnamese. LIHL 114F, LIHL 114W, and LIHL 114P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 134F. Advanced Vietnamese for Vietnamese Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on domestic culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Vietnamese. LIHL 134F, LIHL 134W, and LIHL 134P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 134W. Advanced Vietnamese for Vietnamese Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on media/arts. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Vietnamese. LIHL 134F, LIHL 134W, and LIHL 134P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 134P. Advanced Vietnamese for Vietnamese Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on entertainment/culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Vietnamese. LIHL 134F, LIHL 134W, and LIHL 134P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 115F. Korean for Korean Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Korean but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and family life/festivals; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Korean. LIHL 115F, LIHL 115W, and LIHL 115P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 115W. Korean for Korean Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Korean but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and media/arts; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Korean. LIHL 115F, LIHL 115W, and LIHL 115P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 115P. Korean for Korean Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Korean but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and entertainment/culture; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Korean. LIHL 115F, LIHL 115W, and LIHL 115P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 135F. Advanced Korean for Korean Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on domestic culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Korean LIHL 135F, LIHL 135W, and LIHL 135P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 135W. Advanced Korean for Korean Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on media/arts. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Korean. LIHL 135F, LIHL 135W, and LIHL 135P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 135P. Advanced Korean for Korean Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on entertainment/culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Korean. LIHL 135F, LIHL 135W, and LIHL 135P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 116F. Arabic for Arabic Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Arabic but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and family life/festivals; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Arabic. LIHL 116F, LIHL 116W, and LIHL 116P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 116W. Arabic for Arabic Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Arabic but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and media/arts; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Arabic. LIHL 116F, LIHL 116W, and LIHL 116P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 116P. Arabic for Arabic Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Arabic but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and entertainment/culture; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Arabic. LIHL 116F, LIHL 116W, and LIHL 116P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 136. Advanced Arabic for Arabic Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language functions required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Arabic. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 117F. Persian for Persian Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Persian but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and family life/festivals; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Persian. LIHL 117F, LIHL 117W, and LIHL 117P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 117W. Persian for Persian Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Persian but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and media/arts; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Persian. LIHL 117F, LIHL 117W, and LIHL 117P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 117P. Persian for Persian Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Persian but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and entertainment/culture; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Persian. LIHL 117F, LIHL 117W, and LIHL 117P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 137F. Advanced Persian for Persian Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on domestic culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Persian. LIHL 137F, LIHL 137W, and LIHL 137P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 137W. Advanced Persian for Persian Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on media/arts. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Persian. LIHL 137F, LIHL 137W, and LIHL 137P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 137P. Advanced Persian for Persian Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on entertainment/culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Persian. LIHL 137F, LIHL 137W, and LIHL 137P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 118. Cantonese for Cantonese Speakers (4)
For students who already comprehend informal spoken Cantonese but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and culture; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Cantonese. Some speaking ability in Cantonese recommended. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Not in offered 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 138. Advanced Cantonese for Cantonese Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language functions required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Cantonese. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Not in offered 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 119F. Hindi for Hindi Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Hindi but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and family life/festivals; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Hindi. LIHL 119F, LIHL 119W, and LIHL 119P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 119W. Hindi for Hindi Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Hindi but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and family media/arts; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Hindi. LIHL 119F, LIHL 119W, and LIHL 119P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 119P. Hindi for Hindi Speakers (4)
For students who comprehend informal spoken Hindi but wish to improve their communicative and sociocultural competence and their analytic understanding. Language functions for oral communication, reading, writing, and entertainment/culture; dialect and language style differences; structure and history of Hindi. LIHL 119F, LIHL 119W, and LIHL 119P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 139F. Advanced Hindi for Hindi Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on domestic culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Hindi. LIHL 139F, LIHL 139W, and LIHL 139P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 139W. Advanced Hindi for Hindi Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on media/arts. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Hindi. LIHL 139F, LIHL 139W, and LIHL 139P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Heritage Languages (LIHL) 139P. Advanced Hindi for Hindi Speakers (4)
Instruction stresses language function required for advanced oral communication, reading, writing, and cultural understanding in professional contexts, with emphasis on entertainment/culture. High-level vocabulary and texts; dialect differences and formal language styles (registers). Advanced structural analysis and history of Hindi. LIHL 139F, LIHL 139W, and LIHL 139P may be taken in any order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; appropriate proficiency for level.

Linguistics/Hindi (LIHI) 1A. Hindi Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIHI 1AX. Prerequisites: no prior study of Hindi. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Hindi (LIHI) 1AX. Analysis of Hindi (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. This course is taught entirely in Hindi. Must be taken in conjunction with LIHI 1A. Prerequisites: no prior study of Hindi. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Hindi (LIHI) 1B. Hindi Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIHI 1BX. Prerequisites: LIHI 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIHI 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Hindi (LIHI) 1BX. Analysis of Hindi (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. This course is taught entirely in Hindi. Must be taken in conjunction with LIHI 1B. Prerequisites: LIHI 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIHI 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Hindi (LIHI) 1C. Hindi Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIHI 1CX. Prerequisites: LIHI 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIHI 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Hindi (LIHI) 1CX. Analysis of Hindi (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. This course is taught entirely in Hindi. Must be taken in conjunction with LIHI 1C. Prerequisites: LIHI 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIHI 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Hindi (LIHI) 1D. Hindi Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIHI 1DX. Prerequisites: LIHI 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIHI 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Hindi (LIHI) 1DX. Analysis of Hindi (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. This course is taught entirely in Hindi. Must be taken in conjunction with LIHI 1D. Prerequisites: LIHI 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIHI 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent. (Not offered in 2016–17.)

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 1A. Italian Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIIT 1AX. Prerequisites: no prior study of Italian.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 1AX. Analysis of Italian (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in Italian. Must be taken with LIIT 1A. Prerequisites: no prior study of Italian.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 1B. Italian Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIIT 1BX. Prerequisites: LIIT 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIIT 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 1BX. Analysis of Italian (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in Italian. Must be taken with LIIT 1B. Prerequisites: LIIT 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIIT 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 1C. Italian Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIIT 1CX. Prerequisites: LIIT 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIIT 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 1CX. Analysis of Italian (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in Italian. Must be taken with LIIT 1C. Prerequisites: LIIT 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIIT 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 1D. Italian Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIIT 1DX. Successful completion of LIIT 1D and LIIT 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Revelle and Eleanor Roosevelt Colleges. Prerequisites: LIIT 1C and LIIT 1CX, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 1DX. Analysis of Italian (2.5)
Practice of the grammatical functions indispensable for comprehensible communication in the language. The course is taught entirely in Italian. Must be taken in conjunction with LIIT 1D. Successful completion of LIIT 1D and LIIT 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Revelle and Eleanor Roosevelt Colleges. Prerequisites: LIIT 1C and LIIT 1CX, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 5AS. Fundamentals of Italian I (5)
A communicative introduction to Italian for students with no prior exposure, with attention to listening comprehension, conversation, reading, writing, grammar analysis, and culture. Equivalent to LIIT 1A/1AX. Prerequisites: None.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 5BS. Fundamentals of Italian II (5)
A course to increase the proficiency level of students who have completed LIIT 1A/1AX, 5AS or who are at an equivalent level. Attention to listening comprehension, conversation, reading, writing, grammar analysis, and culture. Equivalent to LIIT 1B/1BX. Prerequisites: LIIT 1A/1AX, 5AS or consent of instructor.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 5CS. Fundamentals of Italian III (5)
A course to increase the proficiency level of students who have completed LIIT 1B/1BX, 5BS or who are at an equivalent level. Attention to listening comprehension, conversation, reading, writing, grammar analysis, and culture. Equivalent to LIIT 1C/1CX. Prerequisites: LIIT 1B/1BX, 5BS or consent of instructor.

Linguistics/Italian (LIIT) 5DS. Fundamentals of Italian IV (5)
A course to increase the proficiency level of students who have completed LIIT 1C/1CX, 5CS or who are at an equivalent level. Attention to listening comprehension, conversation, reading, writing, grammar analysis, and culture. Equivalent to LIIT1D/1DX. Prerequisites: LIIT 1C/1CX, 5CS or equivalent or consent of instructor.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 1A. Portuguese Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Emphasis on the language and culture of Brazil. Must be taken in conjunction with LIPO 1AX. Prerequisites: no prior study of Portuguese.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 1AX. Analysis of Portuguese (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and reading. The course is taught entirely in Portuguese. Must be taken in conjunction with LIPO 1A. Prerequisites: no prior study of Portuguese.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 1B. Portuguese Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Emphasis on the language and culture of Brazil. Must be taken in conjunction with LIPO 1BX. Prerequisites: LIPO 1A with a grade of C– or better or equivalent and LIPO 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 1BX. Analysis of Portuguese (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and reading. The course is taught entirely in Portuguese. Must be taken in conjunction with LIPO 1B. Prerequisites: LIPO 1A with a grade of C– or better or equivalent and LIPO 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 1C. Portuguese Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Emphasis on the language and culture of Brazil. Must be taken in conjunction with LIPO 1CX. Prerequisites: LIPO 1B with a grade of C– or better or equivalent and LIPO 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 1CX. Analysis of Portuguese (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and reading. The course is taught entirely in Portuguese. Must be taken in conjunction with LIPO 1C. Prerequisites: LIPO 1B with a grade of C– or better or equivalent and LIPO 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 1D. Portuguese Conversation (2.5)
Small conversion sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LIPO 1DX. Successful completion of LIPO 1D and LIPO 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Revelle and Eleanor Roosevelt Colleges. Prerequisites: LIPO 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LIPO 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 1DX. Analysis of Portuguese (2.5)
Practice of the grammatical functions indispensable for comprehensible communication in the language. The course is taught entirely in Portuguese. Must be taken in conjunction with LIPO 1D. Successful completion of LIPO 1D and LIPO 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Revelle and Eleanor Roosevelt Colleges. Prerequisites: LIPO 1C with a grade of C– or better or equivalent and LIPO 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 15. Intermediate Brazilian Portuguese for the Social Sciences: Social Movements (2.0)
Conducted entirely in Portuguese. Course aims to improve oral language skills through discussions of social science topics, with emphasis on social and political movements in contemporary Brazil. Course materials may encompass televised news broadcasts, newspapers, and periodicals. Prerequisites: LIPO 1D and 1DX or equivalent or by consent of the instructor.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 16. Intermediate Brazilian Portuguese for the Social Sciences: Cultural Movements (2.0)
Conducted entirely in Portuguese. Course aims to improve oral language skills through discussions of social science topics, with emphasis on culture and the arts in contemporary Brazil. Course materials may encompass televised news broadcasts, newspapers, and periodicals. Prerequisites: LIPO 1D and 1DX or equivalent or by consent of instructor.

Linguistics/Portuguese (LIPO) 17. Intermediate Brazilian Portuguese for the Social Sciences: Ethnicity (2.0)
Conducted entirely in Portuguese. Course aims to improve oral language skills through discussions of social science topics, with emphasis on the role of ethnicity in contemporary Brazil. Course materials may encompass televised news broadcasts, newspapers and periodicals. Prerequisites: LIPO 1D and 1DX or equivalent or by consent of instructor.

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 1A. Spanish Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LISP 1AX. Prerequisites: no prior study of Spanish.

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 1AX. Analysis of Spanish (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in Spanish. Must be taken with LISP 1A. Prerequisites: no prior study of Spanish.

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 1B. Spanish Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LISP 1BX. Prerequisites: LISP 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISP 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 1BX. Analysis of Spanish (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in Spanish. Must be taken with LISP 1B. Prerequisites: LISP 1A with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISP 1AX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 1C. Spanish Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in the target language. Emphasis on listening comprehension, speaking, vocabulary building, reading, and culture. Must be taken in conjunction with LISP 1CX. Prerequisites: LISP 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISP 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 1CX. Analysis of Spanish (2.5)
Presentation and practice of the basic grammatical structures needed for oral and written communication and for reading. The course is taught entirely in Spanish. Must be taken with LISP 1C. Prerequisites: LISP 1B with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISP 1BX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 1D. Spanish Conversation (2.5)
Small conversation sections taught entirely in Spanish. Emphasis on speaking, reading, writing, and culture. Practice of the language functions needed for successful communication. Must be taken in conjunction with LISP 1DX. Successful completion of LISP 1D and LISP 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Eleanor Roosevelt and Revelle Colleges. Prerequisites: LISP 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISP 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 1DX. Analysis of Spanish (2.5)
Practice of the grammatical functions indispensable for comprehensible communication in the language. The course is taught entirely in Spanish. Must be taken in conjunction with LISP 1D. Successful completion of LISP 1D and LISP 1DX satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Eleanor Roosevelt and Revelle Colleges. Prerequisites: LISP 1C with a grade of C– or better, or equivalent and LISP 1CX with a grade of D or better, or equivalent.

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 5A, 5B, 5C, 5D. Fundamentals of Spanish (5)
This course concentrates on those language skills essential for communication: listening comprehension, conversation, reading, writing, and grammar analysis. UC San Diego students: LISP 5A is equivalent to LISP 1A/1AX, LISP 5B to LISP 5B/5BX, LISP 5C to LISP 1C/1CX and LISP 5D to LISP 1D/1DX. Enrollment is limited. Prerequisites: none for 5A; for 5B, two or more years of Spanish in high school or the first semester or the first quarter of college-level Spanish. (Offered in Summer Session only.)

Linguistics/Spanish (LISP) 15, 16, 17. Intermediate Spanish for the Social Sciences (2)
Conducted entirely in Spanish. Course aims to improve oral language skills through discussions of social science topics, with emphasis on political events and current affairs. Course materials encompass televised news broadcasts, newspapers and periodicals. LISP 15 is offered fall quarter only, LISP 16 is offered winter quarter only, and LISP 17 is offered spring quarter only. Each course may be taken one time and need not be taken in sequence. Prerequisites: LISP 1D/DX or at least three semesters/four quarters of college Spanish or by permission of the instructor.

Linguistics (LIDS) 19. Directed Study—Language (2–4)
Introductory-level study of a language in the language laboratory on a self-instructional basis. Depending on the availability of appropriate study materials, the course may be taken in blocks of two or four units of credit and may be repeated up to the total number of units available for that language.

LTCH 101. Readings in Contemporary Chinese Literature (4)
Intended for students who have the competence to read contemporary Chinese texts, poetry, short stories, and criticism in vernacular Chinese. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTCO 201. Theories and Methods of Literary Analysis (4)
Contemporary theories of the significance of literary form. The seminar will concentrate on major interpretive approaches drawn from several areas of literary, cultural, and political analysis, including Marxist theory, feminism, psychoanalytic theory, postcolonial studies, LGBT studies, diaspora studies, and others. The particular focus and approach may vary. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

LTCO 202C. History of European Criticism and Aesthetics (4)
A core course for comparative literature, strongly recommended for all graduate students in the comparative literature program. A historical survey of criticism and aesthetics divided as follows: 202C, Romanticism to late nineteenth century.

LTCO 274. Genre Studies (4)
A consideration of a representative selection of works relating to a theme, form, or literary genre. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTCO 281. Literature and Film (4)
A study of literature and film in relation to one another, to critical and aesthetic theories, and to historical context. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTCO 282. Literature and Philosophy (4)
Questions and problems from the history of philosophy or from the various fields of philosophy (e.g., epistemology, ethics, logic) in their interaction with intellectual issues and questions addressed by literary criticism and theory. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTCO 283. Literature and Political Philosophy (4)
An inquiry into philosophical texts viewed as influential in comparative literature and political science (Plato, Aristotle, Augustine, Aquinas, Machiavelli, More, Hobbes, Locke, Hume, Kant, Herder, Hegel, Nietzsche, Kojeve, Foucault, Rawls, et al.). May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTCO 284. Performativity (4)
This interdisciplinary course looks at performativity as a social process of cultural significance. It examines the works of John Searle, Jacques Derrida, Judith Butler, and Jose Esteban Munoz and underlines the role of performative action in linguistic, literary, cinematic, theatrical, political, and other forms of human interactivity.

LTCO 285. Literature and Aesthetics (4)
Research in literary theory and aesthetic philosophies. Single and multiple authors and topics; Plato and Aristotle, Renaissance treatises, Winckleman, Kant and Hegel in the Enlightenment, Warburg, Heidegger and Panofsky, contemporary art theory, et al. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTCO 287. Culture and Political Theory (4)
A comparative approach of political theory based on historical periods (with the tools of new historicism), various cultures (inspired by anthropological research), and referring to the most important philosophical thinkers from Western and non-Western traditions. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTCO 297. Directed Studies: Reading Course (1–12)
This course may be designed according to an individual student’s needs when seminar offerings do not cover subjects, genres, or authors of interest. No paper required. The 297 courses do not count toward the seminar requirement. Repeatable for credit.

LTCO 298. Special Projects: Writing Course (1–12)
Similar to a 297, but a paper is required. Papers are usually on subjects not covered by seminar offerings. Up to two 298s may be applied toward the twelve-seminar requirement of the doctoral program. Repeatable for credit.

LTCO 299. Dissertation (1–12)
Research for the dissertation. Offered for repeated registration. Open only to PhD students who have advanced to candidacy.

LTCS 50. Introduction to Cultural Studies (4)
An introduction to cultural studies with a focus on the following areas: literary and historical studies, popular culture, women’s studies, ethnic studies, science studies, and gay/lesbian studies. Particular emphasis on the question of “cultural practices” and their social and political conditions and effects.

LTCS 52. Topics in Cultural Studies (4)
This course is designed to complement LTCS 50, Introduction to Cultural Studies. In this course, cultural studies methods are further introduced and applied to various concrete topics in order to illustrate the practical analysis of culture and cultural forms.

LTCS 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. Prerequisites: none.

LTCS 100. Theories and Methods in Cultural Studies (4)
Reading in some of the major theoretical texts that have framed work in cultural studies, with particular emphasis on those drawn from critical theory, studies in colonialism, cultural anthropology, feminism, semiotics, gay/lesbian studies, historicism, and psychoanalytic theory.

LTCS 102. Practicing Cultural Studies (4)
Survey and application of methods central to cultural studies as a critical social practice, examining the relationship between cultural studies and social transformation. Students will study varieties of material culture, and experiment with techniques of reading, interpretation, and intervention.

LTCS 110. Popular Culture (4)
A reading of recent theory on popular culture and a study of particular texts dealing with popular cultural practices, both contemporary and noncontemporary, as sites of conflict and struggle. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTCS 111. Special Topics in Popular Culture in Historical Context (4)
Exploration of forms of popular culture in different historical and geographical contexts. Topics may include: folklore, dime novels and other types of popular literature, racial performances, popular religions, theatrical melodrama, photojournalism, and early film. Repeatable for credit when readings and focus vary.

LTCS 120. Historical Perspectives on Culture (4)
The course will explore the relation among cultural production, institutions, history, and ideology during selected historical periods. In considering different kinds of texts, relations of power and knowledge at different historical moments will be discussed. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTCS 125. Cultural Perspectives on Immigration and Citizenship (4)
Introduction to the studies of cultural dimensions of immigration and citizenship. Examines the diverse cultural texts—literature, law, film, music, the televisual images, etc.—that both shape and are shaped by immigration and the idea of citizenship in different national and historical contexts.

LTCS 130. Gender, Race/Ethnicity, Class, and Culture (4)
The course will focus on the representation of gender, ethnicity, and class in cultural production in view of various contemporary theories of race, sex, and class. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTCS 131. Topics in Queer Cultures/Queer Subcultures (4)
This course examines the intersection of sex, sexuality, and popular culture by looking at the history of popular representations of queer sexuality and their relation to political movements for gay and lesbian rights. Repeatable for credit when readings and focus vary.

LTCS 132. Special Topics in Social Identities and the Media (4)
A study of media representation and various aspects of identity, such as gender, sexuality, race, ethnicity, social class, culture, and geopolitical location. Students will consider the various media of film, television, alternative video, advertising, music, and the Internet. Repeatable for credit when readings and focus vary.

LTCS 133. Globalization and Culture (4)
Studies of cultural dimensions of immigration and citizenship. This course examines the diverse cultural texts—literature, law, film, music, the televisual images, etc., that both shape and are shaped by immigration and the idea of citizenship in different national and historical contexts.

LTCS 134. Culture and Revolution (4)
This course examines the cultural practices of revolutionary societies from the French Revolution to present time. It focuses on China, Cuba, Russia, and Iran and explores how various cultural practices are produced in the course of building revolutionary societies.

LTCS 135. Interdisciplinary Approaches to Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, and Transgender Studies (4)
Introduction to interdisciplinary examination of human sexuality and, especially, lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender identities and desires. Juxtaposes perspectives from humanities, social sciences, and natural sciences. Introduces queer theory to understand sexuality in relation to phenomena such as government, family, culture, medicine, race, gender, and class.

LTCS 141. Special Topics in Race and Empire (4)
The role of race and culture within the history of empires; may select a single empire for consideration, such as France, Britain, U.S., or Japan, or choose to examine the role of race and culture in comparative histories of colonialism. Repeatable for credit when readings and focus vary.

LTCS 150. Topics in Cultural Studies (4)
The course will examine one or more forms of cultural production or cultural practice from a variety of theoretical and historical perspectives. Topics may include: contemporary debates on culture, genres of popular music/fiction/film, AIDS and culture, the history of sexuality, subcultural styles, etc. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTCS 155. Health, Illness, and Global Culture (4)
A medical humanities course that examines compelling written and cinematic accounts of health issues confronting contemporary societies such as environmental pollution, contaminated food supply, recreational drug use, HIV/AIDS, cancer, chronic conditions (allergies, diabetes, obesity, arthritis), famine, natural disasters, and war. May be taken for credit two times when topics vary.

LTCS 165. Special Topics: The Politics of Food
This course will examine the representation and politics of food in literary and other cultural texts. Topics may include: food and poverty, the fast food industry, controversies about seed, sustainable food production, myths about hunger, eating and epistemology, aesthetics, etc. Repeatable for credit up to three times when topics vary.

LTCS 170. Visual Culture (4)
The course will focus on visual practices and discourses in their intersection and overlap, from traditional media, print, and photography to film, video, TV, computers, medical scanners, and the Internet.

LTCS 172. Special Topics in Screening Race/Ethnicity, Gender and Sexuality (4)
Exploring both Hollywood and international filmmaking, an exploration of screen representations with attention to race/ethnicity, gender, and sexuality in different historical and linguistic contexts. Historical periods may extend from silent, through wartime and cold war, to contemporary era of globalization. Repeatable for credit when readings and focus vary.

LTCS 173. Topics in Violence and Visual Culture (4)
This course focuses on the critical study of representations of violence, such as war, genocide, sexual violence, and crime, across a range of media, including literature, film, photography, and other forms of visual culture. Repeatable for credit when readings and focus vary.

LTCS 180. Programming for the Humanities (4)
Introduction to a script programming language (like Python + NLTK or R) and its usages in the processing of literary and historical digital corpora. 

LTCS 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Directed group research, under the guidance of a member of the faculty, in an area not covered in courses currently offered by the department. (P/NP only.) Prerequisites: permission of the department.

LTCS 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Individual reading in an area not covered in courses currently offered by the department. (P/NP only.) Prerequisites: permission of the department.

LTCS 210. History and Culture (4)
This seminar will focus on the cultural practices of a particular historical period as a means of analyzing the relation between culture/ideology and economic and political modes of production and domination. Topic, historical period, and theoretical approach may vary. Repeatable for credit.

LTCS 222. Topics in Theory and History of Film (4)
This course will consider various theoretical approaches to film texts (historical-materialist, feminist, psychoanalytic, semiotic) as well as the history of film, the political economy of film production and distribution, exhibition practices, and spectatorship in national and transnational contexts. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTCS 225. Interdisciplinary and Historical Analysis of Cultural Texts (4)
The seminar will focus on a particular historical period and examine a variety of cultural texts vis-a-vis related historical, economic, political, and sociological discourses. The conjunction and disjunction of approaches will be explored in relation to specific texts. Repeatable for credit.

LTCS 250. Topics in Cultural Studies (4)
This seminar will be organized around any of various topic areas relating to cultural studies. These might include studies in colonialism, historicism, gender, sexuality, social institutions, popular culture, subaltern practices, etc. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTCS 256. Cultural Studies of Technoscience (4)
The course will explore work in cultural studies, feminist studies, and queer theory of scientific practices altering social relations, cultural identities, and conceptions of “nature.” Issues may include the AIDS pandemic, genetic research, electronic communities, reproductive technologies, and other topics. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTCS 257. City, Literature, and Modernity (4)
This new course explores relationship between city, literature, and modernity. It examines this relationship through key writers such as Charles Dickens, Mikhail Bakhtin, Walter Benjamin, Fredrick Jameson, Naguib Mahfouz, John Rechy, and Georg Simmel. S/U grades only.

LTCS 260. National Cultures (4)
Selected topics on the construction of national cultural identities. Investigation of the dynamics of canon formation and nation building in specific historical contexts. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTCS 297. Directed Studies: Reading Course (1–12)
This course may be designed according to an individual student’s needs when seminar offerings do not cover subjects, genres, or authors of interest. No paper required. The 297 courses do not count toward the seminar requirement. Repeatable for credit.

LTCS 298. Special Projects: Writing Course (1–12)
Similar to a 297, but a paper is required. Papers are usually on subjects not covered by seminar offerings. Up to two 298s may be applied toward the twelve-seminar requirement of the doctoral program. Repeatable for credit.

LTCS 299. Dissertation (1–12)
Research toward the dissertation. Open only to PhD students who have advanced to candidacy. Repeatable for credit.

LTEN 21. Introduction to the Literature of the British Isles: Pre-1660 (4)
An introduction to the literatures written in English in Britain before 1660, with a focus on the interaction of text and history.

LTEN 22. Introduction to the Literature of the British Isles: 1660–1832 (4)
An introduction to the literatures written in English in Britain and Ireland between 1660 and 1832, with a focus on the interaction of text and history.

LTEN 23. Introduction to the Literature of the British Isles: 1832–Present (4)
An introduction to the literatures written in English in Britain, Ireland, and the British Empire (and the former British Empire) from 1832 to the present, with a focus on the interaction of text and history.

LTEN 25. Introduction to the Literature of the United States, Beginnings to 1865 (4)
An introduction to the literatures written in English in the United States from the beginnings to 1865, with a focus on the interaction of text and history.

LTEN 26. Introduction to the Literature of the United States, 1865 to the Present (4)
An introduction to the literatures written in English in the United States from 1865 to the present, with a focus on the interaction of text and history.

LTEN 27. Introduction to African American Literature (4)
A lecture discussion course that examines a major topic or theme in African American literature as it is developed over time and across the literary genres of fiction, poetry, and belles lettres. A particular emphasis of the course is how African American writers have adhered to or departed from conventional definitions of genre.

LTEN 28. Introduction to Asian American Literature (4)
This course provides an introduction to the study of the history, communities, and cultures of different Asian American people in the United States. Students will examine different articulations, genres, conflicts, narrative forms, and characterizations of the varied Asian experience.

LTEN 29. Introduction to Chicano Literature (4)
This course provides an introduction to the literary production of the population of Mexican origin in the United States. Students will examine a variety of texts dealing with the historical (social, economic, and political) experiences of this heterogeneous population.

LTEN 30. Poetry for Physicists (4)
Physicists have spoken of the beauty of equations. The poet John Keats wrote, “Beauty is truth, truth beauty . . .” What did they mean? Students will consider such questions while reading relevant essays and poems. Requirements include one creative exercise or presentation. Students may not receive credit for both LTEN 30 and PHYS 30. Prerequisites: CAT 2 and 3 or DOC 2 and 3 or HUM 1 and 2 or MCWP 40 and 50 or MMW 12 and 13 or WARR 11A-B or WCWP 10A-B. Completion of college writing requirement.

LTEN 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. Prerequisites: none.

LTEN 107. Chaucer (4)
A study of Chaucer’s poetic development, beginning with The Book of the Duchess and The Parliament of Fowls, including Troilus and Criseyde, and concluding with substantial selections from The Canterbury Tales.

LTEN 110. Topics: The Renaissance (4)
Major literary works of the Renaissance, an exciting period of social and cultural transformation in England as elsewhere in Europe. Topics may include a central theme (e.g., humanism, reformation, revolution), a genre (e.g., pastoral), or comparison with other arts and sciences. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 112. Shakespeare I: The Elizabethan Period (4)
A lecture/discussion course exploring the development of Shakespeare’s dramatic powers in comedy, history, and tragedy, from the early plays to the middle of his career. Dramatic forms, themes, characters, and styles will be studied in the contexts of Shakespeare’s theatre and his society.

LTEN 113. Shakespeare II: The Jacobean Period (4)
A lecture/discussion course exploring the rich and varied achievements of Shakespeare’s later plays, including the major tragedies and late romances. Dramatic forms, themes, characters, and styles will be studied in the contexts of Shakespeare’s theatre and his society.

LTEN 117. Topics: The Seventeenth Century (4)
Selected topics in English literature during a period of social change, religious controversy, emergence of the New Science, and the English Civil War. The course may be devoted to one or more major authors, a particular genre, or a political, social, or literary issue. Readings chosen from writers including Jonson, Donne, Bacon, Milton, Marvell, and Dryden, among others. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 120. Topics: The Eighteenth Century (4)
Selected topics in English literature and culture during the “long eighteenth century,” the period between 1660 and 1830. Topics might include satiric writing, the theatre world, radical/reformist discourse, and the emergence of the professional woman writer. Writers include Behn, Wycherley, Congreve, Pope, Swift, Johnson, Wollstonecraft. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 124. Topics: The Nineteenth Century (4)
Selected topics in nineteenth-century British literature and culture, drawing on the Romantic and/or Victorian periods: e.g., relationships between literature and imperialism, social and political debate, gender issues, religion, or science. The course could focus solely on topics within either the Romantic or Victorian periods or comprehend writing in both periods. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 125. Romantic Poetry (4)
Studies in Romantic poetry, covering the first generation (Blake, Wordsworth, Coleridge and their contemporaries) and/or the second generation (Shelley, Keats, Byron and their contemporaries) of Romantic poets. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 127. Victorian Poetry (4)
Studies in the poetry of the Victorian age including writers such as Tennyson, the Brownings, Arnold, Rosetti, Hopkins, and their contemporaries. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 132. Modern Irish Literature (4)
The Irish Revival and its aftermath: Yeats, Synge, O'Casey, Joyce, Beckett, and their contemporaries. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 138. The British Novel: 1680–1790 (4)
Studies in the early period of the development of the English novel. Writers may include Behn, Defoe, Richardson, and Burney. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 140. The British Novel: 1790–1830 (4)
Studies in the early nineteenth century novel, such as the novels ofAusten, Wollstonecraft and/or Shelly, the Gothic novel, radical fiction of the 1790s. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 142. The British Novel: 1830–1890 (4)
Covers the early and midperiod Victorian novel, including such novelists as Dickens, the Brontes, Thackery, Eliot and their contemporaries. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 144. The British Novel: 1890 to Present (4)
Selected topics in the British novel from the late Victorian novel to present-day Black British fiction. Topics include colonial and post-colonial writing, modernism, and post-WWII fiction. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 148. Genres in English and American Literature (4)
An examination of one or more genres in English and/or American literature, for example, satire, science fiction, autobiography, comic drama. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 149. Topics: English-Language Literature (4)
A consideration of one of the themes that recur in many periods and cultural contexts of English-language literatures for instance, love, politics, identity, gender, race, class, or religion. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 150. Gender, Text, and Culture (4)
This course studies representations of the sexes and of their interrelationship in various forms of English-language writing produced during different phases of English history. Emphasis will be placed upon connections of gender and of literature to other modes of social belief, experience, and practice. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 152. The Origins of American Literature (4)
Studies in American written and oral literatures from the early colonial to the early national period (1620–1830), with emphasis on the thrust and continuity of American culture, social and intellectual, through the beginnings of major American writing in the first quarter of the nineteenth century. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 153. The Revolutionary War and the Early National Period in US Literature (4)
A critical examination of new texts of various kinds—written and oral, political, philosophical, and literary—functioned in the construction of the political body of the new American republic and the self-conception of its citizens. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 154. The American Renaissance (4)
A study of some of the chief works, and the linguistic, philosophical, and historical attitudes informing them, produced by such authors as Emerson, Hawthorne, Melville, Dickinson, and Whitman during the period 1836–1865, when the role of American writing in the national culture becomes an overriding concern. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 155. Interactions between American Literature and the Visual Arts (4)
An exploration of the connections between the work of individual writers, or movements, and the work of artists in various visual media. The writers studied are always American; the artists or art movements may represent non-American influences on these American writers. Topics could include portraiture and self-portraiture in visual arts and literature, or nature writing and landscape painting. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 156. American Literature from the Civil War to World War I (4)
A critical examination of works by such authors as Mark Twain, Henry James, Kate Chopin, and Edith Wharton, who were writing in an age when the frontier was conquered and American society began to experience massive industrialization and urbanization. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 157. Captivity and Prison Narratives (4)
A comparative study of narratives of experiences of incarceration, whether through acts of war, commerce, education, crime, or state-sponsored states of exception. Emphasis given to intercultural encounters, identity formation within these encounters, and state uses of and justifications for incarceration. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary.

LTEN 158. Modern American Literature (4)
A critical examination of American literature in several genres and other facets of US culture produced between the turn of the century and World War II. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 159. Contemporary American Literature (4)
A critical examination of American literature in several genres and other facets of US culture produced since World War II. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 169. Topics in Latino/a Literature (4)
The course will focus on selected topics in nineteenth-, twentieth-, and twenty-first-century Latino/a literature and culture in the U.S. from a socio-historical perspective. Topics may include issues of gender, sexuality, race, ethnicity, class, social struggle, and political resistance. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary.

LTEN 171. Comparative Issues in Latino/a Immigration in US Literature (4)
A critical examination of the configuration of Latino/a immigration in US literary and visual culture. The course will focus on Latino immigrant groups, analyzing their relocation in the U.S. from a theoretical, historical, and social perspective. May be taken for credit three times when topics vary.

LTEN 172. American Poetry II—Whitman through the Modernists (4)
Reading and interpretation of American poets from Whitman through the principal modernists—Pound, H.D., Eliot, Moore, Stevens, and others. Lectures will set the appropriate context in sociocultural and literary history.

LTEN 174. American Fiction II—Since Middle James (4)
Reading and interpretation of American fiction from Henry James through the principal modernists—Fitzgerald, Stein, Welty, Faulkner, and others. Lectures will set the appropriate context.

LTEN 175A. New American Fiction—Post-World War II to the Present (4)
Reading and interpretation of American fiction from the mid-1940s to the present. Lectures will set the appropriate context in sociocultural and literary history. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 175B. New American Poetry—Post-World War II to the Present (4)
Reading and interpretation of American poets whose work has made its major impact since the last war, for instance Charles Olson, Robert Creeley, Denise Levertov, Adrienne Rich, Allen Ginsberg, Frank O’Hara, and John Ashbery. Lectures will set the appropriate context in sociocultural and literary history. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEN 176. Major American Writers (4)
A study in depth of the works of major American writers. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 178. Comparative Ethnic Literature (4)
A lecture-discussion course that juxtaposes the experience of two or more US ethnic groups and examines their relationship with the dominant culture. Students will analyze a variety of texts representing the history of ethnicity in this country. Topics will vary.

LTEN 180. Chicano Literature in English (4)
Introduction to the literature in English by the Chicano population, the men and women of Mexican descent who live and write in the United States. Primary focus on the contemporary period.

LTEN 181. Asian American Literature (4)
Selected topics in the literature by men and women of Asian descent who live and write in the United States. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 183. African American Prose (4)
Analysis and discussion of the novel, the personal narrative, and other prose genres, with particular emphasis on the developing characteristics of African American narrative and the cultural and social circumstances that influence their development.

LTEN 184. African American Poetry (4)
Close reading and analysis of selected works of African American poetry as they reflect styles and themes that recur in the literature.

LTEN 185. Themes in African American Literature (4)
An intensive examination of a characteristic theme, special issue, or period in African American literature. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 186. Literature of the Harlem Renaissance (4)
The Harlem Renaissance (1917–39) focuses on the emergence of the “New Negro” and the impact of this concept on black literature, art, and music. Writers studied include Claude McKay, Zora N. Hurston, and Langston Hughes. Special emphasis on new themes and forms.

LTEN 188. Contemporary Caribbean Literature (4)
This course will focus on contemporary literature of the English-speaking Caribbean. The parallels and contrasts of this Third World literature with those of the Spanish- and French-speaking Caribbean will also be explored.

LTEN 189. Twentieth-Century Postcolonial Literatures (4)
The impact of British colonialism, national independence movements, postcolonial cultural trends, and women’s movements on the global production of literary texts in English. Course is organized by topic or geographical/historical location. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 192. Senior Seminar in Literatures in English (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in literature (at the upper-division level). Senior Seminars may be offered in all campus departments. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

LTEN 196. Honors Thesis (4)
Senior thesis research and writing for students who have been accepted for the Literature Honors Program and who have completed LTWL 191. Oral exam. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTEN 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial; individual guided reading in an area not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times.(P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: department approval.

LTEN 222. Elizabethan Studies (4)
Selected topics in the study of literary, dramatic, and other Elizabethan cultural texts. Emphasis will be upon articulations among a range of discourses, practices, and institutions. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 231. Restoration and Eighteenth-Century English Literature (4)
Consideration of one or more figures, texts, or trends in Restoration and eighteenth-century English literature, including Dryden, Pope, Swift, the early novel, satire. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEN 245. Nineteenth-Century American Studies (4)
Consideration of some of the principal writers and movements in nineteenth-century American literature. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEN 246. Victorian Literature (4)
Consideration of one or more major figures, texts, or trends in the Victorian period. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEN 252. Studies in Modern American Literature and Culture (4)
Consideration of one or more major figures, texts, or trends in American literature, in particular the relationship between literature and culture. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEN 254. Topics in US Minority Literatures and Cultures (4)
Consideration of one or more topics in “minority” traditions of cultural production in the United States, with an emphasis on the relationship among history, politics, and culture. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEN 256. Postcolonial Discourses (4)
A survey of selected responses to imperialism and colonialism as presented in cultural texts produced by colonized or once-colonized peoples. Related issues to be examined: gender dynamics, class, representing others, mimicry, language, cultural theory, and the politics of literary genres. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 258. Studies in Anglophone African and/or African Diaspora Literature and Culture (4)
Consideration of one or more major figures, texts, performance or trends in literature and culture of Africa and/or the African Diaspora. Various theories and methodologies may be applied to the representations being studied. Repeatable for credit as topics vary.

LTEN 259. Transnational Literary Studies (4)
New developments in the study of literature in diverse frameworks, including but not limited to: globalization, queer theory, diaspora studies, environmentalism, world literary systems, international literary awards, transnational feminism, literary markets, human rights discourse, and translation studies.

LTEN 271. Genres in English (4)
Consideration of one or more genres present in English and/or American literature; for instance, the ballad, landscape poetry, comedy, satire, the familiar essay. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 272. Cultural Traditions in English (4)
The study of writing produced over an extended period of time by members of an identifiable cultural formation as defined (e.g., by political/social ideology, class, religion, ethnicity, or sexual preference). May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTEN 281. Practicum in Literary Research and Criticism (4)
This course will focus on strategies for framing, organizing, and drafting projects in literary research. Students will study and apply various forms of literary methodology and will learn about recent developments in bibliography, textual editing, and research. May be repeated twice for credit as topics vary.

LTEN 297. Directed Studies: Reading Course (1–12)
This course may be designed according to an individual student’s needs when seminar offerings do not cover subjects, genres, or authors of interest. No paper required. The 297 courses do not count toward the seminar requirement. Repeatable for credit.

LTEN 298. Special Projects: Writing Course (1–12)
Similar to a 297, but a paper is required. Papers are usually on subject not covered by seminar offerings. Up to two 298s may be applied toward the twelve-seminar requirement of the doctoral program. Repeatable for credit.

LTEN 299. Dissertation (1–12)
Research for the dissertation. Offered for repeated registration. Open only to PhD students who have advanced to candidacy.

LTFR 2A. Intermediate French I (5)
First course in a three-quarter sequence designed to prepare students for upper-division French courses. The course is taught entirely in French and emphasizes the development of reading ability, listening comprehension, and conversational and writing skills. Basic techniques of literary analysis. Prerequisites: LIFR 1C/CX or its equivalent, score of 3 on French language AP exam or consent of instructor.

LTFR 2B. Intermediate French II (5)
Second course in a three-quarter sequence designed to prepare students for upper-division French courses. The course is taught entirely in French and emphasizes the development of reading ability, listening comprehension, and conversational and writing skills. Basic techniques of literary analysis. Prerequisites: LTFR 2A or its equivalent, score of 4 on French language or score of 3 on French literature AP exams or consent of instructor.

LTFR 2C. Intermediate French III: Composition and Cultural Contexts (4)
Designed to improve writing and conversational skills. Develop written expression in terms of organization or ideas, structure, vocabulary. Grammar review. Discussions of contemporary novel and film. May be taken in lieu of LTFR 50 as a prerequisite for upper-division courses. Prerequisites: LTFR 2B or its equivalent, score of 5 on French language or score of 4 on French literature AP exams or consent of instructor.

LTFR 21. Conversation Workshop I (1)
Designed to allow students to practice and develop their oral skills by expanding the vocabulary necessary to discuss abstract ideas and by building up the confidence necessary to participate in literature classes. Prerequisites: LIFR 1C/1CX or 1D/1DX or LTFR 2A or LTFR 2B or LTFR 2C or LTFR 50 or consent of instructor.

LTFR 31. Conversation Workshop II (1)
A one-credit, one class-a-week course to develop and maintain oral skills at an advanced level by discussing current cultural issues of the francophone world. Prerequisites: LTFR 2B or consent of instructor.

LTFR 50. Intermediate French III: Textual Analysis (4)
Third course in a three-quarter sequence designed to prepare students for upper-division French courses. The course is taught entirely in French and emphasizes the development of reading ability, listening comprehension, and conversational and writing skills. It also introduces the student to basic techniques of literary analysis. Prerequisites: LTFR 2B or its equivalent, score of 5 on French language AP exam, or consent of instructor.

LTFR 115. Themes in Intellectual and Literary History (4)
Course in a two-quarter sequence designed as an introduction to French literature and literary history. Each quarter will center on a specific theme or problem. It is recommended that majors whose primary literature is French take this sequence as early as possible. Course may be repeated up to three times when the topic and the assigned readings are different. Prerequisites: LTFR 50 or LTFR 2C.

LTFR 116. Themes in Intellectual and Literary History (4)
Course in a two-quarter sequence designed as an introduction to French literature and literary history. Each quarter will center on a specific theme or problem. It is recommended that majors whose primary literature is French take this sequence as early as possible. Course may be repeated up to three times when the topic and the assigned readings are different. Prerequisites: LTFR 50 or LTFR 2C.

LTFR 121. The Middle Ages and the Renaissance (4)
Major literary works of the Middle Ages and Renaissance as seen against the historical and intellectual background of the period. Medieval texts in modern French translation. May be repeated for credit as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTFR 115 or 116.

LTFR 122. Topics in Seventeenth-Century French Literature (4)
This course will cover major literary works and problems of seventeenth-century French literature. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTFR 115 or 116.

LTFR 123. Eighteenth Century (4)
Major literary works and problems of the eighteenth century. May be repeated for credit as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTFR 115 or 116.

LTFR 124. Nineteenth Century (4)
Major literary works of the nineteenth century. May be repeated for credit as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTFR 115 or 116.

LTFR 125. Twentieth Century (4)
Major literary works and problems of the twentieth century. May be repeated for credit as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTFR 115 or 116.

LTFR 141. Topics in Literatures in French (4)
Examines one or more periods, themes, authors, and approaches in French literature. Topics will vary with instructor. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: LTFR 115 or 116.

LTFR 142. Topics in Literary Genres in French (4)
An examination of one or more major or minor genres of French literature: for example, drama, novel, poetry, satire, prose poem, essay. Prerequisites: LTFR 115 or 116.

LTFR 143. Topics in Major Authors in French (4)
A study in depth of the works of a major French writer. Recommended for students whose primary literature is French. May be repeated for credit as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTFR 115 or 116.

LTFR 164. Topics in Modern French Culture (4)
A course on changing topics such as France during the 1960s, contemporary social and cultural structures (the school system, economy, political parties), myths of America in France, etc. May be repeated for credit as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTFR 115 or 116.

LTFR 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial; individual guided reading in areas of French literature not normally covered in courses. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: departmental approval.

LTFR 297. Directed Studies: Reading Course (1–12)
This course may be designed according to an individual student’s needs when seminar offerings do not cover subjects, genres, or authors of interest. No paper required. The 297 courses do not count toward the seminar requirement. Repeatable for credit.

LTFR 298. Special Projects: Writing Course (1–12)
Similar to a 297, but a paper is required. Papers are usually on subjects not covered by seminar offerings. Up to two 298s may be applied toward the twelve-seminar requirement of the doctoral program. Repeatable for credit.

LTFR 299. Dissertation (1–12)
Research for the dissertation. Offered for repeated registration. Open only to PhD students who have advanced to candidacy.

LTGM 2A. Intermediate German I (5)
LTGM 2A follows the basic language sequence of the Department of Linguistics and emphasizes the development of reading ability, listening comprehension, and conversational and writing skills. The course includes grammar review and class discussion of reading and audio-visual materials. Specifically, the course prepares students for LIGM 2B and 2C. Prerequisites: LTGM 1C/1CX or its equivalent or score of 3 on AP German language exam or consent of instructor.

LTGM 2B. Intermediate German II (5)
LTGM 2B is a continuation of LTGM 2A for those students who intend to practice their skills in reading, listening comprehension, and writing on a more advanced level. The literary texts are supplemented by readings from other disciplines as well as audio-visual materials. Prerequisites: LTGM 2A or score of 4 on AP German language exam or consent of instructor.

LTGM 2C. Intermediate German III (4)
A course designed for students who wish to improve their ability to speak and write German. Students will read and discuss a variety of texts and films, and complete the grammar review begun in 2A. 2C emphasizes speaking, writing, and critical thinking, and prepares students for upper-division course work in German. Prerequisites: LTGM 2B or equivalent or score of 5 on AP German language exam or consent of instructor.

LTGM 100. German Studies I: Aesthetic Cultures (4)
This course offers an overview of German aesthetic culture in its various forms (literature, film, art, music, and architecture) and methods of analysis. Materials will explore the diversity of aesthetic production from the eighteenth century to the present.

LTGM 101. German Studies II: National Identities (4)
This course offers an overview of issues in contemporary and historical German cultures. How has national identity been constructed in the past? What does it mean to be a German in the new Europe? Materials include fiction, historical documents, films, and the Internet.

LTGM 130. German Literary Prose (4)
The development of major forms and modes of German literary prose. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTGM 132. German Poetry (4)
The development of major forms and modes of German verse. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTGM 134. New German Cinema (4)
A survey of German cinema from the late 1960s to the early 1980s. Focus on films by such directors as Fassbinder, Herzog, Kluge, Schlӧndorff, von Trotta, and Wenders viewed in historical and cultural context. May be taken credit three times when topics vary.

LTGM 190. Seminars in German Culture (4)
These seminars are devoted to a variety of special topics, including the works of single authors, genre studies, problems in literary history, relations between literature and the history of ideas, literary criticism, literature and society, and the like. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTGM 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial; individual guided reading in areas of German literature not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: department approval.

LTGM 297. Directed Studies: Reading Course (1–12)
This course may be designed according to an individual student’s needs when seminar offerings do not cover subjects, genres, or authors of interest. No paper required. The 297 courses do not count toward the seminar requirement. Repeatable for credit.

LTGM 298. Special Projects: Writing Course (1–12)
Similar to a 297, but a paper is required. Papers are usually on subjects not covered by seminar offerings. Up to two 298s may be applied toward the twelve-seminar requirement of the doctoral program. Repeatable for credit.

LTGK 1. Beginning Greek (4)
Study of ancient Greek, including grammar and reading.

LTGK 2. Intermediate Greek (I) (4)
Continuation of study of ancient Greek, including grammar and reading. Prerequisites: LTGK 1 or equivalent.

LTGK 3. Intermediate Greek (II) (4)
Continuation of study of ancient Greek, including grammar and reading of texts. Prerequisites: LTGK 1 and 2 or equivalent.

LTGK 101. Greek Composition (4)
Greek prose composition. Corequisites: student must be concurrently enrolled in upper-division Literature/Greek course numbered 102 or above.

LTGK 102. Greek Poetry (4)
Readings in Greek from ancient Greek poetry. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTGK 1, 2, and 3.

LTGK 103. Greek Drama (4)
Readings in Greek from ancient Greek drama. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTGK 1, 2, and 3.

LTGK 104. Greek Prose (4)
Readings in Greek from ancient Greek prose. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTGK 1, 2, and 3.

LTGK 105. Topics in Greek Literature (4)
Readings in Greek covering specific topics in ancient Greek literature. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTGK 1, 2, and 3.

LTGK 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Directed group study in areas of Greek literature not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: department approval.

LTIT 2A. Intermediate Italian I (5)
A second-year course in Italian language and literature. Conversation, composition, grammar review, and an introduction to literary and nonliterary texts. Prerequisites: LTIT 1C or LIIT 1C/1CX or its equivalent or a score of 3 on AP Italian Language and Culture Exam or placement result of 3 or 4 on the Language Placement Exam–Italian or consent of instructor.

LTIT 2B. Intermediate Italian II (5)
Continuation of second-year Italian language and literature. Reading, writing, conversation, grammar review, and an introduction to literary genres and contemporary Italian culture and society. Prerequisites: LTIT 2A or its equivalent, or consent of instructor, or a score of 4 on the AP Italian Language and Culture exam.

LTIT 50. Advanced Italian (4)
This course constitutes the sixth and final quarter of the Italian language sequence. It offers an intensive study of Italian grammar, drills in conversation and composition, and readings in modern Italian literature. Prerequisites: LTIT 2A and 2B, or consent of instructor.

LTIT 100. Introduction to Literatures in Italian (4)
Reading and discussion of selections from representative authors. Review of grammar as needed. May be repeated for credit three times when topics vary. Prerequisites: LTIT 50 or its equivalent, or consent of instructor, or a score of 5 on the AP Italian Language and Culture exam.

LTIT 113. Love, War, and Conquest in the Italian Renaissance (4)
A critical reading of Italian Renaissance texts with special attention to those themes, forms, and ideological conflicts still operative in today’s culture. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTIT 115. Medieval Studies (4)
Studies in medieval culture and thought with focus on one of the “three crowns” of Italian literature: Dante, Boccaccio, or Petrarca. May be repeated for credit when course content varies.

LTIT 122. Studies in Modern Italian Culture (4)
Politics, literature, and cultural issues of twentieth-century Italy. May be repeated for credit when topics vary. Prerequisites: LTIT 50.

LTIT 161. Advanced Stylistics and Conversation (4)
Analysis of Italian essays, journalism, literature. Intensive practice in writing and Italian conversation. Prerequisites: LTIT 100 or consent of instructor.

LTIT 192. Senior Seminar in Literatures in Italian (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in literature (at the upper-division level). Senior Seminars may be offered in all campus departments. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

LTIT 196. Honors Thesis (4)
Senior thesis research and writing for students who have been accepted for the literature honors program and who have completed LTWL 191. Oral examination. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTIT 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Directed group study in areas of Italian literature not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: department approval.

LTIT 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial; individual guided reading in areas of Italian literature not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: department approval.

LTKO 1A. Beginning Korean: First Year I (5)
Students develop beginning-level skills in the Korean language, beginning with an introduction to the writing and sound system. The remainder of the course will focus on basic sentence structures and expressions. Prerequisites: placement test required.

LTKO 1B. Beginning Korean: First Year II (5)
Students develop beginning-level skills in the Korean language, with an introduction to the writing and sound system. The remainder of the course will focus on basic sentence structures and expressions. Prerequisites: LTKO 1A, or placement test and consent of instructor.

LTKO 1C. Beginning Korean: First Year III (5)
Students develop beginning-level skills in the Korean language, beginning with an introduction to the writing and sound system. The remainder of the course will focus on basic sentence structures and expressions. Prerequisites: LTKO 1B.

LTKO 2A-B-C. Intermediate Korean: Second Year I-II-III (5-5-5)
This course will help students develop intermediate-level skills in the Korean language. Upon completion of this course, students are expected to have good command of Korean in various daily conversational situations. Prerequisites: LTKO 1C or placement test for 2A; 2A for 2B; 2B for 2C.

LTKO 2D. Intermediate-Advanced Korean I (5)
This course is designed to develop intermediate-advanced level skills for students in the areas of listening, speaking, reading, and writing in Korean, as well as expand their cultural understanding, with coverage of authentic Korean reading and listening materials. Prerequisites: LTKO 2C or equivalent level of Korean language proficiency.

LTKO 2E. Intermediate-Advanced Korean II (5)
This course is designed to develop intermediate-advanced level skills for students in the areas of listening, speaking, reading, and writing in Korean, as well as expand their cultural understanding, with coverage of authentic Korean reading and listening materials. Prerequisites: LTKO 2D or equivalent level of Korean language proficiency.

LTKO 3. Advanced Korean: Third Year (5)
This course will help students develop advanced-level skills in the Korean language. Upon completion of this course, students are expected to have good command of Korean in various formal settings and to understand daily news broadcasts/newspapers. Prerequisites: LTKO 2C or placement test and consent of instructor.

LTKO 11.  Conversation Workshop I (1)
This conversation course is designed to assist nonheritage Korean students, with minimum grounding in Korean, to practice and develop conversational fluency and confidence in everyday interactions in Korean. The focus of this course is on vocabulary development and advancement of oral proficiency in Korean. Recommended preparation: This course is recommended for nonheritage Korean students who take the First-Year Korean LTKO 1B or LTKO 1C as an adjunct. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTKO 1A or consent of instructor.

LTKO 21.  Conversation Workshop II (1)
This course is designed to assist nonheritage Korean students to practice and develop conversational fluency and confidence in everyday interactions. The focus is on vocabulary development and advancement of oral proficiency. Recommended for nonheritage Korean students who take LTKO 1B or LTKO 1C as an adjunct. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTKO 1A, placement test, and consent of instructor.

LTKO 100. Readings in Korean Literature and Culture (4)
Majors issues in modern Korean history from colonial period to present, such as Japanese colonization, division, US/Soviet occupation, the Korean War, and authoritarian rule, industrialization, labor/agrarian movement and cultural/social issues, emerging within the globalized economy in South Korea. Prerequisites: reading knowledge of Korean (two years college-level Korean or equivalent).

LTKO 149. Readings in Korean Language History and Structure (4)
This course is designed to develop cultural understanding and professional/academic level reading skill for students with coverage of materials on Korean language history from the fifteenth century to the present, previous and current writing systems, and Korean language structure. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTKO 3 or equivalent.

LTLA 1. Beginning Latin (4)
Study of Latin, including grammar and reading.

LTLA 2. Intermediate Latin (I) (4)
Study of Latin, including grammar and reading. Prerequisites: LTLA 1 or equivalent.

LTLA 3. Intermediate Latin (II) (4)
Study of Latin, including grammar and reading. Prerequisites: LTLA 2 or equivalent.

LTLA 4. Intensive Elementary Latin (12)
Equivalent of LTLA 1, 2, and 3. Given in summer session only.

LTLA 100. Introduction to Latin Literature (4)
Reading and discussion of selections from representative authors of one or more periods. Review of grammar as needed. Prerequisites: LTLA 3 or equivalent.

LTLA 102. Latin Poetry (4)
Readings in Latin from Latin poetry. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTLA 1, 2, and 3.

LTLA 103. Latin Drama (4)
Readings in Latin from Latin drama. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTLA 1, 2, and 3.

LTLA 104. Latin Prose (4)
Readings in Latin from Latin prose. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTLA 1, 2, and 3.

LTLA 105. Topics in Latin Literature (4)
Readings in Latin covering specific topics in Latin literature. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTLA 1, 2, and 3.

LTLA 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Directed group study in areas of Latin literature not normally covered in courses. May be repeated three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: department approval.

LTLA 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial; individual guided reading in areas of Latin literature not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: department approval.

LTRU 1A-B-C. First-Year Russian (5-5-5)
First-year Russian, with attention to reading, writing, and speaking.

LTRU 2A-B-C. Second-Year Russian (5-5-5)
Second-year Russian grammar, with attention to reading, writing, and speaking. Prerequisites: LTRU 1A-B-C or equivalent.

LTRU104A-B-C. Advanced Practicum in Russian (4-4-4)
Development of advanced skills in reading, writing, and conversation. Course based on written and oral texts of various genres and styles. Individualized program to meet specific student needs. Prerequisite for 104A: LTRU 2C or equivalent.

LTRU 110A-B-C. Survey of Russian and Soviet Literature in Translation, 1800–Present (4-4-4)
A study of literary works from Pushkin to the present. LTRU 110A is not a prerequisite for LTRU 110B, and LTRU 110B is not a prerequisite for LTRU 110C.

LTRU 123. Single Author in Russian Literature in Translation (4)
Study of the works of a single Russian author. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTRU 150. Russian Culture (4)
An introduction to Russia’s past and present through the cross-disciplinary study of literature, the visual and performing arts, social and political thought, civic rituals, popular entertainments, values and practices from 1825 to the present. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

LTRU 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Directed group study in areas of Russian literature not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing and permission of department.

LTRU 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial; individual guided reading in areas of Russian literature not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing and permission of department.

LTSP 2A. Intermediate Spanish I: Foundations (5)
Course is taught in Spanish, emphasizing the development of reading ability, listening comprehension, and writing skills. It includes grammar review, weekly compositions, and class discussions. Successful completion of LTSP 2A satisfies the requirement for language proficiency in Revelle College. Prerequisites: completion of LISP 1C/1CX or LISP 1D/DX, or the equivalent or score of 3 on AP Spanish Language Exam, or placement result of 3 or 4 the Language Placement Exam—Spanish, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 2B. Intermediate Spanish II: Readings and Composition (5)
Review of major points of grammar with emphasis on critical reading and interpretation of Spanish texts through class discussions, vocabulary development, and written compositions. It is a continuation of LTSP 2A. Prerequisites: LTSP 2A or score of 4 on AP Spanish language or 3 on AP Spanish literature exams or consent of instructor.

LTSP 2C. Intermediate Spanish III: Cultural Topics and Composition (4)
Continuation of LTSP 2B, with special emphasis in writing and translation. It includes discussion of cultural topics as well as grammar review and composition, further developing the ability to read articles, essays, and longer pieces of fiction/nonfictional texts. Prerequisites: LTSP 2B or equivalent or score of 5 on AP Spanish language or 4 on AP Spanish literature exams or consent of instructor.

LTSP 2D. Intermediate/Advanced Spanish: Spanish for Bilingual Speakers (4)
Spanish for native speakers. Designed for bilingual students seeking to become biliterate. Reading and writing skills stressed with special emphasis on improvement of written expression and problems of grammar and orthography. Prepares native speakers with little or no formal training in Spanish for more advanced courses. Prerequisites: native speaking ability and/or recommendation of instructor.

LTSP 2E. Advanced Readings and Composition for Bilingual Speakers (4)
Second course in a sequence designed for bilingual students seeking to become biliterate. Special emphasis given to improvement of written expression, grammar, and orthography. Prepares bilingual students with little or no formal training in Spanish for more advanced course work. Prerequisites: LTSP 2D and/or recommendation of instructor.

LTSP 21. Conversation Workshop I (1)
Allows students with a basic grounding in Spanish to discuss a variety of topics related to literary and cultural issues. Vocabulary development, use of idiomatic expression, and advancement of oral proficiency in Spanish. May be taken as an adjunct to lower-division LTSP courses. Recommended for students planning to study abroad. Prerequisites: LISP IC/ICX or LISP ID/IDX or LTSP 2A or 2B or 2C or 2D or 2E or 50A or 50B or 50C.

LTSP 31. Conversation Workshop II (1)
Enhances intermediate/advanced students’ command of spoken Spanish through debates on literary and cultural issues and the formulation and expression of thoughts in Spanish. May be taken as an adjunct to lower- and upper-division LTSP courses. Recommended for students planning to study abroad. Prerequisites: LISP IC/ICX or LISP ID/IDX or LTSP 2A or 2B or 2C or 2D or 2E or 50A or 50B or 50C.

LTSP 41. Conversation and Orthography Workshop (1)
The workshop format of this course allows students to attain a stronger command of skills in matters of Spanish orthography, spelling, punctuation, and accent rules. May be taken as an adjunct to lower- or upper-division LTSP courses. Recommended for students planning to study abroad. Prerequisites: LISP IC/ICX or LISP ID/IDX or LTSP 2A or 2B or 2C or 2D or 2E or 50A or 50B or 50C.

LTSP 50A. Readings in Peninsular Literature (4)
An introduction to Peninsular literature, this course offers a selection of authors and genres, introducing students to literary analysis through reading extensive texts in Spanish. Two or more quarters of LTSP 50 are suggested before proceeding to upper-division courses. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTSP 2C or 2E.

LTSP 50B. Readings in Latin American Literature (4)
An introduction to Latin American literature, this course offers a selection of authors and genres, introducing students to literary analysis through reading extensive texts in Spanish. Two or more quarters of LTSP 50 are suggested before proceeding to upper-division courses. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTSP 2C or 2E.

LTSP 50C. Readings in Latin American Topics (4)
An introduction to major topics in Latin American literature, this course focuses on the literature of a particular region, period, or movement. Introduces students to literary analysis through reading extensive texts in Spanish. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTSP 2C or 2E.

LTSP 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

LTSP 100. Major Works of the Middle Ages (4)
Major Spanish literary works of the Middle Ages and Renaissance as seen against the historical and intellectual background of this period. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 116. Representations of Spanish Colonialism (4)
Analysis of selected materials that represent the cultural and political relationship between Spain and its colonies. Close reading of literary texts and historical documents. Specific periods covered will fall between the origins of empire in the early sixteenth century to the demise of imperial Spain in 1898; topics may include cultural exchanges between Spain and Latin America, the Philippines, or the US Southwest. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 119C. Cervantes: Don Quixote (4)
Close reading of the 1605 and 1615 texts with special attention to the social and cultural background of the early seventeenth century in Spain. This course fulfills the pre-1900 requirement for Spanish literature majors. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 123. Topics in Modern Spanish Culture (4)
Investigation of selected topics concerning Spanish cultural production after 1800. Topics might focus on a genre (film, popular novel, theatre) or on the transformations of a theme or metaphor (nation, femininity, the uncanny). May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 129. Spanish Writing after 1939 (4)
Analysis and discussion of literary production during and after the Franco dictatorship. May focus on specific genres, sub-period, or issues. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 130B. Development of Latin American Literature (4)
An introduction to major movements and periods in Latin American literature, centered on a study of key works from pre-Columbian to the present time. Texts will be seen within their sociohistorical context and in relation to main artistic trends of the period. This course fulfills the pre-1900 requirement for Spanish literature majors. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 133. Contemporary Latin American Literature (4)
A study of the major literary works and problems in Latin America from 1900 to the present as seen against the historical context of the period. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 134. Literature of the Southern Cone (4)
Study of movements, traditions, key authors, or major trends in Argentine, Paraguayan, Uruguayan, and Chilean literatures, such as gaucho poetry, the realist novel, modern urban narratives, and the Borges School, etc. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 135A. Mexican Literature before 1910 (4)
Explores the relationships among cultural production, politics, and societal changes in Mexico before the 1910 Revolution, specifically the roles of intellectuals and popular culture in nation-building and modernization. Readings may include didactic literature and historiographic writings, forms of popular discourse, as well as novels and poetry. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 135B. Modern Mexican Literature (4)
Study of popular novels, movements, traditions, key authors, or major trends in modern Mexican literature. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 136. Andean Literatures (4)
Study of movements, traditions, key authors, or major trends in Peruvian, Ecuadorian, and Bolivian literatures, such as indigenismo, urban narrative, and the works of authors such as Vallejo, Icaza, Arguedas, Vargas Llosa. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 137. Caribbean Literature (4)
Study of movements, traditions, key authors, or major trends in Caribbean literature in Spanish, such as the romantic movement, the literature of independence, the essay tradition, Afro-Antillean literature, the historical novel. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 138. Central American Literature (4)
Study of movements, traditions, key authors, or major trends in the literatures of Guatemala, El Salvador, Nicaragua, Honduras, Costa Rica, and Panama, such as the anti-imperialist novel, indigenismo, guerrilla poetry, and testimonio. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 140. Latin American Novel (4)
A study in depth of selected novelists of Latin America. May be organized around a specific theme or idea that is traced in its development through the narratives. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 141. Latin American Poetry (4)
A critical study of some of the major poets of Latin America, focusing on the poet’s central themes, the evolution of poetic style, and the significance of the poetry to the historical context. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 142. Latin American Short Story (4)
Readings and interpretation of the Latin American short story. Focus is primarily nineteenth and/or twentieth century. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 150A. Early Latino/a-Chicano/a Cultural Production: 1848 to 1960 (4)
Cross-disciplinary study of nineteenth- and early twentieth-century Latino/a-Chicano/a literature, folklore, music, testimonio, or other cultural practices. Specific periods covered will fall between the immediate aftermath of the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo to the Cuban revolution. May be taken for credit no more than two times. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 150B. Contemporary Chicano/a-Latino/a Cultural Production: 1960 to Present (4)
Cross-disciplinary study of late twentieth-century Latino/a-Chicano/a literature, the visual and performing arts, film, or other cultural practices. Specific periods covered will fall between the Kennedy years to the era of neoliberalism and the creation of “Hispanic” or Latino identities. May be taken for credit no more than two times. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 159.  Methodological Approaches to the Study of History and Culture in Latin America and the Caribbean (4)
An introduction to methodological and historical trends in Latin American and Caribbean cultural and literary studies. This course includes cultural representations from Latin America and the Caribbean such as film, literature, art, music, and/or photography. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 160. Spanish Phonetics (4)
A comparative study of the English and Spanish phonetic systems. Includes a study of the organs of articulation, manner of articulation stress and intonation patterns, as well as dialectal variations of Spanish. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 166.  Creative Writing (4)
A workshop designed to foster and encourage writing in Spanish of students working on short forms of fiction. The workshop will include discussions of techniques and intensive writing. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 171. Studies in Peninsular and/or Latin American Literature and Society (4)
Focus on the interaction between literary expression and the study of society, covering issues such as the sociology of literature, the historical novel, literature and social change, the writer as the intellectual. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 172. Indigenista Themes in Latin American Literature (4)
Study of the literary modes by which nineteenth- and twentieth-century authors have interpreted the themes of indigenous survival and resistance in Latin America, primarily in Mexico and the Andean region. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 174. Topics in Culture and Politics (4)
Study of the relationships between cultural production (literature, film, popular cultures), social change, and political conflict, covering topics such as colonialism, imperialism, modernization, social movements, dictatorship, revolution. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 175. Gender, Sexuality, and Culture (4)
This course will examine issues of gender, sexuality, and culture in Spanish, Latin American, and/or Chicana/o literatures. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 176. Literature and Nation (4)
Study of literature as a means through which the nation has been imagined and as a site of debates over national identity and citizenship. Course materials may focus on Spain and/or Latin America. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 177. Literary and Historical Migrations (4)
This course will focus on a variety of Latin American and/or Spanish intra- and inter-national migrations throughout the world and on the literature produced by these exiles or immigrants. May be taken for credit two times as topics vary. Prerequisites: LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C, or consent of instructor.

LTSP 196. Honors Thesis (4)
Senior thesis research and writing for students who have been accepted for the Literature Honors Program and who have completed LTWL 191. Oral Exam. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTSP 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial: individual guided reading in areas of Spanish literature not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department approval.

LTSP 224. Golden Age Studies (4)
Consideration of one or more major figures, texts, trends, or problems in Spanish Golden Age studies. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTSP 258. Spanish American Prose (4)
Consideration of one or more major figures, texts, trends, or problems in Spanish American prose. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTSP 272. Literature and Society Studies (4)
Special topics in practical criticism involving social and economic historical perspectives. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTSP 297. Directed Studies: Reading Course (1–12)
This course may be designed according to an individual student’s needs when seminar offerings do not cover subjects, genres, or authors of interest. No paper required. The 297 courses do not count toward the seminar requirement. Repeatable for credit.

LTSP 298. Special Projects: Writing Course (1–12)
Similar to a 297, but a paper is required. Papers are usually on subjects not covered by seminar offerings. Up to two 298s may be applied toward the twelve-seminar requirement of the doctoral program. Repeatable for credit.

LTSP 299. Dissertation (1–12)
Research for the dissertation. Offered for repeated registration. Open only to PhD students who have advanced to candidacy.

LTTH 110. History of Criticism (4)
A critical and interpretive review of some of the major documents in criticism from the classical period to the present time.

LTTH 115. Introduction to Critical Theory (4)
A critical review of major contemporary theories of the nature of literature, its sociocultural function, and appropriate modes of evaluation.

LTTH 150. Topics in Critical Theory (4)
Selected topics in critical theory such as a particular mode of literary theory; comparative study of theories of text and image; a problem or theme in the history of theory; and issues involved in the relationship between fiction and other discourses (science, law, history, philosophy, music). Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTTH 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Directed group study, under the guidance of a member of the faculty, in an area not covered in courses currently offered by the department. (P/NP only.)

LTTH 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Individual reading in an area not covered in courses currently offered by the department. (P/NP only.)

LTTH 200A. Text/Culture/Critical Practice (4)
An introduction to theories and practices of literary and cultural criticism. Topics may vary, but emphasis will be on terminology, methods of readings, modes of interdisciplinary analysis and argumentation, recent debates on questions of theory, history, textual scholarships, etc. Prerequisites: registered doctoral student in literature and department stamp.

LTTH 200B. Problems in Contemporary Literary Theory (4)
The focus is feminist literary/cultural theories and their relations with major contemporary theoretical discourses (e.g., psychoanalysis, poststructuralism, and various forms of historicism). Prerequisites: LTTH 200A, registered doctoral student in literature, and department stamp.

LTTH 200C. Cultural Perspectives and Cultural Criticism (4)
Literary and cultural relations between the First and Third Worlds, colonialism and neo-colonialism, orality and literacy, construction of ethnicity, formation of canon, and popular culture and the market. Prerequisites: LTTH 200B, department stamp, and registered doctoral student in literature.

LTTH 201. Contemporary Theoretical Debates and Critical Discourses (4)
An introduction to a wide range of theoretical and methodological issues, schools of thought, and interpretative styles in contemporary literary studies. Required of all MA students in the Department of Literature, normally in their first quarter in the program. Prerequisites: admission to the MA program in the Department of Literature or consent of instructor.

LTTH 250. Writing and Theory (4)
An overview of issues in modern critical theory as they pertain to writers. Will focus on issues of textuality, cultural forms, and aesthetics as they impact the process and meaning of writing. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTTH 255. Modern Art Movements and Aesthetics (4)
An introduction to modernist aesthetics with a focus on art and literary movements. Particular attention to be placed on relationships between modern literary movements (realism, imagism, surrealism) and their counterparts in visual arts, music, dance, and theatre, and the ways in which literary movements are components of or responses to issues of political and social identity. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTTH 298. Special Projects: Writing Course (1–12)
Similar to a 297, but a paper is required. Papers are usually on subjects not covered by seminar offerings. Up to two 298s may be applied toward the twelve-seminar requirement of the doctoral program. Repeatable for credit.

LTAF 110. African Oral Literature (4)
Survey of various genres of African and oral literary traditions. Oral narrative genres, investigation of proverb, riddle, praise poetry, and epic. Development and use of a methodology to analyze aspects of performance, composition, and education in oral traditional systems.

LTAF 120. Literature and Film of Modern Africa (4)
This course traces the rise of modern literature in traditional African societies disrupted by the colonial and neocolonial experience. Contemporary films by African and Western artists will provide an additional insight into the complex social self-images of the continent.

LTAM 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

LTAM 100. Latino/a Cultures in the United States (4)
An introductory historical and cultural overview of the various Latino/a populations in the United States with a study of representative cultural texts.

LTAM 101. Early Latino/a-Chicano/a Cultures: 1848–1960 (4)
A cross-disciplinary study of nineteenth- and early twentieth-century Latino/a-Chicano/a literature, the visual and performing arts, and other cultural practices. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTAM 105. Gender and Sexuality in Latino/a Cultural Production (4)
A study of the construction of differences in gender and sexual orientation in Latino/a-Chicano/a literature and other cultural production with an emphasis on examining various theoretical/ideological perspectives on these issues. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTAM 106. Modern Chicana and Mexican Women Writings (4)
A study of themes and issues in the writings of Chicana and Mexican women with a view toward establishing connections while recognizing national and cultural differences between the two. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTAM 107. Comparative Latino/a and US Ethnic Cultures (4)
A comparative and intersecting study of Latino/a and other US ethnic cultures. Literary texts will be viewed as “windows” into real time and spaces where cultures meet and mix. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTAM 108. Chicano/a and Latino/a Cultures: Intellectual and Political Traditions (4)
The course will center on Chicano/a-Latino/a writers and movements of literary, intellectual, cultural, or political significance. Texts may be read in the original language or in English. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTAM 109. Cultural Production of the Latino/a Diasporas (4)
A study of the cultural production of Latino/a immigrant groups with a focus on the literary representation of homeland, national culture, and the forces that led to migration. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTAM 110. Latin American Literature in Translation (4)
Reading of representative works in Latin American literature with a view to literary analysis (form, theme, meaning), the developmental processes of the literature, and the many contexts: historical, social, cultural. Texts may be read in English. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTAM 111. Comparative Caribbean Discourse (4)
Comparative survey of Caribbean literatures from the Spanish, French, English, and Dutch Caribbean. Literary texts trace historical paradigms including the development of plantation slavery, emancipation, the quest for nationhood, migration, and transnational identities. Films and music may complement discussion.

LTAM 120. Iranian-American Culture (4)
Examines the growing Iranian-American culture, focusing on developments in Iranian-American cinematic and popular culture.

LTAM 130. Reading North by South (4)
An analysis of the readings and appropriations of European and US traditions by Latin American, Caribbean, and Filipino writers. The course addresses philosophies, ideologies, and cultural movements and explores the specific literary strategies used by authors in constructing their particular “cosmovisión.”

LTAM 140. Topics in Culture and Politics (4)
Study of the relationships between cultural production (literature, film, popular culture), social change, and political conflict, covering topics such as colonialism, imperialism, modernization, social movements, dictatorship, and revolution. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTEA 100A. Classical Chinese Poetry in Translation (4)
A survey of different genres of traditional Chinese poetry from various periods.

LTEA 100B. Modern Chinese Poetry in Translation (4)
A survey of Chinese poetry written in the vernacular from 1918 to 1949.

LTEA 100C. Contemporary Chinese Poetry in Translation (4)
A survey of Chinese poetic development from 1949 to the present.

LTEA 110A. Classical Chinese Fiction in Translation (4)
The course will focus on a few representative masterpieces of Chinese literature in its classical age, with emphasis on the formal conventions and the social or intellectual presuppositions that are indispensable to their understanding. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTEA 110B. Modern Chinese Fiction in Translation (4)
A survey of representative works of the modern period from 1919 to 1949. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTEA 110C. Contemporary Chinese Fiction in Translation (4)
An introductory survey of representative texts produced after 1949 with particular emphasis on the social, cultural, and political changes. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary.

LTEA 120A. Chinese Films (4)
A survey of representative films from different periods of Chinese cinematic development. Priority may be given to Chinese studies majors and literature majors. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTEA 120B. Taiwan Films (4)
A survey of “New Taiwan Cinema” of the eighties and nineties. Priority may be given to Chinese studies majors and literature majors. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTEA 120C. Hong Kong Films (4)
An examination of representative works of different film genres from Hong Kong. Priority may be given to Chinese studies majors and literature majors. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTEA 132. Later Japanese Literature in Translation (4)
An introduction to later Japanese (kogo) literature in translation. Will focus on several “modern” works, placing their form in the historical context. No knowledge of Japanese required. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTEA 138. Japanese Films (4)
An introduction to Japanese films. Attention given to representative Japanese directors (e.g., Ozu), form (e.g., anime), genre (e.g. feminist revenge horror), or historical context in which films are produced. Priority may be given to Japanese studies majors and literature majors.

LTEA 140. Modern Korean Literature in Translation from Colonial Period (4)
A survey of modern Korean prose fiction and poetry from the colonial period. Exploration of major issues such as Japanese colonization, rise of left-wing and right-wing nationalisms, construction of national culture, and relations between tradition and modernity.

LTEA 141. Modern Korean Literature in Translation from 1945 to Present (4)
A survey of modern Korean prose fiction and poetry from 1945 to the 1990s. Examination of literary representations of national division, the Korean War, accelerated industrialization, authoritarian rule, and the labor/agrarian movements.

LTEA 142. Korean Film, Literature, and Popular Culture (4)
A study of modern Korean society and its major historical issues as represented in film, literature, and other popular cultural media such as TV and music video. We will explore additional issues such as cinematic adaptations of prose fiction, fluid distinctions between popular literature and “serious” literature, and the role of mass media under authoritarian rule.

LTEA 143. Gender and Sexuality in Korean Literature and Culture (4)
A study of constructions of gender and sexuality in premodern and modern Korean societies. We will discuss literary works as well as historical and ethnographic works on gender relations, representations of masculinity and femininity, and changing roles of men and women in work and family.

LTEA 144. Korean American Literature and Other Literatures of Korean Diaspora (4)
An examination of the experiences of the Korean diaspora linked to the historical contexts of modern Korea, Japan, the United States, and other countries. We will focus on literature both about Korea and the Korean immigrant experience written in the United States but will also read from and about other Korean diasporic contexts.

LTEA 151. Readings in Tagalog Literature and Culture I (4)
Course will concentrate on selections of literature, history, and cultural texts (painting, drama, religious artifacts) of the 1896 Philippine revolution and the succeeding US takeover of the Philippines. Intermediate fluency in speaking, reading, and writing Tagalog. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTEA 152A. Topics in Filipino Literature and Culture (Nineteenth Century–World War II) (4)
Surveys the authors, intellectual currents, and cultural politics of Filipino culture from the 1850s to World War II. Topics may include the legacy of Spanish colonialism, European enlightenment, and the emergence of nationalism and socialism, and Filipino literature in English. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEA 152B. Topics in Filipino Literature and Culture (World War II–Present) (4)
Surveys the authors, intellectual currents, and cultural politics of Filipino culture from World War II to the present. Topics may include the dual lingua franca, the birth of “Filipino-American” literature, the culture of dictatorship, and new approaches to narrative. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEA 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial; individual guided reading in areas not normally covered in courses. (P/NP grades only.)

LTEU 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

LTEU 105. Medieval Studies (4)
Studies in medieval culture and thought with focus on one of the “three crowns” of Italian literature: Dante, Boccaccio, or Petrarca. May be repeated for credit when course content varies.

LTEU 109. Studies in Eighteenth-Century European Literature (4)
Topics to be considered include the age of sensibility, enlightenment, neoclassicism. Attention given to historical and cultural contexts.

LTEU 110. European Romanticism (4)
Attention given to historical and cultural contexts. Topics to be considered include the concept of nature, the reaction to science, the role of the imagination.

LTEU 111. European Realism (4)
This course focuses on nineteenth-century European realism in historical and cultural context. Topics include definitions of realism, the impact of urbanization and industrialization on literary forms and themes, and relations between realism in literature and the visual arts. May be repeated up to three times for credit when topics vary.

LTEU 125. Faust in European Literature (4)
This course focuses on the theme of Faust in European literature from the Renaissance to the present, including works by Marlowe, Goethe, Bulgakov, and Thomas Mann. Concentration on how authors adapted the theme to differing national and historical contexts.

LTEU 130. German Literature in Translation (4)
One or more aspects of German literature, such as major authors, the contemporary novel, nineteenth-century poetry, German expressionism. Texts may be read in English or the original language. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEU 137. Seminars in German Culture (4)
These seminars are devoted to a variety of special topics, including the works of single authors, genre studies, problems in literary history, relations between literature and the history of ideas, literary criticism, literature and society, and the like.

LTEU 139. Marx/Nietzsche/Freud (4)
Intensive examination of the major ideas of all three writers, with special attention to the literary styles and problematic aspects of their work.

LTEU 140. Italian Literature in Translation (4)
One or more periods and authors in Italian literature. Texts will be read in English. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEU 145. Studies in Modern Italian Poetry (4)
Study of the chief modern Italian poets, including Montale, Ungaretti, and Quasimodo, with attention to long, poetic form and contemporary Italian culture. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTEU 147. Women in Italy (4)
A study of historical, political, and literary texts regarding women and feminism in Italian society.

LTEU 150A-B-C. Survey of Russian and Soviet Literature in Translation, 1800 to the Present (4-4-4)
A study of literary works from Pushkin to the present.

LTEU 154. Russian Culture (4)
An introduction to Russia’s past and present through the cross-disciplinary study of literature, the visual and performing arts, social and political thought, civic rituals, popular entertainments, values and practices from 1825 to the present.

LTEU 158. Single Author in Russian Literature in Translation (4)
A study of literary works by a single Russian author. All readings will be in English. May be repeated for credit when authors vary.

LTWL 4A-C-D-F-M. Film and Fiction in Twentieth-Century Societies (4)
A study of modern culture and of the way it is expressed and understood in novels, stories, and films. The sequence aims at an understanding of relationship between the narrative arts and society in the twentieth century, with the individual quarters treating fiction and film of the following language groups. 4A French, 4C Asian, 4D Italian, 4M multiple national literatures and film, 4F Spanish.

LTWL 19A-B-C. Introduction to the Ancient Greeks and Romans (4-4-4)
An introductory study of ancient Greece and Rome, their literature, myth, philosophy, history, and art.

LTWL 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

TWS 21-22-23-24-25-26. Third World Literatures (4-4-4-4-4-4)
(See entry under “Third World Studies” heading.)

LTWL 100. Mythology (4)
A study of various bodies of myth: their content, form, and meaning. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTWL 106. The Classical Tradition (4)
Greek and Roman literature in translation. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTWL 108. Words and Their Vicissitudes (4)
The history of English and its forebears, focusing on the quirky nature of semantic change in order to equip students with a basis for evaluating metaphor, metonymy, and other forms of verbal deviance.

LTWL 110B. Folk and Fairy Tales (4)
A study of folk and fairy tales from various cultures, from the point of view of literary form, psychological meaning, and cultural function. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTWL 111. Medieval Studies (4)
A lecture/discussion course designed to explore a variety of topics in medieval literatures and cultures. Topics may include a genre or combination of genres (e.g., drama, romance, lyric, allegory), or a central theme (e.g., the Crusades or courtly love).

LTWL 114. Children’s Literature (4)
A study of literature written for children in various cultures and periods. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTWL 116. Adolescent Literature (4)
A study of fiction written for the young adult in various cultures and periods. Consideration will be given to the young adult hero in fiction. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTWL 120. Popular Literature and Culture (4)
A study of various popular forms—such as pop music, cult books, film, fashion, magazines, graphic arts—within a broader cultural context. Focus may be on a particular genre (e.g., best sellers) or era (e.g., the sixties). May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTWL 123. Vampires in Literature (4)
A study of representations of the vampire through a variety of methodological perspectives with an emphasis on historical context and cultural symbolism.

LTWL 124. Science Fiction (4)
An exploration of the genre—past and present, in literature and the visual media—as a cultural response to scientific and technological change, as modern mythmaking, and as an enterprise serving a substantial fan subculture. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTWL 128. Introduction to Semiotics and Applications (4)
Semiotics, basically a theory of signification, describes the models and conceptual constructs through which meaning is grasped and produced. Background in the history of semiotics and its dominant models.

LTWL 129. Wisdom: The Literature of Authority (4)
What is wisdom? Does wisdom refer to a specific type of discourse; a literary genre; a specific content that holds true transculturally and transtemporally? This class will consider these questions by reading literature from diverse times and places.

LTWL 134. Cinema and Islam (4)
This course examines histories and theories of cinema and Islam. It offers an overview on intersections between film and religious experience in various Muslim cultures, and how such experiences are ultimately grounded in shifting historical and social settings.

LTWL 135. The Buddhist Imaginary (4)
An introduction to the imaginative universe of Indian Buddhism, with a focus on the connection between cosmological models and liberative practices. In this class we read Buddhist narrative and doctrinal literatures, supplemented by archaeological and art historical artifacts.

LTWL 136. Socially Engaged Buddhism (4)
This course explores the writings of Buddhists who actively engage with the problems of the world: social, environmental, economic, political. We will examine the historical development of engaged Buddhism in light of traditional Buddhist concepts of morality, interdependence, and liberation.

LTWL 138. Critical Religion Studies (4)
Selected topics, texts, and problems in the study of religion. May be repeated for credit when content varies.

LTWL 139. Gnosticism: The Religious Underground from Late Antiquity to the New Age (4)
A survey of Gnostic currents in religious thought which influenced the Abrahamic traditions of Judaism, Christianity, and Islam, and which resurfaced periodically as heretical challenges to these mainstream traditions and their doctrinal orthodoxies.

LTWL 140. Novel and History in the Third World (4)
This course sets out to explore the relation between the novel and the “dependent” history of the Third World, contrasting and comparing the uses of history in the European novel as defined in the theoretical analysis of Lukacs with uses of history in the Third World novel. An analysis of major themes and movements common to selected ethnic literature in the United States and national literatures in the Third World.

LTWL 141. Islam and Modernity (4)
A survey of developments in the Islamic world during the period of European colonial domination and its aftermath, with special attention to the works of leading Muslim thinkers (e.g., Sayid Ahmed Khan, Muhammad Abduh, Hasan al Banna, Ruhallah Khomeini, among others).

LTWL 143. Arab Literatures and Cultures (4)
Lecture/discussion course focusing on Arab literatures and cultures. It could offer study of any period of Arab cultures, from ante-Islam to the contemporary world. Topics may include themes (e.g., gender, social critique) or focus on specific genres or aesthetics (film, novel, realism). May be taken for credit three times as topics vary.

LTWL 144.  Islam and Cinema (4)
This course examines the relationship between cinema and Islam. It looks at how Islam is represented through various cinematic genres and historical periods from 1920s to the present.

LTWL 150. Modernity and Literature (4)
Explores the various cross-cultural historical, philosophical, and aesthetic ideas which formed the basis of most twentieth-century literature. Literature from the Americas, Europe, Asia, and Africa will be studied through lectures and the reading of texts in English translation. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTWL 155. Gender Studies (4)
The study of the construction of sexual differences in literature and culture. May be repeated for credit when topics vary.

LTWL 157. Iranian Film (4)
Course sets out to explore the history and theory of Iranian films in the context of the country’s political, cultural, and religious settings since 1945. Students are expected to watch and discuss Iranian films, particularly the postrevolutionary films of Kiarostami and Mokhbalbaf.

LTWL 158A. Topics in the New Testament (4)
Literary and socio-historical considerations of the diverse writings that developed into the New Testament. Topics include Jewish origins of the “Jesus movement” within Greco-Roman culture; varying patterns of belief/practice among earliest communities; oral tradition and development of canon.

LTWL 158B. Topics in Early Christian Texts and Cultures (4)
This course investigates the manner in which texts shape religious identities on the individual and communal level in sociohistorical and cultural contexts: various topics include portraits of Jesus, saints lives, death and afterlife, martyrdom, demonology, apocalypticism, Christianity, and empire.

LTWL 158C. Topics in Other Christianities (4)
A survey of the Christian texts that comprise the fatalities of the battles defining Christian canon: e.g., apocryphal acts, noncanonical gospels, and “Gnostic” texts. Considers the social communities, theological views, religious identities, and practices reflected in largely forgotten texts.

LTWL 159. Digital Middle East: Culture, Politics, and Religion (4)
This course examines the role of Information Communication Technologies (ICTs) such as the Internet, mobile, and satellite TV in the reshaping of the Middle East and North Africa. It will focus on how ICTs like the Internet are changing culture, politics, and religion in the region and implication of such transformations.

LTWL 160. Women and Literature (4)
This course will explore the relationship between women and literature, i.e., women as producers of literature, as objects of literary discourse, and as readers. Foreign language texts will be read in translation. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTWL 165. Literature and the Environment (4)
With primarily American (and a couple of English) readings, the course inquires into the relation of human and nonhuman nature. Topics include wilderness, animals, Native American thought, women in nature, description as a kind of writing, the spirituality of place.

LTWL 168. Death and Desire in India (4)
This class investigates the link between desire and death in classical and modern Hindu thought. It considers the stories of Hindu deities, as well as the lives of contemporary South Asian men and women, in literature and film.

LTWL 169. Yoga, Body, and Transformation (4)
This class investigates yoga as a practice aimed at integrating the body, intellect, and spirit. It considers a range of sources and representations, from foundational works in classical Sanskrit through the sometimes kitschy, sometimes serious, spirituality of contemporary pop culture.

LTWL 172. Special Topics in Literature (4)
Studies in specialized literary, philosophic, and artistic movements, approaches to literature, literary ideas, historical moments, etc.

LTWL 176. Literature and Ideas (4)
The course will center on writers or movements of international literary, cultural, or ideological significance. The texts studied, if foreign, may be read either in the original language or in English. May be repeated for credit as topics vary.

LTWL 180. Film Studies and Literature: Film History (4)
The study of film history and its effects upon methods of styles in literary history. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTWL 181. Film Studies and Literature: Film Movement (4)
Study of analogies between literary movements and film movements. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTWL 183. Film Studies and Literature: Director’s Work (4)
Methods of criticism of author’s work applied to the study and analysis of film director’s style and work. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTWL 184. Film Studies and Literature: Close Analysis of Filmic Text (4)
Methods of literary analysis applied to the study of shots, sequences, poetics, and deep structure in filmic discourse. Repeatable for credit when topics vary.

LTWL 191. Honors Seminar (4)
Explorations in critical theory and method. This course, designed to prepare students to write an honors thesis, is open only to literature majors invited into the department’s Honors Program.

LTWL 192. Senior Seminar in Literatures of the World (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in literature (at the upper-division level). Senior Seminars may be offered in all campus departments. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

LTWL 194. Capstone Course for Literature Majors (4)
An advanced seminar open to all literature majors in their senior year. Required for those interested in the Honors Program. It offers an integrative experience by considering key facets of the discipline, including literary theory/historiography, knowledge of neighboring disciplines, and relevance of literature/culture studies in various professions outside of academia. Prerequisites: senior standing.

LTWL 194A. Honors Practicum (1)
Honors practicum for those students in the literature department Honors Program. This is a one-unit course for which students in the Honors Program will present their work as part of organized panels at an Honors Program conference (within the department). Students will receive a P/NP grade for LTWL 194A for completing the presentation. Prerequisites: LTWL 194 or LTWR 194, and senior standing.

LTWL 196. Honors Thesis (4)
Senior thesis research and writing for students who have been accepted for the Literature Honors Program and who have completed LTWL 191. Oral exam. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWL 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Research seminars and research, under the direction of faculty member. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWL 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial; individual guided reading in areas of literature (in translation) not normally covered in courses. May be repeated for credit three times. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department approval.

LTWL 500. Apprentice Teaching in Literature (2 or 4)
Consideration of pedagogical methods appropriate to undergraduate teaching in literature courses under the supervision of instructor of course. Doctoral students in literature are required to participate in undergraduate teaching for a minimum of twelve units (two to four units per quarter) prior to completion of the PhD degree.

LTWL 501. Apprentice Teaching in Humanities (2 or 4)
Consideration of pedagogical methods appropriate to undergraduate teaching in humanities sequences under the supervision of instructor of course. Doctoral students in literature are required to participate in undergraduate teaching for a minimum of twelve units (two to four units per quarter) prior to completion of the PhD degree.

LTWL 503. Apprentice Teaching in Marshall College (2 or 4)
Consideration of pedagogical methods appropriate to undergraduate teaching in Marshall College courses under the supervision of instructor of course. Doctoral students in literature are required to participate in undergraduate teaching for a minimum of twelve units (two to four units per quarter) prior to completion of the PhD degree.

LTWL 504. Apprentice Teaching in Warren College (2 or 4)
Consideration of pedagogical methods appropriate to undergraduate teaching in Warren College courses under the supervision of instructor of course. Doctoral students in literature are required to participate in undergraduate teaching for a minimum of twelve units (two to four units per quarter) prior to completion of the PhD degree.

LTWL 506. Apprentice Teaching in Roosevelt College (2 or 4)
Consideration of pedagogical methods appropriate to undergraduate teaching in Eleanor Roosevelt College courses under the supervision of instructor of course. Doctoral students in literature are required to participate in undergraduate teaching for a minimum of twelve units (two to four units per quarter) prior to completion of the PhD degree.

LTWR 8A. Writing Fiction (4)
Study of fiction in both theory and practice. Narrative technique studied in terms of subjectivity and atmosphere, description, dialogue, and the editing process will be introduced through readings from the history of the novel and short story. Students are required to attend at least three New Writing Series readings during the quarter. Prerequisites: CAT 2 and 3 or DOC 2 and 3 or HUM 1 and 2 or MCWP 40 and 50 or MMW 12 and 13 or WARR 11A-B or WCWP 10A-B.

LTWR 8B. Writing Poetry (4)
Study and practice of poetry as artistic and communal expression. Techniques of composition (traditional forms, avant garde techniques, dramatic monologue, performance poetry, and new genre) studied through written and spoken examples of poetry. Students are required to attend at least three New Writing Series readings during the quarter. Prerequisites: CAT 2 and 3 or DOC 2 and 3 or HUM 1 and 2 or MCWP 40 and 50 or MMW 12 and 13 or WARR 11A-B or WCWP 10A-B.

LTWR 8C. Writing Nonfiction (4)
Study of nonfictional prose in terms of genre and craft. Techniques of composition (journalism, essay, letters, reviews) will be studied through written examples of the genre. Prerequisites: CAT 2 and 3 or DOC 2 and 3 or HUM 1 and 2 or MCWP 40 and 50 or MMW 12 and 13 or WARR 11A-B or WCWP 10A-B. Completion of college writing requirement.

LTWR 100. Short Fiction Workshop (4)
A workshop for students with some experience and special interest in writing fiction. This workshop is designed to encourage regular writing in the short forms of prose fiction and to permit students to experiment with various forms. There will be discussion of student work, together with analysis and discussion of representative examples of short fiction from the present and previous ages. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8A; department approval.

LTWR 101. Writing Fiction in Spanish (4)
A workshop for students with interest in writing fiction in Spanish. Includes discussion of student work, together with analysis and discussion of representative examples of short fiction from the present and previous ages. A working knowledge of Spanish is required. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8A; LTSP 50A or 50B or 50C; department approval.

LTWR 102. Poetry Workshop (4)
A workshop for students with some experience and special interest in writing poetry. This workshop is designed to encourage regular writing of poetry. There will be discussion of student work, together with analysis and discussion of representative examples of poetry from the present and previous ages. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8B; department approval.

LTWR 104A. The Novella I (4)
A two-quarter workshop for fiction writers ready to explore a longer form, and committed to developing a single piece over the course of two consecutive quarters. In addition to analyzing student work, we will read and discuss a wide range of published novellas. Two-quarter sequence; students must complete LTWR 104A and LTWR 104B in order to receive final grade in both courses. Prerequisites: LTWR 100; department approval.

LTWR 104B. The Novella II (4)
A continuation of LTWR 104A in which fiction writers complete the novella manuscripts they began during the previous quarter. Each student will produce a novella of at least fifty revised pages by the end of the quarter. We will continue to read and discuss published novellas with a particular emphasis on narrative strategy, structure, and revision. Two-quarter sequence; students must complete LTWR 104A and LTWR 104B in order to receive final grade in both courses. Prerequisites: LTWR 104A; department approval.

LTWR 106. Science Fiction, Fantasy, and Irrealism Workshop (4)
In this workshop, students will practice skills of narration, characterization, and style with particular attention to the demands of nonrealistic genres, especially the challenge of suspending disbelief in fictional environments that defy conventional logic. Readings and lectures will accompany writing exercises. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8A; department approval.

LTWR 113. Intercultural Writing Workshop (4)
This course is an introduction to modes of writing from other cultural systems vastly different from the cultural-aesthetic assumptions of Anglo-American writing. While disclosing the limitations of the English language, this course attempts to provide new language strategies for students. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8A, 8B, or 8C; department approval.

LTWR 114. Graphic Texts Workshop (4)
From illuminated manuscripts to digital literature, from alphabets to concrete poems, from artists’ books to comics, this course explores the histories and techniques of combinatory image/word literary arts. The course may emphasize specific movements or genres. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8A or 8B or 8C; department approval.

LTWR 115. Experimental Writing Workshop (4)
This workshop explores writing for which the traditional generic distinctions of prose/poetry, fiction/documentary, narrative/discourse do not apply. Students taking this course will be asked to challenge the boundaries of literature to discover new forms and modes of expression. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8A, 8B, or 8C; department approval.

LTWR 119. Writing for Performance (4)
A workshop and survey of experimental approaches to the writing and production of performance works in a range of literary genres. Emphasis will be placed on the integration of written texts with nonverbal elements from the visual arts, theatre, and music. Prerequisites: LTWR 8A or 8B, to be determined by quarterly offerings of LTWR 119; department approval.

LTWR 120. Personal Narrative Workshop (4)
A workshop designed to encourage regular writing of all forms of personal experience narrative, including journals, autobiography, firsthand biography, and firsthand chronicle. Instructor and students will discuss student work as well as published personal narratives. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8A, 8B, or 8C; department approval.

LTWR 121. Media Writing Workshop (4)
Workshop focusing on the review, the op-ed piece, the column, the blurb, the profile, the interview, and “content-providing” for websites. We’ll examine current examples of media writing; students will produce a body of work and critique one another’s productions. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8C; department approval.

LTWR 122. Writing for the Sciences Workshop (4)
A workshop in writing about science for the public. Students will study and then construct metaphors or analogues that introduce readers to scientific perplexities. Completion of LTWR 8A, 8B, or 8C highly recommended. May be repeated for credit three times. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWR 124. Translation of Literary Texts Workshop (4)
A writing workshop on the theory and practice of literary translation. Students will translate literary texts and workshop with the instructor and other course members. Selected readings in translation theory. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8A, 8B, or 8C; department approval.

LTWR 126. Creative Nonfiction Workshop (4)
A writing, reading, and critical-thinking workshop designed to produce nonfiction pieces that fall outside the limits of the essay form. Included are travel narratives, memoir, and information-based writing that transform their own materials into compelling literature. May be repeated for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 8C; department approval.

LTWR 129. Distributing Literature Workshop (4)
Workshop designed to critique and engage the means of distributing literature within culture. Publishing from “zine” through mainstream publication; web publishings; readings and “slams”; publicity and funding; colloquia with writers; politics and literature; and the uses of performance and media. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: LTWR 100, LTWR 102, or LTWR 120; department approval.

LTWR 143. Stylistics and Grammar (4)
A close look at sentence-level features of written discourse–stylistics and sentence grammars. Students will review recent research on these topics and experiment in their own writing with various stylistic and syntactic options. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWR 144. The Teaching of Writing (4)
Wide reading in current theory and practice of teaching writing in schools and colleges. Careful attention to various models of classroom writing instruction and to different approaches in the individual conference. Students in this course may observe instruction in the UC San Diego college writing programs or tutor freshman students in those programs. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWR 148. Theory for Writers/Writing for Theory (4)
Hybrid workshop offering writing students a working knowledge of literary theory while exposing literature students to practical techniques from poetry, fiction, and nonfiction to refresh their writing of theoretical nonfiction texts. Discussion of student work and published work. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWR 194. Capstone Course for Writing Majors (4)
An advanced seminar open to all writing majors in their senior year. Required for those interested in the Honors Program. It offers an integrative experience by considering key facets of the discipline and profession, including relationships between aesthetics/culture and politics, genre writing, craft/technique, literary theories/theories of writing, and distribution/publication. Prerequisites: senior standing.

LTWR 195. Apprentice Teaching (4)
Undergraduate instruction assistance. Students will 1) assist TA in editing students’ writing for LTWR 8A and 8C during class and outside of class; and 2) prepare a paper and report for the professor at the end of the quarter. Prerequisites: LTWR 144.

LTWR 196. Honors Thesis (4)
Senior thesis research and writing for students who have been accepted for the Literature Honors Program and who have completed LTWL 191. Oral exam. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWR 198. Directed Group Study (2 or 4)
Directed group study in areas of writing not normally covered in courses. (P/NP grades only.) Repeatable for credit when areas of study vary.

LTWR 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
Tutorial; individual guidance in areas of writing not normally covered in courses. (P/NP grades only.) May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department approval.

LTWR 200. Fiction Workshop (4)
A weekly meeting between a faculty member, guest fictions writers, and a small group of MFA students for focused discussion of new student writing produced during the time of the workshop. The workshop guides students toward beginning the full-length manuscript that will constitute their MFA project. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWR 202. Poetry Workshop (4)
A weekly meeting between a single faculty member, occasional guest poets, and a small group of MFA students engaged in a discussion of new student work produced during the time of the workshop. There will be assigned readings and some writing exercises to give the course focus. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWR 215. Cross-Genre Workshop (4)
In the generative workshop, writers create intergenre works and practice unconventional workshopping techniques that function less as editorial roundtables and more as discussions of the relationships between aesthetics and culture. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWR 220. Topics in Writing (4)
This seminar will be organized around any of various topic areas relating to writing (fiction, poetry, cross-genre, theory). Topics might focus on a genre (film, popular novel, theater) or on the transformations of a theme or metaphor (nation, femininity, the uncanny). S/U grades only. May be taken for credit three times as content varies. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA in writing, major code LT84.

LTWR 295. MFA Thesis (1–12)
Research for master’s thesis. Offered for repeated registration. Open only to MFA students. Prerequisites: department approval.

LTWR 298. Directed Studies: Writing Course (1–12)
This course may be designed according to an individual student’s needs when seminar offerings do not cover subjects, genres, or authors of interest. May be applied toward the guided research or graduate seminar in literature requirement of the MFA program. Repeatable for credit. Prerequisites: department approval.

MMW 11. Prehistory and Ancient Foundations (4)
MMW 11 explores human origins, the development of social organization, the strategies early peoples and societies used to negotiate their physical and social environments, and the rise of the ancient world’s classical traditions (to ca. 100 BCE). Open to Eleanor Roosevelt College students only. Students may not receive credit for both MMW 1 and MMW 11. (F)

MMW 12. Classical and Medieval Traditions (6)
Covering ca. 100 BCE to 1200 CE, MMW 12 examines the development of classical empires from China to the West, their collapse, and their transformation into distinct medieval forms. It also examines the rise and spread of Christianity, Islam, and Mahayana Buddhism. This course is the first of two writing-intensive quarters in the MMW sequence. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the Entry Level Writing Requirement. Open to Eleanor Roosevelt College students only. Students may not receive credit for both MMW 12, which is the first writing-intensive six-credit course in the new MMW sequence, and MMW 2, which was the first writing-intensive course in the original MMW sequence. (W)

MMW 13. New Ideas and Cultural Encounters (6)                              
MMW 13 provides a framework for understanding developments in the global past from 1200 CE to 1750 CE and the transition from the medieval to the early modern world. This course is the second of two writing-intensive quarters in the MMW sequence. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the Entry Level Writing Requirement. Open to Eleanor Roosevelt College students only. Students may not receive credit for MMW 13, which is the second writing-intensive six-credit course in the new MMW sequence, and MMW 3, which is the second writing-intensive six-credit course in the original MMW sequence. (S)

MMW 14. Revolution, Industry, and Empire (4)                       
This course examines the great changes in European society occurring from the late seventeenth century to the time of the Russian Revolution and considers the impact of those changes on the non-Western world. Topics include absolutist states and the Enlightenment, the French and American Revolutions, industrialization, the rise of nationalism and the nation-state, mass politics, Western imperialism, and the colonial experience. Developments in non-Western countries during this period will be examined from their own internal perspectives. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the Entry Level Writing Requirement; MMW 12 or MMW 2; or MMW 13 or MMW 3; open to Eleanor Roosevelt College students only. Students may not receive credit for both MMW 14 and MMW 5. (F, W, Su)

MMW 15. Twentieth Century and Beyond (4)                          
This course begins with a consideration of the causes and consequences of World War I, and then looks at the postwar crisis of liberal values and institutions. It addresses the deepening crisis in the 1930s, especially evident in the emergence of ideological politics and extreme nationalism in the context of worldwide depression. That period provides the background for understanding World War II. Attention is then devoted to the Cold War, the competition between capitalism and communism, and the process of decolonization. The course ends with a discussion of the collapse of communism and the emergence of a new world order (or disorder). Prerequisites: satisfaction of Entry Level Writing Requirement; MMW 12 or MMW 2 and/or MMW 13 or MMW 3; open to Eleanor Roosevelt College students only. Students may not receive credit for both MMW 6 and MMW 15. (S, Su)

MMW 121. Exploring the Premodern World (4)
MMW 121, the first of two required courses for ERC transfer students, addresses themes and topics from the premodern world (from antiquity to the eighteenth century) and strengthens students’ analytical, research, and writing skills. Students may not receive credit for MMW 21 and 121. Students who previously took MMW 21 and received a grade of D or F should contact their college for guidance. Prerequisites: open to Eleanor Roosevelt College transfer students only. (F, Su)

MMW 122. Exploring the Modern World (4)
MMW 122, the second of two required courses for ERC transfer students, addresses specific themes and topics from the modern world (from the eighteenth century to the present) and strengthens transfer students’ analytical, research, and writing skills. Students may not receive credit for MMW 22 and 122. Students who previously took MMW 22 and received a grade of D or F should contact their college for guidance. Prerequisites: open to Eleanor Roosevelt College transfer students only. (W, Su)

MGT 3. Quantitative Methods in Business (4) 
Introduction to techniques to develop/analyze data for informed tactical and strategic management decisions: statistical inference, probability, regression analysis, and optimization. Using these analytic approaches, theory based formulas and spreadsheets, students explore managerial applications across all areas of business activity.

MGT 4. Financial Accounting (4)
Cross-listed with Econ 4. Recording, organizing, and communicating financial information to business entities.

MGT 5. Managerial Accounting (4)
Internal accounting fundamentals, including cost behavior, cost application methods, overhead allocation methods, break-even analysis, budgeting, cost variance analysis, inventory management, and capital budgeting.

MGT 12. Personal Financial Management (4) 
Course examines management of personal financial assets: savings and checking accounts, fixed assets, and credit cards. Budgeting, loan applications, payment terms, and statement reconciliation will be covered as will credit ratings, cash management, compound interest, bank operations, and contract obligations.

MGT 16. Personal Ethics at Work (4)
Course examines the ethical foundation for choices individuals make every day both in the workplace and in their private lives, the connection between economic and ethical obligations with examples related to privacy, reporting, whistle-blowing, workplace relationships, confidentiality, and intellectual property.

MGT 18. Managing Diverse Teams (4)
The modern workplace includes people different in culture, gender, age, language, religion, education, and more. Students will learn why diverse teams make better decisions and are often integral to the success of organizations. Topics include challenges of diversity, and the impact of emotional, social, and cultural intelligence on team success. Content will include significant attention to the experiences of Asian Americans and African Americans as members and leaders of such diverse teams.

MGT 45. Principles of Accounting (4)
Covers the principles, methods and applications of general accounting, cost accounting and investment ROI. Development of the three key financial reports and their interrelations, cost identification, product costing, inventory control, operational performance, and investment return calculations are also covered. This course is designed for nonaccounting minors.

MGT 103. Product Marketing and Management (4)
Defining markets for products and services, segmenting these markets, and targeting critical customers within segments. Strategies to position products and services within segments. The critical role of pricing as well as market research, product management, promotion, selling, and customer support. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 105. Product Promotion and Brand Management (4)
Principles and decisions to be considered in overall communications and promotion strategy for traditional channels and emerging social networks. Decisions on promotional mix, ad design, implementation and evaluation for establishing brand equity, measure brand performance and sustaining brand equity. Prerequisites: MGT 103.

MGT 106. Sales and Sales Management (4)
Examines the sales function from strategic competitive importance to the firm to required direct sales skills of individual salespersons. Major subject areas covered are: the sales process, recruitment and training, organization and focus, “territories,” evaluation and compensation. Prerequisites: MGT 103.

MGT 112. Global Business Strategy (4)
Will examine the advantages and complications of the multinational organization with emphasis on translating marketing, financing, and operating plans in light of geographical, cultural, and legal differences across the globe. Will also cover organizational considerations for transglobal management. Prerequisites: MGT 103 and either MGT 181 or MGT 187, upper-division standing.

MGT 121A. Innovation to Market A (4)
Consider new project concepts. Discern market needs, competitive environment, and determine “go to market” strategy. Research potential markets, customers, partners, and competitors. Consider price versus attributes, alternative distribution channels, gaining unfair advantage. Examine the need and structure of a start-up team. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 121B. Innovation to Market B (4)
Build a business plan. Establish intellectual property rights. Provide financial projections and determine financing needs. Explore investment sourcing, business valuation, and harvesting opportunities. Determine operational plans and key employee requirements. Prerequisites: MGT 181 and MGT 121A.

MGT 128. Innovation in Service Enterprises (4)
The service sector is the fastest-growing sector of the economy. This course will help students prepare for the transition to a service economy and identify career and entrepreneurial opportunities in the service industry. Students will learn how services differ from goods and gain understanding of the innovation process in the service industry. The course will also address trends of services getting systematized, industrialized, and professionalized for greater productivity and scalability. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 129. Topics in Entrepreneurship (2)
Introduces advanced topics of special interest in entrepreneurship. Examples of course topics include (but are not limited to): venture capital funding process, entrepreneurial business development and marketing, workplace climate and morale, and developing a capable workforce. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture, case presentation, assigned reading and group discussion. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 131A. Intermediate Accounting A (4)
Preparation and interpretation of accounting information under both FASB and IASB guidelines pertaining to revenue and expense recognition, receivables, and inventories. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and MGT 5 and either MGT 4 or Econ 4.

MGT 131B. Intermediate Accounting B (4)
Preparation and interpretation of accounting information under both FASB and IASB guidelines pertaining to property plant and equipment, leases, intangible assets, investments, long-term debt, and stockholders’ equity. Prerequisites: MGT 131A.

MGT 132. Auditing (4)
Theory and practice of the attest process; planning and implementing the audit of the financial statements and internal control over financial reporting to ensure compliance with applicable requirements. Prerequisites: MGT 131B.

MGT 133. Advanced Cost Accounting (4)
Covers cost accumulation and analysis, for both manufacturing cost components and service activities, budgeting and cost projections, cost variance analysis, relevant costs, and capital investment analysis. Prerequisites: MGT 131B.

MGT 134. Federal Taxation—Individuals (4)
Covers theory and practical application of federal income tax regulations for individuals pertaining to gross income, adjusted gross income, itemized deductions, business operations, passive activities, property transactions, deferred income recognition, and reporting standards. Prerequisites: MGT 132.

MGT 135. Federal Taxation—Companies (4)
Covers the theory and practical application of federal income tax regulations for corporations and other enterprises pertaining to formulations, annual operations, distributions, liquidations, reorganizations, affiliations, and reporting standards. Prerequisites: MGT 132.

MGT 136. Advanced Accounting (4)
Covers accounting topics related to consolidated financial statements, variable interest entities, foreign currency translation, segment reporting, and business combinations. Prerequisites: MGT 135.

MGT 138. Information Technology and Accounting (4)
This course provides an introduction to the role and use of models and modeling in managerial decision-making. Students will gain hands-on experience in evaluating accounting data using Microsoft Excel. Content includes creating data boxes in financial accounting, using multiple sheets with formulas, preparing professional quality financial reports, and creating graphs to interpret business results. Students will also explore the utility of QuickBooks and the functionality for small businesses. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 139. Accounting Information Systems (4)
Develop an understanding of transaction cycles (e.g., sales order and purchase order processing) with a focus on processing steps, internal controls, and data used. Gain hands-on experience developing flowcharts, processing transactions in a manual accounting information system, and analyzing transaction data using Microsoft Excel and other tools. Prerequisites: MGT 131B and MGT 138, upper-division standing.

MGT 153. Business Analytics (4)
This course is designed to help a business manager use data to make good decisions in complex decision-making situations. Students will gain foundation knowledge of several analytical and econometric methods including decision analysis, probability theory, statistical inference, regression analysis, and hypothesis testing. Students will also learn how to use available computing technology to arrive at optimal solutions. Prerequisites: Math 31BH, Math 10C, or Math 20C, upper-division standing.

MGT 162. Negotiation (2)
The ability to negotiate effectively is a critical skill for business professionals. Students will develop a systematic and insightful approach to negotiation. The course provides an introduction to strategic thinking and the basic concepts, tactics, and cognitive aspects of negotiation. Interactive negotiation exercises are used to isolate and emphasize specific analytic points and essential skills. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 164. Business and Organizational Leadership (4)
Students will study alternative organizational structures, their stakeholders and corporate cultures, and their use in meeting strategic enterprise priorities facing a company. This course provides students with insights into motivational factors, communications networks, organizational cultures, and alternative leadership styles. The concept of change management and its challenges is also studied along with power and influence. Course previously listed as: Organizational Leadership. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 166. Business Ethics and Corporate Responsibility (4)
Will cover ethical conduct issues for leaders from a wide array of organizations and industries including consideration of differences among global trading partners. The issues impacting corporate responsibility will be examined as will full-cycle cost analysis of products and services. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 167. Social Entrepreneurship (4)
Social entrepreneurs create innovative solutions to solve challenging social and environmental issues affecting the world around them. In this course, students will learn how to apply entrepreneurial business and innovative skills to effectively tackle global issues impacting society such as environmental degradation, rural health care availability, educational improvements in economically disadvantaged regions of the world, famine in an era of obesity, and clean water development. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 172. Business Project Management (4)
Addresses effective practices for management of business projects. Includes both project management processes—scheduling, milestone setting, resource allocation, budgeting, risk mitigation—and human capital management—communication, teamwork, leadership. Also considers requirements for effectively working across functional and organizational boundaries. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 173. Project Management: Health Services (4)
This course covers efficient techniques for managing health services projects, including both the technical aspects of project management as well as the human-capital management issues associated with blending administrative and technical staff with health-care professionals. Topics include scheduling methods, milestone setting, governmental regulations, resource allocation, interpersonal skills, and performing research and development projects—all with a health services focus. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 174. Supply Chain and Operations Management (4)
Will cover process design and optimization, inventory control and forecasting, vendor selection and management, operations, planning and management, global distribution techniques, material, labor, and overhead costing, and work-in-process tracking and valuation, quality control along with organizational issues. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 181. Enterprise Finance (4)
Will cover debt and equity financing of the enterprise, the role of commercial banks, venture firms, and investment banks; along with enterprise valuation, cash flow management, capital expenditure decisions, return on investment, economic value add, and foreign currency translation. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and (Math 10A or Math 20A or MGT 3) and (MGT 5 or MGT 45) and (MGT 4 or MGT 45 or Econ 4) or consent of instructor.

MGT 183. Financial Investments (4)   
Examines financial theory and empirical evidence useful for making investment decisions. Portfolio theory, equilibrium models, and market efficiency are examined for stock securities and fixed income instruments. Risk adjusted ROIs for capital investments’ impact on stock prices and free options will also be studied. Prerequisites: MGT 181 or Econ 173B.

MGT 184. Money and Banking (4) 
Focuses on role of financial institutions, implications for firm financing and valuation as well as the Federal Reserve, financial regulation, the money supply process, and monetary policy. Mechanisms through which monetary policy affects businesses and credit channels will be covered. Prerequisites: MGT 181 or Econ 173B.

MGT 185. Investment Banking (4)   
This course provides students with an overview of the investment banking industry, including IPOs, equity offerings, debt offerings, valuation, mergers and acquisition, private equity, asset securitization, prime brokerage, sales and trading, and market making. Emphasis of the class will be on traditional corporate finance, which includes equity and debt offerings as well as mergers and acquisitions. Prerequisites: MGT 181.

MGT 187. New Venture Finance (4)
Taking a global perspective, this course examines how innovation is funded and the financial tools necessary over the life cycle of a new venture—development, growth, maturity, and exit. Students will learn to perform financial analysis to determine the feasibility of financing new, transformed, and growing ventures, whether foreign or domestic. The course will also cover term sheets, valuation methods, and the role of private equity investors—angels, VCs, and vendors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

MGT 198. Directed Group Study (4)
A small group undertaking, on a topic or in a field not included in the regular curriculum, by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: instructor consent and departmental approval.

MGT 199. Directed Independent Study (4)
Directed individual study or research by special arrangement and under supervision of a faculty member. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and departmental approval; approved Special Studies form.

MGT 401. Professional Seminar (1)
The Professional Seminar presents up-to-date research, professional skills development, and experts and business leaders as speakers. Topics may vary by term. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit eight times. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 402. Management Communications (1)
Course focuses on various management communications platforms. Students will learn strategies to establish competence, build trust, motivate and inspire, and achieve commitment to action. Participants will develop, present, and receive intensive peer feedback for both written communications and presentations. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 403. Quantitative Analysis (4)
Through lecture and online delivery, students will be introduced to key techniques for using data to make informed management decisions. Covers probability, statistics, decision analysis, and optimization techniques. Emphasizes managerial applications in such areas as operations management, marketing, and finance. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 404. Accounting (4)
Through lecture and online delivery, students will be introduced to the basic concepts and methods used in financial statements. The course highlights the linkages between accounting information and management planning, decision making, and control. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 405. Managerial Economics (4)
Through lecture and online delivery, this course will introduce students to the tools and concepts of microeconomics to analyze decision problems within technology driven firms through the coverage of microeconomic concepts relevant to managerial decision making. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 406. Leadership Skills, Values, and Teamwork in Technology Firms (4)
Through lecture and online delivery, introduces principles of effective teamwork and leadership and of strategic managerial communication. Provides an introduction to case study and to ethical issues confronting managers in technology or science-driven firms. Develops managerial communication skills. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 407. Marketing (4)
By taking an analytical approach to the study of marketing problems, this course provides an understanding of customers and competitors as a basis for developing, pricing, promoting, and distributing goods and services that satisfy customer and organizational objectives. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 408. Finance (4)
Through lecture and online delivery, this course will focus on basic business financial concepts with particular attention to challenges of finance in start-up and small- and medium-sized enterprises. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 409. Organizational Strategy (4)
After identifying characteristics common to technology driven firms, the implications of living in, managing, and leading such an organization are explored. Covers skills such as leadership of project teams and negotiations. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 410. Strategy (4)
Through lecture and online delivery, this course explores the strategic management of technology-driven firms focusing on the analytical tools and techniques that support strategy formulation and the related managerial skills and decision processes that foster strategy implementation. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 412. Lab to Market: Opportunity and Business Model Analysis (4)
An integrated examination of competencies needed to transform innovations into profitable market opportunities. Focus on processes to generate ideas, assess which ones are viable business opportunities, and evolve them into products and businesses. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 413. Operations, Information Systems, and Data Analysis (4)
Through lecture and online delivery, students will be familiarized with the problems and issues confronting operations managers, and to introduce language, conceptual models, and analytical techniques that are broadly applicable in confronting such problems. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 414A. Lab to Market Workshop I (4)
Through lecture, provides broad coverage of leading edge developments in technical and scientific research, with an eye to their potential applicability and value in business. Provides basis for project-based Lab to Market Workshop II. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of the quarter. Final grade will not be given until the completion of MGT 414B. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 414B. Lab to Market Workshop II (4)
Project-based course, requiring identification and completion of major project assessing potential business value of emerging or potential technology or science. Students work individually or in teams. Periodic class meetings include presentation of interim and final reports. Prerequisites: MGT 414A and MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 416. Readings in Management (1 or 2)
Review and discussion of current research and literature on selected topics in business and management. Research paper and presentation required. May be taken for credit three times. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 416 and MGT 252 if the courses have the same course subtitle. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 417. Current Business Law Issues (4)
Explores current issues in business law, emphasizing concerns faced by new companies. Students learn how the law regulates and shapes businesses; examine the legal role in business formations, operations, and dissolutions; and gain knowledge of contract and intellectual property law. Letter grades only. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 417 and MGT 212. Also, students may not receive credit for both MGT 417 and MGT 219 with the course subtitle Current Business Law Issues. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 419. Global Business Immersion (2)
Introduces advanced topics in global business, with a regional emphasis. Instructional methods include lectures, case presentations, readings, and discussions. A substantial portion of learning outcomes will be met by visiting businesses in another world region, observing operations, and interviewing executives. The visit to the foreign region will typically be one to two weeks and may occur outside the normal academic quarter. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 419 and MGT 259 if the courses have the same course subtitle. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 420. Negotiation (4)
Examines methods of conflict resolution needed for effective management in a constantly changing business environment. Applies these tools to the broad spectrum of negotiation problems faced by the manager and professional. Includes simulations, role playing, and cases. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 420 and MGT 260. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 421. CEO, the Board of Directors, and Corporate Governance (4)
Provides an understanding of relationships among shareholders, managers, and boards. Focuses on the office of the chief executive officer and on the board of directors, including the roles and responsibilities of directors, and the legal, economic, managerial, and psychological issues they confront. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 421 and MGT 211. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 422. Creativity and Innovation (4)
This course focuses on fostering and maintaining creativity in entrepreneurial ventures and in general management more broadly. Reading materials, cases, classroom, and home exercises will help students understand and be able to use creativity in their own working lives. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 422 and MGT 222. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 426. Creating a High-Performing Workplace (2)
Students will learn to develop a workforce that performs at the highest level through strategies and practices that recruit productive people, build commitment, foster innovation, and inspire and empower motivated employees to deliver results. Letter grades only. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 426 and MGT 262. Students may not receive credit for both MGT 426 and MGT 269 with the course subtitle Creating a High-Performing Workplace. Prerequisites: MBA student or department stamp.

MGT 427. Decision Analysis (4)
Provides practical techniques to help structure decision problems and analyze them quantitatively. Techniques help thinking clearly about objectives, alternatives, consequences, and uncertainties, and enable logical judgments with other types of information. Letter grades only. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 427 and MGT 240. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 429. Topics in Corporate Governance (2 or 4)
Introduces advanced topics of special interest in corporate governance. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture, case presentations, assigned readings, and online group discussions. May be taken for credit four times, for a maximum of eight units. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 429 and MGT 219 if courses have same course subtitle. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 430. Biotechnology Industry, Structure, and Strategy (4)
Provides a business overview of the life science industry, its major market segments, financial structure, and financing strategies. Develops an understanding of major industry issues and strategies, including business development, financing, partnering and alliances, emerging trends, ethical and policy issues. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 430 and MGT 250. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 439. Topics in Organizational Behavior (2 or 4)
Introduces advanced topics of special interest in management and organizational behavior. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture, case presentations, assigned readings, and online group discussions. May be taken for credit four times. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 439 and MGT 269 when they have the same subtitles. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 442. Topics in Decision Sciences (2 or 4)
Introduces advanced topics of special interest in management and decision sciences. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture, case presentations, assigned readings, and group discussions. May be taken for credit four times. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 442 and MGT 249 with same course subtitle. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 443. Topics in International Business (2 or 4)
Introduces advanced topics of special interest in international business. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture, case presentations, assigned readings, and group discussions. May be taken for credit four times. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 443 and MGT 229 when the course subtitles are the same. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 444. Topics in Business Strategy (2 or 4)
Advanced topics of special interest in business strategy. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture sessions and case discussion. May be taken for credit four times, for a maximum of eight units. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 444 and MGT 251 when the subtitles are the same. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 447. Drug Discovery, Development, and Commercialization (3)
This elective is designed to increase knowledge of the drug discovery, development, regulatory, and commercialization process. Students will have an increased understanding of how an investigational agent eventually becomes an approved drug for patient use. Lectures and a student group project will be conducted for this elective. Prerequisites: open to Skaggs School of Pharmacy and Pharmaceutical Sciences, School of Medicine, and graduate biomedical science students; and Rady School of Management graduate students.

MGT 449. Topics in Operations and Technology (2 or 4)
Introduces advanced topics of special interest in operations. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture, case presentations, assigned readings, and online group discussions. May be taken for credit four times, for a maximum of eight units. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 449 and MGT 279 when the course subtitles are the same. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 450. Project Management (4)
Provides management concepts and tools to enable the more effective design, planning, and control of projects. Includes both the qualitative and quantitative aspects of project management. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 450 and MGT 270. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 451. Technology and Innovation Strategy (4)
Outlines tools for formulating and evaluating technology strategy, including an introduction to the economics of technical change, models of technological evolution, and models of organizational dynamics and innovation. Provides an understanding of how technology firms gain and sustain competitive advantage. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 451 and MGT 271. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 452. New Product Development (4)
Provides comprehensive analytical coverage of the new product development process, focusing on the basic tools, methods, and organizational structures used in new product development and management. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 452 and MGT 272. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 453. Supply Chain Management (4)
Describes the systems approach to managing the entire flow of information, materials, and services from raw materials suppliers through factories and warehouses to the end customer, which is the key to productivity and competitiveness of manufacturing and service enterprises. Letter grades only. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 453 and MGT 273. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 454. Disruptive Technologies for Health Care (4)
Introduces how IT will transform health sciences. Highlights how IT and associated disruptive innovations in health-care delivery will enable physicians, patients, and caregivers to cost effectively prevent, diagnose, and monitor health conditions; manage treatment; and facilitate timely communication and intervention. Letter grades only. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 454 and MGT 274. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 459. Topics in Innovation (2 or 4)
Advanced topics in business innovation, delivered by lecture, case presentation, and group discussion. May be taken for credit four times, for a maximum of eight units. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 459 and MGT 221 if the course has the same course subtitle. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 463. Projects in Technology Commercialization (4)
This elective engages students in the process of commercializing technology through experiential learning. Students will gain an increased understanding of commercialization, including introducing a new product into the market, customer development, and market selection. Students will be required to incorporate the latest research methods for identifying customers, analyzing markets, and developing strategies for market entry and growth. Lectures and a student group project will be conducted. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 463 and MGT 223. Also, students may not receive credit for both MGT 463 and MGT 221 Topics in Innovation course with the subtitle Projects in Technology Commercialization. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 464. Projects in Business Innovation (4)
Students will use latest research in management, marketing, finance, strategy, and operations to analyze current business problems posed by real companies and will recommend to senior management strategies that resolve the problem(s) presented in the project. Students may not earn credit for both MGT464 and MGT224. Students may not receive credit for both MGT 224 and MGT 221 Topics in Innovation with the course subtitle Projects in Business Innovation. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 469. Topics in Accounting (2 or 4)
Introduces advanced topics of special interest in accounting. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture, case presentations, assigned readings, and online group discussions. May be repeated for a maximum of sixteen credits if the topics are substantially different. Students may not receive credit for both MGT 239 and MGT 469. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 475. Research for Marketing Decisions (4)
Methods and applications of qualitative and quantitative marketing research to solve substantive marketing problems. Emphasis on integrating problem formulation, research design, questionnaire construction, and sampling to yield the most valuable information, and on the proper use of statistical methods. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 475 and MGT 202. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 476. Marketing Strategy (4)
Addresses formulation and implementation of marketing strategy, based on an integrative view of competitive brand strategy over the product life cycle. Provides a framework for developing marketing strategies yielding sustainable competitive advantage based on customer, competitor, industry, and environmental analysis. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 476 and MGT 201. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 477. Consumer Behavior (4)
The course identifies the factors that influence the selection and usage of products and services. Students will be introduced to problems/decisions that include evaluating behavior; understanding the consumers’ decision process, and strategies to create desirable consumer behavior. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 477 and MGT 203. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 478. Marketing Communications (4)
This course differentiates decisions/principles considered when developing an overall communications and promotions strategy. Key decisions include the promotional mix, the design, implementation and evaluation of communications strategies and the thinking required to develop a creative strategy. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 478 and MGT 204. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 479. Pricing (4)
This class covers issues in pricing decisions. The main emphasis will be on the data and tools required to make successful profitable pricing decisions. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 479 and MGT 205. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: MGT 407, admission to the MBA program, or consent of instructor.

MGT 480. Sales and Sales Management (4)
Offers a pragmatic view into the world of sales, from its strategic importance to the day-to-day creation and management of a sales organization. Students will also have the opportunity to develop and practice their own sales skills. Letter grades only. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 480 and MGT 206. Also, students may not receive credit for MGT 480 and MGT 209 Topics in Marketing with the course subtitle Sales and Sales Management. Prerequisites: admission to the MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 489. Topics in Marketing (2 or 4)
Introduces advanced topics of special interest in marketing. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture, case presentations, assigned readings, and  group discussions. May be taken for credit four times, for a maximum of eight units. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 489 and MGT 209 if the course has the same course subtitle. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to the MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 491. Investments (4)
Examines financial theory and empirical evidence useful for making investment decisions. Topics include: portfolio theory, equilibrium models of security prices, the empirical behavior of security prices, market efficiency, and fixed-income markets and behavioral finance. Letter grades only. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 491 and MGT 281. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: MGT 408, admission to the MBA program, or consent of instructor.

MGT 492. Financial Risk Management (4)
Explains how to identify, measure, and analyze investment risks associated with interest rates, currency exchange, and equity markets, and acquire techniques to manage and control risk through the use of over-the-counter and exchange-traded derivatives. Letter grades only. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 492 and MGT 283. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 495. Topics in Finance (2 or 4)
Advanced topics in finance. Instructional methods include face-to-face lecture and case discussion. May be taken for credit four times. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 495 and MGT 282 when the course subtitles are the same. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 496A. Venture Capital Management I (2)
Hands-on experience in venture investing. Direct involvement in all stages of managing Rady Venture Fund, including applicant sourcing, initial analysis, due diligence, investment negotiation, portfolio monitoring. IP grade awarded at end of quarter. Final grade assigned upon completion of MGT 496B. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 496A and MGT 289A. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: enrollment only by consent of instructor and department stamp. Restricted to majors: RS76, RS78, RS80, and RS81 or by consent of instructor.

MGT 496B. Venture Capital Management II (2)
Provides hands-on experience in venture investing. Direct involvement in all stages of managing the Rady Venture Fund, including sourcing applicants, performing initial analysis, due diligence, investment negotiation, monitoring of the portfolio. Students have substantial input into fund investment decisions. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 496B and MGT 289B. They are course equivalents. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: MGT 496A and consent of instructor and department stamp. Restricted to majors: RS75, RS76, RS77, RS78, RS80, and RS81 or by consent of instructor.

MGT 497. Advanced Management Research Practicum (1)
Internship with approved business or governmental agency, allowing student to pursue topics raised in the management core and elective courses. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times with instructor consent. Students may not earn credit for both MGT 497 and MGT 297. They are course equivalents. Internship credit may not be applied to fulfill specific course requirements or to credits required for graduation. Prerequisites: admission to the MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGT 499. Individual Directed Study (1-4)
Individual study or research under the direction of a selected faculty member. May be taken for credit twelve times. Students may earn credit for a total of twelve units in MGT 299 and/or MGT 499. Prerequisites: admission to MBA program or consent of instructor.

MGTF 405. Business Forecasting (4)
Introduction to state-of-the-art forecasting methods in finance. Students will learn to estimate forecasting models based on past values of the predicted variable(s), surveys, market information, and other economic data. Participants will become critical consumers of forecasts reported in the media. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 406. Behavioral Finance (4)
Develop theories of behavior motivated by psychology to describe various features of financial markets. Examine how the insights from behavioral finance complement the traditional paradigm and shed light on investors’ trading patterns, the behavior of asset prices, and corporate finance. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MGTF 402; restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 407. Valuation in Corporate Finance (4)
Covering the fundamentals of corporate finance and their application to valuation (including the WACC approach, APV approach, multiples, and real option valuation). We focus on important areas of corporate finance, including capital structure, real options, and financial distress and bankruptcy. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MGTF 402; restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 408. Real Estate Finance (4)
Examination of real estate capital markets, both debt and equity. Covered topics include real estate valuation, real options applied to real estate, real estate equity markets, and the place of real estate within a diversified investor’s portfolio. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MGTF 402; restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 409. Mergers, Acquisitions, and Corporate Restructuring (4)
Explains the mergers and acquisitions process. Topics include history, motivation, valuation, legal framework and tax issues of mergers and acquisitions, antitakeover strategies, takeover tactics, leveraged buyouts, joint venture, and strategic alliances. Students may not earn credit for both MGTF 409 and MGT 284. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: enrollment in MBA program and completion of MGT 408 Finance or with consent of faculty.

MGTF 410. New Venture Finance (4)
Focuses on the financing of new ventures and technological innovation. Includes perspectives of both the entrepreneur and the investor, investigating the venture capital process and methods of financial valuation useful in the venture capital industry and for other technology investments. Students may not earn credit for both MGTF 410 and MGT 280. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: core finance course or consent of instructor.

MGTF 412. Financial Statement Analysis (4)
Develop a deeper familiarity with financial accounting and assumptions underlying measurements reported in financial statements. Understanding of economic and regulatory forces underlying corporate disclosure of financial statements. Knowledge of data sources and analytical tools to extract and evaluate this data. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 432. Portfolio Theory in Practice (4)
Provides students with a deeper and broader understanding of risk-return analysis (especially, but not exclusively, mean-variance analysis) than is common among users. Surveys how risk-return analysis is used in practice, and examines the modern portfolio theory industry and its entrepreneurs. Letter grades only. Students may not receive credit for MGT 432, MGT 232, and MGT 282 Topics in Finance course with same course subtitle: Portfolio Theory in Practice. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: MGT 281 or MGT 491; restricted to majors; RS75, RS76, RS77, RS78, RS80, and new master of finance major code or consent of instructor.

MGTF 401. Financial Accounting (4)
Overview of financial accounting reporting, with a primary focus on the analysis of economic events and their effect on the major financial statements (balance sheet, income statement, and statement of cash flows). Learn the nature and purpose of accounting methods. Letter grades only. Students may not receive credit for both MGTF 401 and MGT 404. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 402. Investment Analysis (4)
Introduces quantitative methods for analyzing the pricing and return behavior of assets such as stocks, bonds, and derivatives; and develops methods for implementing modern portfolio theory in practice. The most influential financial models are derived; their practical applications are discussed. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 403. Advanced Financial Risk Management (4)
Introduces ways to identify, measure, estimate, and control risks in the context of risk management as applied in fixed income, foreign exchange, and equity markets. Reviews the pricing and hedging applications of derivatives, such as futures, options, and CDSs. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 404. Financial Econometrics and Empirical Methods (4)
Bridging the gap between theoretical financial models and the real world. Covering the major accomplishments of empirical finance. Empirical exercises and analysis of real financial data will help students to truly appreciate the content of the course. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 405. Business Forecasting (4)
Introduction to state-of-the-art forecasting methods in finance. Students will learn to estimate forecasting models based on past values of the predicted variable(s), surveys, market information, and other economic data. Participants will become critical consumers of forecasts reported in the media. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 406. Behavioral Finance (4)
Develop theories of behavior motivated by psychology to describe various features of financial markets. Examine how the insights from behavioral finance complement the traditional paradigm and shed light on investors’ trading patterns, the behavior of asset prices, and corporate finance. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MGTF 402; restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 407. Valuation in Corporate Finance (4)
Covering the fundamentals of corporate finance and their application to valuation (including the WACC approach, APV approach, multiples, and real option valuation). We focus on important areas of corporate finance, including capital structure, real options, and financial distress and bankruptcy. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MGTF 402; restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 408. Real Estate Finance (4)
Examination of real estate capital markets, both debt and equity. Covered topics include real estate valuation, real options applied to real estate, real estate equity markets, and the place of real estate within a diversified investor’s portfolio. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MGTF 402; restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 410. New Venture Finance (4)
Focuses on the financing of new ventures and technological innovation. Includes perspectives of both the entrepreneur and the investor, investigating the venture capital process, and methods of financial valuation useful in the venture capital industry and for other technology investments. Letter grades only. Students may not receive credit for both MGTF 410 and MGT 280. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 411. Stochastic Calculus and Continuous Time Finance (4)
Many closed-form analytic results in finance are obtained in the continuous-time setting. This course covers portfolio choice, derivative pricing, and term structure modeling in continuous time setting. The objective is to understand important topics and master techniques of continuous-time models. Letter grades only. Students may not receive credit for both MGTF411 and MGT286. These are course duplicates. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 412. Financial Statement Analysis (4)
Develop a deeper familiarity with financial accounting and assumptions underlying measurements reported in financial statements. Understanding of economic and regulatory forces underlying corporate disclosure of financial statements. Knowledge of data sources and analytical tools to extract and evaluate this data. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 413. Computational Finance Methods (4)
This course introduces students to a variety of mathematical methods as applied in finance, including Monte Carlo simulation, optimization methods, and numerical solution to PDEs. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 414. Analyzing Large Data (4)
Introduction to both structured and unstructured data analysis. Methods for “harvesting” Internet data and putting it into suitable format will be covered. Other topics include large market microstructure data (tick-by-tick data, high-frequency data), data with missing observations, and Kalman filtering. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 415. Collecting and Analyzing Financial Data (4)
Teaches students how to obtain and process data in order to answer empirical questions in finance. The data can be numerical or textual, and structured or unstructured. Specific data sources may include CRSP, Compustat, Thomson Reuters, and Bloomberg. Some programming. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 416. Professional Seminars in Finance (1)
Discussion series involving industry experts, alumni, and executives on current issues in financial services. Educates students on industry trends. Prepares students to be effective users of the financial press and to be effective in discussion and interaction with financial professionals. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Students may not earn credit for both this course and MGT 401, which is a comparable course offered in the MBA program. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program or by department stamp.

MGTF 417. Professional Communications in Finance (1)      
Focuses on communications skills and abilities required for effective professionals in the financial services sector. Addresses oral and written communications, including presentations, informational and job interviewing, resume writing, cross-cultural communication, and report writing. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Students may not earn credit for both this course and MGT 402, which is a comparable course offered in the MBA program. Prerequisites: restricted to master of finance program or by department stamp.

MGTF 432. Portfolio Theory in Practice (4)
Provides students with a deeper and broader understanding of risk-return analysis (especially, but not exclusively, mean-variance analysis) than is common among users. Surveys how risk-return analysis is used in practice and examines the modern portfolio theory industry and its entrepreneurs. Letter grades only. Students may not receive credit for MGT 432, MGT 232, and MGT 282 Topics in Finance course with same course subtitle: Portfolio Theory in Practice. They are course equivalents. Prerequisites: MGT 281 or MGT 491; restricted to master of finance program, MBA program, or by consent of instructor.

MGTF 490. Capstone: Applied Finance Project (4)
The Capstone project is one of the primary measures of student learning. Evaluation is based on students’ ability to apply course material to the Capstone project. Satisfactory completion of the project is required for award of the degree. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: MGTF 401, MGTF 402, MGTF 403, MGTF 404, and restricted to master of finance program or by consent of instructor.

MGTA 401. Professional Seminar (1)
Discussion series where domain experts and business leaders present up-to-date research, discuss legal, privacy, and ethical issues, and provide professional skills development. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: MGTA 451, MGTA 452, MGTA 453, and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval. 

MGTA 451. Business Analytics in Marketing, Finance, and Operations (4)
Business analytics projects should strive to create substantial value to an organization by solving impactful business problems. In this class, students will learn to identify business opportunities in the substantive areas of marketing, finance, and operations. Prerequisites: restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGTA 452. Collecting and Analyzing Large Data (4)
This course aims to provide students with an introduction to data analytics in R where the emphasis is more on business “data” than “analytics.” The emphasis is on collecting, handling, manipulating, and summarizing large data sets. Case studies are used throughout the course.  Prerequisites: MGTA 451 and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGTA 453. Business Analytics (4)
This course is designed to help a business manager to use data to make good decisions in complex decision-making situations. Several analytical and econometric methods will be covered including decision analysis, regression analysis, optimization, and simulation.  Prerequisites: MGTA 451 and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGTA 454. Business Analytics Capstone Project (2 or 4)
Students will pursue their capstone experience as part of a team to solve practical business problems faced by companies. Each team will work as external consultants on a project to create value for a client company. May be taken for credit two times for a maximum of four units. Prerequisites: MGTA 451, MGTA 452, MGTA 453, and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGTA 455. Customer Analytics (4)
Many firms have extensive information about customers’ choices and how they react to marketing campaigns, but few have the expertise to efficiently act on such information. In this course, students will learn a scientific approach to marketing with hands-on use of technologies such as databases, analytics, and computing systems to collect, analyze, and act on customer information. Prerequisites: MGTA 451, MGTA 452, MGTA 453, and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGTA 456. Supply Chain Analytics (4)
This course focuses on improving the performance of production and service operations, as well as supply chains, through the combination of data and analytical tools including statistics, forecasting, and optimization. Students will learn to employ analytics in capacity and distribution facility planning and contracting; how to determine data collection requirements for dynamic management of inventory levels; and how to improve revenue management under demand learning. Prerequisites: MGTA 451, MGTA 452, MGTA 453, and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGTA 457. Business Intelligence Systems (2)
A decision support system consists of decision model, data, and user interface. This course covers the R and Shiny programming and design skills to develop a DSS that addresses a manager’s decision-making needs. Prerequisites: MGTA 451, MGTA 452, MGTA 453, and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGTA 458. Experiments in Firms (4)
Students will learn to design and run experiments to guide policy and business decisions. They will learn to distinguish between a correlation and a causal effect and also to critically evaluate causal claims based on nonexperimental data. Prerequisites: MGTA 451, MGTA 452, MGTA 453, and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGTA 459. Managerial Judgment and Decision-Making (4)
Decision making is difficult with scarce resources, inexact information, and conflicting stakeholder agendas (i.e., most of the time). Students will use advanced behavioral research to gain a competitive advantage, by improving their decisions and their understanding of how others decide. Prerequisites: MGTA 451, MGTA 452, MGTA 453, and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGTA 460. Business Analytics Project Management (2)
Many projects fail to produce valuable results, are over budget, or not finished on time. This course will teach students how to set and manage goals and expectations of the team and of the executive sponsors for business analytics projects. Prerequisites: MGTA 451, MGTA 452, MGTA 453, and restricted to master’s of business analytics students or with department and instructor approval.

MGT 208A. Introduction to Management Research A (4)
This is the first course in a three-course sequence that introduces students to the various methodologies and research paradigms employed in management research. This course covers fundamentals of empirical research methods, including research design, reliability and validity of measurements, theory building and hypothesis testing, and some history of science. Prerequisites: admission to management PhD program; others consent of instructor.

MGT 208B. Introduction to Management Research B (4)
Sequence introduces students to various management research and methodological paradigms, and discusses theory development, building, and validation approaches. Students with additional need for mathematical/analytical training may be asked to take additional courses that prepare for the rigors of the program. Prerequisites: MGT 208A.

MGT 208C. Introduction to Management Research C (4)
Sequence introduces students to various management research and methodological paradigms, and discusses theory development, building, and validation approaches. Students with additional need for mathematical/analytical training may be asked to take additional courses that prepare for the rigors of the program. Prerequisites: MGT 208B.

MGT 225. Behavioral Economics (4)
Introduction to formal and predictive approaches to incorporating behavioral regularities into economic theory. Covers developments in generalizing conventional economic models to allow patterns of behavior that appear to be common but are paradoxical for conventional models based on assumptions of rationality. Prerequisites: MGT 208A-B-C, Econ 200A-B-C.

MGT 226. Theory of Industrial Organization and Business Strategy (4)
This course provides the theoretical underpinnings of business strategy drawing from the body of literature in industrial organization. It will complement Department of Economics courses on industrial organization to provide depth in business strategy. Prerequisites: Econ 200A-B-C.

MGT 245. Theory of Technology and Operations Management (4)
This course addresses classical operations management models in inventory and capacity planning and control leading up to models of supply chain and supplier relationship management. Prerequisites: MGT 208A-B-C, Econ 200A-B-C.

MGT 246. Research in Management and Technology Strategy (4)
This course covers the management of technology and innovation emphasizing product family design, market segmentation, technology selection, and product management. Prerequisites: MGT 208A-B-C, Econ 200A-B-C, MGT 245.

MGT 255. Psychology and Decision Making (4)
This course introduces students to theories and research in the field of individual judgment and decision making. Topics include judgment under uncertainty, the psychology of risk, choice, decision framing, prospect theory, mental accounting, context effects, task effects, and regret. Prerequisites: admission to management PhD program; others consent of instructor.

MGT 256. Consumer Behavior Research (4)
This course covers concepts and theories useful in understanding and researching the behaviors of consumers. Sample topics include attitude formation and change, social influence and persuasion, communication, consumer decision making and judgment, and consumer knowledge. Prerequisites: admission to management PhD program; others consent of instructor.

MGT 257. Behavior in Organizations (4)
Theories/research about behavior of employees/managers in organizations, as individuals and in groups. Topics include motivation, design of incentive/compensation systems, impact of goals/objectives, managerial judgment/decision making, evaluation judgments, managing reactions to change, and group decision making. Prerequisites: admission to management PhD program; others consent of instructor.

MGT 285. Financial Economics (4)
This course covers the basic concepts and important models used in finance research. The subjects include expected utility theories, stochastic dominance, portfolio math, mean-variance theory, CAPM, aggregation theorems, arbitrages, and arbitrage pricing. Prerequisites: Econ 220A-B-C; admission to management PhD program or by consent of instructor.

MGT 286. Continuous-Time Finance (4)
This course covers most powerful tools in finance, i.e., which are finance models in continuous-time setting. The subjects include dynamic portfolio selection, derivative pricing, dynamic term structure, and dynamic equilibrium models. Students may not earn academic credit for both MGTF 411 and MGT 286; these are course duplicates. Prerequisites: MGT 285; admission to management PhD program or by consent of instructor.

MGT 287. Empirical Finance (4)
This course covers econometric methods including the linear regression model, serial correlation, hypothesis testing, timer series analysis, and estimation of discrete choice and simultaneous equation models. Prerequisites: MGT 285; admission to management PhD program or by consent of instructor.

MGT 293A. Literature Review and Critique Paper (4)
This course will require the student to identify and critique the research literature in a particular area identified during the summer of first year. The student will write a review paper that identifies opportunities for further research. Prerequisites: none.

MGT 293B. Literature Review and Critique Presentation (4)
In this course, the student will continue work on the literature review and prepare a presentation of the gaps and opportunities identified in the literature. Prerequisites: MGT 293A.

MGT 293C. Original Research Paper (4)
In this course, the student will work on identifying and developing an original research problem based on the gaps identified in the literature review courses. Prerequisites: MGT 291, MGT 292, MGT 293B.

MGT 293D. Original Research Presentation (4)
In this course, the student will continue work on the original research problem and prepare a presentation that will prepare for candidacy. Prerequisites: MGT 292, MGT 293C.

MGT 296. Dissertation (4-12)
This course is taken by students actively working on their dissertation after advancing to candidacy.

MGT 299. Advanced Field Advising (4)
Each student who has not advanced to candidacy by June of the third year must enroll in and complete MGT 299 during the fall, winter, and spring quarters of the fourth year. Prerequisites: admission to management PhD program.  

SIO 286. Marine Science, Economics, and Policy (4)
This course investigates global issues in marine conservation and potential policy solutions. The approach is interdisciplinary, fast-paced, and discussion-oriented. Students will become acquainted with sufficient background in marine biology, ecology, marine and conservation economics, international law and policy as preparation for participation in discussion on real-world issues in marine conservation. Topics and instructors change each quarter. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SIO 295S. Introduction to Marine Biodiversity and Conservation—Seminar (8)
Lectures on ecological, economic, social, and legal issues related to marine biodiversity and case studies on socioeconomic and legal issues. Students are expected to attend field trips at sea and to various sites around San Diego County as part of the corequisite course. Students who have taken SIO 295 may not receive credit for SIO 295S. Prerequisites: consent of instructors. Corequisites: SIO 295LS and MAS students only.

SIO 295LS. Introduction to Marine Biodiversity and Conservation—Lab (8)
Laboratory work on major biological taxa, field trips on biodiversity in situ, computer labs for informatic tools. Students are expected to attend field trips at sea and to various sites around San Diego County as part of the course. Students who have taken SIO 295L may not receive credit for SIO 295LS. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. Corequisites: SIO 295S and MAS students only.

MBC 258. Special Topics/Marine Biology–MAS-MBC Forum (1)
Required course for MAS-MBC students will focus on development of MAS Capstone Projects and discussions covering marine conservation issues, including informal student presentations on political, economic, historical, educational, and natural science issues related to conservation and analysis of marine biodiversity. Prerequisites: SIO 295S and SIO 295LS summer courses. Limited to registered students in MAS Marine Biodiversity and Conservation program. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

MBC 296. Capstone Independent Study Project (6)
Building on the knowledge and experience gained from the entire curriculum of the master’s in Marine Biodiversity and Conservation (MAS-MBC) program, students will design and present a specific marine conservation project. Limited to registered students in MAS-MBC program. Prerequisites: SIO 286. (F,W)

Electives. Varies (8)
Students enroll in eight elective units of course work relating to marine biodiversity and conservation issues that are approved by the MAS-MBC program chair.

 
UC San Diego 9500 Gilman Dr., La Jolla, CA 92093

TMC 1. First Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to Marshall NFRS students only.

TMC 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to TMC transfer students only.

TMC 10. Thurgood Marshall College Methods of Inquiry (2)
In this course, students learn analytical thinking strategies routinely used by professional scholars, historians, and social planners. Each student applies methodologies from the materials presented in lectures, films, and readings relevant to the current course work. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: department stamp.

TMC 15. Introduction to Public Service in America (4)
This course is designed to study, discuss, and analyze the history and current role of public service in the United States. Students will be introduced to the different roles held by the three sectors of the American economic structure (government, business, and nonprofit/public service) with opportunity to provide a critical analysis of those roles within American society.

TMC 20. Thurgood Marshall College Honors Seminar (1)
Weekly seminar conducted by UC San Diego faculty and distinguished guest lecturers on topics related to the core curriculum: diversity, justice, and imagination. P/NP grades only.

TMC 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
These seminars are designed to expose undergraduate students, especially freshmen and sophomores, to exciting research conducted by UC San Diego faculty. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: none.

TMC 198. Thurgood Marshall College Directed Group Studies (4)
Directed group studies of a creative project. Designated for TMC students to work as a group on a project supervised by faculty; not included in regular curriculum, where group emphasis would be more beneficial and constructive than individual special studies. Prerequisites: upper-division standing (ninety units) including lower-division writing requirement (DOC 2 and DOC 3), minimum overall GPA of 2.5 and consent of instructor.

TMC 199. Marshall College Special Project (1–4)
Individual, independent research, or creative work intended to satisfy Marshall College graduation requirement. Designated for Marshall College students, topics are supervised by Marshall faculty in association with the honors seminar and honors projects. A written application describing the project is required. See Office of the Provost. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: upper-division students with 2.5 GPA and ninety units and approval of the provost or faculty designee. Honors standing required for honors projects.

MATS 200. Graduate Seminar (0)
Each graduate student in the Materials Science and Engineering Program is expected to attend a weekly seminar in materials science or related areas. MS students must enroll for three quarters, PhD students for six quarters, as of fall 1995. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

MATS 201A. Thermodynamics of Solids (4)
The thermodynamics and statistical mechanics of solids. Basic concepts; equilibrium properties of alloy systems; thermodynamic information from phase diagrams, surfaces, and interfaces; crystalline defects. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATS 201B. Solid State Diffusion and Reaction Kinetics (4)
Thermally activated processes, Boltzmann factor, homogeneous and heterogeneous reactions, solid state diffusion, Fick’s laws, diffusion mechanisms, Kirkendall effect, Boltzman-Matano analysis, high diffusivity paths. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATS 201C. Phase Transformations (4)
Classification of phase transformations: displacive and reconstructive transformations: classical and nonclassical theories of nucleation: Becker-Doering, Volmer-Weber, lattice instabilities, spinodal decomposition. Growth theories: interface migration, stress effects, terrace-ledge mechanisms, epitaxial growth, kinetics, and mechanics. Precipitation. Order-disorder transformations. Solidification. Amorphization. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Cross-listed with MAE 271C.)

MATS 205A. Imperfections in Solids (4)
Point, line, and planar defects in crystalline solids, including vacancies, self-interstitials, solute atoms, dislocations, stacking faults, and grain boundaries; effects of imperfections on mechanical properties; interactions of dislocations with point defects; strain hardening by micro-obstacles, precipitation, and alloying elements. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATS 213A. Dynamic Behavior of Materials I (4)
Elastic waves in continuum; longitudinal and shear waves. Surface waves. Plastic waves; shock waves; Rankine-Hugoniot relations. Method of characteristics, differential and difference form of conservation equations; dynamic plasticity and dynamic fracture. Shock wave reflection and interaction. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Cross-listed with MAE 273A.) (F)

MATS 227. Structure and Analysis of Solids (4)
Key concepts in the atomic structure and bonding of solids such as metals, ceramics, and semiconductors. Symmetry operations, point groups, lattice types, space groups, simple and complex inorganic compounds, structure/property comparisons, structure determination with X-ray diffraction. Ionic, covalent, metallic bonding compared with physical properties. Atomic and molecular orbitals, bands verses bonds, free electron theory. Prerequisites: graduate student or consent of instructor.

MATS 231. Mechanics of Soft Materials (4)
Main focus is the large deformations and instabilities in soft materials, such as elastomers, gels, and biomaterials. Some contents in thermodynamics and finite deformation theory are reviewed and summarized. Fundamental theories are applied to study the mechanics of gels, electroactive polymers, and biomaterials. This course intends to use soft material as an example to illustrate how to study the interaction between mechanics and other fields in materials (e.g., electric field, chemical field). Students may not receive credit for both MAE 276 and MATS 231. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Cross-listed with MAE 276.)

MATS 236. Advanced Ceramic (4)
Topics include phase equilibria and crystallography, defects and thermodynamics (Kröger-Vink Notation), glass science, electrical and ionic transport behavior, Brouwer diagrams, powder synthesis and compaction, sintering theory and gain growth, mechanical, optical, magnetic, electrical properties, fuel cells. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATS 243. Modern Materials Analysis (4)
Analysis of the near surface of materials via ion, electron, and X-ray spectroscopes. Topics to be covered include particle solid interactions. Rutherford Backscattering, secondary ion mass spectroscopy, electron energy loss spectroscopy, particle induced X-ray emission, Auger electron spectroscopy, extended X-ray absorption fine structure and channeling. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Cross-listed with ECE 237.)

MATS 251A. Electronic and Photonic Properties of Materials (4)
The electronic and optical properties of metals, semiconductors, and insulators. The concept of the band structure. Electronic and lattice conductivity. Type I and Type II superconductivity. Optical engineering using photonic band gap crystals in one-, two-, and three-dimensions. Current research frontiers. Prerequisites: consent of the instructor. (Cross-listed with MAE 265A.)

MATS 251B. Magnetic Materials: Principles and Applications (4)
The basis of magnetism: classical and quantum mechanical points of view. Different kinds of magnetic materials. Magnetic phenomena including anisotropy, magnetostriction, domains, and magnetization dynamics. Current frontiers of nanomagnetics research including thin films and particles. Optical, data storage, and biomedical engineering applications of soft and hard magnetic materials. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Cross-listed with MAE 265B, NANO 251A.)

MATS 252. Biomaterials and Medical Devices (4)
This class will cover biomaterials and biomimetic materials. Metal, ceramic, and polymer biomaterials will be discussed. Emphasis will be on the structure-property relationships, biocompatibility/degradation issues and tissue/material interactions. Synthesis and mechanical testing of biomimetic materials will also be discussed. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Cross-listed with MAE 266.)

MATS 253. Nanomaterials and Properties (4)
This course discusses synthesis techniques, processing, microstructural control, and unique physical properties of materials in nanodimensions. Topics include nanowires, quantum dots, thin films, electrical transport, electron emission properties, optical behavior, mechanical behavior, and technical applications of nanomaterials. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Cross-listed with MAE 267.)

MATS 254. Frontier Micro-Electro-Mechanical Systems (MEMS) Materials and Devices (4)
Fabrication of Micro-Electro-Mechanical Systems (MEMS) by bulk and surface micromachining of single crystal, polycrystal, and amorphous silicon and other materials. Performance issues including electrostatic, magnetic, piezoelectric actuations, residual stresses, deformation. Novel device applications, future trends in smart materials and nano-electro-mechanical (NEMS) systems. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (Cross-listed with MAE 268.)

MATS 256. Energy Materials and Applications (4)
This class will cover the fundamentals/engineering aspects of various energy materials based on metallic, ceramic, semiconductor; and chemical structures and their applications related to solar cells, fuel cells, batteries, fusion energy, and hydrogen storage will be discussed. (Cross-listed with MAE 278.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor/department stamp.

MATS 257. Polymer Science and Engineering (4)
Quantitative basic understanding of different branches of polymer science varying from polymer chemistry, characterization, thermodynamics, rheological properties, smart materials, self-assembly in biopolymers (natural) and synthetic polymers, and applications of polymers ranging from medicine to structure. (Cross-listed with BENG 242.) Prerequisites: graduate standing in bioengineering (BE 75) or materials science (MS 76) or consent of instructor.

MATS 259. Frontiers in Therapeutic and Diagnostic Delivery (1)
Nanotechnology has made a tremendous impact on drug and diagnostic delivery technology. This seminar series will expose PharmD students to the most cutting edge research on using nanotechnology for the delivery of agents to detect, treat, and prevent disease. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. 

MATS 261A. Processing of Polymers and Composites (4)
Introduction to processing and fabrication methods of polymers and composite materials. Processing techniques; facilities and equipment, material-processing-microstructure interaction, materials selection, form and quality control. Extrusion, injection molding, blow molding, compression molding, thermoforming, casting, foaming. Wet layup; sprayup; autoclave cure, SMC; RTM; resin infusion; winding and fiber placement; pultrusion. Process induced defects and environmental considerations. (Cross-listed with SE 251A.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

MATS 261B. Mechanical Behavior of Polymers and Composites (4)
Material-science oriented course on polymers and composites. Mechanical properties of polymers; micromechanisms of elastic and plastic deformations, fracture, and fatigue of polymers and composites. (Cross-listed with SE 251B.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

MATS 295. Research Conference (2)
Group discussion of research activities and progress of group members. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATS 296. Independent Study (4)
Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATS 299. Graduate Research (1–12)
Subject to the approval of a faculty adviser, students may choose courses offered by departments participating in the Materials Science and Engineering Program. Please see the graduate coordinator for more information.(S/U grades only.)

MATH 3C. Precalculus (4)
Functions and their graphs. Linear and polynomial functions, zeroes, inverse functions, exponential and logarithmic, trigonometric functions and their inverses. Emphasis on understanding algebraic, numerical and graphical approaches making use of graphing calculators. (No credit given if taken after Math 4C, 1A/10A, or 2A/20A.) Three or more years of high school mathematics or equivalent recommended. Prerequisites: Math Placement Exam qualifying score.

MATH 4C. Precalculus for Science and Engineering (4)
Review of polynomials. Graphing functions and relations: graphing rational functions, effects of linear changes of coordinates. Circular functions and right triangle trigonometry. Reinforcement of function concept: exponential, logarithmic, and trigonometric functions. Vectors. Conic sections. Polar coordinates. (No credit given if taken after Math 1A/10A or 2A/20A. Two units of credit given if taken after Math 3C.) Prerequisites: Math Placement Exam qualifying score or Math 3C with a grade of C– or better.

MATH 10A. Calculus I (4)
Differential calculus of functions of one variable, with applications. Functions, graphs, continuity, limits, derivatives, tangent lines, optimization problems. (No credit given if taken after or concurrent with Math 20A.) Prerequisites: Math Placement Exam qualifying score, or AP Calculus AB score of 2, or SAT II Math Level 2 score of 600 or higher, or Math 3C, or Math 4C.

MATH 10B. Calculus II (4)
Integral calculus of functions of one variable, with applications. Antiderivatives, definite integrals, the Fundamental Theorem of Calculus, methods of integration, areas and volumes, separable differential equations. (No credit given if taken after or concurrent with Math 20B.) Prerequisites: AP Calculus AB score of 3, 4, or 5 (or equivalent AB subscore on BC exam), or Math 10A, or Math 20A.

MATH 10C. Calculus III (4)
Introduction to functions of more than one variable. Vector geometry, partial derivatives, velocity and acceleration vectors, optimization problems. (No credit given if taken after or concurrent with 20C.) Prerequisites: AP Calculus BC score of 3, 4, or 5, or Math 10B, or Math 20B.

MATH 11. Calculus-Based Introductory Probability and Statistics (5)
Events and probabilities, conditional probability, Bayes’ formula. Discrete and continuous random variables: mean, variance; binomial, Poisson distributions, normal, uniform, exponential distributions, central limit theorem. Sample statistics, confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, regression. Applications. Introduction to software for probabilistic and statistical analysis. Emphasis on connections between probability and statistics, numerical results of real data, and techniques of data analysis. Prerequisites: AP Calculus BC score of 3, 4, or 5, or Math 10B or Math 20B.

MATH 15A. Introduction to Discrete Mathematics (4)
Basic discrete mathematical structure: sets, relations, functions, sequences, equivalence relations, partial orders, and number systems. Methods of reasoning and proofs: propositional logic, predicate logic, induction, recursion, and pigeonhole principle. Infinite sets and diagonalization. Basic counting techniques; permutation and combinations. Applications will be given to digital logic design, elementary number theory, design of programs, and proofs of program correctness. Credit not offered for both Math 15A and CSE 20. Equivalent to CSE 20. Prerequisites: CSE 8A or CSE 8B or CSE 11.

MATH 18. Linear Algebra (4)
Matrix algebra, Gaussian elimination, determinants. Linear and affine subspaces, bases of Euclidean spaces. Eigenvalues and eigenvectors, quadratic forms, orthogonal matrices, diagonalization of symmetric matrices. Applications. Computing symbolic and graphical solutions using Matlab. Students may not receive credit for both Math 18 and 31AH. Prerequisites: Math Placement Exam qualifying score, or AP Calculus AB score of 2, or SAT II Math Level 2 score of 600 or higher, or Math 3C, or Math 4C, or Math 10A, or Math 20A. Students who have not completed listed prerequisites may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 20A. Calculus for Science and Engineering (4)
Foundations of differential and integral calculus of one variable. Functions, graphs, continuity, limits, derivative, tangent line. Applications with algebraic, exponential, logarithmic, and trigonometric functions. Introduction to the integral. (Two credits given if taken after Math 1A/10A and no credit given if taken after Math 1B/10B or Math 1C/10C. Formerly numbered Math 2A.) Prerequisites: Math Placement Exam qualifying score, or AP Calculus AB score of 2 or 3 (or equivalent AB subscore on BC exam), or SAT II Math 2C score of 650 or higher, or Math 4C with a grade of C– or better, or Math 10A with a grade of C– or better.

MATH 20B. Calculus for Science and Engineering (4)
Integral calculus of one variable and its applications, with exponential, logarithmic, hyperbolic, and trigonometric functions. Methods of integration. Infinite series. Polar coordinates in the plane and complex exponentials. (Two units of credits given if taken after Math 1B/10B or Math 1C/10C.) Prerequisites: AP Calculus AB score of 4 or 5, or AP Calculus BC score of 3, or Math 20A with a grade of C– or better, or Math 10B with a grade of C– or better, or Math 10C with a grade of C– or better.

MATH 20C. Calculus and Analytic Geometry for Science and Engineering (4)
Vector geometry, vector functions and their derivatives. Partial differentiation. Maxima and minima. Double integration. (Two units of credit given if taken after Math 10C. Credit not offered for both Math 20C and 31BH. Formerly numbered Math 21C.) Prerequisites: AP Calculus BC score of 4 or 5, or Math 20B with a grade of C– or better.

MATH 20D. Introduction to Differential Equations (4)
Ordinary differential equations: exact, separable, and linear; constant coefficients, undetermined coefficients, variations of parameters. Systems. Series solutions. Laplace transforms. Techniques for engineering sciences. Computing symbolic and graphical solutions using Matlab. (Formerly numbered Math 21D.) May be taken as repeat credit for Math 21D. Prerequisites: Math 20C (or Math 21C) or Math 31BH with a grade of C– or better.

MATH 20E. Vector Calculus (4)
Change of variable in multiple integrals, Jacobian, Line integrals, Green’s theorem. Vector fields, gradient fields, divergence, curl. Spherical/cylindrical coordinates. Taylor series in several variables. Surface integrals, Stoke’s theorem. Gauss’ theorem. Conservative fields. Prerequisites: Math 20C (or Math 21C) or Math 31BH with a grade of C– or better.

MATH 31AH. Honors Linear Algebra (4)
First quarter of three-quarter honors integrated linear algebra/multivariable calculus sequence for well-prepared students. Topics include: real/complex number systems, vector spaces, linear transformations, bases and dimension, change of basis, eigenvalues, eigenvectors, diagonalization. (Credit not offered for both Math 31AH and 20F.) Prerequisites: AP Calculus BC score of 5 or consent of instructor.

MATH 31BH. Honors Multivariable Calculus (4)
Second quarter of three-quarter honors integrated linear algebra/multivariable calculus sequence for well-prepared students. Topics include: derivative in several variables, Jacobian matrices, extrema and constrained extrema, integration in several variables. (Credit not offered for both Math 31BH and 20C.) Prerequisites: Math 31AH with a grade of B– or better, or consent of instructor.

MATH 31CH. Honors Vector Calculus (4)
Third quarter of honors integrated linear algebra/multivariable calculus sequence for well-prepared students. Topics include: change of variables formula, integration of differential forms, exterior derivative, generalized Stoke’s theorem, conservative vector fields, potentials. Prerequisites: Math 31BH with a grade of B– or better, or consent of instructor.

MATH 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshman. Prerequisites: none.

MATH 95. Introduction to Teaching Math (2)
(Cross-listed with EDS 30.) Revisit students’ learning difficulties in mathematics in more depth to prepare students to make meaningful observations of how K–12 teachers deal with these difficulties. Explore how instruction can use students’ knowledge to pose problems that stimulate students’ intellectual curiosity. Prerequisites: none.

MATH 96. Putnam Seminar (1)
Students will develop skills in analytical thinking as they solve and present solutions to challenging mathematical problems in preparation for the William Lowell Putnam Mathematics Competition, a national undergraduate mathematics examination held each year. Students must sit for at least one half of the Putnam exam (given the first Saturday in December) to receive a passing grade. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit up to four times. Prerequisites: AP Calculus AB score of 4 or more, or AP Calculus BC score of 3 or more, or Math 20A.

MATH 99R. Independent Study (1)
Independent study or research under direction of a member of the faculty. Prerequisites: Must be of first-year standing and a Regent’s Scholar.

MATH 100A. Abstract Algebra I (4)
First course in a rigorous three-quarter introduction to the methods and basic structures of higher algebra. Topics include: groups, subgroups and factor groups, homomorphisms, rings, fields. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 100A and Math 103A.) Prerequisites: Math 31CH or Math 109 or consent of instructor.

MATH 100B. Abstract Algebra II (4)
Second course in a rigorous three-quarter introduction to the methods and basic structures of higher algebra. Topics include: rings (especially polynomial rings) and ideals, unique factorization, fields; linear algebra from perspective of linear transformations on vector spaces, including inner product spaces, determinants, diagonalization. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 100B and Math 103B.) Prerequisites: Math 100A or consent of instructor.

MATH 100C. Abstract Algebra III (4)
Third course in a rigorous three-quarter introduction to the methods and basic structures of higher algebra. Topics include: linear transformations, including Jordan canonical form and rational canonical form; Galois theory, including the insolvability of the quintic. Prerequisites: Math 100B or consent of instructor.

MATH 102. Applied Linear Algebra (4)
Second course in linear algebra from a computational yet geometric point of view. Elementary Hermitian matrices, Schur’s theorem, normal matrices, and quadratic forms. Moore-Penrose generalized inverse and least square problems. Vector and matrix norms. Characteristic and singular values. Canonical forms. Determinants and multilinear algebra. Prerequisites: Math 18 or Math 20F or Math 31AH and Math 20C. Students who have not completed listed prerequisites may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 103A. Modern Algebra I (4)
First course in a two-quarter introduction to abstract algebra with some applications. Emphasis on group theory. Topics include: definitions and basic properties of groups, properties of isomorphisms, subgroups. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 100A and Math 103A.) Prerequisites: Math 31CH or Math 109 or consent of instructor.

MATH 103B. Modern Algebra II (4)
Second course in a two-quarter introduction to abstract algebra with some applications. Emphasis on rings and fields. Topics include: definitions and basic properties of rings, fields, and ideals, homomorphisms, irreducibility of polynomials. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 100B and Math 103B.) Prerequisites: Math 103A or Math 100A or consent of instructor.

MATH 104A. Number Theory I (4)
Elementary number theory with applications. Topics include unique factorization, irrational numbers, residue systems, congruences, primitive roots, reciprocity laws, quadratic forms, arithmetic functions, partitions, Diophantine equations, distribution of primes. Applications include fast Fourier transform, signal processing, codes, cryptography. Prerequisites: Math 109 or Math 31CH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 104B. Number Theory II (4)
Topics in number theory such as finite fields, continued fractions, Diophantine equations, character sums, zeta and theta functions, prime number theorem, algebraic integers, quadratic and cyclotomic fields, prime ideal theory, class number, quadratic forms, units, Diophantine approximation, p-adic numbers, elliptic curves. Prerequisites: Math 104A or consent of instructor.

MATH 104C. Number Theory III (4)
Topics in algebraic and analytic number theory, with an advanced treatment of material listed for Math 104B. Prerequisites: Math 104B or consent of instructor.

MATH 109. Mathematical Reasoning (4)
This course uses a variety of topics in mathematics to introduce the students to rigorous mathematical proof, emphasizing quantifiers, induction, negation, proof by contradiction, naive set theory, equivalence relations and epsilon-delta proofs. Required of all departmental majors. Prerequisites: Math 20F or Math 31AH or consent of instructor.

MATH 110A. Introduction to Partial Differential Equations (4)
Fourier series, orthogonal expansions, and eigenvalue problems. Sturm-Liouville theory. Separation of variables for partial differential equations of mathematical physics, including topics on Bessel functions and Legendre polynomials. Formerly Math 110. (Students may not receive credit for Math 110A and Math 110.) Prerequisites: Math 20D and either 20F or Math 31AH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 110B. Elements of Partial Differential Equations and Integral Equations (4)
Basic concepts and classification of partial differential equations. First order equations, characteristics. Hamilton-Jacobi theory, Laplace’s equation, wave equation, heat equation. Separation of variables, eigenfunction expansions, existence and uniqueness of solutions. (Formerly Math 132A. Students may not receive credit for Math 110B and Math 132A.) Prerequisites: Math 110A or consent of instructor.

MATH 111A. Mathematical Modeling I (4)
An introduction to mathematical modeling in the physical and social sciences. Topics vary, but have included mathematical models for epidemics, chemical reactions, political organizations, magnets, economic mobility, and geographical distributions of species. May be taken for credit two times when topics change. Prerequisites: Math 20D and either Math 20F or Math 31AH, and Math 109, or consent ofinstructor.

MATH 111B. Mathematical Modeling II (4)
Continued study on mathematical modeling in the physical and social sciences, using advanced techniques that will expand upon the topics selected and further the mathematical theory presented in Math 111A. Prerequisites: Math 111A or consent of instructor.

MATH 120A. Elements of Complex Analysis (4)
Complex numbers and functions. Analytic functions, harmonic functions, elementary conformal mappings. Complex integration. Power series. Cauchy’s theorem. Cauchy’s formula. Residue theorem. Prerequisites:Math 20E or Math 31CH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 120B. Applied Complex Analysis (4)
Applications of the residue theorem. Conformal mapping and applications to potential theory, flows, and temperature distributions. Fourier transformations. Laplace transformations, and applications to integral and differential equations. Selected topics such as Poisson’s formula, Dirichlet’s problem, Neumann’s problem, or special functions. Prerequisites: Math 120A or consent of instructor.

MATH 121A. Foundations of Teaching and Learning Mathematics I (4)
(Cross-listed with EDS 121A.) Develop teachers’ knowledge base (knowledge of mathematics content, pedagogy, and student learning) in the context of advanced mathematics. This course builds on the previous courses where these components of knowledge were addressed exclusively in the context of high-school mathematics. Prerequisites: EDS 30/Math 95, Calculus 10C or 20C.

MATH 121B. Foundations of Teaching and Learning Math II (4)
(Cross-listed with EDS 121B.) Examine how learning theories can consolidate observations about conceptual development with the individual student as well as the development of knowledge in the history of mathematics. Examine how teaching theories explain the effect of teaching approaches addressed in the previous courses. Prerequisites: EDS 121A/Math 121A.

MATH 130A. Ordinary Differential Equations I (4)
Linear and nonlinear systems of differential equations. Stability theory, perturbation theory. Applications and introduction to numerical solutions. Prerequisites: Math 20D and either Math 20F or Math 31AH or consent of instructor.

MATH 130B. Ordinary Differential Equations II (4)
Existence and uniqueness of solutions to differential equations. Local and global theorems of continuity and differentiabillity. Prerequisites: Math 130A or consent of instructor.

MATH 140A. Foundations of Real Analysis I (4)
First course in a rigorous three-quarter sequence on real analysis. Topics include: the real number system, basic topology, numerical sequences and series, continuity. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 140A and Math 142A.) Prerequisites: Math 31CH or Math 109, or consent of instructor.

MATH 140B. Foundations of Real Analysis II (4)
Second course in a rigorous three-quarter sequence on real analysis. Topics include: differentiation, the Riemann-Stieltjes integral, sequences and series of functions, power series, Fourier series, and special functions. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 140B and Math 142B.) Prerequisites: Math 140A or consent of instructor.

MATH 140C. Foundations of Real Analysis III (4)
Third course in a rigorous three-quarter sequence on real analysis. Topics include: differentiation of functions of several real variables, the implicit and inverse function theorems, the Lebesgue integral, infinite-dimensional normed spaces. Prerequisites: Math 140B or consent of instructor.

MATH 142A. Introduction to Analysis I (4)
First course in an introductory two-quarter sequence on analysis. Topics include: the real number system, numerical sequences and series, limits of functions, continuity. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 140 and Math 142A.) Prerequisites: Math 31CH or Math 109, or consent of instructor.

MATH 142B. Introduction to Analysis II (4)
Second course in an introductory two-quarter sequence on analysis. Topics include: differentiation, the Rieman integral, sequences and series of functions, uniform convergence, Taylor and Fourier series, special functions. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 140B and Math 142B.) Prerequisites: Math 142A or Math 140A, or consent of instructor.

MATH 150A. Differential Geometry (4)
Differential geometry of curves and surfaces. Gauss and mean curvatures, geodesics, parallel displacement, Gauss-Bonnet theorem. Prerequisites: Math 20E with a grade of C– or better and Math 20F with a grade of C– or better, or consent of instructor.

MATH 150B. Calculus on Manifolds (4)
Calculus of functions of several variables, inverse function theorem. Further topics may include exterior differential forms, Stokes’ theorem, manifolds, Sard’s theorem, elements of differential topology, singularities of maps, catastrophes, further topics in differential geometry, topics in geometry of physics. Prerequisites: Math 150A or consent of instructor.

MATH 152. Applicable Mathematics and Computing (4)
This course will give students experience in applying theory to real world applications such as Internet and wireless communication problems. The course will incorporate talks by experts from industry and students will be helped to carry out independent projects. Topics include graph visualization, labelling, and embeddings, random graphs and randomized algorithms. May be taken 3 times for credit. Prerequisites: Math 20D and either 20F or Math 31AH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 153. Geometry for Secondary Teachers (4)
Two- and three-dimensional Euclidean geometry is developed from one set of axioms. Pedagogical issues will emerge from the mathematics and be addressed using current research in teaching and learning geometry. This course is designed for prospective secondary school mathematics teachers. Prerequisites: Math 109 or Math 31CH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 154. Discrete Mathematics and Graph Theory (4)
Basic concepts in graph theory. Combinatorial tools, structures in graphs (Hamiltonian cycles, perfect matching). Properties of graphics and applications in basic algorithmic problems (planarity, k-colorability, traveling salesman problem). Prerequisites: Math 109 or Math 31CH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 155A. Geometric Computer Graphics (4)
Bezier curves and control lines, de Casteljau construction for subdivision, elevation of degree, control points of Hermite curves, barycentric coordinates, rational curves. Programming knowledge recommended. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 155A and CSE 167.) Prerequisites: Math 20F or Math 31AH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 160A. Elementary Mathematical Logic I (4)
An introduction to recursion theory, set theory, proof theory, model theory. Turing machines. Undecidability of arithmetic and predicate logic. Proof by induction and definition by recursion. Cardinal and ordinal numbers. Completeness and compactness theorems for propositional and predicate calculi. Prerequisites: Math 100A, or Math 103A, or Math 140A, or consent of instructor.

MATH 160B. Elementary Mathematical Logic II (4)
A continuation of recursion theory, set theory, proof theory, model theory. Turing machines. Undecidability of arithmetic and predicate logic. Proof by induction and definition by recursion. Cardinal and ordinal numbers. Completeness and compactness theorems for propositional and predicate calculi. Prerequisites: Math 160A or consent of instructor.

MATH 163. History of Mathematics (4)
Topics will vary from year to year in areas of mathematics and their development. Topics may include the evolution of mathematics from the Babylonian period to the eighteenth century using original sources, a history of the foundations of mathematics and the development of modern mathematics. Prerequisites: Math 20B or consent of instructor.

MATH 168A. Topics in Applied Mathematics—Computer Science(4)
Topics to be chosen in areas of applied mathematics and mathematical aspects of computer science. May be repeated once for credit with different topics. Prerequisites: Math 20F or Math 31AH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 170A. Introduction to Numerical Analysis: Linear Algebra (4)
Analysis of numerical methods for linear algebraic systems and least squares problems. Orthogonalization methods. Ill conditioned problems. Eigenvalue and singular value computations. Knowledge of programming recommended. Prerequisites: Math 20F.

MATH 170B. Introduction to Numerical Analysis: Approximation and Nonlinear Equations (4)
Rounding and discretization errors. Calculation of roots of polynomials and nonlinear equations. Interpolation. Approximation of functions. Knowledge of programming recommended. Prerequisites: Math 170A.

MATH 170C. Introduction to Numerical Analysis: Ordinary Differential Equations (4)
Numerical differentiation and integration. Ordinary differential equations and their numerical solution. Basic existence and stability theory. Difference equations. Boundary value problems. Prerequisites: Math 20D or 21D and Math 170B, or consent of instructor.

MATH 171A. Introduction to Numerical Optimization: Linear Programming (4)
Linear optimization and applications. Linear programming, the simplex method, duality. Selected topics from integer programming, network flows, transportation problems, inventory problems, and other applications. Knowledge of programming recommended. (Credit not allowed for both Math 171A and Econ 172A.) Prerequisites: Math 20F or consent of instructor.

MATH 171B. Introduction to Numerical Optimization: Nonlinear Programming (4)
Convergence of sequences in Rn, multivariate Taylor series. Bisection and related methods for nonlinear equations in one variable. Newton’s methods for nonlinear equations in one and many variables. Unconstrained optimization and Newton’s method. Equality-constrained optimization, Kuhn-Tucker theorem. Inequality-constrained optimization. Knowledge of programming recommended. (Credit not allowed for both Math 171B and Econ 172B.) Prerequisites: Math 171A or consent of instructor.

MATH 174. Numerical Methods for Physical Modeling (4)
(Conjoined with Math 274.) Floating point arithmetic, direct and iterative solution of linear equations, iterative solution of nonlinear equations, optimization, approximation theory, interpolation, quadrature, numerical methods for initial and boundary value problems in ordinary differential equations. (Students may not receive credit for both Math 174 and PHYS 105, AMES 153 or 154. Students may not receive credit for Math 174 if Math 170A, B, or C has already been taken.) Graduate students will do an extra assignment/exam. Prerequisites: Math 20D or Math 21D, and either Math 20F or Math 31AH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 175. Numerical Methods for Partial Differential Equations (4)
(Conjoined with Math 275.) Mathematical background for working with partial differential equations. Survey of finite difference, finite element, and other numerical methods for the solution of elliptic, parabolic, and hyperbolic partial differential equations. (Formerly Math 172. Students may not receive credit for Math 175/275 and Math 172.) Graduate students do an extra paper, project, or presentation, per instructor. Prerequisites: Math 174 or Math 274, or consent of instructor.

MATH 179. Projects in Computational and Applied Mathematics (4)
(Conjoined with Math 279.) Mathematical models of physical systems arising in science and engineering, good models and well-posedness, numerical and other approximation techniques, solution algorithms for linear and nonlinear approximation problems, scientific visualizations, scientific software design and engineering, project-oriented. Graduate students will do an extra paper, project, or presentation per instructor. Prerequisites: Math 174 or Math 274 or consent of instructor.

MATH 180A. Introduction to Probability (4)
Probability spaces, random variables, independence, conditional probability, distribution, expectation, variance, joint distributions, central limit theorem. (Two units of credit offered for Math 180A if Econ 120A previously, no credit offered if Econ 120A concurrently.) Prior or concurrent enrollment in Math 109 is highly recommended. Prerequisites: Math 20C or Math 31BH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 180B. Introduction to Stochastic Processes I (4)
Random vectors, multivariate densities, covariance matrix, multivariate normal distribution. Random walk, Poisson process. Other topics if time permits. Prerequisites: Math 20D and either Math 20F or Math 31AH, and Math 109, and Math 180A, or consent of instructor.

MATH 180C. Introduction to Stochastic Processes II (4)
Markov chains in discrete and continuous time, random walk, recurrent events. If time permits, topics chosen from stationary normal processes, branching processes, queuing theory. Prerequisites: Math 180B or consent of instructor.

MATH 181A. Introduction to Mathematical Statistics I (4)
Multivariate distribution, functions of random variables, distributions related to normal. Parameter estimation, method of moments, maximum likelihood. Estimator accuracy and confidence intervals. Students completing Econ 120A instead of Math 180A must obtain consent of instructor to enroll. Prior or concurrent enrollment in Math 109 is highly recommended. Prerequisites: Math 180A, and Math 20F or Math 31AH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 181B. Introduction to Mathematical Statistics II (4)
Hypothesis testing. Linear models, regression, and analysis of variance. Goodness of fit tests. Nonparametric statistics. Two units of credit offered for Math 181B if Econ 120B previously; no credit offered if Econ 120B concurrently. Prior enrollment in Math 109 is highly recommended. Prerequisites: Math 181A or consent of instructor.

MATH 181C. Mathematical Statistics—Nonparametric Statistics (4)
Topics covered may include the following: classical rank test, rank correlations, permutation tests, distribution free testing, efficiency, confidence intervals, nonparametric regression and density estimation, resampling techniques (bootstrap, jackknife, etc.) and cross validations. Prior enrollment in Math 109 is highly recommended. Prerequisites: Math 181B or consent of instructor.

MATH 181E. Mathematical Statistics—Time Series (4)
Analysis of trends and seasonal effects, autoregressive and moving averages models, forecasting, informal introduction to spectral analysis. Prerequisites: Math 181B or consent of instructor.

MATH 183. Statistical Methods (4)
Introduction to probability. Discrete and continuous random variables–binomial, Poisson and Gaussian distributions. Central limit theorem. Data analysis and inferential statistics: graphical techniques, confidence intervals, hypothesis tests, curve fitting. (Credit not offered for Math 183 if Econ 120A, ECE 109, Math 180A, Math 181A, or Math 186 previously or concurrently taken.) Prerequisites: Math 20C (21C) with a grade of C– or better, or consent of instructor.

MATH 184A. Combinatorics (4)
Introduction to the theory and applications of combinatorics. Enumeration of combinatorial structures. Ranking and unranking. Graph theory with applications and algorithms. Recursive algorithms. Inclusion-exclusion. Generating functions. Polya theory. Prerequisites: Math 109 with a grade of C– or better, or consent of instructor.

MATH 185. Introduction to Computational Statistics (4)
Statistical analysis of data by means of package programs. Regression, analysis of variance, discriminant analysis, principal components, Monte Carlo simulation, and graphical methods. Emphasis will be on understanding the connections between statistical theory, numerical results, and analysis of real data. Recommended preparation: exposure to computer programming (such as CSE 5A, CSE 7, or ECE 15) highly recommended. Prerequisites: Math 11, or Math 181A, or Math 183, or Math 186, or MAE 108, or ECE 109, or Econ 120A, and either Math 20F or Math 31AH or consent of instructor.

MATH 186. Probability Statistics for Bioinformatics (4)
This course will cover discrete and random variables, data analysis and inferential statistics, likelihood estimators and scoring matrices with applications to biological problems. Introduction to Binomial, Poisson, and Gaussian distributions, central limit theorem, applications to sequence and functional analysis of genomes and genetic epidemiology. (Credit not offered for Math 186 if Econ 120A, ECE 109, Math 180A, Math 181A, or Math 183 previously or concurrently.) Prerequisites: Math 20C (21C) with a grade of C– or better, or consent of instructor.

MATH 187. Introduction to Cryptography (4)
An introduction to the basic concepts and techniques of modern cryptography. Classical cryptanalysis. Probabilistic models of plaintext. Monalphabetic and polyalphabetic substitution. The one-time system. Caesar-Vigenere-Playfair-Hill substitutions. The Enigma. Modern-day developments. The Data Encryption Standard. Public key systems. Security aspects of computer networks. Data protection. Electronic mail. Prerequisites: programming experience.

MATH 189. Exploratory Data Analysis and Inference (4)
An introduction to various quantitative methods and statistical techniques for analyzing data—in particular big data. Quick review of probability continuing to topics of how to process, analyze, and visualize data using statistical language R. Further topics include basic inference, sampling, hypothesis testing, bootstrap methods, and regression and diagnostics. Offers conceptual explanation of techniques, along with opportunities to examine, implement, and practice them in real and simulated data. Prerequisites: Math 20F or Math 31AH, and Math 180A. Students who have not completed listed prerequisites may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 190. Introduction to Topology (4)
Topological spaces, subspaces, products, sums and quotient spaces. Compactness, connectedness, separation axioms. Prerequisites: Math 31CH or Math 140A. Students who have not completed prerequisites may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 191. Topics in Topology (4)
Topics to be chosen by the instructor from the fields of differential algebraic, geometric, and general topology. Prerequisites: Math 190 or consent of instructor.

MATH 193A. Actuarial Mathematics I (4)
Probabilistic Foundations of Insurance. Short-term risk models. Survival distributions and life tables. Introduction to life insurance. Prerequisites: Math 180A or Math 183, or consent of instructor.

MATH 193B. Actuarial Mathematics II (4)
Life Insurance and Annuities. Analysis of premiums and premium reserves. Introduction to multiple life functions and decrement models as time permits. Prerequisites: Math 193A or consent of instructor.

MATH 194. The Mathematics of Finance (4)
Introduction to the mathematics of financial models. Basic probabilistic models and associated mathematical machinery will be discussed, with emphasis on discrete time models. Concepts covered will include conditional expectation, martingales, optimal stopping, arbitrage pricing, hedging, European and American options. Prerequisites: Math 20D, and either Math 20F or Math 31AH, and Math 180A, or consent of instructor.

MATH 195. Introduction to Teaching in Mathematics (4)
Students will be responsible for and teach a class section of a lower-division mathematics course. They will also attend a weekly meeting on teaching methods. (Does not count towards a minor or major.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATH 196. Student Colloquium (1)
A variety of topics and current research results in mathematics will be presented by guest lecturers and students under faculty direction. May be taken for P/NP grade only. Prerequisites: upper-division status.

MATH 197. Mathematics Internship (2 or 4)
An enrichment program which provides work experience with public/private sector employers. Subject to the availability of positions, students will work in a local company under the supervision of a faculty member and site supervisor. Units may not be applied towards major graduation requirements. Prerequisites: completion of ninety units, two upper-division mathematics courses, an overall 2.5 UC San Diego GPA, consent of mathematics faculty coordinator, and submission of written contract. Department stamp required.

MATH 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
Independent reading in advanced mathematics by individual students. Three periods. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: permission of department.

MATH 199H. Honors Thesis Research for Undergraduates (2–4)
Honors thesis research for seniors participating in the Honors Program. Research is conducted under the supervision of a mathematics faculty member. Prerequisites: admission to the Honors Program in mathematics, department stamp.

MATH 200A-B-C. Algebra (4-4-4)
Group actions, factor groups, polynomial rings, linear algebra, rational and Jordan canonical forms, unitary and Hermitian matrices, Sylow theorems, finitely generated abelian groups, unique factorization, Galois theory, solvability by radicals, Hilbert Basis Theorem, Hilbert Nullstellensatz, Jacobson radical, semisimple Artinian rings. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATH 201A. Basic Topics in Algebra I (4)
Recommended for all students specializing in algebra. Basic topics include categorical algebra, commutative algebra, group representations, homological algebra, nonassociative algebra, ring theory. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 200C. Students who have not taken Math 200C may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 202A. Applied Algebra I (4)
Introduction to algebra from a computational perspective. Groups, rings, linear algebra, rational and Jordan forms, unitary and Hermitian matrices, matrix decompositions, perturbation of eigenvalues, group representations, symmetric functions, fast Fourier transform, commutative algebra, Grobner basis, finite fields. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MATH 202B. Applied Algebra II (4)
Second course in algebra from a computational perspective. Groups, rings, linear algebra, rational and Jordan forms, unitary and Hermitian matrices, matrix decompositions, perturbation of eigenvalues, group representations, symmetric functions, fast Fourier transform, commutative algebra, Grobner basis, finite fields. Prerequisites: Math 202A or consent of instructor.

MATH 202C. Applied Algebra III (4)
Third course in algebra from a computational perspective. Groups, rings, linear algebra, rational and Jordan forms, unitary and Hermitian matrices, matrix decompositions, perturbation of eigenvalues, group representations, symmetric functions, fast Fourier transform, commutative algebra, Grobner basis, finite fields. Prerequisites: Math 202B or consent of instructor.

MATH 203A-B-C. Algebraic Geometry (4-4-4)
Places, Hilbert Nullstellensatz, varieties, product of varieties: correspondences, normal varieties. Divisors and linear systems; Riemann-Roch theorem; resolution of singularities of curves. Grothendieck schemes; cohomology, Hilbert schemes; Picard schemes. Prerequisites: Math 200A-B-C.

MATH 204A. Number Theory I (4)
First course in graduate-level number theory. Local fields: valuations and metrics on fields; discrete valuation rings and Dedekind domains; completions; ramification theory; main statements of local class field theory. Prerequisites: Math 200C. Students who have not taken Math 200C may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 204B. Number Theory II (4)
Second course in graduate-level number theory. Global fields: arithmetic properties and relation to local fields; ideal class groups; groups of units; ramification theory; adèles and idèles; main statements of global class field theory. Prerequisites: Math 204A. Students who have not taken Math 204A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 204C. Number Theory III (4)
Third course in graduate-level number theory. Zeta and L-functions; Dedekind zeta functions; Artin L-functions; the class-number formula and generalizations; density theorems. Prerequisites: Math 204B. Students who have not taken Math 204B may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 205. Topics in Number Theory (4)
Topics in algebraic and analytic number theory, such as: L-functions, sieve methods, modular forms, class field theory, p-adic L-functions and Iwasawa theory, elliptic curves and higher dimensional abelian varieties, Galois representations and the Langlands program, p-adic cohomology theories, Berkovich spaces, etc. May be taken for credit nine times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

MATH 206A. Topics in Algebraic Geometry (4)
Introduction to varied topics in algebraic geometry. Topics will be drawn from current research and may include Hodge theory, higher dimensional geometry, moduli of vector bundles, abelian varieties, deformation theory, intersection theory. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

MATH 206B. Further Topics in Algebraic Geometry (4)
Continued development of a topic in algebraic geometry. Topics will be drawn from current research and may include Hodge theory, higher dimensional geometry, moduli of vector bundles, abelian varieties, deformation theory, intersection theory. May be taken for credit three times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 206A. Students who have not completed Math 206A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 207A. Topics in Algebra (4)
Introduction to varied topics in algebra. In recent years, topics have included number theory, commutative algebra, noncommutative rings, homological algebra, and Lie groups. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 209. Seminar in Number Theory (1)
Various topics in number theory. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 210A. Mathematical Methods in Physics and Engineering (4)
Complex variables with applications. Analytic functions, Cauchy’s theorem, Taylor and Laurent series, residue theorem and contour integration techniques, analytic continuation, argument principle, conformal mapping, potential theory, asymptotic expansions, method of steepest descent. Prerequisites: Math 20DEF,140A/142A or consent of instructor.

MATH 210B. Mathematical Methods in Physics and Engineering (4)
Linear algebra and functional analysis. Vector spaces, orthonormal bases, linear operators and matrices, eigenvalues and diagonalization, least squares approximation, infinite-dimensional spaces, completeness, integral equations, spectral theory, Green’s functions, distributions, Fourier transform. Prerequisites: Math 210A or consent of instructor.

MATH 210C. Mathematical Methods in Physics and Engineering (4)
Calculus of variations: Euler-Lagrange equations, Noether’s theorem. Fourier analysis of functions and distributions in several variables. Partial differential equations: Laplace, wave, and heat equations; fundamental solutions (Green’s functions); well-posed problems. Prerequisites: Math 210B or consent of instructor. (S)

MATH 217. Topics in Applied Mathematics (4)
In recent years, topics have included applied complex analysis, special functions, and asymptotic methods. May be repeated for credit with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 220A-B-C. Complex Analysis (4-4-4)
Complex numbers and functions. Cauchy theorem and its applications, calculus of residues, expansions of analytic functions, analytic continuation, conformal mapping and Riemann mapping theorem, harmonic functions. Dirichlet principle, Riemann surfaces. Prerequisites: Math 140A-B or consent of instructor.

MATH 221A. Topics in Several Complex Variables (4)
Introduction to varied topics in several complex variables. In recent years, topics have included formal and convergent power series, Weierstrass preparation theorem, Cartan-Ruckert theorem, analytic sets, mapping theorems, domains of holomorphy, proper holomorphic mappings, complex manifolds and modifications. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 200A and 220C. Students who have not completed Math 200A and 220C may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 221B. Further Topics in Several Complex Variables (4)
Continued development of a topic in several complex variables. Topics include: formal and convergent power series, Weierstrass preparation theorem, Cartan-Ruckert theorem, analytic sets, mapping theorems, domains of holomorphy, proper holomorphic mappings, complex manifolds and modifications. May be taken for credit three times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 221A. Students who have not completed Math 221A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 231A-B-C. Partial Differential Equations (4-4-4)
Existence and uniqueness theorems. Cauchy-Kowalewski theorem, first order systems. Hamilton-Jacobi theory, initial value problems for hyperbolic and parabolic systems, boundary value problems for elliptic systems. Green’s function, eigenvalue problems, perturbation theory. Prerequisites: Math 210A-B or 240A-B-C or consent of instructor.

MATH 237A. Topics in Differential Equations (4)
Introduction to varied topics in differential equations. In recent years, topics have included Riemannian geometry, Ricci flow, and geometric evolution. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 237B. Further Topics in Differential Equations (4)
Continued development of a topic in differential equations. Topics include: Riemannian geometry, Ricci flow, and geometric evolution. May be taken for credit three times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 237A. Students who have not completed Math 237A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 240A-B-C. Real Analysis (4-4-4)
Lebesgue integral and Lebesgue measure, Fubini theorems, functions of bounded variations, Stieltjes integral, derivatives and indefinite integrals, the spaces L and C, equi-continuous families, continuous linear functionals general measures and integrations. Prerequisites: Math 140A-B-C.

MATH 241A-B. Functional Analysis (4-4)
Metric spaces and contraction mapping theorem; closed graph theorem; uniform boundedness principle; Hahn-Banach theorem; representation of continuous linear functionals; conjugate space, weak topologies; extreme points; Krein-Milman theorem; fixed-point theorems; Riesz convexity theorem; Banach algebras. Prerequisites: Math 240A-B-C or consent of instructor.

MATH 242. Topics in Fourier Analysis (4)
In recent years, topics have included Fourier analysis in Euclidean spaces, groups, and symmetric spaces. May be repeated for credit with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 240C, students who have not completed Math 240C may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 243. Seminar in Operator Algebras (1)
Various topics in operator algebras. May be taken for credit nine times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.)

MATH 245A. Convex Analysis and Optimization I (4)
Convex sets and functions, convex and affine hulls, relative interior, closure, and continuity, recession and existence of optimal solutions, saddle point and min-max theory, subgradients and subdifferentials. Recommended preparation: course work in linear algebra and real analysis. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

MATH 245B. Convex Analysis and Optimization II (4)
Optimality conditions, strong duality and the primal function, conjugate functions, Fenchel duality theorems, dual derivatives and subgradients, subgradient methods, cutting plane methods. Prerequisites: Math 245A or consent of instructor.

MATH 245C. Convex Analysis and Optimization III (4)
Convex optimization problems, linear matrix inequalities, second-order cone programming, semidefinite programming, sum of squares of polynomials, positive polynomials, distance geometry. Prerequisites: Math 245B or consent of instructor.

MATH 247A. Topics in Real Analysis (4)
Introduction to varied topics in real analysis. In recent years, topics have included Fourier analysis, distribution theory, martingale theory, operator theory. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 247B. Further Topics in Real Analysis (4)
Continued development of a topic in real analysis. Topics include: Fourier analysis, distribution theory, martingale theory, operator theory. May be taken for credit three times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 247A. Students who have not completed Math 247A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 248. Seminar in Real Analysis (1)
Various topics in real analysis. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 250A-B-C. Differential Geometry (4-4-4)
Differential manifolds, Sard theorem, tensor bundles, Lie derivatives, DeRham theorem, connections, geodesics, Riemannian metrics, curvature tensor and sectional curvature, completeness, characteristic classes. Differential manifolds immersed in Euclidean space. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATH 251A-B-C. Lie Groups (4-4-4)
Lie groups, Lie algebras, exponential map, subgroup subalgebra correspondence, adjoint group, universal enveloping algebra. Structure theory of semi-simple Lie groups, global decompositions, Weyl group. Geometry and analysis on symmetric spaces. Prerequisites: Math 200 and 250 or consent of instructor.

MATH 256. Seminar in Lie Groups and Lie Algebras (1)
Various topics in Lie groups and Lie algebras, including structure theory, representation theory, and applications. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 257A. Topics in Differential Geometry (4)
Introduction to varied topics in differential geometry. In recent years, topics have included Morse theory and general relativity. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 257B. Further Topics in Differential Geometry (4)
Continued development of a topic in differential geometry. Topics include Morse theory and general relativity. May be taken for credit three times with consent of adviser. Prerequisites: Math 257A. Students who have not completed Math 257A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 258. Seminar in Differential Geometry (1)
Various topics in differential geometry. May be taken for credit nine times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 259A-B-C. Geometrical Physics (4-4-4)
Manifolds, differential forms, homology, deRham’s theorem. Riemannian geometry, harmonic forms. Lie groups and algebras, connections in bundles, homotopy sequence of a bundle, Chern classes. Applications selected from Hamiltonian and continuum mechanics, electromagnetism, thermodynamics, special and general relativity, Yang-Mills fields. Prerequisites: graduate standing in mathematics, physics, or engineering, or consent of instructor.

MATH 260A. Mathematical Logic I (4)
Propositional calculus and first-order logic. Theorem proving, Model theory, soundness, completeness, and compactness, Herbrand’s theorem, Skolem-Lowenheim theorems, Craig interpolation. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MATH 260B. Mathematical Logic II (4)
Theory of computation and recursive function theory, Church’s thesis, computability and undecidability. Feasible computability and complexity. Peano arithmetic and the incompleteness theorems, nonstandard models. Prerequisites: Math 260A or consent of instructor.

MATH 261A. Probabilistic Combinatorics and Algorithms (4)
Introduction to the probabilistic method. Combinatorial applications of the linearity of expectation, second moment method, Markov, Chebyschev, and Azuma inequalities, and the local limit lemma. Introduction to the theory of random graphs. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MATH 261B. Probabilistic Combinatorics and Algorithms II (4)
Introduction to probabilistic algorithms. Game theoretic techniques. Applications of the probabilistic method to algorithm analysis. Markov Chains and Random walks. Applications to approximation algorithms, distributed algorithms, online and parallel algorithms. Math 261A must be taken before Math 261B. Prerequisites: Math 261A.

MATH 261C. Probabilistic Combinatorics and Algorithms III (4)
Advanced topics in the probabilistic combinatorics and probabilistics algorithms. Random graphs. Spectral Methods. Network algorithms and optimization. Statistical learning. Math 261B must be taken before Math 261C. Prerequisites: Math 261B.

MATH 262A. Topics in Combinatorial Mathematics (4)
Introduction to varied topics in combinatorial mathematics. In recent years topics have included problems of enumeration, existence, construction, and optimization with regard to finite sets. Recommended preparation: some familiarity with computer programming desirable but not required. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 262B. Further Topics in Combinatorial Mathematics (4)
Continued development of a topic in combinatorial mathematics. Topics include: problems of enumeration, existence, construction, and optimization with regard to finite sets. Recommended preparation: some familiarity with computer programming desirable but not required. May be taken for credit three times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 262A. Students who have not completed Math 262A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 264A-B-C. Combinatorics (4-4-4)
Topics from partially ordered sets, Mobius functions, simplicial complexes and shell ability. Enumeration, formal power series and formal languages, generating functions, partitions. Lagrange inversion, exponential structures, combinatorial species. Finite operator methods, q-analogues, Polya theory, Ramsey theory. Representation theory of the symmetric group, symmetric functions and operations with Schur functions.

MATH 267A. Topics in Mathematical Logic (4)
Introduction to varied topics in mathematical logic. Topics chosen from recursion theory, model theory, and set theory. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 267B. Further Topics in Mathematical Logic (4)
Continued development of a topic in mathematical logic. Topics chosen from recursion theory, model theory, and set theory. May be taken for credit three times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 267A or consent of instructor. Students who have not completed Math 267A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 268. Seminar in Logic (1)
Various topics in logic. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 269. Seminar in Combinatorics (1)
Various topics in combinatorics. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 270A. Numerical Linear Algebra (4)
Error analysis of the numerical solution of linear equations and least squares problems for the full rank and rank deficient cases. Error analysis of numerical methods for eigenvalue problems and singular value problems. Iterative methods for large sparse systems of linear equations. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MATH 270B. Numerical Approximation and Nonlinear Equations (4)
Iterative methods for nonlinear systems of equations, Newton’s method. Unconstrained and constrained optimization. The Weierstrass theorem, best uniform approximation, least-squares approximation, orthogonal polynomials. Polynomial interpolation, piecewise polynomial interpolation, piecewise uniform approximation. Numerical differentiation: divided differences, degree of precision. Numerical quadrature: interpolature quadrature, Richardson extrapolation, Romberg Integration, Gaussian quadrature, singular integrals, adaptive quadrature. Prerequisites: Math 270A or consent of instructor.

MATH 270C. Numerical Ordinary Differential Equations (4)
Initial value problems (IVP) and boundary value problems (BVP) in ordinary differential equations. Linear methods for IVP: one and multistep methods, local truncation error, stability, convergence, global error accumulation. Runge-Kutta (RK) Methods for IVP: RK methods, predictor-corrector methods, stiff systems, error indicators, adaptive time-stepping. Finite difference, finite volume, collocation, spectral, and finite element methods for BVP; a priori and a posteriori error analysis, stability, convergence, adaptivity. Prerequisites: Math 270B or consent of instructor.

MATH 271A-B-C. Numerical Optimization (4-4-4)
Formulation and analysis of algorithms for constrained optimization. Optimality conditions; linear and quadratic programming; interior methods; penalty and barrier function methods; sequential quadratic programming methods. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATH 272A. Numerical Partial Differential Equations I (4)
Survey of discretization techniques for elliptic partial differential equations, including finite difference, finite element and finite volume methods. Lax-Milgram Theorem and LBB stability. A priori error estimates. Mixed methods. Convection-diffusion equations. Systems of elliptic PDEs. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MATH 272B. Numerical Partial Differential Equations II (4)
Survey of solution techniques for partial differential equations. Basic iterative methods. Preconditioned conjugate gradients. Multigrid methods. Hierarchical basis methods. Domain decomposition. Nonlinear PDEs. Sparse direct methods. Prerequisites: Math 272A or consent of instructor.

MATH 272C. Numerical Partial Differential Equations III (4)
Time dependent (parabolic and hyperbolic) PDEs. Method of lines. Stiff systems of ODEs. Space-time finite element methods. Adaptive meshing algorithms. A posteriori error estimates. Prerequisites: Math 272B or consent of instructor.

MATH 273A. Advanced Techniques in Computational Mathematics I (4)
Models of physical systems, calculus of variations, principle of least action. Discretization techniques for variational problems, geometric integrators, advanced techniques in numerical discretization. Project-oriented; projects designed around problems of current interest in science, mathematics, and engineering. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

MATH 273B. Advanced Techniques in Computational Mathematics II (4)
Nonlinear functional analysis for numerical treatment of nonlinear PDE. Numerical continuation methods, pseudo-arclength continuation, gradient flow techniques, and other advanced techniques in computational nonlinear PDE. Project-oriented; projects designed around problems of current interest in science, mathematics, and engineering. Prerequisites: Math 273A or consent of instructor.

MATH 273C. Advanced Techniques in Computational Mathematics III (4)
Adaptive numerical methods for capturing all scales in one model, multiscale and multiphysics modeling frameworks, and other advanced techniques in computational multiscale/multiphysics modeling. Project-oriented; projects designed around problems of current interest in science, mathematics, and engineering. Prerequisites: Math 273B or consent of instructor.

MATH 274. Numerical Methods for Physical Modeling (4)
(Conjoined with Math 174.) Floating point arithmetic, direct and iterative solution of linear equations, iterative solution of nonlinear equations, optimization, approximation theory, interpolation, quadrature, numerical methods for initial and boundary value problems in ordinary differential equations. Students may not receive credit for both Math 174 and PHYS 105, AMES 153 or 154. (Students may not receive credit for Math 174 if Math 170A, B, or C has already been taken.) Graduate students will complete an additional assignment/exam. Prerequisites: Math 20D or 21D, and either Math 20F or Math 31AH, or consent of instructor.

MATH 275. Numerical Methods for Partial Differential Equations (4)
(Conjoined with Math 175.) Mathematical background for working with partial differential equations. Survey of finite difference, finite element, and other numerical methods for the solution of elliptic, parabolic, and hyperbolic partial differential equations. (Formerly Math 172; students may not receive credit for Math 175/275 and Math 172.) Graduate students will do an extra paper, project, or presentation, per instructor. Prerequisites: Math 174 or Math 274 or consent of instructor.

MATH 276. Numerical Analysis in Multiscale Biology (4)
(Cross-listed with BENG 276/CHEM 276.) Introduces mathematical tools to simulate biological processes at multiple scales. Numerical methods for ordinary and partial differential equations (deterministic and stochastic), and methods for parallel computing and visualization. Hands-on use of computers emphasized, students will apply numerical methods in individual projects. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATH 277A. Topics in Computational and Applied Mathematics (4)
Introduction to varied topics in computational and applied mathematics. In recent years, topics have included: applied functional analysis and approximation theory; numerical treatment of nonlinear partial differential equations; and geometric numerical integration for differential equations. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 278A. Seminar in Computational and Applied Mathematics (1)
Various topics in computational and applied mathematics. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 278B. Seminar in Mathematical Physics/PDE (1)
Various topics in mathematical physics and partial differential equations. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 279. Projects in Computational and Applied Mathematics (4)
(Conjoined with Math 179.) Mathematical models of physical systems arising in science and engineering, good models and well-posedness, numerical and other approximation techniques, solution algorithms for linear and nonlinear approximation problems, scientific visualizations, scientific software design and engineering, project-oriented. Graduate students will do an extra paper, project, or presentation per instructor. Prerequisites: Math 174, or Math 274, or consent of instructor.

MATH 280A-B-C. Probability Theory (4-4-4)
Probability measures; Borel fields; conditional probabilities, sums of independent random variables; limit theorems; zero-one laws; stochastic processes. Prerequisites: advanced calculus and consent of instructor.

MATH 281A. Mathematical Statistics (4)
Statistical models, sufficiency, efficiency, optimal estimation, least squares and maximum likelihood, large sample theory. Prerequisites: advanced calculus and basic probability theory or consent of instructor.

MATH 281B. Mathematical Statistics (4)
Hypothesis testing and confidence intervals, one-sample and two-sample problems. Bayes theory, statistical decision theory, linear models and regression. Prerequisites: advanced calculus and basic probability theory or consent of instructor.

MATH 281C. Mathematical Statistics (4)
Nonparametrics: tests, regression, density estimation, bootstrap and jackknife. Introduction to statistical computing using S plus. Prerequisites: advanced calculus and basic probability theory or consent of instructor.

MATH 282A. Applied Statistics I (4)
General theory of linear models with applications to regression analysis. Ordinary and generalized least squares estimators and their properties. Hypothesis testing, including analysis of variance, and confidence intervals. Completion of courses in linear algebra and basic statistics are recommended prior to enrollment. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.)

MATH 282B. Applied Statistics II (4)
Diagnostics, outlier detection, robust regression. Variable selection, ridge regression, the lasso. Generalized linear models, including logistic regression. Data analysis using the statistical software R. Students who have not taken Math 282A may enroll with consent of instructor. Prerequisites: Math 282A or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.)

MATH 283. Statistical Methods in Bioinformatics (4)
This course will cover material related to the analysis of modern genomic data; sequence analysis, gene expression/functional genomics analysis, and gene mapping/applied population genetics. The course will focus on statistical modeling and inference issues and not on database mining techniques. Prerequisites: one year of calculus, one statistics course or consent of instructor.

MATH 284. Survival Analysis (4)
Survival analysis is an important tool in many areas of applications including biomedicine, economics, engineering. It deals with the analysis of time to events data with censoring. This course discusses the concepts and theories associated with survival data and censoring, comparing survival distributions, proportional hazards regression, nonparametric tests, competing risk models, and frailty models. The emphasis is on semiparametric inference, and material is drawn from recent literature. Prerequisites: Math 282A or consent of instructor.

MATH 285. Stochastic Processes (4)
Elements of stochastic processes, Markov chains, hidden Markov models, martingales, Brownian motion, Gaussian processes. Prerequisites: Math 180A or equivalent, or consent of instructor.

MATH 286. Stochastic Differential Equations (4)
Review of continuous martingale theory. Stochastic integration for continuous semimartingales. Existence and uniqueness theory for stochastic differential equations. Strong Markov property. Selected applications. Prerequisites: Math 280A-B or consent of instructor.

MATH 287A. Time Series Analysis (4)
Discussion of finite parameter schemes in the Gaussian and non-Gaussian context. Estimation for finite parameter schemes. Stationary processes and their spectral representation. Spectral estimation. Students who have not taken Math 282A may enroll with consent of instructor. Prerequisites: Math 282A or consent of instructor.

MATH 287B. Multivariate Analysis (4)
Bivariate and more general multivariate normal distribution. Study of tests based on Hotelling’s T2. Principal components, canonical correlations, and factor analysis will be discussed as well as some competing nonparametric methods, such as cluster analysis. Students who have not taken Math 282A may enroll with consent of instructor. Prerequisites: Math 282A or consent of instructor.

MATH 287C. Advanced Time Series Analysis (4)
Nonparametric function (spectrum, density, regression) estimation from time series data. Nonlinear time series models (threshold AR, ARCH, GARCH, etc.). Nonparametric forms of ARMA and GARCH. Multivariate time series. Students who have not taken Math 287A may enroll with consent of instructor. Prerequisites: Math 287A or consent of instructor.

MATH 287D. Statistical Learning (4)
Topics include regression methods: (penalized) linear regression and kernel smoothing; classification methods: logistic regression and support vector machines; model selection; and mathematical tools and concepts useful for theoretical results such as VC dimension, concentration of measure, and empirical processes. Students who have not taken Math 282A may enroll with consent of instructor. Prerequisites: Math 282A or consent of instructor.

MATH 288. Seminar in Probability and Statistics (1)
Various topics in probability and statistics. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 289A. Topics in Probability and Statistics (4)
Introduction to varied topics in probability and statistics. In recent years, topics have included Markov processes, martingale theory, stochastic processes, stationary and Gaussian processes, ergodic theory. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 289B. Further Topics in Probability and Statistics (4)
Continued development of a topic in probability and statistics. Topics include: Markov processes, martingale theory, stochastic processes, stationary and Gaussian processes, ergodic theory. May be taken for credit three times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 289A. Students who have not completed Math 289A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 289C. Exploratory Data Analysis and Inference (4)
An introduction to various quantitative methods and statistical techniques for analyzing data—in particular big data. Quick review of probability continuing to topics of how to process, analyze, and visualize data using statistical language R. Further topics include basic inference, sampling, hypothesis testing, bootstrap methods, and regression and diagnostics. Offers conceptual explanation of techniques, along with opportunities to examine, implement, and practice them in real and simulated data. Recommended preparation: familiarity with linear algebra and mathematical statistics highly recommended. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

MATH 290A-B-C. Topology (4-4-4)
Point set topology, including separation axioms, compactness, connectedness. Algebraic topology, including the fundamental group, covering spaces, homology and cohomology. Homotopy or applications to manifolds as time permits. Prerequisites: Math 100A-B-C and Math 140A-B-C.

MATH 291A. Topics in Topology (4)
Introduction to varied topics in topology. In recent years topics have included: generalized cohomology theory, spectral sequences, K-theory, homotophy theory. May be taken for credit six times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 291B. Further Topics in Topology (4)
Continued development of a topic in topology. Topics include generalized cohomology theory, spectral sequences, K-theory, homotophy theory. May be taken for credit three times with consent of adviser as topics vary. Prerequisites: Math 291A. Students who have not completed Math 291A may enroll with consent of instructor.

MATH 292. Seminar in Topology (1)
Various topics in topology. May be taken for credit nine times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grade only.)

MATH 294. The Mathematics of Finance (4)
Introduction to the mathematics of financial models. Hedging, pricing by arbitrage. Discrete and continuous stochastic models. Martingales. Brownian motion, stochastic calculus. Black-Scholes model, adaptations to dividend paying equities, currencies and coupon-paying bonds, interest rate market, foreign exchange models. Prerequisites: Math 180A (or equivalent probability course) or consent of instructor.

MATH 295. Special Topics in Mathematics (1 to 4)
A variety of topics and current research results in mathematics will be presented by staff members and students under faculty direction.

MATH 296. Graduate Student Colloquium (1)
A variety of advanced topics and current research in mathematics will be presented by department faculty. (S/U grades only.) May be taken for credit six times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

MATH 297. Mathematics Graduate Research Internship (2–4)
An enrichment program that provides work experience with public/private sector employers and researchers. Under supervision of a faculty adviser, students provide mathematical consultation services. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MATH 299. Reading and Research (1 to 12)
Independent study and research for the doctoral dissertation. One to three credits will be given for independent study (reading) and one to nine for research. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.)

MATH 500. Apprentice Teaching (1 to 4)
Supervised teaching as part of the mathematics instructional program on campus (or, in special cases such as the CTF program, off campus). Prerequisites: consent of adviser. (S/U grades only.)

MSED 290. Issues in Science Education Research (4)
Survey of recent literature highlighting critical issues in science education research. Specific focus on research in biology education, chemistry education, and physics education. Theoretical perspectives and research methodology (both qualitative and quantitative) used to understand learning will be discussed. Prerequisites: admission to the Joint Doctoral Program in Mathematics and Science Education or a master’s degree in biology, chemistry/biochemistry, mathematics, or physics with consent of instructor.

MSED 294. Teaching Practicum (4)
In this course, the graduate student will teach or assist a teacher in a K–12 setting. The graduate student will have the mentorship of the classroom teacher as well as the supervision of an MSED faculty member. Prerequisites: admission to the Joint Doctoral Program in Mathematics and Science Education. (S/U grades only.)

MSED 295. MSED Orientation Practicum (1–3)
Each practicum lasts five weeks and is designed to inform students about a faculty member’s research program. Assignment as a research assistant may be used as one practicum. This course should be taken during the first year. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: admission to MSED Joint Doctoral Program. (S/U grades only.)

MSED 296A. Theories and Applications of Mathematics and Science Education (4)
The course is designed to cover several major themes in mathematics and science education. It will address theories and applications of cognition, teaching and learning, and curriculum, with particular emphasis on international perspectives. This is a three-quarter sequence. Prerequisites: admission to the Joint Doctoral Program in Mathematics and Science Education or a master’s degree in biology, chemistry/biochemistry, mathematics, or physics with consent of instructor.

MSED 296B. Theories and Applications of Mathematics and Science Education (4)
The course is designed to cover several major themes in mathematics and science education. It will address theories and applications of cognition, teaching and learning, and curriculum, with particular emphasis on international perspectives. This is a three-quarter sequence. Prerequisites: admission to the Joint Doctoral Program in Mathematics and Science Education or a master’s degree in biology, chemistry/biochemistry, mathematics, or physics with consent of instructor. MSED 296A must be taken before MSED 296B.

MSED 296C. Theories and Applications of Mathematics and Science Education (4)
The course is designed to cover several major themes in mathematics and science education. It will address theories and applications of cognition, teaching and learning, and curriculum, with particular emphasis on international perspectives. This is a three quarter sequence. Prerequisites: admission to the Joint Doctoral Program in Mathematics and Science Education or a master’s degree in biology, chemistry/biochemistry, mathematics, or physics with consent of instructor. MSED 296B must be taken before MSED 296C.

MSED 297. Special Topics in Math and Science Education (1–4)
Study of special topics in mathematics or science education under direction of a faculty member. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MSED 298. Research Project (2–12)
Students will work on an independent research project under the supervision of MSED faculty.

MSED 299. Reading and Research (1–12)
Students will do independent study and research in preparation of their doctoral dissertation under the supervision of MSED faculty.

MUIR 1. First Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: departmental approval. Open to incoming Muir College students only.

MUIR 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: departmental approval. Open to Muir College transfer students only.

MUIR 199. Muir Special Project (4–16)
A course of independent work on a research or creative project to satisfy a Muir graduation requirement. (Only Muir students who have had Muir Special Project proposals approved may enroll in this course.) Students wishing to enroll must submit a written request with a description of the project. (Muir students must submit the Muir Special Project 199 form to the major advisor and to the Office of the Provost by the seventh week of the quarter prior to the quarter in which the 199 is to be undertaken. For information on other requirements, consult the provost’s office.) Prerequisites: upper-division status, approval by project advisor and by provost. (Letter grades only.)

MCWP 40. Critical Writing (4)
First course of sequence in university reading and writing which satisfies the Muir College graduation requirement in writing. Required of all Muir College first-year students and of transfer students who have not completed a comparable course elsewhere. MCWP 40 introduces students to the basic elements of argument and analysis. Students engage in close reading of texts, weekly writing and revision, and individual conferences. Course must be taken for a letter grade. Those who need additional work to prepare for MCWP 50 will be given a grade of IP and will be required to take MCWP 41. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the UC Entry Level Writing requirement.

MCWP 50. Critical Writing (4)
Second course of sequence in reading and writing which satisfies the Muir College graduation requirement in writing. Required of all Muir College first-year students and of transfer students. MCWP 50 focuses on advanced skills of argument and analysis. Students engage in close reading of texts, weekly writing and revision, and individual conferences. Course must be taken for a letter grade. Prerequisites: satisfaction of MCWP 40 requirement or completion of TAG or IGETC agreement.

MCWP 125. Argument and Analysis (4)
An advanced course in argumentation and analysis, with particular attention both to constructing arguments and analyzing the logic and rhetoric of others’ arguments. Students will engage in close reading of texts, weekly writing and revision, and individual conferences. A course specially designed for and required of transfer students who enter Muir College under the aegis of TAG or IGETC. Prerequisites: departmental approval.

MUS 1A. Fundamentals of Music A (4)
This course, first in a three-quarter sequence, is primarily intended for students without previous musical experience. It introduces music notation and basic music theory topics such as intervals, scales, keys, and chords, as well as basic rhythm skills. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 1B. Fundamentals of Music B (4)
This course, second in a three-quarter sequence, focuses on understanding music theory and in developing musical ability through rhythm, ear training, and sight singing exercises. Topics include major and minor scales, seventh-chords, transposition, compound meter and rudiments of musical form. Prerequisites: Music 1A.

MUS 1C. Fundamentals of Music C (4)
This course, third in a three-quarter sequence, offers solid foundation in musical literacy through exercises such as harmonic and melodic dictation, sight singing exercises and rhythm in various meters. Topics include complex rhythm, harmony, and basic keyboard skills. Prerequisites: Music 1B.

MUS 2A-B-C. Basic Musicianship (4-4-4)
Primarily intended for music majors. Development of basic skills: perception and notation of pitch and temporal relationships. Introduction to functional harmony. Studies in melodic writing. Drills in sight singing, rhythmic reading, and dictation. Prerequisites: passing score on proficiency exam. Must be taken in sequence. Music majors must be concurrently enrolled in Music 2AK, 2BK, and 2CK (Basic Keyboard).

MUS 2AK-BK-CK. Basic Keyboard (2-2-2)
Scales, chords, harmonic progressions, transposition, and simple pieces. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in Music 2A, B, C.

MUS 2JK. Jazz Keyboard (2)
This course will introduce basic voicings and voice leading, stylistically appropriate accompaniment, and basic chord substitution. For majors with a Jazz and the Music of the African diaspora emphasis to be taken concurrently with Music 2C. Prerequisites: Music 2AK and 2BK or passing proficiency exam, or consent of instructor. Concurrent enrollment in Music 2C. Majors only.

MUS 4. Introduction to Western Music (4)
A brief survey of the history of Western music from the Middle Ages to the present. Much attention will be paid to the direct experience of listening to music and attendance of concerts. Class consists of lectures, listening labs, and live performances. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 5. Sound in Time (4)
An examination and exploration of the art and science of music making. Topics include acoustics, improvisation, composition, and electronic and popular forms. There will be required listening, reading, and creative assignments. No previous musical background required. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 6. Electronic Music (4)
Lectures and listening sessions devoted to the most significant works of music realized through the use of computers and other electronic devices from the middle of this century through the present. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 7. Music, Science, and Computers (4)
Exploration of the interactions among music, science, and technology, including the history and current development of science and technology from the perspective of music. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 8. American Music (4)
A course designed to study the development of music in America. The focus will be on both the vernacular traditions including hymn singing, country music, jazz, big band, rock, etc., as well as the cultivated traditions of various composers from William Billings to John Cage. Prerequisites: none. (Offered in selected years.)

MUS 9. Symphony (4)
The symphonic masterworks course will consist of lectures and listening sessions devoted to a detailed discussion of a small number of recognized masterworks (e.g., Mozart, Beethoven, Berlioz, Stravinsky, Ligeti, etc.). Prerequisites: none. (Offered in selected years.)

MUS 11. Folk Music (4)
A course on folk musics of the world, covered through lectures, films, and listening sessions devoted to detailed discussion of music indigenous to varying countries/areas of the world. Topics vary from year to year. May be repeated once for credit. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 12. Opera (4)
A study of opera masterworks that often coincide with operas presented in the San Diego Opera season. Class consists of lectures, listening labs, live performances, and opera on video. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 13. Worlds of Music (4)
Through surveying selected musical traditions and practices from around the world, this course explores the ways in which music both reflects and affects social, cultural, and ecological relationships. Specific case studies will be covered through lectures, films, and listening sessions. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 14. Contemporary Music (4)
This course offers opportunities to prepare oneself for experiences with new music (through preview lectures), hear performances (by visiting or faculty artists), to discuss each event informally with a faculty panel: an effort to foster informed listening to the new in music. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 15. Popular Music (4)
A course on popular music from different time periods, covered through lectures, films, and listening sessions. Topics vary from year to year. May be repeated once for credit. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 16. The Beatles (4)
This course will explore The Beatles from musical, cultural, historical, technological, and critical angles. It will place them in context, examining their assorted confluences and wide influences. The group will be critically examined as artists, innovators, and public personalities. Listening, watching, and discussion will provide a broader, deeper, and more personal understanding of the group’s enduring appeal. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 17. Hip-Hop (4)
This class presents a broad chronological overview of the development of hip-hop as a musical form from the late 1970s through today. It examines the development of the style in relation to direct context and to earlier African-American musical and cultural forms, and considers the technological and legal issues that have impacted its development. The class is listening-intensive and students will be expected to know and recognize essential structures and production techniques. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 18. Klezmer Music (4)
(Cross-listed with JUDA 18.) A survey of Eastern European Jewish folk music, Yiddish theatre and popular song, and their transition to America. Credit not allowed for Music 18 and JUDA 18. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 20. Exploring the Musical Mind (4)
(Cross-listed with COGS 20.) How do we transform complex sounds into comprehensible and meaningful music? What physiological, neurological, cognitive, and cultural systems are involved? Why do we make music in such diverse ways around the globe? Does music have evolutionary or ecological significance? What is the relationship between music, motion, and emotions? This course explores contemporary understandings of how we hear and how we become musical and invites students to listen to new music in new ways. Students may not receive credit for both Music 20 and COGS 20. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 32. Instrumental/Vocal Instruction (2)
Individual instruction on intermediate level in instrumental technique and repertory. For declared music majors and minors. Students must be simultaneously enrolled in a performance ensemble or non-performance music course. May be taken six times for credit. Prerequisites: audition and department stamp.

MUS 32G. Group Instrumental Instruction (2)
Group instruction in instrumental or vocal technique and repertory. Intermediate level. Intended for students who make an important contribution to Department of Music ensembles. Prerequisites: written recommendation of ensemble director and audition for performance faculty on first day of classes required. Department stamp required. May be taken for credit six times. (Offered in selected years.)

MUS 32V. Vocal Instruction (1)
Individual instruction on intermediate level in vocal technique and repertory. For declared music majors and minors. Students must be simultaneously enrolled in a performance ensemble or nonperformance music course and in Music 32VM. May be taken six times for credit. Prerequisites: audition and department stamp.

MUS 32VM. Vocal Master Class (1)
All students enrolled in voice lessons (32V, 132V, or 132C) perform for one another and their instructors. Students critique in-class performances, with emphasis on presentation, diction, dramatic effect, vocal quality, and musicality. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in Music 32V, 132V, or 132C.

MUS 33A. Introduction to Composition I (4)
First course in a sequence for music majors and nonmajors pursuing an emphasis in composition. The course examines “sound” itself and various ways of building sounds into musical structures, and develops skills in music notation. Students compose solo pieces in shorter forms. Students may not receive credit for both Music 33 and 33A. Prerequisites: Music 2C or consent of instructor.

MUS 33B. Introduction to Composition II (4)
Second part of course sequence for students pursuing a composition emphasis. Course continues the building of skills with the organization of basic compositional elements: pitch, rhythm, and timbre. It explores issues of musical texture, expression, and structure in traditional and contemporary repertoire. Writing for two instruments in more extended forms. Prerequisites: Music 33A.

MUS 33C. Introduction to Composition III (4)
Third part of course sequence for students pursuing a composition emphasis. Course continues the development of skills in instrumentation and analysis. It includes a survey of advanced techniques in contemporary composition, with additional focus on notation, part-preparation, and the art of writing for small groups of instruments. Prerequisites: Music 33B.

MUS 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

MUS 95. Ensemble Performance (2)
Performance in an ensemble appropriate to student abilities and interests. Normally each section requires student participation for the whole academic year, with credit for participation each quarter. Sections of Music 95W have included: African drumming, Korean percussion, Indian sitar and tabla, koto, and Indonesian flute. Not all sections will be offered every year. May be repeated for credit. Grading on participation level, individual testing, comparative papers on repertoire covered, etc. Prerequisites: audition and consent of instructor for each section. Materials fee required.

VIS 41. Design Communication (4)
This course provides a strong foundation in contemporary techniques of design communication, including: digital image editing, typography, vector-based illustration and diagramming, document layout, as well as basic digital video editing tools, and web-production formats. Emphasis is on mastery of craft through iteration and presentation of multiple projects. Students may not receive credit for both VIS 140 or ICAM 101 and VIS 41. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 101A. Music Theory and Practice I (4)
Study of modal counterpart in the style of the sixteenth century. Two-voice species counterpoint studies. Analysis of music of the period. Musicianship studies: sight-singing, dictation, and keyboard skills. Prerequisites: Music 2C and 2CK.

MUS 101B. Music Theory and Practice II (4)
Study of tonal harmony and counterpoint. Analysis of Bach chorales and other music from the Baroque period. Musicianship studies: sight-singing, dictation, and keyboard skills. Prerequisites: Music 101A.

MUS 101C. Music Theory and Practice III (4)
Tonal harmony and counterpoint. Analysis of larger classical forms: Sonata, Variation, Minuet and Trio, Rondo. Musicianship studies: sight-singing, dictation, and keyboard skills. Prerequisites: Music 101B.

MUS 102A. Music Theory and Practice IV (4)
Advanced study of the materials and structures of music (Beethoven to Wagner) emphasizing the evolution of music through chromatic harmony and voice leading. Development of aural discrimination and in-depth analysis. Prerequisites: Music 101C.

MUS 102B. Music Theory and Practice V (4)
Advanced study of the materials and structures of music (Schoenberg, Stravinsky, Webern, etc.—1900–1940) emphasizing the evolution of music through extended harmony post tonality and neoclassicism. Development of aural discrimination and in-depth analysis. Prerequisites: Music 102A.

MUS 102C. Music Theory and Practice VI (4)
Advanced study of the materials and structures of music (1945–2006) emphasizing the evolution of music through the many compositional trends of the late twentieth century. Development of aural discrimination and in-depth analysis. Prerequisites: Music 102B.

MUS 103A. Seminar in Composition I (4)
First part in composition course sequence. Individual projects will be reviewed in seminar. Techniques of instrumentation will be developed through examination of scores and creative application. Assignments will include short exercises and analysis, and final project for standard ensemble. Prerequisites: Music 33C.

MUS 103B. Seminar in Composition II (4)
Second part in composition course sequence. Intensive work in free composition by drafting a composition for presentation at the end of Music 103C. Written analysis of contemporary repertoire is introduced. Instruction about calligraphic conventions including computer engraving programs. Prerequisites: Music 103A.

MUS 103C. Seminar in Composition III (4)
Third part in composition course sequence. A mixture of individual lessons as well as group meetings, with discussion of topics germane to the development of composers, including musical aesthetics and contemporary orchestration techniques. Final performance of students’ work will take place at the end of the quarter. Prerequisites: Music 103B.

MUS 103D-E-F. Honors Seminar in Composition (4-4-4)
Advanced individual projects for senior music majors pursuing honors in composition. Projects will be critically reviewed in seminar with fellow students and faculty composers. Prerequisites: Music 103A-B-C and admission into the Department of Music Honors Program in composition. Department stamp required.

MUS 104. Jazz Transcription and Analysis (4)
An introduction to the practice of transcribing and analyzing improvised music. Discussion of music technique, style, aesthetics, and the ideology of transcription. Prerequisites: Music 101A and 101B.

MUS 105. Jazz Composition (4)
This course will explore a range of compositional possibilities from song forms to modal and more extended forms. May be repeated once for credit. Prerequisites: Music 104 or consent of instructor.

MUS 107. Critical Studies Seminar (4)
This seminar explores the history of music in relation to critical issues, such as race, gender, sexuality, the environment, and politics. Readings include recent literature in cultural studies, musicology, and sociology. Topics vary. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: Music 120C.

MUS 110. Introduction to Ethnomusicology Seminar (4)
This seminar introduces the central theories, methods, and approaches used to study the musics of contemporary cultures, in their local contexts. In addition to surveying key writings, students will document music from their local environment. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

MUS 111. Topics/World Music Traditions (4)
A study of particular regional musics in their repertory, cultural context, and interaction with other traditions. Topics vary. May be taken for credit up to three times. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 112. Topics in European Music Before 1750 (4)
This course will address topics in medieval, Renaissance, and Baroque music; topics will vary from year to year. May be repeated five times for credit. Prerequisites: knowledge of music notation or consent of instructor; Music 4, 8–10, or 120 recommended.

MUS 113. Topics in Classic, Romantic, and Modern Music (4)
This course will focus on Western music between 1750 and the early 20th century; topics will vary from year to year. May be repeated five times for credit. Prerequisites: knowledge of music notation or consent of instructor; Music 4, 8–10, or 120 recommended.

MUS 114. Music of the Twentieth Century (4)
An exploration of materials and methods used in the music of our time. There will be an extra discussion group for music majors. May be repeated once for credit. Prerequisites: none.

MUS 115. Women in Music (4)
A survey of the biographical, historical, sociological, and political issues affecting woman musicians, their creativity, their opportunities, and their perception by others. It compares and contrasts the work of women composers, performers, patrons, teachers, and writers on music from the Middle Ages through the present. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MUS 116. Popular Music Studies Seminar (4)
This course examines special topics in popular music from various sociopolitical, aesthetic, and performance perspectives. Readings include recent literature in cultural studies, musicology, and/or performance practice. Topics vary. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

MUS 120A. History of Music in Western Culture I (4)
First part of intensive historical, analytical, and cultural-aesthetic examination of music in Western culture from the ninth through the twenty-first centuries. Considers both sacred and secular repertories, from Gregorian chant through early opera, c. 800–1600. Prerequisites: Music 1C or 2C or passing grade on proficiency exam. Music majors should be enrolled concurrently in Music 101A. Department stamp required for nonmajors.

MUS 120B. History of Music in Western Culture II (4)
Second part of intensive historical, analytical, and cultural-aesthetic examination of music in Western culture from the ninth through the twenty-first centuries. Considers both instrumental and vocal repertories, from the Baroque to the Romantic, c. 1600–1830. Prerequisites: Music 120A. Music majors should be enrolled concurrently in Music 101B. Department stamp required for nonmajors.

MUS 120C. History of Music in Western Culture III (4)
Third part of intensive historical, analytical, and cultural-aesthetic examination of music in Western culture from the ninth through the twenty-first centuries. Considers both established traditions and new trends, from Romanticism through Modernism and Post-Modernism, c. 1890–present. Prerequisites: Music 120B. Music majors should be enrolled concurrently in Music 101C. Department stamp required for nonmajors.

MUS 126. Blues: An Oral Tradition (4)
This course will examine the development of the Blues from its roots in work-songs and the minstrel show to its flowering in the Mississippi Delta to the development of Urban Blues and the close relationship of the Blues with Jazz, Rhythm and Blues, and Rock and Roll. (Cross-listed with Ethnic Studies 178.) Prerequisites: none.

MUS 127A. Jazz Roots and Early Development (1900–1943) (4)
This course will trace the early development of Jazz and the diverse traditions that helped create this uniquely American art form. We will witness the emergence of Louis Armstrong in New Orleans and examine the composer’s role in Jazz with Jelly Roll Morton and Duke Ellington. (Cross-listed with Ethnic Studies 179A.) Prerequisites: none.

MUS 127B. Jazz Since 1946: Freedom and Form (4)
This course will examine the evolution of Jazz from 1943 to the present. The course will survey the contrasting and competing styles in Jazz from BEBOP to COOL to the avant-garde and fusion. (Cross-listed with Ethnic Studies 179B.) Prerequisites: none.

MUS 128. Principles and Practice of Conducting (4)
The theory and practice of instrumental and/or choral conducting as they have to do with basic baton techniques, score reading, interpretation, orchestration, program building, and functional analysis. Members of the class will be expected to demonstrate their knowledge in the conducting of a small ensemble performing literature from the eighteenth, nineteenth, and twentieth centuries. Prerequisites: Music 2A-B-C and 101A-B-C. Department stamp required.

MUS 130. Chamber Music Performance (2–4/0)
Instruction in the preparation of small group performances of representative instrumental and vocal chamber music literature. May be taken for credit six times, after which students must enroll for zero units. Prerequisites: consent of instructor through audition.

MUS 131. Advanced Improvisation Performance (4/0)
Master class instruction in advanced improvisation performance for declared majors and minors only or consent of instructor. Audition required at first class meeting. May be repeated six times for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor through audition. Department stamp required.

MUS 132. Proseminar in Music Performance (4)
Individual or master class instruction in advanced instrumental performance. For declared music majors and minors. Students must be simultaneously enrolled in a performance ensemble or nonperformance music course. May be taken six times for credit. Prerequisites: audition and department stamp.

MUS 132C. Vocal Coaching (4)
Individual instruction in advanced vocal coaching. Emphasis placed on diction and musical issues. For declared music majors and minors. Students must be simultaneously enrolled in the Vocal Master Class, Music 32VM. May be taken six times for credit. Prerequisites: at least one quarter of Music 132V and consent of instructor. Department stamp required.

MUS 132R. Recital Preparation (4)
Advanced instrumental/vocal preparation for senior music majors pursuing honors in performance. Repertoire for a solo recital will be developed under the direction of the appropriate instrumental/vocal faculty member. Special audition required during Welcome Week preceding fall quarter. Prerequisites: by audition only; Music 132. Department stamp required.

MUS 132V. Proseminar in Vocal Instruction (3)
Individual instruction in advanced vocal performance. For declared music majors and minors. Students must be simultaneously enrolled in a performance ensemble or nonperformance music course and in the Vocal Master Class, Music 32VM. May be taken six times for credit. Prerequisites: audition and department stamp.

MUS 133. Projects in New Music Performance (4)
Performance of new music of the twentieth century. Normally offered winter quarter only. Required a minimum of one time for all music majors. May be taken two times for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor through audition.

MUS 134. Symphonic Orchestra (4)
Repertoire is drawn from the classic symphonic literature of the eighteenth, nineteenth, and twentieth centuries with a strong emphasis on recently composed and new music. Distinguished soloists, as well as The La Jolla Symphony Chorus, frequently appear with the orchestra. The La Jolla Symphony Orchestra performs two full-length programs each quarter, each program being performed twice. May be repeated six times for credit. Prerequisites: audition and department stamp required.

MUS 137A. Jazz Theory and Improvisation (4)
Study of jazz theory and improvisation, focused on fundamental rhythmic, harmonic, melodic, and formal aspects of modern jazz style. Application of theoretical knowledge to instruments and concepts will be reinforced through listening, transcription work, and composition and improvisation exercises. First course of a yearlong sequence. Prerequisites: MUS 2A-B-C, proficiency exam, or consent on instructor.

MUS 137B. Jazz Theory and Improvisation (4)
Study of jazz theory and improvisation, focused on fundamental rhythmic, harmonic, melodic, and formal aspects of modern jazz style. Application of theoretical knowledge to instruments and concepts will be reinforced through listening, transcription work, and composition and improvisation exercises. Second course of a yearlong sequence; continuation of Music 137A. Prerequisites: MUS 2A-B-C and 137A, proficiency exam, or consent on instructor.

MUS 137C. Jazz Theory and Improvisation (4)
Study of jazz theory and improvisation, focused on fundamental rhythmic, harmonic, melodic, and formal aspects of modern jazz style. Application of theoretical knowledge to instruments and concepts will be reinforced through listening, transcription work, and composition and improvisation exercises. Third course of a yearlong sequence; continuation of MUS 137B. Prerequisites: MUS 2A-B-C and 137B, proficiency exam, or consent on instructor.

MUS 137D. Seminar in Jazz Studies I (4)
Advanced individual projects for senior music majors pursuing honors in jazz and music of the African diaspora. Projects will be critically reviewed in seminar with fellow students and jazz faculty. First course of a yearlong sequence. Prerequisites: MUS 137A-B-C and admission into the Music Department Honors Program in jazz. Department stamp required.

MUS 137E. Seminar in Jazz Studies II (4)
Advanced individual projects for senior music majors pursuing honors in jazz and music of the African diaspora. Projects will be critically reviewed in seminar with fellow students and jazz faculty. Second course of a yearlong sequence; continuation of 137D. Prerequisites: MUS 137D and department stamp.

MUS 137F. Seminar in Jazz Studies III (4)
Advanced individual projects for senior music majors pursuing honors in jazz and music of the African diaspora. Projects will be critically reviewed in seminar with fellow students and jazz faculty. Third course of a yearlong sequence; continuation of 137E. Prerequisites: MUS 137E and department stamp.

MUS 143. Department Seminar (1)
The department seminar serves both as a general department meeting and as a forum for the presentation of research and performances by visitors, faculty, and students. Required of all undergraduate music majors every quarter.

MUS 150. Jazz and the Music of the African Diaspora: Special Topics Seminar (4)
An in-depth writing and listening intensive investigation into a jazz or diaspora-related music history topic. Topics vary from year to year. May be repeated once for credit. Prerequisites: Music 126, 127A or 127B, or consent of instructor.

MUS 151. Race, Culture, and Social Change (4)
Aggrieved groups generate distinctive cultural expressions by turning negative ascription into positive affirmation and by transforming segregation into congregation. This course examines the role of cultural expressions in struggles for social change by these communities inside and outside the United States. (Cross-listed with Ethnic Studies 108.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

MUS 152. Hip Hop: The Politics of Culture (4)
Examination of hip-hop’s music, technology, lyrics, and its influence in graffiti, film, music video, fiction, advertising, gender, corporate investment, government and censorship with a critical focus on race, gender, popular culture, and the politics of creative expression. (Cross-listed with Ethnic Studies 128.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

MUS 153. African Americans and the Mass Media (4)
Examination of media representations of African Americans from slavery to the present focusing on emergence and transmission of enduring stereotypes, their relationship to changing social, political, and economic frameworks, and African Americans’ responses to and interpretations of these mediated images. (Cross-listed with Ethnic Studies 164.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

MUS 154. Black Music/Black Texts: Communication and Cultural Expression (4)
Explores roles of music as a traditional form of communication among Africans, Afro-Americans, and West Indians: Special attention given to poetry of black music, including blues and other forms of vocal music expressive of contestatory political attitudes. (Cross-listed with Ethnic Studies 176 and Literature in English 187.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

MUS 170. Musical Acoustics (4)
(Formerly Music 160A.) An introduction to the acoustics of music with particular emphasis on contemporary digital techniques for understanding and manipulating sound. Prerequisites: Music 1A, 2A, or 4. Cross-listed with ICAM 103.

MUS 171. Computer Music I (4)
(Formerly Music 160C.) A practical introduction to computer techniques for desktop audio editing, MIDI control, and real-time music algorithms using the MAX programming environment. Recommended preparation: completion of MUS 170. Prerequisites: none; restricted to music majors, ICAM-music and ICAM-visual arts majors and minors, or consent of instructor.

MUS 172. Computer Music II (4)
(Formerly Music 161.) Computer synthesis techniques including wavetable and additive synthesis, waveshaping, and sampling. Transformation of musical sounds using filters, modulation, and delay effects. Fourier analysis of sounds. Prerequisites: Music 171 (formerly Music 160C); music majors, ICAM-music and ICAM-visual arts majors and minors, or consent of instructor.

MUS 173. Electronic Music Production and Composition (4)
(Formerly Music 162.) Creative music production using digital audio workstations (DAWs), emphasizing hands-on composition projects including tempo warping, beat and tonality matching, virtual drum kits, chord progressions, sound processing and effects, arrangement, and remixing in the context of both popular and experimental genres. Existing works are analyzed and dissected for aesthetic value and production technique. Prerequisites: none; restricted to music, ICAM-music, and ICAM-visual arts majors and minors, or consent of instructor.

MUS 174A. Audio/MlDI Studio Techniques I (4)
First class in a year-long sequence. Surveys hardware and software resources in an advanced analog/digital and media studio. Required course for use of the studio. Topics include: electronic and computer music, digital and analog audio signal mixing and manipulation, studio devices, interfacing, compositional applications, MIDI synchronization, performance and student projects. 174A focuses on signals, mics, device based recording, mixing, monitoring. Depending on the instructor, this course may include the following tools: Pro Tools HD, Altiverb, Waves. Prerequisites: Music 170; restricted to music, ICAM-music, and ICAM-visual arts majors and minors, or consent of instructor.

MUS 174B. Audio/MlDI Studio Techniques II (4)
Second class in a year-long sequence. Surveys hardware and software resources in an advanced analog/digital and media studio. Required course for use of the studio. Topics include: electronic and computer music, digital and analog audio signal mixing and manipulation, studio devices, interfacing, compositional applications, MIDI synchronization, performance and studio techniques, and student projects. 174B focuses on digital audio workstations, computer based mixing and editing, sound file transformation. Depending on the instructor, this course may include the following tools: Pro Tools HD, Altiverb, Waves. Prerequisites: Music 170, Music 174A; restricted to music, ICAM-music, and ICAM-visual arts majors and minors, or consent of instructor.

MUS 174C. Audio/MlDI Studio Techniques III (4)
Third class in a year-long sequence. Surveys hardware and software resources in an advanced analog/digital and media studio. Required course for use of the studio. Topics include: electronic and computer music, digital and analog audio signal mixing and manipulation, studio devices, interfacing, compositional applications, MIDI synchronization, performance and studio techniques, and student projects. 174C focuses on MIDI, synchronization, and sound-for-picture. Depending on the instructor, this course may include the following tools: Pro Tools HD, Altiverb, Waves. Prerequisites: Music 170, Music 174B; restricted to music, ICAM-music, and ICAM-visual arts majors and minors, or consent of instructor.

MUS 175. Musical Psychoacoustics (4)
(Formerly Music 160B.) Survey of psychoacoustical phenomena, theories of hearing, and their relation to musical perception and cognition. Techniques of psychoacoustical experimentation. Prerequisites: Music 170 (formerly Music 160A) recommended.

MUS 176. Music Technology Seminar (4)
(Formerly Music 163.) Selected topics in music technology and its application to composition and/or performance. Offerings vary according to faculty availability and interest. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: Music 172 (formerly Music 161) and consent of instructor.

MUS 177. Music Programming (4)
Fundamentals of programming music software in C and C++. DSP implementation of oscillators, filters, delay, reverb and spectral processing; programming techniques specific to audio and MIDI and simple GUI design for parameter control and signal display. Implementation using a plug-in or external programming interface such as for VST, Audio Unit, PD, or Max/MSP. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: Music 172 (formerly Music 161); restricted to music, ICAM-music, and ICAM-visual arts majors and minors, or consent of instructor.

MUS 192. Senior Seminar in Music (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in music (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; department stamp and/or consent of instructor required.

MUS 195. Instructional Assistance (2)
Assisting in the instruction of an undergraduate music class under the direct and constant supervision of a faculty member. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and departmental approval.

MUS 198. Directed Group Study (1–4)
Concentrated inquiry into various problems not covered in the usual undergraduate courses. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department chair approval. Pass/Not Pass grade only.

MUS 199. Independent Study (1–4)
Independent reading, research, or creative work under the direction of a faculty member, provided no course covering the material to be studied already exists, and the study area derives from previous course work. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department chair approval. Department stamp required. Pass/Not Pass grade only. May be taken for credit two times.

VIS 140. Digital Imaging: Image and Interactivity (4)
Introduction to digital image involving images, texts, and interactive display operating both within computer mediated space (i.e., website) and in physical space (i.e., artist book). Interactive narrative and computer programming are explored. Materials fee required. Two production-course limitation. Students may not receive credit for both VIS 140 and ICAM 101. Prerequisites: VIS 40 or ICAM 40. Open to studio, media, and ICAM majors; computing and ICAM minors only.

VIS 145A. Time- and Process-Based Digital Media I (4)
Introduces time and process-based digital media artmaking. Contemporary and historical works across time and process-based media will be studied and projects produced. Topics may include software art, software and hardware interfacing, interaction, and installation in an art context. Recommended Preparation: CSE 5A or equivalent program experience. Materials fee required. Two production-course limitation. Students may not receive credit for both VIS 145A and ICAM 102. Prerequisites: VIS 40 or ICAM 40. Open to media and ICAM majors; ICAM minors only.

MUS 170. Musical Acoustics (4)
(Formerly Music 160A.) An introduction to the acoustics of music with particular emphasis on contemporary digital techniques for understanding and manipulating sound. Prerequisites: MUS 1A, 2A, or 4.

ICAM 110. Computing in the Arts: Current Practice (4)
Designed around the presentations by visiting artists, critics, and scientists involved with contemporary issues related to computer arts. Lectures by the instructor and contextual readings provide background material for the visitor presentations. Prerequisites: none. Note: materials fee required.

ICAM 120. Virtual Environments (4)
Students create virtual reality artworks. Projects may be done individually or in groups. Exploration of theoretical issues involved will underlie acquisition of techniques utilized in the construction of virtual realities. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: VIS 145A or ICAM 102; CSE 11 recommended. Open to ICAM majors and minors only. Two production course limitation.

VIS 149. Seminar in Contemporary Computer Topics (4)
Topics relevant to computer-based art- and music-making, such as computer methods for making art/music, design of interactive systems, spatialization of visual/musical elements, critical studies. Topics will vary. Two production-course limitation. Recommended preparation: VIS 145A or ICAM 102 and MUS 170 or ICAM 103. Materials fee required. May be taken for credit three times. Students may not receive credit for both VIS 149 and ICAM 130. Prerequisites: VIS 140 or ICAM 101. Open to media and ICAM majors; ICAM minors only.

VIS 159. History of Art and Technology (4)
Aims to provide historical context for computer arts by examining the interaction between the arts, media technologies, and sciences in different historical periods. Topics vary (e.g., Renaissance perspective, futurism and technology, and computer art of the 1950s and 1960s). Materials fee required. Students may not receive credit for both VIS 159 and ICAM 150. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

ICAM 160A. Senior Projects in Computer Arts I (4)
Students pursue projects of their own design over two quarters with support from faculty in a seminar environment. Project proposals are developed, informed by project development guidelines from real world examples. Collaborations are possible. Portfolio required for admissions. Prerequisites: VIS 141B or VIS 145B or VIS 147B or MUS 172. Open to ICAM majors only. Department stamp required. Two production-course limitation.

ICAM 160B. Senior Projects in Computer Arts II (4)
Continuation of ICAM 160A. Completion and presentation of independent projects along with documentation. Prerequisites: ICAM 160A. Open to ICAM majors only. Department stamp required. Two production-course limitation.

192. Senior Seminar in Music (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in music (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topics, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

ICAM 199. Special Studies (2/4)
Independent reading, research or creative work under direction of faculty member. Prerequisites: department stamp and upper-division standing required.

MUS 200. Contemporary Chamber Opera Performance (4)
Students will collaborate with faculty and guest artists in the preparation and performance of a fully staged contemporary chamber opera. The opera will be presented in multiple public performances. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music, MU75/MU76, or consent of instructor.

MUS 201A-B-C-D-E-F. Projects in New Music Performance (1–4, 1–4, 1–4, 1–4, 1–4, 1–4)
Performance of contemporary music. Different sections represent active performance ensembles. A core requirement for music graduate students as outlined in the curriculum.

MUS 202. Advanced Projects in Performance (1–4)
Advanced performance of new music with members of the performance faculty (SONOR). Students taking this course do not need to take Music 201 that quarter. Enrollment by consent of instructor/director of SONOR. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music; others by written consent of instructor and department stamp.

MUS 203A. Advanced Projects in Composition (6)
Meetings and laboratory sessions devoted to the study of composition in small groups. Consent of instructor required.

MUS 203B. Advanced Projects in Composition (6)
Meetings and laboratory sessions devoted to the study of composition in small groups. Consent of instructor required.

MUS 203C. Advanced Projects in Composition (6)
Meetings and laboratory sessions devoted to the study of composition in small groups. Consent of instructor required.

MUS 203D. Advanced Projects in Composition (1–4)
Meetings on group basis with faculty composer in sessions devoted to the study of composition. Prerequisites: 203A-B-C and consent of instructor.

MUS 204. Focus on Composition (2)
The purpose of this seminar is to bring in the entire population of the graduate composition program (all students and faculty) for in-depth discussion of critical issues in music theory and composition. Each meeting will feature a formal presentation by either a student, faculty member, or visitor, followed by lively and challenging debate on relevant issues. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MUS 205. Focus on Integrative Studies (2)
Meets on a biweekly basis to facilitate presentations by advanced students and invited guests and to encourage in-depth discussion between students, faculty, and visitors about theoretical and artistic issues of interest. Participation is required of all enrolled IS students until advanced to candidacy. Others are welcome to participate. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music.

MUS 206. Experimental Studies Seminar (4)
Seminars growing out of current faculty interests. The approach tends to be speculative and includes individual projects or papers as well as assigned readings. In the past, such areas as new instrumental and vocal resources, mixed media, and compositional linguistics have been offered. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music; others by written consent of instructor and department stamp.

MUS 207. Theoretical Studies Seminar (4)
Seminars on subject areas relating to the established dimensions of music and in which theoreticians have produced a substantial body of work. These include studies in analysis, timbre, rhythm, notation, and psychoacoustics. Offerings vary depending on faculty availability and interest. Analytical paper required. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music; others by written consent of instructor and department stamp.

MUS 209. Advanced Music Theory and Practice (4)
Advanced integrated studies in music theory; composition and styles study through analysis and performance. This course is intended primarily for doctoral students and may be taken by MA students only with special approval of MA adviser and course instructor. A major research or analytical publishable paper required. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music; others by written consent of instructor and department stamp.

MUS 210. Musical Analysis (4)
The analysis of complex music. The course will assume that the student has a background in traditional music analysis. The goal of the course is to investigate and develop analytical procedures that yield significant information about specific works of music, old and new. Reading, projects, and analytical papers. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music; others by written consent of instructor and department stamp.

MUS 211. Introduction to Ethnomusicology (2)
Introduces the field of ethnomusicology by highlighting important thinkers, concepts, and issues and by orienting students toward work of an anthropological, ethnographic, or comparative nature. Students who have taken and passed MUS 208A may not get credit for MUS 211. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music

MUS 212. Introduction to System Inquiry (2)
Introduces the network of concepts and approaches that comprise systems inquiry and explores the theoretical, philosophical, and methodological implications of systems thinking for musical research and practice. Students who have taken MUS 208B for credit may not take MUS 212 for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music.

MUS 213. Introduction to Critical Studies (2)
Introduces important themes and thinkers from the fields of critical theory and cultural studies and explores how musical behaviors and phenomena relate to matters of ideology, nationality, ethnicity, social class, race, and gender. Students who have taken MUS 208C for credit may not take MUS 213 for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music.

MUS 214. Introduction to Creative Practices (2)
Surveys the terrain of contemporary creative music and investigates the social, cultural, historical, and technological dimensions of its manifestations and practice. Students who have taken MUS 208D for credit may not take MUS 214 for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music.

MUS 228. Conducting (4)
This course will give practical experience in conducting a variety of works from various eras of instrumental and/or vocal music. Students will study problems of instrumental or vocal techniques, formal and expressive analysis of the music, and manners of rehearsal. Required of all graduate students. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music; others by written consent of instructor and department stamp. (Offered in selected years.)

MUS 229. Seminar in Orchestration (4)
A seminar to give practical experience in orchestration. Students will study works from various eras of instrumental music and will demonstrate their knowledge by orchestrating works in the styles of these various eras, learning the capabilities, timbre, and articulation of all the instruments in the orchestra. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (Offered in selected years.)

MUS 230. Chamber Music Performance (4)
Performance of representative chamber music literature, instrumental and/or vocal, through coached rehearsal and seminar studies. Course may be repeated for credit since the literature studied varies from quarter to quarter. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MUS 232. Proseminar in Music Performance (1–4)
Individual or master class instruction in advanced instrumental/vocal performance. Prerequisites: consent of instructor through audition.

MUS 234. Symphonic Orchestra (4)
Repertoire is drawn from the classic symphonic literature of the eighteenth, nineteenth, and twentieth centuries with a strong emphasis on recently composed and new music. Distinguished soloists, as well as The La Jolla Symphony Chorus, frequently appear with the orchestra. The La Jolla Symphony Orchestra performs two full-length programs each quarter, each program being performed twice. May be repeated six times for credit. Prerequisites: audition required.

MUS 245. Focus on Performance (2)
The purpose of this seminar is to bring together performance students, faculty, and guests for discussion, presentation of student and faculty projects, performances by guest artists, and master classes with different members of the performance faculty. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (S/U grade option only.)

MUS 251. Integrative Studies Seminar in Ethnomusicology (4)
Provides an in-depth look at the shifting definitions, methods, and scope of ethnomusicology and explores contemporary writings and issues that are shaping the field today. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music.

MUS 252. Integrative Studies Seminar in Systems Inquiry (4)
Traces the development of systems thinking and encourages work of a transdisciplinary nature, integrating models, strategies, methods, and tools from natural, human, social, and technological realms. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music.

MUS 253. Integrative Studies Seminar in Critical Studies (4)
Develops critical thinking and self-reflexive inquiry through in-depth study of a diverse range of critical and scholarly traditions as they relate to music. Students are encouraged to investigate their own sense of identity and voice, as embodied in their creative and/or scholarly work. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music.

MUS 254. Integrative Studies Seminar in Creative Practice (4)
Students will explore a variety of approaches to collaborative work and will be challenged to develop a personal aesthetic in experimental art and new media and design original work for presentation at faculty juries. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music.

MUS 267. Advanced Music Technology Seminar (4)
Advanced topics in music technology and its application to composition and/or performance. Offerings vary according to faculty availability and interest. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: Music 173 or equivalent and consent of instructor.

MUS 270A. Digital Audio Processing (4)
Digital techniques for analysis, synthesis, and processing of musical sounds. Sampling theory. Software synthesis techniques. Digital filter design. The short-time Fourier transform. Numerical accuracy considerations. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MUS 270B. Musical Cognitive Science (4)
Theoretical bases for analyzing musical sound. Approaches to perception and cognition, including psychoacoustics and information processing, both ecological and computational. Models of audition including Helmholtz’s consonance/dissonance theory and Bregman’s streaming model. Musical cognition theories of Lerdahl and Narmour. Neural network models of music perception and cognition. Models of rhythm. The problem of timbre and timbre perception. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MUS 270C. Compositional Algorithms (4)
Transformations in musical composition; series and intervalic structures; serial approaches to rhythm and dynamic. The stochastic music of Xenakis and Cage. Hiller’s automatic composition. Improvisational models. Computer analysis of musical style. Neurally inspired and other quasiparallel algorithms. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

MUS 270D. Advanced Projects in Computer Music (4)
Meetings on group basis with computer music faculty in support of individual student research projects. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and completion of Music 270A-B-C.

MUS 271A. Survey of Electronic Music Techniques I (4)
A hands-on encounter with several important works from the classic electronic repertory, showing a representative subset of the electronic techniques available to musicians. Students who have taken MUS 271 for credit may not take MUS 271A for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music.

MUS 271B. Survey of Electronic Music Techniques II (4)
A continuation of 271A, with emphasis on live interactive techniques (e.g., audio processing; analysis/resynthesis; score following). Prerequisites: Music 271A and graduate standing in music.

MUS 271C. Survey of Electronic Music Techniques III (4)
A continuation of 271A and B, with emphasis on compositional techniques (e.g., computer-aided composition, production, spatialization). Prerequisites: Music 271B and graduate standing in music.

MUS 272. Seminar in Live Computer Music (4)
Group projects to create new pieces of live electronic music involving research in electronic music and/or instrumental techniques. May be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: Music 271A-B-C or consent of instructor and graduate standing in music.

MUS 296. Directed Group Research in Performance (4)
This group research seminar involves the investigation and exploration of new and experimental performance concerns. Areas could include: improvisation, graphic notation, performance electronics, and working with combined media (such as dance, poetry, and theatre). Prerequisites: graduate standing. (S/U grade option only.)

MUS 298. Directed Research (1–4)
Individual research. (S/U grades permitted.) May be repeated for credit. Enrollment by consent of instructor only.

MUS 299. Advanced Research Projects and Independent Study (1–12)
Individual research projects relevant to the student’s selected area of graduate interest conducted in continuing relationship with a faculty adviser in preparation of the master’s thesis or doctoral dissertation. Prerequisites: graduate standing in music; others by written consent of instructor and department stamp. (S/U grades permitted.)

MUS 500. Apprentice Teaching (1–4)
Participation in the undergraduate teaching program is required of all graduate students at the equivalent of 25 percent time for three quarters (six units is required for all graduate students). Prerequisites: graduate standing in music; others by written consent of instructor and department stamp. (S/U grade option only.)

MUS 501. Apprentice Teaching—Nondepartmental (4)
Consideration and development of pedagogical methods appropriate to undergraduate teaching. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of instructor. (S/U grade option only.)

NEU 199. Independent Research (2 or 4)
Laboratory research under the supervision of individual members of the faculty of the neurosciences department in one or a combination of neurosciences disciplines, e.g., neuroanatomy, neurophysiology, neurochemistry, neuropharmacology. (P/NP grades only.) (F,W,S)

NEU 200A-B-C. Basic Neuroscience (4-4-4)
These courses are designed for graduate students in the neurosciences and other departments that are part of the interdisciplinary program (i.e., Biology, Cog Sci, Psychology). These courses have been designed to cover as much basic neuroscience as possible in three quarters of study. It will combine two three-hour meetings each week with a 1.5 hour lecture and a 1.5 hour discussion of papers. These will be required courses for all first-year neurosciences graduate students. Biology will cross-list courses under Biology headings, making it a requirement of first-year Biology graduate students. Prerequisites: graduate student or consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

NEU 210. Neurobiology Boot Camp (4)
For incoming doctoral students in neurobiology, computational neurosciences, and neurosciences. During the first two weeks in September, students commit to ten to fifteen hours per day in lectures and laboratories in electrophysiology, cellular anatomy, molecular biology, optical imaging, and computational neurobiology. Students also attend weekly seminars during fall quarter. Prerequisites: graduate standing only. For students in the following major codes: BI77, BI79, NE75, NE78.

NEU 221. Advanced Topics in Neurosciences (2)
Specialized advanced topic areas in neurosciences will be addressed in an interactive seminar course format. A different specific topic will be considered each quarter as announced in advance. Students will each present an aspect of the topic area and participate in discussions. Prerequisites: graduate student or consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

NEU 225. Statistical Methods and Experimental Design (2)
This is a practical course designed to emphasize the relationships between experimental design, statistical methods, and biomedical research. The assumptions behind the statistical tests, their appropriate use, and examples of misuse will be discussed. Prerequisites: registered student in SOM graduate program or approval of instructor.

NEU 241. Ethics and Survival Skills in Academia (3)
This course will cover “ethical” issues in academia, including dishonesty, plagiarism, attribution, sexual misconduct, etc. We will also discuss “survival” issues, including job hunting, grant preparation, journal reviews, writing letters of recommendation, mentoring, etc. (W)

NEU 243. Physiological Basis of Human Information (2)
Psychological processes including attention, perception, and memory will be studied in connection with event-related potentials of the human brain. The interrelations among psychological and physiological events will be explored in order to arrive at unified concepts of human information processing. Prerequisites: Neurosci 238 or Psych. 231, and consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.) (F)

NEU 259. Workshop in Electron Microscopy (4)
This course is to introduce graduate students in the neurosciences to research methods used in electron microscopy (EM) through one hour of formal lecture, one hour of seminar, three hours of demonstration, and three hours of supervised laboratory work per week. Students will become familiar with sectioning EM, scanning EM, and freeze-fracture EM. Prerequisites: graduate-student standing in neurosciences doctoral program and consent of instructor. Enrollment limited. (S/U grades only.) (F)

NEU 260. Light and Electron Microscopy of Cells and Tissue (4)
Students will review basic principles of light and electron microscopy and learn a variety of basic and advanced microscopy methods through lecture and hands-on training. Each student will have his or her own project. Additional supervised instrument time is available. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. (F)

NEU 265. Mechanisms of Pain (2)
Anatomical and pharmacological substrates activated following tissue or nerve injury will be discussed. Changes in afferents and spinal cord, including increased expressions of channels and receptors, during chronic pain states will be emphasized. Clinical relevance and treatment will be included. (S/U grades only.) (F)

NEU 266. Development of Neural Circuits (4)
Course focuses on developmental processes during formation of neural circuits. Molecular, genetic, cellular mechanisms controlling neurogenesis, neuronal differentiation, positioning (migration), axon/dendrite patterning, and synapse formation will be discussed. Role of neural activity shaping circuit formation will be explored. Prerequisites: graduate standing only. For students in the following major codes: NE75, NE78, BI77, BI79, or consent of instructor.

NEU 268. Molecular and Cellular Neurobiology (4)
Molecular and cellular approaches to the study of the nervous system are advancing neurobiology at an increasingly rapid pace. This graduate-level course will address the latest molecular advances in the areas of: 1) synapse formation, neurotransmitter release, and neurotransmitter receptors; 2) nerve growth factors, their receptors, and neuronal apoptosis; 3) transcriptional regulation in the brain and peripheral nervous system; 4) cell culture, transgenic, and knock-out mouse model systems; 5) the molecular bases of genetic, psychiatric, and degenerative diseases of the nervous system; and 6) the current molecular knowledge of vision, sensory transduction, circadian rhythms, learning, memory, and behavior.

NEU 270. Neurobiology of Disease (4)
This course will blend research and clinical perspectives to allow comprehensive learning of CNS diseases. For each two-week disease block, students will read, present, and discuss current research publications that will be paired with a lecture by a research scientist who will describe the major features of each disease, hypothesis being explored, and the state of therapeutics. The following session will involve a physician presenting a patient with the condition, and students will have the opportunity to ask questions of both the physician and the patient. Prerequisites: one year of PhD or MD course work is required. Medical or graduate students only. (S)

NEU 276. Neuroscience Research Rounds (1)
Neurosciences group faculty members and graduate students will present and discuss ongoing research. Attendance will be mandatory for first- and second-year graduate students. Faculty, advanced graduate students, medical students, postdoctoral trainees, and other interested parties are encouraged to attend. (F,W,S)

NEU 277. Neuropsychopharmacology (4)
An examination of the molecular and biochemical bases of drug and transmitter action. The course is devoted to receptor mechanisms, neuropharmacology, and drug action on excitable tissues. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (S)

NEU 280. Minor Proposition (4)
This intensive writing course offers graduate students in the neurosciences the opportunity to propose and defend an original research project. Students are required to select a research problem in the neurosciences and propose and experimental approach for solving it. Prerequisites: neurosciences PhD majors only; NE75, NE78 and NE80. (S/U grades only.)

NEU 285. Clinical Trails: Issues and Dilemmas in Clinical Trials (2)
This course provides a methodological perspective on clinical trials. Topics will include ethics, design of Phase I–IV trials, randomization/blinding, bias, and sample-size power. Lectures will also cover “application” with eminent UC San Diego trialists describing conduct, design, and statistical issues of specific studies. Prerequisites: medical or graduate student standing.

NEU 296. Neurosciences Research Rotation (1–12)
Independent study. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

NEU 298. Neurosciences Independent Study Project (ISP) (1–12)
Prerequisites: approved ISP proposal. (F,W,S)

NEU 299. Neurosciences Research (1–12)
Independent study. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

NEU 401. Neurology General Clinical Selective Clerkship (7)
Provides opportunities for practical application of neurological skills to the understanding and treatment of a variety of clinical disorders of the nervous system. Prerequisites: successful completion of first two years of medical school. (F,W,S)

NEU 426. Subintern Pediatric Neurology (7)
Subinterns are responsible for the primary care of hospitilized pediatric neurology patients under direct resident and attending physician supervision. Students will perform procedures such as lumbar puncture and participate in night call, daily teaching round, neurology grand rounds, and journal clubs. Prerequisites: Neurology 401 or consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

NEU 427. Neurology Outpatient (7)
The student will rotate through the general and subspecialty (stroke, epilepsy, headache, nerve, and muscle) neurology clinics based at UC San Diego Medical Center, Perlman, VAMC, and Children’s Hospital. There are lectures and clinical conferences. Prerequisites: Neurosciences 401 or equivalent. (F,W,S)

NEU 496. Clinical Independent Study (1–21)
Independent clinical study for medical students (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

NEU 500. Apprenticeship Teaching (1–4)
Participation in the department teaching program is required of all students working toward a PhD. In general, students are not expected to teach in the first year, but are required to serve as teaching assistants or tutors for one quarter at any time during their subsequent years of training. The amount of teaching required is equivalent to the duties expected of a 50 percent assistant for one quarter. Prerequisites: neurosciences graduate students. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

PHIL 1. Introduction to Philosophy (4)
A general introduction to some of the fundamental questions, texts, and methods of philosophy. Multiple topics will be covered, and may include the existence of God, the nature of mind and body, free will, ethics and political philosophy, knowledge and skepticism.

PHIL 10. Introduction to Logic (4)
Basic concepts and techniques in both informal and formal logic and reasoning, including a discussion of argument, inference, proof, and common fallacies, and an introduction to the syntax, semantics, and proof method in sentential (propositional) logic. May be used to fulfill general-education requirements for Warren and Eleanor Roosevelt Colleges.

PHIL 12. Scientific Reasoning (4)
Strategies of scientific inquiry: how elementary logic, statistical inference, and experimental design are integrated to evaluate hypotheses in the natural and social sciences. May be used to fulfill general-education requirements for Marshall, Warren, and Eleanor Roosevelt Colleges.

PHIL 13. Introduction to Philosophy: Ethics (4)
An inquiry into the nature of morality and its role in personal or social life by way of classical and/or contemporary works in ethics. May be used to fulfill general-education requirements for Muir and Marshall Colleges.

PHIL 14. Introduction to Philosophy: The Nature of Reality (4)
A survey of central issues and figures in the Western metaphysical tradition. Topics include the mind-body problem, freedom and determinism, personal identity, appearance and reality, and the existence of God.

PHIL 15. Introduction to Philosophy: Knowledge and Its Limits (4)
A study of the grounds and scope of human knowledge, both commonsense and scientific, as portrayed in the competing traditions of Continental rationalism, British empiricism, and contemporary cognitive science.

PHIL 25. Science, Philosophy, and the Big Questions (4)
An inquiry into fundamental questions at the intersection of science and philosophy. Topics can include Einstein’s universe; scientific revolutions; the mind and the brain.

PHIL 26.  Science, Society, and Values (4)
An exploration of the interaction between scientific theory and practice on the one hand, and society and values on the other. Topics can include the relationship between science and religion, global climate change, DNA, medicine, and ethics.

PHIL 27. Ethics and Society (4)
An examination of ethical principles (e.g., utilitarianism, individual rights, etc.) and their social and political applications to contemporary issues: abortion, environmental protection, and affirmative action. Ethical principles will also be applied to moral dilemmas in government, law, business, and the professions. Warren College students must take course for a letter grade in order to satisfy the Warren College general-education requirement. Prerequisites: CAT 2 and 3 or DOC 2 and 3 or MCWP 40 and 50 or Hum 1 and 2 or MMW 2 and 3 or WCWP 10A and B.

PHIL 28. Ethics and Society II (4)
An examination of a single set of major contemporary social, political, or economic issues (e.g., environmental ethics, international ethics) in light of ethical and moral principles and values. Warren College students must take course for a letter grade in order to satisfy the Warren College general-education requirement. Prerequisites: Philosophy 27 or Poli Sci 27.

PHIL 31. Introduction to Ancient Philosophy (4)
A survey of classical Greek philosophy with an emphasis on Socrates, Plato and Aristotle, though some consideration may be given to Pre-Socratic and/or Hellenistic philosophers.

PHIL 32. Philosophy and the Rise of Modern Science (4)
Beginning with the contrast between medieval and early modern thought, the course focuses on the relation of seventeenth-century philosophy and the emergence of modern natural science. Figures to be studied include Bacon, Galileo, Descartes, Hobbes, Leibniz, and Newton.

PHIL 33. Philosophy between Reason and Despair (4)
Introduction to nineteenth-century philosophy, focusing on skepticism about the authority of reason to answer questions about the ultimate meaning and value of human life. Figures discussed may include Kant, Schopenhauer, Kierkegaard, Nietzsche, and James.

PHIL 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

PHIL 90. Basic Problem in Philosophy (4)
An investigation of a selected philosophical topic through readings, discussions, and written assignments. May be taken for credit twice, when topics vary.

PHIL 100. Plato (4)
A study of Socrates and/or Plato through major dialogues of Plato. Possible topics include the virtues and happiness; weakness of the will; political authority and democracy; the theory of Forms and sensible flux; immortality; relativism, skepticism, and knowledge. May be repeated for credit with change of content and approval of instructor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 101. Aristotle (4)
A study of major issues in Aristotle’s works, such as the categories; form and matter; substance, essence, and accident; the soul; virtue, happiness, and politics. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 102. Hellenistic Philosophy (4)
A study of selected texts from the main schools of Hellenistic philosophy—Stoicism, Epicureanism, and Skepticism. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 105. The Empiricists (4)
The major writings of one or more of the British empiricists—Locke, Berkeley, Hume, and Reid. May be repeated for credit with change of content and approval of instructor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 106. Kant (4)
A study of selected portions of The Critique of Pure Reason and other theoretical writings and/or his major works in moral theory. May be repeated for credit with change in content and approval of the instructor. Prerequisites: Philosophy 32 or 33 or 104 or 105 or 111 or 112 or consent of instructor.

PHIL 107. Hegel (4)
A study of one or more of Hegel’s major works, in particular, The Phenomenology of Spirit and The Philosophy of Right. Readings and discussion may also include other figures in the Idealist tradition—such as Fichte, Hölderlin, and Schelling—and critics of the Idealist tradition—such as Marx and Kierkegaard. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 108. Nineteenth-Century Philosophy (4)
A study of one or more figures in nineteenth-century philosophy, such as Schopenhauer, Nietzsche, Kierkegaard, Marx, Emerson, Thoreau, James, and Mill. The focus may be on particular figures or intellectual themes and traditions. May be repeated for credit with change of content and approval of instructor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 109. History of Analytic Philosophy (4)
Central texts, figures, and traditions in analytic philosophy. Figures may include Frege, Russell, Wittgenstein, Carnap, Moore, Austin, Tarski, Quine, Davidson, Kripke, and Putnam. May be repeated for credit with change of content and approval of the instructor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 110. History of Philosophy: Ancient (4)
An examination of ancient Greek philosophy, focusing on major works of Plato and Aristotle. Philosophy 110, Philosophy 111, and Philosophy 112 should be taken in order. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department stamp or consent of instructor.

PHIL 111. History of Philosophy: Early Modern (4)
An examination of seventeenth- and eighteenth-century philosophy, focusing on major works of Descartes, Locke, and Hume. Philosophy 110, Philosophy 111, and Philosophy 112 should be taken in order. Prerequisites: Philosophy 110, upper-division standing and department stamp or consent of instructor.

PHIL 112. History of Philosophy: Late Modern (4)
An examination of late eighteenth and nineteenth-century philosophy, focusing on major works of Kant and Hegel. Philosophy 110, Philosophy 111, and Philosophy 112 should be taken in order. Prerequisites: Philosophy 111, upper-division standing and department stamp or consent of instructor.

PHIL 115. Philosophical Methods Seminar (4)
This course provides an introduction to the techniques of philosophical inquiry through detailed study of selected philosophical texts and through extensive training in philosophical writing based on those texts. Enrollment limited and restricted to majors; must be taken for letter grade. May not be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: open to philosophy majors only.

PHIL 120. Symbolic Logic I (4)
The syntax, semantics, and proof-theory of first-order predicate logic with identity, emphasizing both conceptual issues and practical skills (e.g., criteria for logical truth, consistency, and validity; the application of logical methods to everyday as well as scientific reasoning). Prerequisites: Philosophy 10 or consent of instructor.

PHIL 122. Advanced Topics in Logic (4)
Topics vary from year to year. They include: Metalogic (Mathematical Logic), Modal Logic, Foundations of Logic, Foundations of Set Theory, Gödel’s Incompleteness Theorems, and others. Prerequisites: Philosophy 120 or consent of instructor.

PHIL 123. Philosophy of Logic (4)
Philosophical issues underlying standard and nonstandard logics, the nature of logical knowledge, the relation between logic and mathematics, the revisability of logic, truth and logic, ontological commitment and ontological relativity, logical consequence, etc. May be repeated for credit with change in content and approval of instructor. Prerequisites: Philosophy 120 or consent of instructor.

PHIL 124. Philosophy of Mathematics (4)
The character of logical and mathematical truth and knowledge; the relations between logic and mathematics; the significance of Godel’s Incompleteness Theorem; Platonism, logicism, and more recent approaches. Prerequisites: Philosophy 120 or consent of instructor.

PHIL 130. Metaphysics (4)
Central problems in metaphysics, such as free will and determinism, the mind-body problem, personal identity, causation, primary and secondary qualities, the nature of universals, necessity, and identity. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 131. Topics in Metaphysics (4)
An in-depth study of some central problem, figure, or tradition in metaphysics. May be repeated for credit with change of content and approval of instructor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 132. Epistemology (4)
Central problems in epistemology such as skepticism; a priori knowledge; knowledge of other minds; self-knowledge; the problem of induction; foundationalist, coherence, and causal theories of knowledge. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 134. Philosophy of Language (4)
Examination of contemporary debates about meaning, reference, truth, and thought. Topics include descriptional theories of reference, sense and reference, compositionality, truth, theories of meaning, vagueness, metaphor, and natural and formal languages. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 136. Philosophy of Mind (4)
Different conceptions of the nature of mind and its relation to the physical world. Topics include identity theories, functionalism, eliminative materialism, internalism and externalism, subjectivity, other minds, consciousness, self-knowledge, perception, memory, and imagination. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 137. Moral Psychology (4)
The nature of action and psychological explanation. Topics include action individuation, reasons as causes, psychological laws, freedom and responsibility, weakness of will, self-deception, and the emotions. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 138.  Responsibility (4)
A study of the nature and significance of responsibility. Possible topics include: freedom, determinism, and responsibility; moral luck; responsibility and reactive attitudes such as blame and forgiveness; responsibility and situationism; moral and criminal responsibility; responsibility and excuse; insanity and psychopathy, immaturity, addiction, provocation, and duress. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 139. Global Justice (4)
Social justice issues as they arise across the borders of nation-states. Topics may include nationalism and cosmopolitanism, theories of just war and just warfare, issues of migration and immigration, global distributive justice and fair trade, and international cooperation in the face of global problems such as climate change and human rights violations. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 145. Philosophy of Science (4)
Central problems in philosophy of science, such as the nature of confirmation and explanation, the nature of scientific revolutions and progress, the unity of science, and realism and antirealism. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 146. Philosophy of Physics (4)
Philosophical problems in the development of modern physics, such as the philosophy of space and time, the epistemology of geometry, the philosophical significance of Einstein’s theory of relativity, the interpretation of quantum mechanics, and the significance of modern cosmology. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 147. Philosophy of Biology (4)
Philosophical problems in the biological sciences, such as the relation between biology and the physical sciences, the status and structure of evolutionary theory, and the role of biology in the social sciences. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 148. Philosophy and the Environment (4)
Investigation of ethical and epistemological questions concerning our relationship to the environment. Topics may include the value of nature, biodiversity, policy and science, and responsibility to future generations. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 149. Philosophy of Psychology (4)
Philosophical issues raised by psychology, including the nature of psychological explanation, the role of nature versus nurture, free will and determinism, and the unity of the person. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 150. Philosophy of the Cognitive Sciences (4)
Theoretical, empirical, methodological, and philosophical issues at work in the cognitive sciences (e.g., psychology, linguistics, neuroscience, artificial intelligence, and computer science), concerning things such as mental representation, consciousness, rationality, explanation, and nativism. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 151. Philosophy of Neuroscience (4)
An introduction to elementary neuroanatomy and neurophysiology and an examination of theoretical issues in cognitive neuroscience and their implications for traditional philosophical conceptions of the relation between mind and body, perception, consciousness, understanding, emotion, and the self. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 152. Philosophy of Social Science (4)
Philosophical issues of method and substance in the social sciences, such as causal and interpretive models of explanation, structuralism and methodological individualism, value neutrality, and relativism. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 160. Ethical Theory (4)
Systematic and/or historical perspectives on central issues in ethical theory such as deontic, contractualist, and consequentialist conceptions of morality; rights and special obligations; the role of happiness and virtue in morality; moral conflict; ethical objectivity and relativism; and the rational authority of morality. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 161. Topics in the History of Ethics (4)
Central issues and texts in the history of ethics. Subject matter can vary, ranging from one philosopher (e.g., Aristotle, Hobbes, Kant, or Mill) to a historical tradition (e.g., Greek ethics or the British moralists). May be repeated for credit with change in content and approval of instructor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 162. Contemporary Moral Issues (4)
An examination of contemporary moral issues, such as abortion, euthanasia, war, affirmative action, and freedom of speech. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 163. Biomedical Ethics (4)
Moral issues in medicine and the biological sciences, such as patient’s rights and physician’s responsibilities, abortion and euthanasia, the distribution of health care, experimentation, and genetic intervention. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 164. Technology and Human Values (4)
Philosophical issues involved in the development of modern science, the growth of technology, and control of the natural environment. The interaction of science and technology with human nature and political and moral ideals. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 165. Freedom, Equality, and the Law (4)
Examination of freedom and equality under the US Constitution, focusing on Supreme Court cases concerning discrimination on grounds of race, ethnic background, gender, undocumented status, wealth, and sexual orientation, and cases regarding contraceptives, abortion, interracial marriage, polygamy, and same-sex marriage. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 166. Classics in Political Philosophy (4)
Central issues about the justification, proper functions, and limits of the state through classic texts in the history of political philosophy by figures such as Plato, Aristotle, Hobbes, Locke, Rousseau, Mill, and Marx. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 167. Contemporary Political Philosophy (4)
Different perspectives on central issues in contemporary political philosophy, such as the nature of state authority and political obligation, the limits of government and individual liberty, liberalism and its critics, equality and distributive justice. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 168. Philosophy of Law (4)
A study of issues in analytical jurisprudence such as the nature of law, the relation between law and morality, and the nature of legal interpretation and issues in normative jurisprudence such as the justification of punishment, paternalism and privacy, freedom of expression, and affirmative action. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 169. Feminism and Philosophy (4)
Philosophical examination of core concepts and theses in feminism, feminist philosophy, and critiques of traditional philosophical approaches to morality, politics, and science, from a feminist perspective. May also treat the historical development of feminist philosophy and its critiques. May be taken for credit two times with permission of instructor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 170. Philosophy and Race (4)
A philosophical investigation of the topics of race and racism. The role of “race” in ordinary speech. The ethics of racial discourse. Anthropological and biological conceptions of race. The social and political significance of racial categories. Post-racialist conceptions of race. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 173. Topics in Bioethics (4)
An in-depth exploration of an issue in bioethics. Topics will vary, and may include the ethics of genetic engineering, mental capacity and genuinely informed consent, the just distribution of health care, the ethics of geo-engineering, and the ethics of climate change and health. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 175. Aesthetics (4)
Central issues in philosophical aesthetics such as the nature of art and aesthetic experience, the grounds of artistic interpretation and evaluation, artistic representation, and the role of the arts in education, culture, and politics. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 177. Philosophy and Literature (4)
A study of philosophical themes contained in selected fiction, drama, or poetry, and the philosophical issues that arise in the interpretation, appreciation, and criticism of literature. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 178. Topics in German Philosophy Translation—Intermediate (2)
Careful, line-by-line translation of passages of intermediate difficulty from German philosophical texts, both classic (Kant, Fichte, Hegel, Schopenhauer) and contemporary (Heidegger, Wittgenstein, Habermas). P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit six times as topics vary. LIGM 1D or equivalent level of study recommended. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and preauthorization.

PHIL 179. Topics in German Philosophy Translation—Advanced (2)
Continuation of Philosophy 178 in the careful, line-by-line translation of passages of advanced difficulty from German philosophical texts, both classic (Kant, Fichte, Hegel, Schopenhauer) and contemporary (Heidegger, Wittgenstein, Habermas). May be repeated for credit as topics vary. Prerequisites: consent of instructor or completion of Philosophy 178.

PHIL 180. Phenomenology (4)
An examination of the phenomenological tradition through the works of its major classical and/or contemporary representatives. Authors studied will vary and may include Brentano, Husserl, Heidegger, Merleau-Ponty, Levinas, Bourdieu. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 181. Existentialism (4)
Classical texts and issues of existentialism. Authors studied will vary and may include Nietzsche, Kierkegaard, Sartre, and Heidegger. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 183. Topics in Continental Philosophy (4)
The focus will be on a leading movement in continental philosophy (e.g., the critical theory of the Frankfurt school, structuralism and deconstruction, postmodernism) or some particular issue that has figured in these traditions (e.g., freedom, subjectivity, historicity, authenticity). May be repeated for credit with change in content and approval of instructor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 185. Philosophy of Religion (4)
A general introduction to the philosophy of religion through the study of classical and/or contemporary texts. Among the issues to be discussed are the existence and nature of God, the problem of evil, the existence of miracles, the relation between reason and revelation, and the nature of religious language. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 191A. Philosophy Honors (4)
Independent study by special arrangement with and under the supervision of a faculty member, including a proposal for the honors essay. An IP grade will be awarded at the end of this quarter; a final grade will be given for both quarters at the end of 191B. Prerequisites: department stamp; consent of instructor.

PHIL 191B. The Honors Essay (4)
Continuation of 191A: independent study by special arrangement with and under the supervision of a faculty member, leading to the completion of the honors essay. A letter grade for both 191A and 191B will be given at the end of this quarter. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

PHIL 195. Introduction to Teaching Philosophy (4)
Under the supervision of the instructor, student will lead one discussion section of a lower-division philosophy class. The student must attend the lecture for the class and meet regularly with the instructor. Applications are available in the Department of Philosophy. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and department chair, GPA of 3.0 or higher, over ninety units.

PHIL 199. Directed Individual Study (4)
Directed individual study by special arrangement with and under the supervision of a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

PHIL 200. Proseminar (4)
Introduction to philosophical methods of analysis through study of classic historical or contemporary texts. Writing intensive. Enrollment limited to entering graduate students.

PHIL 201A. Core Course in History (4)
A study of selected texts or topics in the history of philosophy. Usually the focus will be on a single major text. May be taken for credit nine times with changed content.

PHIL 202. Core Course in Ethics (4)
An introduction to some central issues in ethical theory with emphasis on classic texts or contemporary authors. May be taken for credit three times with changed content.

PHIL 204A. Core Course in Philosophy of Science (4)
An introduction to one or more central problems in the philosophy of science, or in the philosophy of one of the particular sciences, such as the nature of confirmation and explanation, the nature of scientific knowledge, reductionism, the unity of science, or realism and antirealism. May be taken for credit three times with changed content.

PHIL 205A. Core Course in Metaphysics (4)
An introduction to central topics in metaphysics with emphasis on classic texts or contemporary authors. May be taken for credit three times with changed content.

PHIL 206A. Core Course in Epistemology (4)
An introduction to central topics in epistemology with emphasis on classic texts or contemporary authors. May be taken for credit three times with changed content.

PHIL 207. Core Course in Philosophy of Mind (4)
An introduction to central topics in philosophy of mind with emphasis on classic texts or contemporary authors. May be taken for credit three times with changed content. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 208. Core Course in Philosophy of Language (4)
An introduction to central topics in philosophy of language with emphasis on classic texts or contemporary authors. May be taken for credit three times with changed content. Prerequisites: graduate status or consent of instructor.

PHIL 209A. Introduction to Science Studies (4)
Study and discussion of classic work in history of science, philosophy of science, and of work that attempts to develop a unified science studies approach. Required of all students in the Science Studies Program.

PHIL 209B. Seminar in Science Studies (4)
Study and discussion of selected topics in the science studies field. Required of all students in the Science Studies Program. The topic varies from year to year and students may, therefore, repeat the course for credit. May be taken for credit three times with changed content.

PHIL 209C. Colloquium in Science Studies (4)
A forum for the presentation and discussion of research in progress in science studies, by graduate students, faculty, and visitors. May be taken for credit two times with changed content.

PHIL 209D. Advanced Approaches to Science Studies (4)
Contemporary themes and problems in science studies. Focus on recent literature in the history, philosophy, and sociology of science, technology, and medicine.

PHIL 210. Greek Philosophy (4)
A study of selected texts or topics from the history of Greek philosophy. Usually centers on works by Plato or Aristotle. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 214. Early Modern Philosophy (4)
A study of selected texts or topics from philosophers of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries: Descartes, Spinoza, Leibniz, or Locke. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 215. Eighteenth-Century Philosophy (4)
A study of selected texts or topics from philosophers of the eighteenth century: for example, Kant or Hume. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 218. Contemporary Analytical Philosophy (4)
A study of the historical development of the analytical movement, with emphasis on major texts. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 230. Metaphysics (4)
Topics may include identity, personal identity, universals and particulars, modality and possible worlds, causation, reduction, supervenience, freedom and determinism, space and time, and realism versus antirealism. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 232. Epistemology (4)
This seminar will cover issues such as rival accounts of knowledge, justification, and warrant, traditional and contemporary perspectives on empiricism, rationalism, and pragmatism, and skepticism. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 234. Philosophy of Language (4)
Central issues in contemporary philosophy of language, such as the nature of linguistic meaning, truth, content, reference, the syntax and semantics of various linguistic constructions, presupposition, speech acts, the epistemology of language understanding and language learning, the mental/psychological basis of linguistic understanding and use. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 236. Philosophy of Mind (4)
Contemporary debates on the nature, function, and operation of the mental. May include questions about the mind-body relation, mental causation, perception, consciousness, and mental representation. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 245. Philosophy of Science (4)
This seminar will cover current books and theoretical issues in the philosophy of science. May be taken for credit seven times with changed content.

PHIL 250A. Philosophy of the Cognitive Sciences (4)
Contemporary debates about the study of the mind-brain as studied in one or more of the empirical cognitive sciences. May include questions about the different strategies of explanation invoked, the conceptions of representation employed, the connections between theoretical models developed. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 260. Ethics (4)
Topics may include metaethics (e.g., the semantics, metaphysics, epistemology, and normativity of ethics), consequentialism and deontology, moral psychology (e.g., freedom, responsibility, and weaknesses of will), or substantive moral problems. The approach may be systematic, historical, or both. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 267. Political Philosophy (4)
Topics may include the nature and limits of state authority, liberty and equality, distributive justice, liberalism and its critics (e.g., feminists, libertarians, and others), or issues in jurisprudence. The focus may be on classic texts or contemporary authors. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 275. German Philosophy Reading Group (1–2)
This course meets regularly to discuss primary or secondary literature in the area of German philosophy (including Kant, Fichte, Hegel, etc.). The reading is designed both for students doing active research in the field and for those seeking to gain some familiarity with it. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit nine times with changed content.

PHIL 276. German Translation Workshop (1–2)
This course meets weekly to provide training in reading and translating philosophical German. Students prepare in advance written translations of assigned passages. The course helps train graduate students preparing to take the Departmental German Exam. Can be taken nine times for credit with changed content.

PHIL 277. Phenomenology Reading Group (1–2)
This course meets biweekly with students reading and presenting material from the phenomenological literature. The course is designed both for students doing active research in phenomenology and for those seeking to gain some familiarity with that tradition. Can be taken nine times for credit with changed content.

PHIL 278. Topics and Methods in Contemporary Philosophy (1–2)
Investigation of central issues in contemporary philosophy. Content varies but typically will center on a recent and important philosophical book. Can be taken nine times for credit with changed content.

PHIL 280. Philosophy of Science Topics and Methods (1–2)
This course meets weekly to discuss recent books or articles in philosophy of science. The reading is designed both for students doing active research in the field and for those seeking to gain some familiarity with it. Can be taken nine times for credit with changed content.

PHIL 281. History of Philosophy Research and Methods (1–2)
This course meets to discuss work in progress in the history of philosophy. Its aim is to introduce understanding of the methods and standards of research in the field through constructive criticism of each other’s work. Can be taken nine times for credit with changed content.

PHIL 282. Topics and Methods in Ethics (1–2)
Weekly or biweekly meetings to discuss recent literature in ethics, broadly construed so as to include ethical theory, normative ethics, jurisprudence, and historical traditions in these fields. The course is suitable for those specializing in ethics and for those seeking some familiarity with the field. Can be taken nine times for credit with changed content.

PHIL 284. Philosophy of Biology Research Group (1–2)
A research group for graduate students engaged in philosophy or history of the biological sciences. The group discusses biological, historical, and philosophical articles and books and ongoing research projects. Can be taken nine times for credit with change of content. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 285. Seminar on Special Topics (4)
Focused examination of specific problems or themes in some area of philosophy. May be taken for credit nine times with changed content.

PHIL 286. Philosophy of Physics Reading Group (1–2)
A research group for graduate students engaged in philosophy or history of the physical sciences. The group discusses physical, historical, and philosophical articles and books and ongoing research projects. Can be taken nine times for credit with change of content. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 287. Greek Reading Group (1–2)
This group provides training in reading and translating philosophical Greek by having students prepare translations of passages and lead discussions. The group helps train graduate students preparing for Departmental Greek Exam. Can be taken nine times for credit with change of content. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 288. Latin Reading Group (1–2)
This group provides training in reading and translating philosophical Latin by having students prepare translations of passages and lead discussions. The group helps train graduate students preparing for departmental Latin exam. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PHIL 290. Directed Independent Study (4)
Supervised study of individually selected philosophical topics. S/U grades permitted.

PHIL 292. Writing Workshop (1–3)
Each enrolled student produces a research essay ready for publication, presents it to students and faculty, and offers critiques of other students’ presentations. Units will vary according to enrollment in course. To be taken in fall quarter of third year of philosophy graduate study.

PHIL 295. Research Topics (1–12)
Advanced individual research studies under the direction of a member of the staff. Hours of outside preparation will vary with number of units taken. May be taken for credit nine times with changed content.

PHIL 299. Thesis Research (1–12)
S/U grades permitted.

PHIL 500. Apprentice Teaching (1–4)
A course designed to satisfy the requirement that graduate students should serve as teaching assistants, either in the Department of Philosophy or in one of the writing programs offered by the various colleges. Each PhD candidate must teach the equivalent of quarter time for three academic quarters. Students are permitted to sign up as TAs for a maximum of eighteen quarters.

PHYS 1A. Mechanics (3)
First quarter of a three-quarter introductory physics course, geared towards life-science majors. Equilibrium and motion of particles in one and two dimensions in the framework of Newtonian mechanics, force laws (including gravity), energy, momentum, rotational motion, conservation laws, and fluids. Examples will be drawn from astronomy, biology, sports, and current events. Prerequisites: Mathematics 10A or 20A. Corequisites: Physics 1AL and Mathematics 10B or 20B (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (F,W,S)

PHYS 1AL. Mechanics Laboratory (2)
Physics laboratory course to accompany Physics 1A. Experiments in Mechanics. Prerequisites: Mathematics 10A or 20A. Corequisites: Physics 1A and Mathematics 10B or 20B (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (F,W,S)

PHYS 1B. Electricity and Magnetism (3)
Second quarter of a three-quarter introductory physics course geared toward life-science majors. Electric fields, magnetic fields, DC and AC circuitry. Prerequisites: Physics 1A or 2A, 1AL or 2BL, and Mathematics 10B or 20B. Corequisites: Physics 1BL and Mathematics 10C or 20C or 11 (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (F,W,S)

PHYS 1BL. Electricity and Magnetism Laboratory (2)
Physics laboratory course to accompany Physics 1B. Experiments in electricity and magnetism. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: Physics 1A or 2A, 1AL or 2BL, and Mathematics 10B or 20B. Corequisites: Physics 1B and Mathematics 10C or 20C or 11 (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (F,W,S)

PHYS 1C. Waves, Optics, and Modern Physics (3)
Third quarter of a three-quarter introductory physics course geared toward life-science majors. The physics of oscillations and waves, vibrating strings and sound, the behavior of systems under combined thermal and electric forces, and the interaction of light with matter as illustrated through optics and quantum mechanics. Examples from biology, sports, medicine, and current events. Prerequisites: Physics 1B or 2B, 1BL or 2CL, and Mathematics 10C or 20C or 11. Corequisites: Physics 1CL. (F,W,S)

PHYS 1CL. Waves, Optics, and Modern Physics Laboratory (2)
Physics laboratory course to accompany Physics 1C. Experiments in waves, optics, and modern physics. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: Physics 1B or 2B, 1BL or 2CL, and Mathematics 10C or 20C or 11. Corequisites: Physics 1C. (F,W,S)

PHYS 2A. Physics—Mechanics (4)
A calculus-based science-engineering general physics course covering vectors, motion in one and two dimensions, Newton’s first and second laws, work and energy, conservation of energy, linear momentum, collisions, rotational kinematics, rotational dynamics, equilibrium of rigid bodies, oscillations, gravitation. Prerequisites: Mathematics 20A. Corequisites: Mathematics 20B (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (F,W,S)

PHYS 2B. Physics—Electricity and Magnetism (4)
Continuation of Physics 2A covering charge and matter, the electric field, Gauss’s law, electric potential, capacitors and dielectrics, current and resistance, electromotive force and circuits, the magnetic field, Ampere’s law, Faraday’s law, inductance, electromagnetic oscillations, alternating currents and Maxwell’s equations. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A and Mathematics 20A-B. Corequisites: Mathematics 20C (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (F,W,S)

PHYS 2BL. Physics Laboratory—Mechanics (2)
Experiments include gravitational force, linear and rotational motion, conservation of energy and momentum, collisions, oscillations and springs, gyroscopes. Data reduction and error analysis are required for written laboratory reports. One-hour lecture and three hours’ laboratory. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A. Corequisites: Physics 2B or 4C (prior completion of Physics 2B or 4C is permitted). (F,W,S)

PHYS 2C. Physics—Fluids, Waves, Thermodynamics, and Optics (4)
Continuation of Physics 2B covering fluid mechanics, waves in elastic media, sound waves, temperature, heat and the first law of thermodynamics, kinetic theory of gases, entropy and the second law of thermodynamics, Maxwell’s equations, electromagnetic waves, geometric optics, interference and diffraction. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A, and Mathematics 20A-C. Corequisites: Mathematics 20D (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). Recommended preparation: prior completion of Physics 2B is strongly recommended. (F,W,S)

PHYS 2CL. Physics Laboratory—Electricity and Magnetism (2)
Experiments on L-R-C circuits; oscillations, resonance and damping, measurement of magnetic fields. One-hour lecture and three hours’ laboratory. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A and Physics 2B or 4C. Corequisites: Physics 2C or 4D (prior completion of Physics 2C or 4D is permitted). (F,W,S)

PHYS 2D. Physics—Relativity and Quantum Physics (4)
A modern physics course covering atomic view of matter, electricity and radiation, atomic models of Rutherford and Bohr, relativity, X-rays, wave and particle duality, matter waves, Schrödinger’s equation, atomic view of solids, natural radioactivity. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A, 2B, and Mathematics 20D. Corequisites: Mathematics 20E (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (W,S)

PHYS 2DL. Physics Laboratory—Modern Physics (2)
One hour of lecture and three hours of laboratory. Experiments to be chosen from refraction, diffraction and interference of microwaves, Hall effect, thermal band gap, optical spectra, coherence of light, photoelectric effect, e/m ratio of particles, radioactive decays, and plasma physics. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: 2BL or 2CL. Corequisites: Physics 2D or 4E (prior completion of Physics 2D or 4E is permitted). (S)

PHYS 4A. Physics for Physics Majors—Mechanics (4)
The first quarter of a five-quarter calculus-based physics sequence for physics majors and students with a serious interest in physics. The topics covered are vectors, particle kinematics and dynamics, work and energy, conservation of energy, conservation of momentum, collisions, rotational kinematics and dynamics, equilibrium of rigid bodies. Prerequisites: Mathematics 20A. Corequisites: Mathematics 20B (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (W)

PHYS 4B. Physics for Physics Majors—Fluids, Waves, and Heat (4)
Continuation of Physics 4A covering oscillations, gravity, fluid statics and dynamics, waves in elastic media, sound waves, heat and the first law of thermodynamics, kinetic theory of gases, second law of thermodynamics, gaseous mixtures and chemical reactions. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A and Mathematics 20B. Corequisites: Math 20C (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). Students continuing to Physics 4C will need prior completion of both Mathematics 20C and Mathematics 18 or 20F. (S)

PHYS 4C. Physics for Physics Majors—Electricity and Magnetism (4)
Continuation of Physics 4B covering charge and Coulomb’s law, electric field, Gauss’s law, electric potential, capacitors and dielectrics, current and resistance, magnetic field, Ampere’s law, Faraday’s law, inductance, magnetic properties of matter, LRC circuits, Maxwell’s equations. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A, 4B, Mathematics 20C and 20F or 18. Corequisites: Mathematics 20E (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (F)

PHYS 4D. Physics for Physics Majors—Electromagnetic Waves, Optics, and Special Relativity (4)
Continuation of Physics 4C covering electromagnetic waves and the nature of light, cavities and wave guides, electromagnetic radiation, reflection and refraction with applications to geometrical optics, interference, diffraction, holography, special relativity. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A, 4B-C, and Mathematics 20A-B-C-E, and Mathematics 20F or 18. Corequisites: Mathematics 20D (prior completion of mathematics corequisite is permitted). (W)

PHYS 4E. Physics for Physics Majors—Quantum Physics (4)
Continuation of Physics 4D covering experimental basis of quantum mechanics: Schrödinger equation and simple applications; spin; structure of atoms and molecules; selected topics from solid state, nuclear, and elementary particle physics. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A, 4B-C-D, and Mathematics 20A-B-C-D-E, and Mathematics 20F or 18. (S)

PHYS 5. Stars and Black Holes (4)
An introduction to the evolution of stars, including their birth and death. Topics include constellations, the atom and light, telescopes, stellar birth, stellar evolution, white dwarfs, neutron stars, black holes, and general relativity. This course uses basic algebra, proportion, radians, logs, and powers. Physics 5, 7, 9, and 13 form a four-quarter sequence and can be taken individually in any order. (F,S)

PHYS 7. Galaxies and Cosmology (4)
An introduction to galaxies and cosmology. Topics include the Milky Way, galaxy types and distances, dark matter, large scale structure, the expansion of the Universe, dark energy, and the early Universe. This course uses basic algebra, proportion, radians, logs and powers. Physics 5, 7, 9, and 13 form a four-quarter sequence and can be taken individually in any order. (W)

PHYS 8. Physics of Everyday Life (4)
Examines phenomena and technology encountered in daily life from a physics perspective. Topics include waves, musical instruments, telecommunication, sports, appliances, transportation, computers, and energy sources. Physics concepts will be introduced and discussed as needed employing some algebra. No prior physics knowledge is required.

PHYS 9. The Solar System (4)
An exploration of our Solar System. Topics include the Sun, terrestrial and giant planets, satellites, asteroids, comets, dwarf planets and the Kuiper Belt, exoplanets, and the formation of planetary systems. This course uses basic algebra, proportion, radians, logs and powers. Physics 5, 7, 9, and 13 form a four-quarter sequence and can be taken individually in any order. (S)

PHYS 10. Concepts in Physics (4)
This is a one-quarter general physics course for nonscience majors. Topics covered are motion, energy, heat, waves, electric current, radiation, light, atoms and molecules, nuclear fission and fusion. This course emphasizes concepts with minimal mathematical formulation. Recommended preparation: college algebra. (W)

PHYS 11. Survey of Physics (4)
Survey of physics for nonscience majors with strong mathematical background, including calculus. Physics 11 describes the laws of motion, gravity, energy, momentum, and relativity. A laboratory component consists of two experiments with gravity and conservation principles. Prerequisites: Mathematics 10A or 20A. Corequisites: Mathematics 10B or 20B. (F)

PHYS 12. Energy and the Environment (4)
A course covering energy fundamentals, energy use in an industrial society and the impact of large-scale energy consumption. It addresses topics on fossil fuel, heat engines, solar energy, nuclear energy, energy conservation, transportation, air pollution and global effects. Concepts and quantitative analysis. (S)

PHYS 13. Life in the Universe (4)
An exploration of life in the Universe. Topics include defining life; the origin, development, and fundamental characteristics of life on Earth; searches for life elsewhere in the Solar System and other planetary systems; space exploration; and identifying extraterrestrial intelligence. This course uses basic algebra, proportion, radians, logs, and powers. Physics 5, 7, 9, and 13 form a four-quarter sequence and can be taken individually in any order. (W)

PHYS 30. Poetry for Physicists (4)
Physicists have spoken of the beauty of equations. The poet John Keats wrote, “Beauty is truth, truth beauty...” What did they mean? Students will consider such questions while reading relevant essays and poems. Requirements include one creative exercise or presentation. Cross-listed with LTEN 30. Students cannot earn credit for both Physics 30 and LTEN 30. Prerequisites: CAT 2 or DOC 2 or HUM 1 or MCWP 40 or MMW 12 or WARR 11A or WCWP 10A and CAT 3 or DOC 3 or HUM 2 or MCWP 50 or MMW 13 or WARR 11B or WCWP 10B. (S)

PHYS 87. Freshman Seminar in Physics and Astrophysics (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

PHYS 98. Directed Group Study (2)
Directed group study on a topic, or in a field not included in the regular departmental curriculum. P/NP grades only.

PHYS 99. Independent Study (2)
Independent reading or research on a topic by special arrangement with a faculty member. P/NP grading only. Prerequisites: lower-division standing. Completion of thirty units at UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0, and a completed and approved Special Studies form. Department stamp required.

PHYS 100A. Electromagnetism I (4)
Coulomb’s law, electric fields, electrostatics; conductors and dielectrics; steady currents, elements of circuit theory. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-B-C or 4A-B-C-D, and Mathematics 20A-B-C-D-E and 20F or 18. Open to major codes EC28, PY26, PY28, PY29, PY30, PY31, PY32, PY33, and PY34 only.  (F)

PHYS 100B. Electromagnetism II (4)
Magnetic fields and magnetostatics, magnetic materials, induction, AC circuits, displacement currents; development of Maxwell’s equations. Prerequisites: Physics 100A, 105A, and Mathematics 20A-B-C-D-E and 20F or 18. Open to major codes EC28, PY26, PY28, PY29, PY30, PY31, PY32, PY33, and PY34 only. (W)

PHYS 100C. Electromagnetism III (4)
Electromagnetic waves, radiation theory; application to optics; motion of charged particles in electromagnetic fields; relation of electromagnetism to relativistic concepts. Prerequisites: Physics 100B. (S)

PHYS 105A. Mathematical and Computational Physics I (4)
A combined analytic and mathematically-based numerical approach to the solution of common applied mathematics problems in physics and engineering. Topics: Fourier series and integrals, special functions, initial and boundary value problems, Green’s functions; heat, Laplace and wave equations. Prerequisites: Physics 2B-C-D or 4B-C-D-E, and Mathematics 20A-B-C-D-E and 20F or 18. Open to major codes EC28, PY26, PY28, PY29, PY30, PY31, PY32, PY33, and PY34 only. (F)

PHYS 105B. Mathematical and Computational Physics II (4)
A continuation of Physics 105A covering selected advanced topics in applied mathematical and numerical methods. Topics include statistics, diffusion and Monte-Carlo simulations; Laplace equation and numerical methods for nonseparable geometries; waves in inhomogeneous media, WKB analysis; nonlinear systems and chaos. Prerequisites: Physics 105A, and Mathematics 20A-B-C-D-E and 20F or 18. (W)

PHYS 110A. Mechanics I (4)
Phase flows, bifurcations, linear oscillations, calculus of variations, Lagrangian dynamics, conservation laws, central forces, systems of particles, collisions, coupled oscillations. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-B-C or 4A-B-C-D and Mathematics 20A-B-C-D-E and 20F or 18. Open to major codes EC28, PY26, PY28, PY29, PY30, PY31, PY32, PY33, and PY34 only. (F)

PHYS 110B. Mechanics II (4)
Noninertial reference systems, dynamics of rigid bodies, Hamilton’s equations, Liouville’s theorem, chaos, continuum mechanics, special relativity. Prerequisites: Physics 105A, 110A, and Mathematics 20A-B-C-D-E and 20F or 18. (W)

PHYS 111. Introduction to Ocean Waves (4)
The linear theory of ocean surface waves, including group velocity, wave dispersion, ray theory, wave measurement and prediction, shoaling waves, giant waves, ship wakes, tsunamis, and the physics of the surf zone. Cross-listed with SIO 111. Students cannot earn credit for both Physics 111 and SIO 111. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-B-C or Physics 4A-B-C and Mathematics 20A-B-C-D-E. (W) )

PHYS 120. Circuits and Electronics (5)
Laboratory and lecture course that covers principles of analog circuit theory and design, linear systems theory, and practical aspects of circuit realization, debugging, and characterization. Laboratory exercises include passive circuits, active filters and amplifiers with discrete and monolithic devices, nonlinear circuits, interfaces to sensors and actuators, and the digitization of analog signals. Physics 120 was formerly numbered Physics 120A. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-B-C or 4A-B-C and Physics 2CL. Open to major codes PY26, PY28, PY29, PY30, PY31, PY32, PY33, and PY34 only. Recommended preparation: Physics 100A. (S)

PHYS 122. Experimental Techniques (4)
Laboratory-lecture course covering practical techniques used in research laboratories. Possible topics include: computer interfacing of instruments, sensors, and actuators; programming for data acquisition/analysis; electronics; measurement techniques; mechanical design/machining; mechanics of materials; thermal design/control; vacuum/cryogenic techniques; optics; particle detection. Physics 122 was formerly numbered Physics 121. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: Physics 120. (F)

PHYS 124. Laboratory Projects (4)
A laboratory-lecture-project course featuring creation of an experimental apparatus in teams of about two. Emphasis is on electronic sensing of the physical environment and actuating physical responses. The course will use a computer interface such as the Arduino. Physics 124 was formerly numbered Physics 120B. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: Physics 120. (W)

PHYS 130A. Quantum Physics I (4)
Development of quantum mechanics. Wave mechanics; measurement postulate and measurement problem. Piece-wise constant potentials, simple harmonic oscillator, central field and the hydrogen atom. Three hours lecture, one-hour discussion session. Prerequisites: Physics 100B and 110A. (S)

PHYS 130B. Quantum Physics II (4)
Matrix mechanics, angular momentum, spin, and the two-state system. Approximation methods and the hydrogen spectrum. Identical particles, atomic and nuclear structures. Scattering theory. Three hours lecture, one-hour discussion session. Prerequisites: Physics 130A. (F)

PHYS 130C. Quantum Physics III (4)
Quantized electromagnetic fields and introductory quantum optics. Symmetry and conservation laws. Introductory many-body physics. Density matrix, quantum coherence and dissipation. The relativistic electron. Three-hour lecture, one-hour discussion session. Prerequisites: Physics 130B. (W)

PHYS 133. Condensed Matter/Materials Science Laboratory (4)
A project-oriented laboratory course utilizing state-of-the-art experimental techniques in materials science. The course prepares students for research in a modern condensed matter-materials science laboratory. Under supervision, the students develop their own experimental ideas after investigating current research literature. With the use of sophisticated state-of-the-art instrumentation students conduct research, write a research paper, and make verbal presentations. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: Physics 2CL, 2DL. (S)

PHYS 137. String Theory (4)
Quantum mechanics and gravity. Electromagnetism from gravity and extra dimensions. Unification of forces. Quantum black holes. Properties of strings and branes. Prerequisites: Physics 100A, 110A, 130A. (S)

PHYS 139. Physics Special Topics (4)
From time to time a member of the regular faculty or a resident visitor will give a self-contained short course on a topic in his or her special area of research. This course is not offered on a regular basis, but it is estimated that it will be given once each academic year. Course may be taken for credit up to two times as topics vary (the course subtitle will be different for each distinct topic). Students who repeat the same topic in Physics 139 will have the duplicate credit removed from their academic record. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-B-C-D or 4A-B-C-D-E and Mathematics 20A-B-C and 20F or 18.

PHYS 140A. Statistical and Thermal Physics I (4)
Integrated treatment of thermodynamics and statistical mechanics; statistical treatment of entropy, review of elementary probability theory, canonical distribution, partition function, free energy, phase equilibrium, introduction to ideal quantum gases. Prerequisites: Physics 130A. (F)

PHYS 140B. Statistical and Thermal Physics II (4)
Applications of the theory of ideal quantum gases in condensed matter physics, nuclear physics and astrophysics; advanced thermodynamics, the third law, chemical equilibrium, low temperature physics; kinetic theory and transport in nonequilibrium systems; introduction to critical phenomena including mean field theory. Prerequisites: Physics 140A. (W)

PHYS 141. Computational Physics I: Probabilistic Models and Simulations (4)
Project-based computational physics laboratory course with student’s choice of Fortran90/95, or C/C++. Applications from materials science to the structure of the early universe are chosen from molecular dynamics, classical and quantum Monte Carlo methods, physical Langevin/Fokker-Planck processes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. (W)

PHYS 142. Computational Physics II: PDE and Matrix Models (4)
Project-based computational physics laboratory course for modern physics and engineering problems with student’s choice of Fortran90/95, or C/C++. Applications of finite element PDE models are chosen from quantum mechanics and nanodevices, fluid dynamics, electromagnetism, materials physics, and other modern topics. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. (S)

PHYS 151. Elementary Plasma Physics (4)
Particle motions, plasmas as fluids, waves, diffusion, equilibrium and stability, nonlinear effects, controlled fusion. Cross-listed with MAE 117A. Prerequisites: Mathematics 20D or 21D or consent of instructor. Recommended preparation: Physics 100B-C or ECE 107. (S)

PHYS 152A. Condensed Matter Physics (4)
Physics of the solid-state. Binding mechanisms, crystal structures and symmetries, diffraction, reciprocal space, phonons, free and nearly free electron models, energy bands, solid-state thermodynamics, kinetic theory and transport, semiconductors. Prerequisites: Physics 130A or Chemistry 133, and Physics 140A. (W)

PHYS 152B. Electronic Materials (4)
Physics of electronic materials. Semiconductors: bands, donors and acceptors, devices. Metals: Fermi surface, screening, optical properties. Insulators: dia-/ferro-electrics, displacive transitions. Magnets: dia-/para-/ferro-/antiferro-magnetism, phase transitions, low temperature properties. Superconductors: pairing, Meissner effect, flux quantization, BCS theory. Prerequisites: Physics 152A. (S)

PHYS 154. Elementary Particle Physics (4)
The constituents of matter (quarks and leptons) and their interactions (strong, electromagnetic, and weak). Symmetries and conservation laws. Fundamental processes involving quarks and leptons. Unification of weak and electromagnetic interactions. Particle-astrophysics and the Big Bang. Prerequisites: Physics 130B.

PHYS 160. Stellar Astrophysics (4)
Introduction to stellar astrophysics: observational properties of stars, solar physics, radiation and energy transport in stars, stellar spectroscopy, nuclear processes in stars, stellar structure and evolution, degenerate matter and compact stellar objects, supernovae and nucleosynthesis. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-B-C-D or 4A-B-C-D-E. Physics 160, 161, 162, and 163 may be taken as a four-quarter sequence in any order for students interested in pursuing graduate study in astrophysics or individually as topics of interest.

PHYS 161. Black Holes (4)
An introduction to Einstein’s theory of general relativity with emphasis on the physics of black holes. Topics will include metrics and curved space-time, the Schwarzchild metric, motion around and inside black holes, rotating black holes, gravitational lensing, gravity waves, Hawking radiation, and observations of black holes. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-B-C-D or 4A-B-C-D-E. Physics 160, 161, 162, and 163 may be taken as a four-quarter sequence in any order for students interested in pursuing graduate study in astrophysics or individually as topics of interest.

PHYS 162. Cosmology (4)
The expanding Universe, the Friedman-Robertson-Walker equations, dark matter, dark energy, and the formation of galaxies and large scale structure. Topics in observational cosmology, including how to measure distances and times, and the age, density, and size of the Universe. Topics in the early Universe, including the cosmic microwave background, creation of the elements, cosmic inflation, the big bang. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-D or 4A-E. Physics 160, 161, 162, and 163 may be taken as a four-quarter sequence in any order for students interested in pursuing graduate study in astrophysics or individually as topics of interest.

PHYS 163. Galaxies and Quasars (4)
An introduction to the structure and properties of galaxies in the universe. Topics covered include the Milky Way, the interstellar medium, properties of spiral and elliptical galaxies, rotation curves, starburst galaxies, galaxy formation and evolution, large-scale structure, and active galaxies and quasars. Physics 160, 161, 162, and 163 may be taken as a four-quarter sequence in any order for students interested in pursuing graduate study in astrophysics or individually as topics of interest. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-B-C-D or 4A-B-C-D-E.

PHYS 164. Observational Astrophysics Research Lab (4)
Project-based course developing tools and techniques of observational astrophysical research: photon counting, imaging, spectroscopy, astrometry; collecting data at the telescope; data reduction and analysis; probability functions; error analysis techniques; and scientific writing. Prerequisites: Physics 2A-B-C-D or 4A-B-C-D-E. Recommended preparation: concurrent enrollment or completion of one course from Physics 160, 161, 162, or 163 is recommended.

PHYS 170. Medical Instruments: Principles and Practice (4)
The principles and clinical applications of medical diagnostic instruments, including electromagnetic measurements, spectroscopy, microscopy; ultrasounds, X-rays, MRI, tomography, lasers in surgery, fiber optics in diagnostics. Prerequisites: Physics 1B-C or 2B-C or 4B-C.

PHYS 173. Modern Physics Laboratory: Biological and Quantum Physics (4)
A selection of experiments in contemporary physics and biophysics. Students select among pulsed NMR, Mossbauer, Zeeman effect, light scattering, holography, optical trapping, voltage clamp and genetic transcription of ion channels in oocytes, fluorescent imaging, and flight control in flies. Prerequisites: Physics 120, BILD 1, and Chemistry 7L. (S)

PHYS 175. Biological Physics (4)
This course teaches how quantitative models derived from statistical physics can be used to build quantitative, intuitive understanding of biological phenomena. Case studies include ion channels, cooperative binding, gene regulation, protein folding, molecular motor dynamics, cytoskeletal assembly, and biological electricity. Prerequisites: Physics 100A and 110A or Chemistry 132. Corequisites: Physics 140A. (F)

PHYS 176. Quantitative Molecular Biology (4)
A quantitative approach to gene regulation including transcriptional and posttranscriptional control of gene expression, as well as feedback and stochastic effects in genetic circuits. These topics will be integrated into the control of bacterial growth and metabolism. Prerequisites: Physics 140A. Recommended preparation: an introductory course in biology is helpful but not necessary. (W)

PHYS 177. Physics of the Cell (4)
The use of dynamic systems and nonequilibrium statistical mechanics to understand the biological cell. Topics chosen from: chemotaxis as a model system; signal transduction networks and cellular information processing; mechanics of the membrane; cytoskeletal dynamics; nonlinear Calcium waves. May be scheduled with Physics 277. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Recommended preparation: an introductory course in biology is helpful but not necessary. (S)

PHYS 178. Biophysics of Neurons and Networks (4)
Information processing by nervous system through physical reasoning and mathematical analysis. A review of the biophysics of neurons and synapses and fundamental limits to signaling by nervous systems is followed by essential aspects of the dynamics of phase coupled neuronal oscillators, the dynamics and computational capabilities of recurrent neuronal networks, and the computational capability of layered networks. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Recommended preparation: a working knowledge of calculus and linear algebra. (W)

PHYS 191. Undergraduate Seminar on Physics (1)
Undergraduate seminars organized around the research interests of various faculty members. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: Physics 2A or 4A. (F)

PHYS 192. Senior Seminar in Physics (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in Physics (at the upper-division level). Senior Seminars may be offered in all campus departments. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors.

PHYS 198. Directed Group Study (2 or 4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular departmental curriculum. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor and departmental chair. (F,W,S)

PHYS 199. Research for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
Independent reading or research on a problem by special arrangement with a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor and departmental chair. (F,W,S)

PHYS 199H. Honors Thesis Research for Undergraduates (2-4)
Honors thesis research for seniors participating in the Honors Program. Research is conducted under the supervision of a physics faculty member. Prerequisites: admission to the Honors Program in Physics. (F,W,S)

PHYS 200A. Theoretical Mechanics I (4)
Lagrange’s equations and Hamilton’s principle; symmetry and constants of the motion. Applications to: charged particle motion; central forces and scattering theory; small oscillations; anharmonic oscillations; rigid body motion; continuum mechanics. (F)

PHYS 200B. Theoretical Mechanics II (4)
Hamilton’s equations, canonical transformations; Hamilton-Jacobi theory; action-angle variables and adiabatic invariants; introduction to canonical perturbation theory, nonintegrable systems and chaos; Liouville equation; ergodicity and mixing; entropy; statistical ensembles. Prerequisites: Physics 200A. (W)

PHYS 201. Mathematical Physics (5)
An introduction to mathematical methods used in theoretical physics. Topics include: a review of complex variable theory, applications of the Cauchy residue theorem, asymptotic series, method of steepest descent, Fourier and Laplace transforms, series solutions for ODE’s and related special functions, Sturm Liouville theory, variational principles, boundary value problems, and Green’s function techniques. (F)

PHYS 203A. Advanced Classical Electrodynamics I (5)
Electrostatics, symmetries of Laplace’s equation and methods for solution, boundary value problems, electrostatics in macroscopic media, magnetostatics, Maxwell’s equations, Green functions for Maxwell’s equations, plane wave solutions, plane waves in macroscopic media. (W)

PHYS 203B. Advanced Classical Electrodynamics II (4)
Special theory of relativity, covariant formulation of electrodynamics, radiation from current distributions and accelerated charges, multipole radiation fields, waveguides and resonant cavities. Prerequisites: Physics 203A. (S)

PHYS 210A. Equilibrium Statistical Mechanics (5)
Approach to equilibrium: BBGKY hierarchy; Boltzmann equation; H-theorem. Ensemble theory; thermodynamic potentials. Quantum statistics; Bose condensation. Interacting systems: Cluster expansion; phase transition via mean-field theory; the Ginzburg criterion. Prerequisites: Physics 200A-B. Corequisites: Physics 212C. (S)

PHYS 210B. Nonequilibrium Statistical Mechanics (4)
Transport phenomena; kinetic theory and the Chapman-Enskog method; hydrodynamic theory; nonlinear effects and the mode coupling method. Stochastic processes; Langevin and Fokker-Planck equation; fluctuation-dissipation relation; multiplicative processes; dynamic field theory; Martin-Siggia-Rose formalism; dynamical scaling theory. Prerequisites: Physics 210A. (F)

PHYS 211A. Solid-State Physics I (5)
The first of a two-quarter course in solid-state physics. Covers a range of solid-state phenomena that can be understood within an independent particle description. Topics include: chemical versus band-theoretical description of solids, electronic band structure calculation, lattice dynamics, transport phenomena and electrodynamics in metals, optical properties, semiconductor physics. (F)

PHYS 211B. Solid-State Physics II (4)
Deals with collective effects in solids arising from interactions between constituents. Topics include electron-electron and electron-phonon interactions, screening, band structure effects, Landau Fermi liquid theory. Magnetism in metals and insulators, superconductivity; occurrence, phenomenology, and microscopic theory. Prerequisites: Physics 210A, 211A. (Offered in alternate years.) (W)

PHYS 212A. Quantum Mechanics I (4)
Quantum principles of state (pure, composite, entangled, mixed), observables, time evolution, and measurement postulate. Simple soluble systems: two-state, harmonic oscillator, and spherical potentials. Angular momentum and spin. Time-independent approximations. (F)

PHYS 212B. Quantum Mechanics II (4)
Symmetry theory and conservation laws: time reversal, discrete, translation and rotational groups. Potential scattering. Time-dependent perturbation theory. Quantization of Electromagnetic fields and transition rates. Identical particles. Open systems: mixed states, dissipation, decoherence. Prerequisites: Physics 212A. (W)

PHYS 212C. Quantum Mechanics III (4)
Scattering with internal degrees of freedom. Path integrals, topological phases, and Bohm-Aharonov effect. Interacting fermions and bosons. Introductory quantum optics. The measurement problem. The relativistic electron. Prerequisites: Physics 212A-B. (S)

PHYS 214. Physics of Elementary Particles (4)
Classification of particles using symmetries and invariance principles, quarks and leptons, quantum electrodynamics, weak interactions, e+p- interactions, deep-inelastic lepton-nucleon scattering, pp collisions, introduction to QCD. Prerequisites: Physics 215A. (W)

PHYS 215A. Particles and Fields I (4)
The first quarter of a three-quarter course on field theory and elementary particle physics. Topics covered include the relation between symmetries and conservation laws, the calculation of cross sections and reaction rates, covariant perturbation theory, and quantum electrodynamics. (F)

PHYS 215B. Particles and Fields II (4)
Gauge theory quantization by means of path integrals, SU(3) symmetry and the quark model, spontaneous symmetry breakdown, introduction to QCD and the Glashow-Weinberg-Salam model of weak interactions, basic issues of renormalization. Prerequisites: Physics 215A. (W)

PHYS 215C. Particles and Fields III (4)
Modern applications of the renormalization group in quantum chromodynamics and the weak interactions. Unified gauge theories, particle cosmology, and special topics in particle theory. Prerequisites: Physics 215A-B. (Offered in alternate years.) (S)

PHYS 217. Field Theory and the Renormalization Group (4)
Application of field theoretic and renormalization group methods to problems in condensed matter, or particle physics. Topics will vary and may include: phase transition and critical phenomena; many body quantum systems; quantum chromodynamics and the electroweak model. Prerequisites: Physics 210A.

PHYS 218A. Plasma Physics I (4)
The basic physics of plasmas is discussed for the simple case of an unmagnetized plasma. Topics include: thermal equilibrium statistical properties, fluid and Landau theory of electron and ion plasma waves, velocity space instabilities, quasi-linear theory, fluctuations, scattering or radiation, Fokker-Planck equation. (F)

PHYS 218B. Plasma Physics II (4)
This course deals with magnetized plasma. Topics include: Appleton-Hartree theory of waves in cold plasma, waves in warm plasma (Bernstein waves, cyclotron damping). MHD equations, MHD waves, low frequency modes, and the adiabatic theory of particle orbits. Prerequisites: Physics 218A. (W)

PHYS 218C. Plasma Physics III (4)
This course deals with the physics of confined plasmas with particular relevance to controlled fusion. Topics include: topology of magnetic fields, confined plasma equilibria, energy principles, ballooning and kink instabilities, resistive MHD modes (tearing, rippling and pressure-driven), gyrokinetic theory, microinstabilities and anomalous transport, and laser-plasma interactions relevant to inertial fusion. Prerequisites: Physics 218B. (S)

PHYS 219. Condensed Matter/Materials Science Laboratory (4)
A project-oriented laboratory course utilizing state-of-the-art experimental techniques in materials science. The course prepares students for research in a modern condensed matter-materials science laboratory. Under supervision, the students develop their own experimental ideas after investigating current research literature. With the use of sophisticated state-of-the-art instrumentation students conduct research, write a research paper, and make verbal presentations. Prerequisites: Physics 211A. (S)

PHYS 220. Group Theoretical Methods in Physics (4)
Study of group theoretical methods with applications to problems in high energy, atomic, and condensed matter physics. Representation theory, tensor methods, Clebsh-Gordan series. Young tableaux. The course will cover discrete groups, Lie groups and Lie algebras, with emphasis on permutation, orthogonal, and unitary groups. Prerequisites: Physics 212C. (S)

PHYS 221A. Nonlinear and Nonequilibrium Dynamics of Physical Systems (4)
An introduction to the modern theory of dynamical systems and applications thereof. Topics include maps and flows, bifurcation theory and normal form analysis, chaotic attractors in dissipative systems, Hamiltonian dynamics and the KAM theorem, and time series analysis. Examples from real physical systems will be stressed throughout. Prerequisites: Physics 200B. (Offered in alternate years.) (W)

PHYS 222A. Elementary Particle Physics (4)
Weak interactions; neutrino physics; C,P, and CP violation; electroweak gauge theory and symmetry breaking. Design of detectors and experiments; searches for new phenomena. Prerequisites: Physics 214. (W)

PHYS 223. Stellar Structure and Evolution (4)
Energy generation, flow, hydrostatic equilibrium, equation of state. Dependence of stellar parameters (central surface temperature, radius, luminosity, etc.) on stellar mass and relation to physical constants. Relationship of these parameters to the H-R diagram and stellar evolution. Stellar interiors, opacity sources, radiative and convective energy flow. Nuclear reactions, neutrino processes. Polytropic models. White dwarfs and neutron stars. (S/U grades permitted.) (Offered in alternate years.) (F)

PHYS 224. Physics of the Interstellar Medium (4)
Gaseous nebulae, molecular clouds, ionized regions, and dust. Low-energy processes in neutral and ionized gases. Interaction of matter with radiation, emission and absorption processes, formation of atomic lines. Energy balance, steady state temperatures, and the physics and properties of dust. Masers and molecular line emission. Dynamics and shocks in the interstellar medium. (S/U grades permitted.) (Offered in alternate years.)

PHYS 225A-B. General Relativity (4-4)
This is a two-quarter course on gravitation and the general theory of relativity. The first quarter is intended to be offered every year and may be taken independently of the second quarter. The second quarter will be offered in alternate years. Topics covered in the first quarter include special relativity, differential geometry, the equivalence principle, the Einstein field equations, and experimental and observational tests of gravitation theories. The second quarter will focus on more advanced topics, including gravitational collapse, Schwarzschild and Kerr geometries, black holes, gravitational radiation, cosmology, and quantum gravitation. (225B offered in alternate years.) (F,W)

PHYS 226. Galaxies and Galactic Dynamics (4)
The structure and dynamics of galaxies. Topics include potential theory, the theory of stellar orbits, self-consistent equilibria of stellar systems, stability and dynamics of stellar systems including relaxation and approach to equilibrium. Collisions between galaxies, galactic evolution, dark matter, and galaxy formation. (Offered in alternate years.)

PHYS 227. Cosmology (4)
An advanced survey of topics in physical cosmology. The Friedmann models and the large-scale structure of the universe, including the observational determination of Ho (the Hubble constant) and qo (the deceleration parameter). Galaxy number counts. A systematic exposition of the physics of the early universe, including vacuum phase transitions; inflation; the generation of net baryon number, fluctuations, topological defects and textures. Primordial nucleosynthesis, both standard and nonstandard models. Growth and decay of adiabatic and isocurvature density fluctuations. Discussion of dark matter candidates and constraints from observation and experiment. Nucleocosmo-chronology and the determination of the age of the universe. (Offered in alternate years.)

PHYS 228. High-Energy Astrophysics and Compact Objects (4)
The physics of compact objects, including the equation of state of dense matter and stellar stability theory. Maximum mass of neutron stars, white dwarfs, and super-massive objects. Black holes and accretion disks. Compact X-ray sources and transient phenomena, including X-ray and g-ray bursts. The fundamental physics of electromagnetic radiation mechanisms: synchrotron radiation, Compton scattering, thermal and nonthermal bremsstrahlung, pair production, pulsars. Particle acceleration models, neutrino production and energy loss mechanisms, supernovae, and neutron star production. (Offered in alternate years.)

PHYS 230. Advanced Solid-State Physics (4)
Selection of advanced topics in solid-state physics; material covered may vary from year to year. Examples of topics covered: disordered systems, surface physics, strong-coupling superconductivity, quantum Hall effect, low-dimensional solids, heavy fermion systems, high-temperature superconductivity, solid and liquid helium. Prerequisites: Physics 211B. (S)

PHYS 232. Electronic Materials (4)
Physics of electronic materials. Semiconductors: bands, donors and acceptors, devices. Metals: Fermi surface, screening, optical properties. Insulators: dia-/ferro-electrics, displacive transitions. Magnets: dia-/para-/ferro-/antiferro-magnetism, phase transitions, low temperature properties. Superconductors: pairing, Meissner effect, flux quantization, BCS theory. Prerequisites: Physics 211A. (S)

PHYS 235. Nonlinear Plasma Theory (4)
This course deals with nonlinear phenomena in plasmas. Topics include: orbit perturbation theory, stochasticity, Arnold diffusion, nonlinear wave-particle and wave-wave interaction, resonance broadening, basics of fluid and plasma turbulence, closure methods, models of coherent structures. Prerequisites: Physics 218C. (Offered in alternate years.) (W)

PHYS 238. Observational Astrophysics Research Lab (4)
Project-based course developing tools and techniques of observational astrophysical research: photon counting, imaging, spectroscopy, astrometry; collecting data at the telescope; data reduction and analysis; probability functions; error analysis techniques; and scientific writing. Students will complete a final paper of publishable quality in the format of a peer-reviewed journal, as well as an oral presentation. Recommended preparation: undergraduate or graduate background in astrophysics.

PHYS 239. Special Topics (4)
From time to time a member of the regular faculty or a resident visitor will find it possible to give a self-contained short course on an advanced topic in his or her special area of research. This course is not offered on a regular basis, but it is estimated that it will be given once each academic year. (S/U grades permitted.)

PHYS 241. Computational Physics I: Probabilistic Models and Simulations (4)
Project-based computational physics laboratory course with student’s choice of Fortran90/95 or C/C++. Applications from materials science to the structure of the early universe are chosen from molecular dynamics, classical and quantum Monte Carlo methods, physical Langevin/Fokker-Planck processes, and other modern topics. (W)

PHYS 242. Computational Physics II: PDE and Matrix Models (4)
Project-based computational physics laboratory course for modern physics and engineering problems with student’s choice of Fortran90/95 or C/C++. Applications of finite element PDE models are chosen from quantum mechanics and nanodevices, fluid dynamics, electromagnetism, materials physics, and other modern topics. (S)

PHYS 243. Stochastic Methods (4)
Introduction to methods of stochastic modeling and simulation. Topics include: random variables; stochastic processes; Markov processes; one-step processes; the Fokker-Planck equation and Brownian motion; the Langevin approach; Monte-Carlo methods; fluctuations and the Boltzmann equation; and stochastic differential equations. (F)

PHYS 244. Parallel Computing in Science and Engineering (4)
Introduction to basic techniques of parallel computing, the design of parallel algorithms, and their scientific and engineering applications. Topics include: parallel computing platforms; message-passing model and software; design and application of parallel software packages; parallel visualization; parallel applications. (S)

PHYS 250. Condensed Matter Physics Seminar (0-1)
Discussion of current research in physics of the solid state and of other condensed matter. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

PHYS 251. High-Energy Physics Seminar (0-1)
Discussions of current research in nuclear physics, principally in the field of elementary particles. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

PHYS 252. Plasma Physics Seminar (0-1)
Discussions of recent research in plasma physics. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

PHYS 253. Astrophysics and Space Physics Seminar (0-1)
Discussions of recent research in astrophysics and space physics. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

PHYS 254. Biophysics Seminar (1)
Presentation of current research in biological physics and quantitative biology by invited speakers from the U.S. and abroad. (S/U grades only.) May be taken for credit thirty times. (F,W,S)

PHYS 255. Biophysics Research Talks (1)
Discussion of recent research in biological physics and quantitative biology by current graduate students. (S/U grades only.) May be taken for credit thirty times. (F,W,S)

PHYS 256. Critical Reading in Quantitative Biology (1)
Critical analysis of classic and current literature in quantitative biology, involving written critiques and group discussion. (S/U grades only.) May be taken for credit thirty times. (F,W,S)

PHYS 257. High-Energy Physics Special Topics Seminar (0-1)
Discussions of current research in high-energy physics. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

PHYS 258. Astrophysics and Space Physics Special Topics Seminar (0-1)
Discussions of current research in astrophysics and space physics. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

PHYS 260. Physics Colloquium (0-1)
Discussions of recent research in physics directed to the entire physics community. (S/U grades only.) (F,W,S)

PHYS 261. Seminar on Physics Research at UC San Diego (0-1)
Discussions of current research conducted by faculty members in the Department of Physics. (S/U grades only.) (W,S)

PHYS 264. Scientific Method Seminar (1)
Discussions of the application of the scientific method in the natural sciences. (S/U grades only.) May be taken for credit twenty-five times. (F,W,S)

PHYS 270A. Experimental Techniques for Quantitative Biology (4)
A hands-on laboratory course in which the students learn and use experimental techniques, including optics, electronics, chemistry, machining, and computer interface, to design and develop simple instruments for quantitative characterization of living systems. Lab classes will comprise five two-week modules. Prerequisites: department approval required. Recommended preparation: knowledge of electronics and optics at the level of introductory calculus, basic statistics, programming skills; knowledge of introductory biology. (F)

PHYS 270B. Quantitative Biology Laboratory (4)
A project-oriented laboratory course in which students are guided to develop their own ideas and tools, along with using state-of-art instruments to investigate a biological problem of current interest, under the direction of a faculty member. A range of current topics in quantitative biology is available, including microbiology, molecular and cell biology, developmental biology, synthetic biology, and evolution. This course may be repeated up to ten times for credit as long as the student works on a different project. Prerequisites: Physics 270A. Department approval required. (F,W,S)

PHYS 273. Information Theory and Pattern Formation in Biological Systems (4)
This course discusses how living systems acquire information on their environment and exploit it to generate structures and perform functions. Biological sensing of concentrations, reaction-diffusion equations, the Turing mechanism, and applications of information theory to cellular transduction pathways and animal behavior will be presented. Recommended preparation: familiarity with probabilities at the level of undergraduate statistical mechanics and major cellular processes; basic knowledge of information theory. (W)

PHYS 274. Stochastic Processes in Population Genetics (4)
The course explores genetic diversity within biological populations. Genetics fundamentals, mutation/selection equilibria, speciation, Wright-Fisher model, Kimura’s neutral theory, Luria-Delbrück test, the coalescent theory, evolutionary games and statistical methods for quantifying genetic observables such as SNPs, copy number variations, etc., will be discussed. Recommended preparation: familiarity with probabilities and PDEs at the undergraduate level; an introduction to basic evolutionary processes. (S)

PHYS 275. Fundamentals of Biological Physics (4)
This course teaches how quantitative models derived from statistical physics can be used to build quantitative, intuitive understanding of biological phenomena. Case studies include ion channels, cooperative binding, gene regulation, protein folding, molecular motor dynamics, cytoskeletal assembly, and biological electricity. Recommended preparation: an introduction to statistical mechanics, at least at the level of Physics 140A or Chemistry 132. (F)

PHYS 276. Quantitative Molecular Biology (4)
A quantitative approach to gene regulation, including transcriptional and posttranscriptional control of gene expression, as well as feedback and stochastic effects in genetic circuits. These topics will be integrated into the control of bacterial growth and metabolism. Recommended preparation: an introductory course in biology is helpful but not necessary. (W)

PHYS 277. Physics of the Cell (4)
The use of dynamic systems and nonequilibrium statistical mechanics to understand the biological cell. Topics chosen from chemotaxis as a model system, signal transduction networks and cellular information processing, mechanics of the membrane, cytoskeletal dynamics, nonlinear Calcium waves. The graduate version will include a report at the level of a research paper. May be scheduled with Physics 177. Recommended preparation: an introductory course in biology is helpful but not necessary. (S)

PHYS 278. Biophysics of Neurons and Networks (4)
Information processing by nervous system through physical reasoning and mathematical analysis. A review of the biophysics of neurons and synapses and fundamental limits to signaling by nervous systems is followed by essential aspects of the dynamics of phase coupled neuronal oscillators, the dynamics and computational capabilities of recurrent neuronal networks, and the computational capability of layered networks. Recommended preparation: a working knowledge of calculus and linear algebra. (W)

PHYS 279. Neurodynamics (4)
Introduction to the nonlinear dynamics of neurons and simple neural systems through nonlinear dynamics, bifurcation theory, and chaotic motions. The dynamics of single cells is considered at different levels of abstraction, e.g., biophysical and “reduced” models for analysis of regularly spiking and bursting cells, their dynamical properties, and their representation in phase space. Laboratory exercises will accompany the lectures. Duplicate credit not allowed for cross-listed courses: BGGN 260, BENG 260, and PHYS 279.

PHYS 281. Extensions in Physics (1-3)
This course covers topics not traditionally taught as part of a normal physics curriculum, but nonetheless useful extensions to the classic pedagogy. Example topics may include estimation, nuclear physics, fluid mechanics, and scaling relationships.

PHYS 295. MS Thesis Research in Materials Physics (1-12)
Directed research on MS dissertation topic. (F,W,S)

PHYS 297. Special Studies in Physics (1-4)
Studies of special topics in physics under the direction of a faculty member. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and departmental vice chair, education. (S/U grades permitted.) (F,W,S)

PHYS 298. Directed Study in Physics (1-12)
Research studies under the direction of a faculty member. (S/U grades permitted.) (F,W,S)

PHYS 299. Thesis Research in Physics (1-12)
Directed research on dissertation topic. (F,W,S)

PHYS 500. Instruction in Physics Teaching (1-4)
This course, designed for graduate students, includes discussion of teaching, techniques and materials necessary to teach physics courses. One meeting per week with course instructors, one meeting per week in an assigned recitation section, problem session, or laboratory section. Students are required to take a total of two units of Physics 500. (F,W,S)

POLI 10 or 10D. Introduction to Political Science: American Politics (4)
This course surveys the processes and institutions of American politics. Among the topics discussed are individual political attitudes and values, political participation, voting, parties, interest groups, Congress, presidency, Supreme Court, the federal bureaucracy, and domestic and foreign policy making. POLI 10 is Lecture only, and POLI 10D is Lecture plus Discussion section. These courses are equivalents of each other in regards to major requirements, and students may not receive credit for both 10 and 10D. 

POLI 11 or 11D. Introduction to Political Science: Comparative Politics (4)
The nature of political authority, the experience of a social revolution, and the achievement of an economic transformation will be explored in the context of politics and government in a number of different countries. POLI 11 is Lecture only, and POLI 11D is Lecture plus Discussion section. These courses are equivalents of each other in regards to major requirements, and students may not receive credit for both 11 and 11D. 

POLI 12 or 12D. Introduction to Political Science: International Relations (4)
The issues of war/peace, nationalism/internationalism, and economic growth/redistribution will be examined in both historical and theoretical perspectives. POLI 12 is Lecture only, and POLI 12D is Lecture plus Discussion section. These courses are equivalents of each other in regards to major requirements, and students may not receive credit for both 12 and 12D. 

POLI 13 or 13D. Power and Justice (4)
An exploration of the relationship between power and justice in modern society. Materials include classic and contemporary texts, films, and literature. POLI 13 is Lecture only, and POLI 13D is Lecture plus Discussion section. These courses are equivalents of each other in regards to major requirements, and students may not receive credit for both 13 and 13D. 

POLI 27. Ethics and Society (4)
An examination of ethical principles (e.g., utilitarianism, individual rights, etc.) and their social and political applications to contemporary issues such as abortion, environmental protection, and affirmative action. Ethical principles will also be applied to moral dilemmas familiar in government, law, business, and the professions. Satisfies the Warren College ethics and society requirement. Prerequisites: CAT 2 and 3, DOC 2 and 3, MCWP 40 and 50, Hum 1 and 2, MMW 2 and 3, WCWP 10A–B, or WARR 11A–B.

POLI 28. Ethics and Society II (4)
An examination of a single set of major contemporary social, political, or economic issues (e.g., environmental ethics, international ethics) in light of ethical and moral principles and values. Warren College students must take course for a letter grade in order to satisfy the Warren College general-education requirement. Prerequisites: Phil/POLI 27.

POLI 30 or 30D. Political Inquiry (4)
Introduction to the logic of inference in social science and to quantitative analysis in political science and public policy including research design, data collection, data description and computer graphics, and the logic of statistical inference (including linear regression). POLI 30 is Lecture only, and POLI 30D is Lecture plus Discussion section. These courses are equivalents of each other in regards to major requirements, and students may not receive credit for both 30 and 30D. 

POLI 40. Introduction to Law and Society (4)
This course is designed as a broad introduction to the study of law as a social institution and its relations to other institutions in society. The focus will be less on the substance of law (legal doctrine and judicial opinions) than on the process of law–how legal rules both reflect and shape basic social values and their relation to social, political, and economic conflicts within society.

POLI 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. May not be used to fulfill any major or minor requirements in political science.

POLI 90. Undergraduate Seminar (4)
Selected topics to introduce students to current issues and trends in political science. May not be used to fulfill any major or minor requirements in political science. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit four times.

POLI 99H. Independent Study (1)
Independent study or research under direction of a member of the faculty. Prerequisites: student must be of freshman class standing, and a Regents Scholar; approved Special Studies form.

POLI 100A. The Presidency (4)
The role of the presidency in American politics. Topics will include nomination and election politics, relations with Congress, party leadership, presidential control of the bureaucracy, international political role, and presidential psychology.

POLI 100B. The US Congress (4)
This course will examine the nomination and election of congressmen, constituent relationships, the development of the institution, formal and informal structures, leadership, comparisons of House with Senate, lobbying, and relationship with the executive branch.

POLI 100C. American Political Parties (4)
This course examines the development of the two major parties from 1789 to the present. Considers the nature of party coalitions, the role of leaders, activists, organizers, and voters, and the performance of parties in government.

POLI 100DA. Voting, Campaigning, and Elections (4)
A consideration of the nature of public opinion and voting in American government. Studies of voting behavior are examined from the viewpoints of both citizens and candidates, and attention is devoted to recent efforts to develop models of electoral behavior for the study of campaigns. The role of mass media and money also will be examined.

POLI 100E. Interest Group Politics (4)
The theory and practice of interest group politics in the United States. Theories of pluralism and collective action, the behavior and influence of lobbies, the role of political action committees, and other important aspects of group action in politics are examined. Prerequisites: sophomore standing.

POLI 100F. Social Networks (4)
This class explores the many ways in which face-to-face social networks have a powerful effect on a wide range of human behaviors. With a foundation in understanding real-world networks, we can then consider how these networks function online.

POLI 100G. How to Win or Lose an Election (4)
This course explores the various aspects of a political campaign including campaign organization, vote targeting, political parties, social media, fundraising, polling, media interactions, and more. These areas are examined citing specific examples from federal, state, and local campaigns.

POLI 100H. Race and Ethnicity in American Politics (4)
This course examines the processes by which racial and ethnic groups have/have not been incorporated into the American political system. The course focuses on the political experiences of European immigrant groups, blacks, Latinos, and Asians.

POLI 100J. Race in American Political Development (4)
Readings examine how the multiracial character of the United States has shaped the broad outlines of American politics. Cases include the founding/the Constitution, southern politics, social organization in formerly Mexican regions, the New Deal, consequences of limited suffrage. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 100M. Political Psychology (4)
We begin with hypotheses about how people develop political attitudes, and methods to test those hypotheses. The second half focuses on emerging cognitive neuroscience insights, including brain imaging, and asks how these inform theories of political cognition, affect, and behavior. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 100O. Perspectives on Race (4)
This course looks at race in American politics from a variety of perspectives. We may consider psychological, genetic, neuroscience, economic, political, sociological, and legal views of what drives powerful dynamics of race in our country. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 100Q. Advanced Topics in Racial Politics (4)
This course explores how race shapes outcomes in American democracy through in-depth exploration of key issues in American politics. Topics include race in the voting booth, immigration, discrimination, and inter-minority conflict.

POLI 100T. Business and Politics (4)
This course uses the tools of political science and economics to study how corporations affect and are affected by politics. We will cover a broad range of issues, including regulation, lawmaking, mass media, interest group mobilization, and corporate social responsibility.

POLI 100U. Games, Strategy, and Politics (4)
This course provides an introduction to game theory with an emphasis on applications in economics, political science, and business. Game theory uses simple mathematical models to understand social phenomena. The required mathematical background is minimal (high school algebra).

POLI 102C. American Political Development (4)
Examines selected issues and moments in the political history of the United States, comparing competing explanations and analyses of US politics. Likely topics include the founding, “American exceptionalism,” change in the party system, race in US politics, the “new institutionalism.”

POLI 102D. Voting Rights Act: Fifty Years Later (4)
The Voting Rights Act (VRA) is one of the most significant and controversial acts in American history. We will examine the environment that led to its introduction, the legislative process, executive implementation, and the political ramifications and subsequent state government and court decisions. 

POLI 102E. Urban Politics (4)
(Same as USP107) This survey course focuses upon the following six topics: the evolution of urban politics since the mid-nineteenth century; the urban fiscal crisis; federal/urban relationships; the “new” ethnic politics; urban power structure and leadership; and selected contemporary policy issues such as downtown redevelopment, poverty, and race.

POLI 102F. Mass Media and Politics (4)
This course will explore both the role played by mass media in political institutions, processes and behaviors, and reciprocally, the roles played by political systems in guiding communication processes.

POLI 102G. Special Topics in American Politics (4)
An undergraduate course designed to cover various aspects of American politics. May be repeated for credit two times, provided each course is a separate topic, for a maximum of twelve units.

POLI 102J. Advanced Topics in Urban Politics (4)
(Same as USP 110) Building upon the introductory urban politics course, the advanced topics course explores issues such as community power, minority empowerment, and the politics of growth. A research paper is required. Students wishing to fulfill the paper requirement with field research should enroll in the subsequent POLI 102JJ course (offered Summer Session 2). Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

POLI 102JJ. Field Research in Urban Politics (2)
(Same as USP 111) To be taken with the approval of the POLI 102J instructor, this course allows students to do original field research on topics in urban politics. This course is offered in Summer Session 2 subsequent to a 102J course. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. May not be used to fulfill any major or minor requirements in Political Science.

POLI 102K. The Urban Underclass (4)
The lives of individuals living in ghetto poverty in the United States. Causes and consequences of ghetto poverty. Political debates surrounding the underclass and different possible solutions. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 102L. The Politics of Regulation (4)
Politics and policy-making issues in regulation. Themes: regulation versus legislation; general versus specific grants of regulatory power; market versus command mechanisms; private property; and risk assessment. Emphasis on American regulatory policy, examples from current regulatory debates (e.g., health care and environment). Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 103A. California Government and Politics (4)
(Same as USP 109) This survey course explores six topics: 1) the state’s political history; 2) campaigning, the mass media, and elections; 3) actors and institutions in the making of state policy; 4) local government; 5) contemporary policy issues; e.g., Proposition 13, school desegregation, crime, housing and land use, transportation, water; 6) California’s role in national politics.

POLI 103B. Politics and Policymaking in Los Angeles (4)
(Same as USP 113) This course examines politics and policymaking in the five-county Los Angeles region. It explores the historical development of the city, suburbs, and region; politics, power, and governance; and major policy challenges facing the city and metropolitan area. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 103C. Politics and Policymaking in San Diego (4)
(Same as USP 115) This course examines how major policy decisions are made in San Diego. It analyzes the region’s power structure (including the roles of nongovernmental organizations and the media), governance systems and reform efforts, and the politics of major infrastructure projects. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 104A. The Supreme Court and the Constitution (4)
An introduction to the study of the Supreme Court and constitutional doctrine. Topics will include the nature of judicial review, federalism, race, and equal protection. The relation of judicial and legislative power will also be examined.

POLI 104B. Civil Liberties—Fundamental Rights (4)
This course will examine issues of civil liberties from both legal and political perspectives. Topics will include the First Amendment rights of speech, press, assembly, and religion; other “fundamental” rights, such as the right to privacy; and some issues in equal protection. Conflicts between governmental powers and individual rights will be examined.

POLI 104C. Civil Liberties—The Rights of the Accused and Minorities (4)
Examines the legal issues surrounding the rights of criminal suspects, as well as the rights of “marginal” groups such as aliens, illegal immigrants, and the mentally ill. Also includes a discussion of the nature of discrimination in American society. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 104D. Judicial Politics (4)
Introduction to the study of law and courts as political institutions and judges as political actors, including the role of the judiciary in our constitutional system and decision making both within the Supreme Court and within the judicial hierarchy.

POLI 104E. Environmental Law and Policy (4)
The course is an introduction to US environmental law at the federal level. It emphasizes issues and current controversies involving natural resources, such as wilderness, biodiversity, water, and climate change. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 104F. Seminar in Constitutional Law (4)
This seminar will provide an intensive examination of a major issue in constitutional law, with topics varying from year to year. Recent topics have included equal protection law and the rights of civilians in wartime. Students will be required to do legal research on a topic, write a legal brief, and argue a case to the seminar. Prerequisites: POLI 104A, B; department stamp.

POLI 104G. Election Law (4)
A detailed analysis of the legislative and judicial history of election related topics including registration laws, election administration, candidate requirements, voting rights, party organizational rules, nomination procedures, redistricting, and campaign finance. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 104I. Law and Politics—Courts and Political Controversy (4)
This course will examine the role of the courts in dealing with issues of great political controversy, with attention to the rights of speech and assembly during wartime, questions of internal security, and the expression of controversial views on race and religion. The conflict between opposing Supreme Court doctrines on these issues will be explored in the context of the case studies drawn from different historical periods.

POLI 104L. Positive Political Theory of Law (4)
We will discuss modern theories of the origins of law and legal behavior.

POLI 104M. Law and Sex (4)
How law regulates and impacts sexuality and orientation with focus on constitutional law in areas of privacy, free speech, association, regulation of sexual conduct under criminal law pornography, procreation, reproductive rights, and regulation of family status. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 104N. Race and Law (4)
Has the law helped end or contributed to racism in the United States? This course will explore the law of Slavery, Segregation, and Immigration, and study Equal Protection, Affirmative Action, and Criminal Justice (including hate crimes and First Amendment implications).

POLI 105A. Latino Politics in the U.S. (4)
This course examines contemporary issues in Latino politics in the U.S.; comparisons of racial and ethnic group experiences in the U.S.; Latino access to the political system through political participation. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 108. Politics of Multiculturalism (4)
This course will examine central issues in debates about race, ethnicity, and multiculturalism in the United States. It will look at relations not only between whites and minorities, but also at those among racial and ethnic communities. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 110A. Citizens and Saints: Political Thought from Plato to Augustine (4)
This course focuses on the development of politics and political thought in ancient Greece, its evolution through Rome and the rise of Christianity. Readings from Plato, Aristotle, Augustine, Machiavelli, and others.

POLI 110B. Sovereigns, Subjects, and the Modern State: Political Thought from Machiavelli to Rousseau (4)
The course deals with the period that marks the rise and triumph of the modern state. Central topics include the gradual emergence of human rights and the belief in individual autonomy. Readings from Machiavelli, Hobbes, Locke, Rousseau, and others.

POLI 110C. Revolution and Reaction: Political Thought from Kant to Nietzsche (4)
The course deals with the period that marks the triumph and critique of the modern state. Central topics include the development of the idea of class, of the irrational, of the unconscious, and of rationalized authority as they affect politics. Readings drawn from Rousseau, Kant, Hegel, Marx, Nietzsche, and others.

POLI 110DA. Freedom and Discipline: Political Thought in the Twentieth Century (4)
This course addresses certain problems that are characteristic of the political experience of the twentieth century. Topics considered are revolution, availability of tradition, and the problems of the rationalization of social and political relations. Readings from Nietzsche, Weber, Freud, Lenin, Gramsci, Dewey, Oakeshott, Arendt, Merleau-Ponty.

POLI 110EA. American Political Thought from Revolution to Civil War (4)
The first quarter examines the origins and development of American political thought from the revolutionary period to the end of the nineteenth century with special emphasis on the formative role of eighteenth-century liberalism and the tensions between “progressive” and “conservative” wings of the liberal consensus.

POLI 110EB. American Political Thought from Civil War to Civil Rights (4)
The second quarter examines some of the major themes of American political thought in the twentieth century including controversies over the meaning of democracy, equality, and distributive justice, the nature of “neoconservatism,” and America’s role as a world power.

POLI 110EC. American Political Thought: Contemporary Debates (4)
This course explores contemporary issues in American political thought. Topics may include liberalism and rights, gender and sexuality, race and ethnicity, cultural diversity, and the boundaries of modern citizenship. Readings include political pamphlets, philosophical treatises, court decisions, and works of literature.

POLI 110ED. Seminar in American Political Thought (4)
This seminar explores debates over ideals, institutions, and identities in American political thought. Themes and topics will vary. Readings will include political pamphlets, philosophical treatises, court decisions, and works of literature. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; department stamp.

POLI 110G. International Political Thought (4)
This course explores theories of politics that are oriented beyond state borders. Key topics include international order, cosmopolitanism, human rights, just war, global justice, mitigation, citizenship, identity, and commercial society. The course examines thinkers from classical antiquity to contemporary times.

POLI 110H. Democracy and Its Critics (4)
This course will examine the historical development of the ideal of democracy from Periclean Athens to the present in the light of criticism by such thinkers as Plato, Tocqueville, and Mosca and difficulties encountered in efforts to realize the ideal.

POLI 110J. Power in American Society (4)
This course examines how power has been conceived and contested during the course of American history. The course explores the changes that have occurred in political rhetoric and strategies as America has moved from a relatively isolated agrarian and commercial republic to a military and industrial empire.

POLI 110K. Liberty and Equality (4)
Leading political theories of liberal democracy since 1950. What is the meaning of political liberty? Political equality is the equality of what? Course will consider thinkers such as J.S. Mill, Berlin, Rawls, Dworkin, Taylor, Sen, Nussbaum, G. Cohen, Petit. 

POLI 110M. Green Political Thought (4)
Leading theories of environmental justice, ethics, and politics since 1960. Thinkers such as Dauvergne, Dobson, Dryzek, Eckersley, Latour, Plumwood, and Simon on ecosystems, climate change, sustainability, preservation, human welfare, nonhuman animals, place, feminism, state, market, and green political movements. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 110T. Modern Political Ideologies (4)
An examination of some of the ideas and values associated with major social and political movements in Europe and the United States since the French Revolution. Topics will vary and may include liberalism, populism, democracy, communism, nationalism, fascism, and feminism.

POLI 111B. Global Justice in Theory and Action (4)
Discuss the idea of justice from multiple perspectives: theory, philosophy, institutions, markets, social mobilization, politics, and environment. Examine the assets and capabilities of diverse justice-seeking organizations and movements aimed at improving quality of life and place locally, regionally, and globally.

POLI 111D. Social Norms and Global Development (4)
Study of types of social norms and practices, and how to change them. Illustrated with development examples such as the end of footbinding, female genital cutting, urban violence in Colombia, Serbian student revolution, early marriage, and other adverse gender norms.

POLI 112A. Economic Theories of Political Behavior (4)
An introduction to theories of political behavior developed with the assumptions and methods of economics. General emphasis will be upon theories linking individual behavior to institutional patterns. Specific topics to be covered will include collective action, leadership, voting, and bargaining.

POLI 112C. Political Theory and Artistic Vision (4)
The course explores the modes of political thinking found in arts, especially in drama and literature. It may include ends and means, political leadership, and political economy. Students may not receive credit for both POLI 112CS and POLI 112C. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 113A. East Asian Thought in Comparative Perspective (4)
This course examines the major traditions of East Asian thought in comparative perspective. Topics include Confucianism, Taoism, Buddhism, and contemporary nationalist and East Asian political thought. Throughout, focused comparisons and contrasts will be made between western and eastern thought. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 113B. Chinese and Japanese Political Thought I (4)
Examines philosophical traditions of ancient and modern China and Japan, to understand how these have been reflected in Chinese and Japanese development. Course will be in English; however, students with Chinese or Japanese language skills will have opportunity to use these. Graduate students will be required to complete a seminar-length research paper; undergraduate students will write a paper. Prerequisites: upper-division standing for 113B.

POLI 113C. Chinese and Japanese Political Thought II (4)
A continuation of 113B, which follows political philosophical themes in China and Japan through the twentieth century. Important topics include Buddhism and Confucianism as they changed in each context in response to internal and external stimuli. Prerequisites: 113B.

POLI 114B. Marxist Political Thought (4)
An introduction to Marxist thought from its roots in the Western tradition through its development in non-Western contexts. Emphasis is placed on how adaptations were made in Marxism to accommodate the specific challenges of each environment.

POLI 115A. Gender and Politics (4)
Our understanding of politics, power, conflict, and quality continue to be challenged and transformed by considering gender as it intersects with nationality, race, class, and ethnicity. We will consider the importance of gender in each of the subfields of political science.

POLI 116A. Feminist Theory (4)
Readings in historical and contemporary feminist theory; development of gender as a category of political analysis; alternative perspectives on core concepts and categories in feminist thought. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 119A. Special Topics in Political Theory (4)
An undergraduate course designed to cover various aspects of political theory. May be repeated for credit two times, provided each course is a separate topic, for a maximum of twelve units.

POLI 120A. Political Development of Western Europe (4)
An examination of various paths of European political development through consideration of the conflicts that shaped these political systems: the commercialization of agriculture; religion and the role of the church; the army and the state bureaucracy; and industrialization. Stress will be on alternative paradigms and on theorists.

POLI 120B. The German Political System (4)
An analysis of the political system of the Federal Republic of Germany with an emphasis on the party system, elections, executive-legislative relations, and federalism. Comparisons will be made with other West European democracies and the Weimar Republic.

POLI 120C. Politics in France (4)
This course will examine the consequences of social and economic change in France. Specific topics will include institutional development under a semi-presidential system, parties, and elections.

POLI 120D. Germany: Before, During, and After Division (4)
Consideration of political, economic, and security factors that have kept Germany at the center of European developments for more than a century.

POLI 120E. Scandinavian Politics (4)
Introduction to the politics and societies of the Scandinavian states (Denmark, Finland, Norway, and Sweden). Focuses on historical development, political culture, constitutional arrangements, political institutions, parties and interest groups, the Scandinavian welfare states, and foreign policy. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 120G. British Politics (4)
Emphasis will be placed on the interaction between British political institutions and processes and contemporary policy problems: the economy, social policy, foreign affairs. The course assumes no prior knowledge of British politics and comparisons with the United States will be drawn.

POLI 120H. European Integration (4)
This course reviews the origins and development of the European Community/European Union and its institutions, theories of integration and the challenges inherent in the creation of a supranational political regime.

POLI 120I. Politics in Italy (4)
This course will provide a comparative perspective on the development and functioning of the Italian political system. It includes analysis of political institutions, ideological traditions, parties and elections, political elites in the policy process, and the evolving importance of Italy within European integration.

POLI 120N. Contention and Conflict in Africa (4)
This course offers a systematic study of civil wars, electoral violence, anti-immigrant violence, genocides, coups, riots, and rebel groups in sub-Saharan Africa. It will explore why some regions experience certain types of violence and others do not.

POLI 120P. Africa’s Success Stories (4)
This course examines reasons why we can be cautiously optimistic about development, growth, peace and democratization in Africa. Sample cases include Botswana's resource blessing, postconflict reconstruction in Uganda, and democratization in Ghana, Benin, and Niger.

POLI 120Q. Ethnic Politics (4)
This course introduces students to the comparative study of ethnic politics. It examines the relationships between ethnicity on one hand, and mobilization, political contestation, violence, trust, and pork on the other. It draws from analysis from a variety of contexts and regions, such as sub-Saharan Africa, Eastern Europe, North America, South Asia, and Western Europe. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 121. Government and Politics of the Middle East (4)
This course examines general themes affecting the region (social structure and regime type, religion and modernization, bonds and tensions), the character of major states, and efforts to resolve the conflict between Israel and its Arab and Islamic neighbors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 121B. Politics in Israel (4)
An interdisciplinary study of Israel as both a unique and yet a common example of a modern democratic nation-state. We will examine Israel’s history, its political, economic, and legal systems, social structure and multicultural tensions, the relation between state and religion, national security, and international relations.

POLI 122. Politics of Human Rights (4)
What do we mean by “international human rights”? Are they universal? This course examines human rights abuse and redress over time, and across different regions of the world. From this empirically grounded perspective, we critically evaluate contemporary human rights debates. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 122D. Abuse of Power (4)
Power, a crucial part of politics, can be, and often is, abused. This course discusses the nature of power and surveys a variety of abuses, including agenda manipulation, rent extraction, fraud, extortion, corruption, exploitation, and gross political oppression. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 123. Politics of Empire in Comparative Perspective (4)
In between “rises” and “declines,” empires are political entities with highly heterogeneous populations that must be governed. The course examines the similarities and differences in imperial governance, comparing the internal and external political dynamics of traditional (Roman, Ottoman), modernizing (Habsburg), and modern (British) empires. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 124. Israeli-Palestinian Conflict (4)
(Same as SOCI 188I.) In this course we will examine the national and colonial dimensions of this long-lasting conflict and then turn our attention to the legal, governmental/political, and everyday aspects of the Israeli occupation of the West Bank and Gaza following the 1967 war.

POLI 124A. Political Consequences of Electoral Systems (4)
A comparative survey of the major dimensions of the electoral systems used in contemporary democracies (including plurality and majority systems, proportional representation, and districting methods) and of their effects on party competition.

POLI 125. Gender, Politics, and Globalization (4)
What have been the effects of globalization on gender, and how has gender shaped conceptions and processes of globalization? Through case studies drawn from the global north and south, this course critically assesses contemporary theoretical debates on global gender justice.

POLI 125A. Communities and the Environment (4)
A popular new idea in environmental protection is to include local communities in conservation efforts. But what are these communities? What challenges do they face in governing their own resources? This course uses both theory and case studies to explore the political economy of community-based conservations.

POLI 125B. The Politics of Food in a Global Economy (4)
This course explores emerging issues in production and consumption of food in a global economy. On production side, we discuss issues such as famine, overproduction of commercial crops, and sustainability. On consumption side, we explore issues such as fair trade, ethical consumption, and public health consequences (such as obesity). Then we discuss the roles of governments, international organizations, and communities to address these issues.

POLI 126. Political Economy of Development (4)
Why are some countries rich and others poor? This course examines how political and economic factors shape development trajectories, focusing on Africa, Asia, and Latin America. Topics include the impact of democracy, corruption, oil, and foreign aid on economic development. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 126AA. Fundamentals of Political Economy: Modern Capitalism (4)
This course explores how economic factors affect political institutions and how political action affects economic behavior in the United States and Western Europe. Particular attention is given to relations between business and labor, economic policy choices, and the impact of international trade. Prerequisites: POLI 11 or consent of instructor.

POLI 126AB. Politics and Economics in Eastern Europe (4)
This course explores the interrelationship of politics and economics in Eastern Europe, analyzing the historic evolution of the area, the socialist period, and contemporary political and economic change there. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 127. Politics of Developing Countries (4)
This course critically examines central concepts and theories of development, and assesses their utility in understanding political, economic, and social change in the developing world. Central case studies are drawn from three regions: Latin America, Sub-Saharan Africa, and Southeast Asia. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 128. Autocracy, Democracy, and Prosperity (4)
This course considers the interplay between factor endowments, political institutions, and economic performance. It focuses on the connection between representative political institutions and the emergence and expansion of markets.

POLI 129. How to Steal an Election (4)
Examine the role of elections in new and fragile democracies, explore how politicians construct elections to suppress increased levels of democracy, the techniques used to undermine free and fair elections, and the strategic responses to these actions by domestic/international actors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 130AD. The Politics of the Russian Revolution (4)
An examination of the dynamics of the Russian Revolution from 1905 through the Stalinist period and recent years in light of theories of revolutionary change. Emphasis is placed on the significance of political thought, socioeconomic stratification, and culturo-historical conditions.

POLI 130B. Politics in the People’s Republic of China (4)
This course analyzes the political system of China since 1949, including political institutions, the policy-making process, and the relationship between politics and economics. The main focus is on the post-Mao era of reform beginning in 1978.

POLI 131. Muslim Integration and Exclusion (4)
Is there a Muslim challenge to immigrant integration in Christian-heritage societies? This course asks if and why Muslim immigrants integrate into their host societies, and evaluates the various solutions put forth by politicians and scholars.

POLI 131C. The Chinese Revolution (4)
An analysis of the dynamics of the Chinese Revolution from the fall of the Qing Dynasty (1644–1911) to the present. Emphasis is placed on the relationship between political thought and the dynamics of the revolutionary process.

POLI 132. Political Development and Modern China (4)
Political development has dominated the study of comparative politics among US academicians since the revival of the Cold War in 1947. This course examines critically this paradigm and its Western philosophical roots in the context of the experience of modern China.

POLI 133A. Japanese Politics: A Developmental Perspective (4)
This course will analyze the political systems of modern Japan in comparative-historical perspective.

POLI 133D. Political Institutions of East Asian Countries (4)
This course discusses the following major topics in three East Asian countries (Japan, South Korea, and the Philippines) from a comparative perspective: (a) economic and political development; (b) political institutions; and (c) policies.

POLI 133G. Postwar US-Japan Relations (4)
The relationship between U.S. and Japan has been described as “the most important in the world, bar none.” This course will examine US-Japan security and economic relations in the postwar period from the Occupation and Cold War alliance through the severe bilateral trade friction of the 1980s and 1990s to the present relationship and how it is being transformed by the forces of globalization, regionalization, and multilateralism.

POLI 133J. Korean Politics (4)
This course is primarily about the politics and political economy of South Korea, but will also briefly look at politics and political economy of North Korea as well as foreign and unification policies of the two Koreas. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 134AA. Comparative Politics of Latin America (4)
Comparative analysis of contemporary political systems and developmental profiles of selected Latin American countries, with special reference to the ways in which revolutionary and counter-revolutionary movements have affected the political, economic, and social structures observable in these countries today. Analyzes the performance of “revolutionary” governments in dealing with problems of domestic political management, reducing external economic dependency, redistributing wealth, creating employment, and extending social services. Introduction to general theoretical works on Latin American politics and development. Prerequisites: POLI 11 or consent of instructor.

POLI 134B. Politics in Mexico (4)
General survey of the Mexican political system as it operates today. Emphasis on factors promoting the breakdown of Mexico’s authoritarian regime and the transition to a more democratic political system. Changing relationship between the state and various segments of Mexico society (economic elites, peasants, urban labor, and the Church). New patterns of civil-military relations.

POLI 134D. Selected Topics in Latin American Politics (4)
A comparative analysis of contemporary political issues in Latin America. Material to be drawn from two or three countries. Among the topics: development, nationalism, neoimperialism, political change. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 134I. Politics in the Southern Cone of Latin America (4)
This course is a comparative analysis of twentieth-century political developments and issues in the southern cone of Latin America: Argentina, Chile, and Uruguay. The course will also examine the social and economic content and results of contrasting political experiments. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 136. Religion and Politics (4)
The political impact of major religious traditions—including Christianity, Islam, Hinduism, and Confucianism—around the world. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 136A. Nationalism and Ethnic Conflict (4)
Appropriate case studies from around the world will be selected.

POLI 137A. Comparative Political Parties and Interest Groups (4)
This course serves as an introduction to the comparative study of political parties and interest groups as well as an analytical introduction to parties, interest groups, and their role in democratic representation. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 138D. Special Topics in Comparative Politics (4)
An undergraduate course designed to cover various aspects of comparative politics. May be repeated for credit three times, provided each course is a separate topic, for a maximum of twelve units.

POLI 140A. International Law (4)
International law is central to the efforts to create a world order to limit armed conflict, regulate world economy, and set minimum standards for human rights. This course introduces international law and explains theories advanced by academic analysts and practitioners to explain its role. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 140B. Concepts and Aspects of Revolution (4)
Introduction to the analytical and comparative study of revolutionary movements and related forms of political violence. Topics include: the classical paradigm; types of revolutionary episodes; psychological theories; ideology and belief systems; coups; insurgencies; civil wars; terrorism and revolutionary outcomes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 140C. International Crisis Diplomacy (4)
A survey of international peacekeeping and peace enforcement in civil conflicts with a simulation of international diplomacy. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 140D. International Human Rights Law: Migrant Populations (4)
International migration creates a distinct set of human rights challenges. This course examines the conflict between international legal obligations and domestic politics of citizenship, human rights, asylum, and human trafficking. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 142A. United States Foreign Policy (4)
United States foreign policy from the colonial period to the present era. Systematic analysis of competing explanations for US policies—strategic interests, economic requirements, or the vicissitudes of domestic politics. Interaction between the U.S., foreign states (particularly allies), and transnational actors are examined. Prerequisites: POLI 12 or consent of instructor.

POLI 142D. Weapons of Mass Destruction (4)
This course provides an overview of the challenges posed by chemical, biological, radiological, and nuclear weapons. Students will learn about how these weapons work, why states seek them, and attempts to prevent proliferation. We will delve into technical and policy challenges related to these weapons, and address how CBRN weapons shape national and regional security dynamics. Efforts to restrict the proliferation of these weapons will be discussed. We will also analyze CBRN terrorism.

POLI 142I. National and International Security (4)
A survey of theories of defense policies and international security.

POLI 142J. National Security Strategy (4)
A survey of American strategies for national defense. Topics may include deterrence, coercive diplomacy, limited war, and unconventional warfare.

POLI 142K. Politics and Warfare (4)
This course offers an exploration of general theories of the origins of warfare; the impact of the state on war in the modern world; and the microfoundations of combat and compliance in the context of the costs of war and military mobilization. The course should be of special interest to students in international relations and comparative politics.

POLI 142L. Insurgency and Terrorism (4)
“Terrorism” uses “illegitimate” violence to achieve political goals. This course uses philosophical, historical, and contemporary material from distinct cultures to understand which actions are defined as “terrorist,” who uses them, why, and when, as well as the determinants of their effectiveness.

POLI 142M. US Foreign Policy/Regional Security (4)
Lectures and readings examine US foreign policy in Europe, Latin America, and East Asia with attention to current problems with specific nations (e.g., Bosnia) and issues (e.g., terrorism). This course integrates historical, comparative, and foreign perspectives on regional security dynamics.

POLI 142N. American Defense Policy (4)
An introduction to analytic techniques for assessing policy options in the field of national security. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 142Q. Cold War (4)
This course explores the way in which the international rivalry between the Soviet Union and the United States affected relationships between the two powers, their allies, the Third World, and above all, their internal domestic affairs and development.

POLI 143A. War and Society (4)
How has warfighting evolved over the centuries? How has it varied across cultures? What has war been like for soldiers and civilians? How do societies mobilize for war, and how do they change in the short and long term from fighting? Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 144. International Political Economy (4)
This course serves as an introduction to the study of international political economy. We will examine the evolution of international economic relations in trade, finance, and economic development and discuss different explanations for its likely causes and consequences. 

POLI 144AB. Selected Topics in International Political Economy (4)
This course will consider major theories purporting to explain and predict the workings of the international order from the point of view of political economy. An extended discussion of one aspect of the economic order (e.g., the multinational corporation) will serve as the test case. One quarter of economics recommended. Prerequisites: POLI 12.

POLI 144D. International Political Economy: Money and Finance (4)
Examination of effects of national policies and international collaboration on public and private international financial institutions, in particular the management of international debt crises, economic policy coordination, and the role of international lender of last resort.

POLI 144F. The Politics of International Trade and Finance (4)
Examines the welfare and distributional aspects of international trade and finance as they relate to the politics of economic policy making. Topics include: globalization in historical perspective; origins and consequences of trade policy; exchange-rate arrangements; international capital flows; currency crises; economic development.

POLI 145A. International Politics and Drugs (4)
This course examines the domestic and international aspects of the drug trade. It will investigate the drug issues from the perspectives of consumers, producers, traffickers, money launderers, and law enforcement. Course material covers the experience of the United States, Latin America, Turkey, Southeast Asia, Western Europe, and Japan.

POLI 145C. International Relations After the Cold War: Theory and Prospect (4)
The nature of international politics appears to have changed dramatically since 1989. This course applies different theoretical approaches to enhance our understanding of the new international environment, future prospects for peace and war, and current problems of foreign policy. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 146A. The U.S. and Latin America: Political and Economic Relations (4)
An analytical survey of US relations with Latin America from the 1820s to the present, with particular emphasis on the post–Cold War environment. Topics include free trade and economic integration; drugs and drug trafficking; illegal migration and immigration control. Focus covers US policy, Latin American reactions, dynamics of cooperation, and options for the future.

POLI 147B. Russian-American Relations (4)
An historical and topical survey of major issues in Russian-American relations, such as security arrangements in the post-Soviet space, the war on terrorism, arms control and nonproliferation, and international energy.

POLI 150A. Politics of Immigration (4)
Comparative analysis of attempts by the United States and other industrialized countries to initiate, regulate and reduce immigration from Third World countries. Social and economic factors shaping outcomes of immigration policies, public opinion toward immigrants, anti-immigration movements, and immigration policy reform options in industrialized countries. Prerequisites: upper-division standing required.

POLI 151. International Organizations (4)
Surveys the theory and function of IOs (UN, NATO, EU, World Bank, IMF) in promoting international cooperation in security, peacekeeping, trade, environment, and human rights. We discuss why IOs exist, how they work, and what challenges they face. Prerequisites: POLI 12, upper-division standing.

POLI 153. The European Union in World Politics (4)
This course introduces students to the role of the EU as a foreign policy actor. Topics include the development of the EU's trade policy, foreign aid policy, security policy, as well as case studies of EU foreign policy.

POLI 154. Special Topics in International Relations (4)
An undergraduate course designed to cover various aspects of international relations. May be repeated for credit two times, provided each course is a separate topic, for a maximum of twelve units.

POLI 160AA. Introduction to Policy Analysis (4)
(Same as USP 101) This course will explore the process by which the preferences of individuals are converted into public policy. Also included will be an examination of the complexity of policy problems, methods for designing better policies, and a review of tools used by analysts and policy makers. Prerequisites: POLI 10 or 11.

POLI 160AB. Introduction to Policy Analysis (4)
In this course, students will use their knowledge of the political and economic foundations of public policy making to conduct research in a wide variety of public policy problems. Prerequisites: POLI 160AA.

POLI 162. Environmental Policy (4)
This course will explore contemporary environmental issues such as global warming, endangered species, and land use. Students will be asked to analyze various policy options and to write case analyses. Policies may be debated in class.

POLI 163. Analyzing Politics (4)
Politics are understood as the combination of individual preferences and decisions into collective choices. What are the issues involved in aggregating individual preferences, what is the choice of rules—formal and informal—for doing so.

POLI 165. Special Topic: Policy Analysis (4)
An undergraduate course designed to cover various aspects of policy analysis. May be repeated for credit two times, provided each course is a separate topic, for a maximum of twelve units.

POLI 168. Policy Assessment (4)
The use of real data to assess policy alternatives. Introduction to benefit/cost analysis, decision theory, and the valuation of public goods. Applications to health, environmental, and regulatory economic policy making.

POLI 170A. Introductory Statistics for Political Science and Public Policy (4)
Introduction to the use of statistics in both political science and public policy concentrating on regression based approaches. Students undertake a series of small quantitative analyses and one project. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

POLI 191A–B. Senior Honors Seminar: Frontiers of Political Science (4-4)
This course is open only to seniors interested in qualifying for departmental honors. Admission to the course will be determined by the department. Each student will write an honors essay under the supervision of a member of the faculty.

POLI 192. Senior Seminar in Political Science (1)
The Senior Seminar is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in political science at the upper-division level. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

POLI 194. Research Seminar in Washington, DC (4)
(Same as Com/Gen 194; USP 194, HITO 193, SocE 194, COGS 194) Course attached to six-unit internship taken by students participating in the UCDC Program. Involves weekly seminar meetings with faculty and teaching assistant and a substantial research paper. Prerequisites: participating in UCDC Program.

POLI 194RA. Research Apprenticeship Seminar (4)
Preparation of a major paper from research conducted while participating in the Research Apprenticeship (POLI 198RA). Presentations to and participation in weekly seminar meetings also required. Students can enroll in POLI 194RA only if they have previously taken or are simultaneously enrolled in 198RA. Prerequisites: department approval. Students must apply for the Research Apprenticeship program and be approved to enroll. Participants must be majors in political science with junior or senior standing and a GPA of 3.5 or higher in all political science courses taken at UC San Diego. Individual projects may require other prerequisite training, such as POLI 30.

POLI 194SD. Local Internship Research Seminar (4)
The Local Internship Research Seminar will be paired with a Local Internship in Political Science (POLI 197SD) in the same quarter. The linkage to this research seminar will provide advanced academic training in analytic skills appropriate to the internship experience and requires a substantial paper based on original research. Prerequisites: department approval and consent of instructor. Corequisites: POLI 197SD.

POLI 195. Apprentice Teaching (4)
Teaching and tutorial activities associated with courses and seminars. Limited to advanced political science majors with at least a 3.5 GPA in upper-division political science courses. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times, but only four units may be used for major credit. Prerequisites: department approval.

POLI 197I. Political Science Washington Internship (6, 8)
This internship is attached to the UCDC Program. Students participating in the UCDC Program are placed in an internship in the Washington, DC, area requiring approximately seventeen to twenty-three hours per week. Prerequisites: must be enrolled in the UCDC Program; department stamp required.

POLI 197SD. Local Internship in Political Science (4)
Individual placements for field learning integrated with political science. A written contract involving all parties with learning objectives, a project outline, and a means of supervision and progress evaluation must be filed with the faculty adviser and department undergraduate coordinator prior to the beginning of the internship. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: ninety units completed; 2.5 minimum cumulative GPA overall and 3.0 in political science; POLI 30 and at least two upper-division courses in political science. Department approval and consent of instructor. Corequisites: POLI 194SD.

POLI 198. Directed Group Study (2-4)
Directed group study in an area not presently covered by the departmental curriculum. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: department approval.

POLI 198RA. Research Apprenticeship (4)
Students conduct directed research as part of a principal investigator’s project and under the supervision of a department mentor. Students may conduct research with a department mentor for up to two quarters. This course is part of the Research Apprenticeship program in political science. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: department approval. Students must apply for the Research Apprenticeship program and be approved to enroll. Participants must be majors in political science with junior or senior standing and a GPA of 3.5 or higher in all political science courses taken at UC San Diego. Individual projects may require other prerequisite training, such as POLI 30.

POLI 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
Independent reading in advanced political science by individual students. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

POLI 200A. Foundations of Political Science (4)
An introduction to the theoretical concepts in the discipline of political science that are commonly used across various subfields. Each week will introduce the core concept(s) and discuss applications from several, if not all subfields in the department. Prerequisites: graduate student standing.

POLI 200B. Democracy (4)
An overview of the normative and positive issues associated with modern democracies. The appeal and the social, political, and economic arrangements of democracies will be explored. Prerequisites: graduate student standing.

POLI 200C. States and Markets (4)
An overview of the normative and positive issues associated with decentralized (market) versus centralized (political) mechanics of allocation. The appropriate role of government in the economy will be explored. Prerequisites: graduate student standing.

POLI 204A. Research Design (4)
This course will study various approaches to knowledge accumulation in social science. A basic outline of scientific method will be used to examine the difference between theories as assumptions and axioms and hypotheses as “if-then” statements derived from theory. Experimental, quasi-experimental, and qualitative designs will be discussed. Prerequisites: graduate student standing.

POLI 204B. Quantitative Methods I (4)
The use of quantitative methods (particularly multiple regression and its extensions) in political science. Emphasis on understanding the methods and using them in political science applications. Prerequisites: graduate student standing.

POLI 204C. Game Theory 1 (4)
This course introduces students to the rudiments of decision theory and game theory. Emphasis will be placed on modeling and solving games. Prerequisites: graduate student standing.

POLI 205. Game Theory II (4)
This course covers advanced topics in game theory. Covered topics will include incomplete information in static and dynamic games, infinitely repeated games, and bargaining games. Emphasis will be placed on advanced equilibrium concepts, and applications of interest to political scientists. Prerequisites: department approval.

POLI 210AA. Systems of Political Thought: Thucydides to Rousseau (4)
This course is a preparation for the field examination in political theory. It will provide an intensive and critical introduction to European political thought from Thucydides to Rousseau. Some of the secondary literature on this period will also be explored. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 210AB. Systems of Political Thought: Kant to Rawls (4)
This course is a preparation for the field examination in political theory. It will provide an intensive and critical introduction to European political thought from Kant to Rawls. Some of the secondary literature on this period will also be explored. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 212. Contemporary Sociological Theory (4)
(Same as Soc/G 202.) Themes important for social theory at the turn of the twenty-first century: Marxism, Gramsci, Althusser, critical theory (Adorno, Habermas), interpretation (Geertz), social systems (Parson), poststructuralism (Foucault), postmodernism, and social constructivism (Bourdieu). Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 213. Culture and Political Theory (4) 
(Same as LTCO 287.) A comparative approach of political theory based on historical periods (with the tools of new historicism), various cultures (inspired by anthropological research), and referring to the most important philosophical thinkers from Western and non-Western traditions. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 214. Marxist and Post-Marxist Political Philosophy (4)
An examination of selected texts in Marxist and post-Marxist political philosophy, with a focus on the theme of individual and collective identity including issues concerning alienation, consciousness, and ideology. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 216. Contemporary Liberal and Democratic Theory (4)
Normative approaches to liberty, equality, justice, and democracy, mostly Anglo-American and empirical approaches to justice. Thinkers such as Rawls, Habermas, Nozick, Dworkin, Raz, Roemer, Elster, Ostrom, Bowles, and Gintis may be considered. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 219. Special Topics in Political Theory (4)
This seminar is an examination of the different approaches to the study of political theory. Issues and research areas will vary each time the course is offered. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 220A. Comparative Politics: State and Society (4)
This course will provide a general literature review in comparative politics to serve as preparation for the field examination. Prerequisites: graduate standing, or consent of instructor.

POLI 220B. Comparative Politics: Institutions (4)
This is a second course in comparative politics designed as a preparation for the field examination. It will focus on the comparative study of political institutions. Prerequisites: graduate standing, or consent of instructor.

POLI 220C. Origins of the State (4)
Survey of theories, with empirical cases explaining origins of the modern state. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 223A. Comparative Parliamentary Studies (4)
A survey of the academic literature on parliamentary studies, comparing the research on legislative elections, behavior, and organization in American, European, and Asian democracies. The course will also compare various approaches to studying legislative activity. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 224. The Politics of Democratization (4)
A survey of theories explaining the processes of democratization and democratic stability. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 224A. Elections in Consolidating Democracies (4)
Course looks at elections in consolidating democracies with an eye to evaluating existing theories of elections with new data. Also explores new empirical patterns in countries around the world, especially Africa, Latin America, Eastern Europe, and the Soviet successor states. Prerequisites: graduate student standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 227. Comparative Political Economy (4)
An introduction to seminal and current research in comparative political economy. Course explores how various political institutions and processes affect economic outcomes (e.g. growth, inequality, and redistribution) and how the economy influences politics (e.g. democratization, electoral institutions, and welfare states). Prerequisites: POLI 200C or consent of instructor.

POLI 229. Special Topics in Comparative Politics (4)
This seminar is an examination of the different approaches to the study of comparative politics. Issues and research areas will vary each time the course is offered. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 231E. Politics of Development (4)
This course provides an overview of previous and current efforts to explain political and economic development in non-Western settings.

POLI 232. International Organization (4) 
This course will study various theories purporting to explain why states succeed or fall at creating institutions by international governance and what effects, if any, those institutions have. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 235A. Latin American Politics (4)
Introductory reading seminar on Latin American politics to acquaint students with leading schools of thought, provide critical perspective on premises and methodology, and identify themes for further inquiry. Themes include authoritarianism, revolution, democratization, regional conflict, and emergence of middle-level powers. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 236. Immigration Policy and Politics (4)
An interdisciplinary seminar covering origins, consequences, and characteristics of worker migration from Third World countries (especially Mexico, Central America, and the Caribbean basin) to the United States, from the nineteenth century to the present. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 240. International Relations Theory (4)
A survey of the principal theories and approaches to the study of international relations. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 242. The European Union and Global Governance (4)
This course explores contemporary research on European Union politics from a comparative and international relations perspective, and links this research to broader questions of global governance. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 243. International Security (4)
A colloquium surveying the major theoretical controversies in the study of international and national security. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 244. International Institutions (4)
This course exposes students to contemporary research on international institutions. What leads nations to cede sovereignty? How do international institutions obtain a measure of authority in world affairs? What makes an institution “successful”? We’ll also examine institutional design. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 244A. European Integration (4)
This seminar provides perspectives on the theories and politics of European integration. Analysis will focus on the development of the European Union, the functioning of core institutions, and the challenges of creating a supranational political regime. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 245. International Political Economy (4)
A seminar surveying the major theoretical controversies in the study of international political economy. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 245A. Political Economy of Regional Integration (4)
This graduate course surveys theories of regional political and economic integration and international cooperation from a comparative and international relations perspective. We compare and contrast the European Union and other regional organizations. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 247A. Quantitative International Relations (4)
Explores empirical research in international relations with special emphasis on international conflict. Topics covered include theories on the causes of war, the distribution of power and conflict, formal and informal alignment, interdependence and conflict, linkages between domestic and international processes, and issues of research design. Students who have previously taken 247 may not take this course for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 247B. Formal Models in International Relations (4)
Explores formal analytic and primarily game-theoretic research in international relations with emphasis on conflict and bargaining. Topics include: causes of war and peace, conventional and nuclear deterrence, crisis bargaining, arms race, and two-level games.

POLI 247C. History of International Relations (4)
This course is a survey of the history of international relations from 1618 to 1945. The focus is on diplomacy and war-fighting in their social, economic, political, cultural, and technological contexts. Formative conflicts will be examined in detail. Prerequisites: 240, 247A, and 247B; graduate standing.

POLI 248. Special Topics in International Relations (4)
(Same as IRGN 290) This seminar is an examination of the different approaches to the study of international relations. Issues and research areas will vary each time the course is offered. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 251. American Political Institutions (4)
A critical examination of major contributions to the theoretical and empirical literature on the US Congress, presidency, and federal bureaucracy. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 252. American Politics: Behavior (4)
Theoretical and empirical perspectives on voting and other forms of political participation, parties, interest groups, and public opinion in the United States. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 253. Research in State Politics (4)
This seminar will survey the existing literature in state politics with an eye toward proposing new research designs. Topics will include the variation across states in electoral systems, campaign finance laws, political culture, legislative institutions, judicial arrangements, and policy outcomes. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 254. American Political Development (4)
This course examines the historical evolution of the American state with particular attention to theories of political development. Special topics include the development of the party system, electoral and policy realignments, and the evolution of national political institutions. Prerequisites: graduate standing in any discipline of the social sciences or humanities or consent of instructor.

POLI 255. Urban Politics (4)
Examines central works on the development of political institutions in US cities; analyses of community power structures; who governs, why, and to what ends; processes and prospects for minority empowerment; the prominence of “growth machines”; the political economy of contemporary cities. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 257. Voting and Elections (4)
This course is designed to acquaint graduate students with the central themes and issues in the study of voting in national elections. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 259. Special Topics in American Politics (4)
This seminar is an examination of the different approaches to the study of American politics. Issues and research areas will vary each time the course is offered. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 270. Mathematical and Statistical Foundations (4)
This course reviews essential calculus and linear algebra and introduces probability theory (probability rules, random variables, univariate and multivariate distributions) and mathematical statistics (sampling distributions, estimation and inference frameworks). Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 271. Advanced Statistical Applications (4)
Use of advanced quantitative techniques in political science. Students will use political science data to complete small exercises and a major project. Students may not receive credit for both 271B and 271. Prerequisites: 204B and 270; graduate standing.

POLI 272. Bayesian Methods (4)
Provides students a solid understanding of Bayesian inference and Markov chain Monte Carlo methods. Topics covered include Bayesian treatment of the linear model, Markov chain Monte Carlo methods, assessing model adequacy, and hierarchical models. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 275. Interviews, Survey Design, and Sampling (4)
This course covers advanced topics in the design and implementation of field surveys and interviews. Questionnaire design and survey techniques for sensitive topics such as list experiments will be developed, as well as sampling methodologies to achieve representivity.

POLI 278. Political Economy Models of Elections (4)
This course introduces the formal literature on economic models of voting and electoral politics. It reviews models that look at elections as I) mechanisms for preference aggregation, II) mechanisms for information aggregation, and III) mechanisms for selecting and incentivizing politicians. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 279. Special Topics in Methodology (4)
This course offers selected topics in quantitative methodology. Content may vary each time the course is offered. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 280. Workshop: International Law and Regulation (4)
Examination of recent research in international law and regulation: development and presentation of research projects by graduate students; presentation of research by faculty. Third-year students present dissertation prospectus, candidates make yearly presentations of dissertation research. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 281. Workshop: American Politics (4)
Examination of recent research in American politics: development and presentation of research projects by graduate students, presentations of research by faculty. Third year students present dissertation prospectus; candidates make yearly presentations of dissertation research. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 282. Workshop: Comparative Politics (4)              
Examination of recent research in comparative politics, development and presentation of research projects by graduate students; presentations of research projects by faculty. Third-year students present dissertation prospectus; candidates make yearly presentations of dissertation research. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 283. Workshop: International Relations (4)
Examination of recent research in international relations, development and presentation of research projects by graduate students, presentations of research projects by faculty. Third year students present dissertation prospectus; candidates make yearly presentation of dissertation research. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 285. Workshop: Political Theory (4) 
Examination of recent research in political theory: development and presentation of research projects by graduate students, presentation of research by faculty. Third year students present dissertation prospectus; candidates make yearly presentations of dissertation research. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 286. Workshop: Methodology (4) 
Examination of recent research in political methodology; development and presentation of research projects by graduate students, presentation of research by faculty. Third year students present dissertation prospectus; candidates make yearly presentations of dissertation research. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 287. Multidisciplinary Methods in Political Science: Social Networks (4)
Examination of research in the natural sciences that may be applied to problems in political science, development and presentation of research projects by graduate students and faculty, special emphasis on social networks. Prerequisites: 204A and 204B and 204C, graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 288. Multidisciplinary Methods in Political Science: Computational Social Science (4)
An examination of research in the natural sciences that may be applied to problems in political science, development and presentation of research projects by graduate students and faculty, special emphasis on computational social science. Prerequisites: 204A and 204B and 204C, graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 289. Multidisciplinary Methods in Political Science: Biology (4)
Examination of research in the natural sciences that may be applied to problems in political science, development and presentation of research projects by graduate students and faculty, special emphasis on biology. Prerequisites: 204A and 204B and 204C, graduate standing or consent of instructor.

POLI 298. Directed Reading (1–12)
Guided and supervised reading in the literature of the several fields of political science.

POLI 299. Dissertation Research (1–12)
Independent work by graduate students engaged in research and writing of second-year paper and doctoral dissertation, under direct supervision of advisor.

POLI 500. Apprentice Teaching (1–4)
A course in which teaching assistants are aided in learning proper teaching methods by means of supervision of their work by the faculty: handling of discussions, preparation, and grading of examinations and other written exercises, and student relations. Twenty-four units of teaching apprenticeship meet the department teaching requirement for the PhD.

POLI 501. Seminar on Teaching Development—American Politics (1–4)
A seminar designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in American politics, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques, and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 502. Seminar on Teaching Development—Comparative Politics (1–4)
A seminar designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in comparative politics, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques, and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 504. Seminar on Teaching Development—Political Theory (1–4)
A seminar designed for graduate students serving as teaching assistants in political theory, includes discussion of teaching theories, techniques, and materials, conduct of discussion sessions, and participation in examinations, under the supervision of the instructor in charge of the course. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

POLI 599. Teaching Methods in Political Science (2)  
Training in teaching methods in the field of political science. Examines evidence-based research on undergraduate teaching and learning with emphasis on effective teaching techniques appropriate to political science. Covers TA training, syllabus design, and effective teaching strategies. Prerequisites: graduate standing in political science.

PSYC 1. Psychology (4)
This course provides an overview of the basic concepts in psychology. Topics may include human information processing, learning and memory, motivation, development, language acquisition, social psychology, and personality.

PSYC 2. General Psychology: Biological Foundations (4)
This course provides an introductory survey of the relationship between human behavior and brain function. Specific areas of emphasis include vision and other sensory processes, memory, motivation, attention, and cognition.

PSYC 3. General Psychology: Cognitive Foundations (4)
This course is an introduction to the basic concepts of cognitive psychology. Topics include perception, attention, memory, language, and thought. The relation of cognitive psychology to cognitive science and to neuropsychology is also covered.

PSYC 4. General Psychology: Behavioral Foundations (4)
This course provides an introduction to behavioral psychology. Topics include classical conditioning, operant conditioning, animal learning, and motivation and behavior modification.

PSYC 6. General Psychology: Social Foundations (4)
This course provides an introduction to social psychology. Topics may include emotion, aesthetics, behavioral medicine, person perception, attitudes and attitude change, and behavior in social organizations.

PSYC 7. General Psychology: Developmental Foundations (4)
This course provides an introduction to theories and research results in developmental psychology, covering infancy through adulthood.

PSYC 60. Introduction to Statistics (4)
This course provides an introduction to both descriptive and inferential statistics, core tools in the process of scientific discovery and the interpretation of research.

PSYC 70. Research Methods in Psychology (4)
This course provides an overview of how to choose appropriate research methods for experimental and non-experimental studies. Topics may include classic experimental design and counterbalancing, statistical power, and causal inference in experimental and non-experimental settings. Prerequisites: Psychology 60 or equivalent.

PSYC 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. Prerequisites: none.

PSYC 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
This seminar introduces the various subdisciplines in psychology and their research methods, and also explores career and graduate school opportunities. This includes informal presentations by faculty, graduate students, and other professionals.

PSYC 93. Topics in Psychology (4)
Selected topics in the field of psychology. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary.

PSYC 99. Independent Study (2 or 4)
Independent study or research under direction of a member of the faculty. May be taken up to three times for a maximum of twelve units. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of at least thirty units of undergraduate study at UC San Diego with a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0; completed and approved Special Studies form.

PSYC 100. Clinical Psychology (4)
This course provides a comprehensive overview of the causes, characteristics, and treatment of psychological disorders. Particular emphasis is given to the interaction between biological, psychological, and sociocultural processes contributing to abnormal behavior. Students may not receive credit for both Psychology 163 and Psychology 100. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 101. Developmental Psychology (4)
This course provides a comprehensive overview of the field of developmental psychology, including topics in cognitive, language, and social development. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 102. Sensory Neuroscience (4)
This course provides a comprehensive overview of the neural mechanisms that support vision, audition, touch, olfaction, and taste. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 104. Social Psychology (4)
This course provides a comprehensive overview of the field of social psychology, covering a review of the field’s founding principles, classic findings, and a survey of recent findings. Topics will include social perception, attributions and attitudes, stereotypies, social influence, group dynamics, and aggressive and prosocial tendencies. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 105. Cognitive Psychology (4)
This course provides a comprehensive overview of cognitive psychology, the scientific study of mental processes: how people acquire, store, transform, use, and communicate information. Topics may include perception, attention, language, memory, reasoning, problem solving, decision-making, and creativity. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 106. Behavioral Neuroscience (4)
This course provides a comprehensive overview of human and animal behavior from a neuroscience perspective. Topics include the functions and mechanisms of perception, motivation (sex, sleep, hunger, emotions), learning and memory, and motor control and movement. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 108. Cognitive Neuroscience (4)
This course provides a comprehensive overview of neuroanatomy and major methods and results from neuroimaging and neuropsychological studies of behavior. Topics include attention, motor control, executive function, memory, learning, emotion, and language. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 110. Juniors Honors Research Seminars (4)
This course provides research seminars by a range of departmental faculty, exposing students to contemporary research problems in many areas of psychology. Class discussions will follow faculty presentations. Must be taken for a letter grade for the Psychology Honors Program. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Admission by application. Department approval.

PSYC 111A. Research Methods I (6)
This course provides training in applying advanced statistical methods to experimental design. Emphasis will be placed on the developing skills in statistical problem-solving, using computer applications, and writing scientific reports. Must be taken for a letter grade for the Psychology Honors Program. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Open to honors students or by consent of instructor. Instructor and department approval.

PSYC 111B. Research Methods II (6)
This course builds upon the material of Psychology 111A. Students will participate in data collection, data organization, statistical analysis and graphical analysis, with emphasis placed on developing scientific report writing, presentations, and critical thinking about experimental methods. Must be taken for a letter grade for the Psychology Honors Program. Prerequisites: Psychology 111A; upper-division standing. Instructor and department approval.

PSYC 114. Laboratory in Psychophysiological Perspectives on the Social Mind (4)
Lab course on the use of psychophysiological methods to investigate “the social mind,” or the cognitive and emotional processes involved in understanding and reacting to other people. Overview of major research topics and methods applying selected techniques in actual experiments. Students will engage in developing individual research questions to actively participate in designing and conducting the experiments. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 115A. Laboratory in Cognitive Psychology I (4)
This course provides training in the design, execution, and analysis of cognitive psychology experiments. Students may not receive credit for both Psychology 115 and Psychology 115A. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and Psychology 60 or equivalent.

PSYC 115B. Laboratory in Cognitive Psychology II (4)
This course is designed to extend the training of Psychology 115A in the design, execution, and analysis of cognitive psychology experiments. Students may not receive credit for both Psychology 115 and Psychology 115A. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and Psychology 115A. Instructor and department approval.

PSYC 116. Laboratory in Clinical Psychology Research (4)
This course provides examination of theory, research design, and methods for clinical research. Students complete an internship at a clinical research lab, culminating in a paper. May be taken for credit three times. Students may not receive credit for both Psychology 116 and Psychology 107. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Instructor approval.

PSYC 117. Psychology Project Laboratory (4)
This course provides experience conducting educational research and outreach for children in greater San Diego county. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Instructor and department approval.

PSYC 119. Psycholinguistics/Cognition Laboratory (4)
Methods and practicum in experimental study of language, reading, and related cognitive processes (reasoning, problem solving) in young adult populations. Prerequisites: Psychology 118A-B or consent of instructor. Department stamp required.

PSYC 120. Learning and Motivation (4)
This course provides a survey of research and theory in learning and motivation. Topics include instincts, reinforcement, stimulus control, choice, and human application. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Must be taken concurrently with Psychology 121 or Psychology 140.

PSYC 121. Laboratory in Operant Psychology (4)
This course provides laboratory experience in operant psychology. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. May be taken concurrently with Psychology 120.

PSYC 122. Mechanisms of Animal Behavior (4)
This course focuses on approaches to the study of behavior and its underlying fundamental units of analysis in human and nonhuman animals. Students may not receive credit for both Psychology 122 and Psychology 103. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 123. Cognitive Control and Frontal Lobe Function (4)
This course provides an understanding of how the frontal lobes allow us to engage in complex mental processes. Topics may include anatomy and theory of prefrontal function, frontal lobe clinical syndromes, pharmacology and genetics, emotion control, and cognitive training. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Instructor and department approval.

PSYC 124. Clinical Assessment and Treatment (4)
This course provides an introduction to the history, purpose, and recent changes to the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders along with appropriate evidence-based interventions. Other topics include psychiatric emergencies, crisis management, and ethics. Recommended preparation: Completion of Psychology 100. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 125. Clinical Neuropsychology (4)
This course provides a fundamental understanding of brain-behavior relationships as applied to the practice of clinical neuropsychology. Major topics include functional neuroanatomy, principles of neuropsychological assessment and diagnosis, and the neuropsychological presentation of common neurologic and psychiatric conditions. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 128. Psychology of Reading (4)
This course provides basic information about the nature of reading. Topics include word recognition, eye movements, inner speech, sentence processing, memory for text, learning to read, methods for teaching reading, reading disabilities and dyslexia, and speed-reading. Recommended preparation: completion of Psychology 105 or Psychology 145. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 129. Logic of Perception (4)
This course provides an overview of how we perceive the world. Topics include classic studies in perception, discussion of the view that perception is "logical," and new insights into the neural mechanisms underlying perception. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 130. Delay of Gratification (4)
This course provides a review of research on delay of gratification. Topics include what makes it so tough, in what situations it is possible, who can do it, and the implications of this ability. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 132. Hormones and Behavior (4)
This course examines how hormones influence a variety of behaviors and how behavior reciprocally influences hormones. Specific topics covered include aggression, sex and sexuality, feeding, learning, memory, mood and neural mechanisms both in humans and non-human animals. Recommended preparation: completion of Psychology 106. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 133. Circadian Rhythms—Biological Clocks (4)
This interdisciplinary course provides an overview of the fundamental properties of daily biological clocks of diverse species, from humans to microbes. Emphasis is placed on the relevance of internal time keeping in wide-ranging contexts including human performance, health, and industry. Cross-listed with BIMM 116. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Psychology 106 or BILD 1 or Psychology 2 or consent of instructor.

PSYC 134. Eating Disorders (4)
This course provides an overview of the biology and psychology of eating disorders such as anorexia nervosa, bulimia nervosa, and binge eating disorder. Abnormal, as well as normal, eating will be discussed from various perspectives including endocrinological, neurobiological, psychological, sociological, and evolutionary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 136. Cognitive Development (4)
This course provides an overview of how children's thinking develops. Topics may include perception, concept formation, memory, problem solving, and social cognition. Prerequisites: upper-division standing ; Psychology 101 or Psychology 105.

PSYC 137. Social Cognition (4)
This course provides an overview of social cognition, which blends cognitive and social psychology to understand how people make sense of the social world. Topics may include social perception, inference, memory, motivation, affect, understanding the self, stereotypes, and cultural cognition. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 138. Sound and Music Perception (4)
This course provides an overview of auditory perception. Topics may include the physiology of the auditory system, perception of pitch, loudness, and timbre, sound localization, perception of melodic and temporal patterns and musical illusions and paradoxes. Recommended preparation: ability to read musical notation. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 139. The Social Psychology of Sport (4)
This course provides an introduction to the applications of social psychological principles and findings to sports. Topics include motivation, level of aspiration, competition, cooperation, social comparison, and optimal arousal. Additional topics may include the perspective of spectators, discussing motivation and perceptions of success, streaks, and such. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 140. Human Behavior Laboratory (4)
This course provides training in applying the principles of human behavior, including choice behavior, self-control, and reasoning. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Must be taken concurrently with Psychology 120.

PSYC 141. Evolution and Human Nature (4)
This course provides insight into the question of whether important aspects of human behavior can be explained as resulting from natural selection. Topics include sex differences, selfishness and altruism, homicide and violence, and context effects of human reasoning. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 142. Psychology of Consciousness (4)
This course provides a survey of research on consciousness from an experimental psychology perspective. Special emphasis will be placed on cognitive, neuro-imaging, and clinical/psychiatric investigative techniques, and on the scientific assessment of the mind-body problem. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 143. Control and Analysis of Human Behavior (4)
This course provides an overview of the behavioral approach, including basic principles, self-control, clinical applications, and the design of cultures. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 144. Memory and Amnesia (4)
This course will provide a survey of current research and theory concerning human memory and amnesia from both cognitive and neuropsychological perspectives. Topics may include short-term (working) memory, encoding and retrieval, episodic and semantic memory, interference and forgetting, false memory, eyewitness memory, emotion and memory, famous case studies of amnesia, and the effects of aging and dementia on memory. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 145. Psychology of Language (4)
This course provides an overview of language comprehension and production. Topics include animal communication, language development, and language disorders. Recommended preparation: completion of a course in language, cognition, or philosophy of the mind. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 146. Language and Conceptual Development (4)
This course provides an introduction to research on language acquisition and its relationship to conceptual development. Topics include on theoretical foundations (e.g., learning mechanisms, theories of concepts) and empirical case studies, including word learning, syntax and semantics, and language and thought. Recommended preparation: completion of a course in language/linguistics, cognition, or cognitive development. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 147. Gender (4)
This course provides an overview of the role of gender in psychology, with an emphasis on critical thinking about gender. Topics may include gender differences in behavior and communication, influences on gender roles, gender identity, and gender effects on health and well-being. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 148. Psychology of Judgement and Decision (4)
This course provides an overview of judgment and decision making, which is broadly concerned with preferences, subjective probability, and how they are combined to arrive at decisions. History and current topics will be covered. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 150. Cognitive Neuroscience of Vision (4)
This course provides an overview of the neural basis of visual experience, or how our brain creates what we see in the world around us. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; Psychology 102 or Psychology 108.

PSYC 151. Tests and Measurement (4)
This course provides an introduction to psychology testing. Topics include psychometrics and statistical methods of test construction; application of psychological tests in industry, clinical practice, and applied settings; and controversies in the application of psychological tests. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; Psychology 60.

PSYC 152. Conceptions of Intelligence (4)
This course provides an overview of the concept of intelligence from multiple perspectives. Topics include how intelligence is measured and the role of this measurement on practical matters, the role of intelligence in comparative psychology, and attempts to analyze intelligence in terms of more fundamental cognitive processes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; Psychology 60.

PSYC 153. Psychology of Emotion (4)
This course provides an overview of past and current theories of emotion. Topics include facial expressions associated with emotion, psychophysiology, evolutionary perspectives, and specific emotions such as anger, fear, and jealousy. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 154. Behavior Modification (4)
The course provides an extension of learning principles to human behavior. Topics include broad implications of a behavioral perspective, applied behavior analysis, and applications of behavioral principles to clinical disorders and to normal behavior in varied settings. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 155. Social Psychology and Medicine (4)
This course provides an exploration of health, illness, treatment, and delivery of treatment as they relate to psychological concepts and research and considers how the social psychological perspective might be extended into medical fields. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 156. Cognitive Development in Infancy (4)
This course provides an overview of infant development. Students will critically evaluate scientific theories regarding infant cognitive, linguistic, and social behavior. Recommended preparation: Psychology 60. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; Psychology 101 or HDP 1.

PSYC 157. Happiness (4)
This course provides an overview of the psychology of happiness. Topics may include such questions as: What is happiness? How do we measure it, and how do we tell who has it? What is the biology of happiness and what is its evolutionary significance? What makes people happy—youth, fortune, marriage, chocolate? Is the pursuit of happiness pointless? Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 158. Interpersonal Relationships (4)
This course provides an examination of theories and empirical work pertaining to interpersonal relationships. Topics include attraction, jealousy, attachments, and love. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 159. Physiological Basis of Perception (4)
This course provides a survey of sensory and perceptual phenomena with an emphasis on their underlying physiological mechanisms. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; Psychology 102.

PSYC 161. Engineering Psychology (4)
This course provides a survey of psychological findings relevant to designing "user-friendly" computers and devices and improving aviation and traffic safety. Topics include human perception as it pertains to displays and image compression, human memory limitations relevant to usability, and nature of human errors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 162. Psychology and the Law (4)
This course provides an overview of the intersection between psychology and the legal system, covering a broad range of forensically relevant issues. Topics may include false memories, false confessions, eyewitness reliability, lie detection, DNA exonerations of the wrongfully convicted, jury decision making, and neuroscience and the law Recommended preparation: Psychology 60. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 164. Criminology (4)
This course provides an overview of the scientific study of law making and societal reaction to law breaking activity. Topics include major theories accounting for criminal behavior, the relationship between drugs and crime, the effects of penalties on recidivism, and the psychological effects of incarceration. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 166. History of Psychology (4)
This course provides a survey of the major trends and figures in the development of psychology as a field. Topics may include the mind-body problem, nativism vs. empiricism, and the genesis of behaviorism. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 168. Psychological Disorders of Childhood (4)
This course provides an overview of psychological disorders in children. Topics may include anxiety disorders, depressive and bipolar disorders, communication and learning disorders, conduct problems, autism, and other conditions. Emphasis is placed on symptomatology, assessment, etiological factors, epidemiology, and treatment. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 169. Brain Damage and Mental Functions (4)
This course provides an introduction to the neural mechanisms underlying perception, memory, language, and other mental capacities. Topics include how brain damage affects these capacities and how patients with brain lesions can contribute to our understanding of the normal brain. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 170. Cognitive Neuropsychology (4)
This course provides a journey to the interface between neurophysiology and psychology. Topics include neuroimaging and neuroplasticity. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 171. Neurobiology of Learning and Memory (4)
This course provides an overview of the neurobiology of learning and memory, from cognitive to molecular neuroscience, including human, animal, cellular, and molecular studies of memory. Topics include amnesia, intellectual disability, exceptional intelligence, aging, and Alzheimer's disease. Prerequisites: Psychology 2 or 106 or 181, upper-division standing.

PSYC 172. The Psychology of Human Sexuality (4)
This course provides an overview of human sexuality research including diversity of sexual behavior and identities, sex and gender development, intimate relationships, and sexual dysfunction. Recommended preparation: completion of Psychology 1, 2, or 106. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 173. Psychology of Food and Behavior (4)
This course provides an overview of the biological, psychological, and social influences on the psychology of food and behavior. Topics may include taste preferences and aversions and how they are learned, how culture influences food selection, and food-related behaviors across the lifespan. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

PSYC 176. Creativity (4)
This course provides an overview of how to foster creativity in individuals, groups, and organizations. Themes that cut across all three levels are highlighted. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 178. Industrial Organizational Psychology (4)
This course provides an examination of human behavior in industrial, business, and organizational settings. Topics include psychological principles applied to selection, placement, management, and training; the effectiveness of individuals and groups within organizations, including leadership and control; conflict and cooperation; motivation; and organizational structure and design. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 179. Drugs, Addiction, and Mental Disorders (4)
This course provides an overview of the use, abuse, liability, and psychotherapeutic effects of drugs on humans. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 180. Adolescence (4)
This course provides an overview of the period of human adolescence, including the physical, cognitive, social, and emotional changes that take place during this developmental transition. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 181. Drugs and Behavior (4)
Develops basic principles in psychopharmacology while exploring the behavioral effects of psychoactive drugs and mechanisms of action of drugs. Prerequisites: psychology major or minor, or biology major or minor.

PSYC 182. Illusions and the Brain (4)
This course provides an examination of visual, auditory, and tactile illusions and examines how they arise from interactions between perceptual and cognitive systems. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 184. Choice and Self-Control (4)
This course provides an overview of the experimental analysis of choice behavior, with an emphasis on the types of choice involved in self-control. A central interest will be the conditions under which decision-making is optimal. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 187. Development of Social Cognition (4)
This course provides an overview of how children learn to reason about the social world. Topics may include theory of mind, social categorization and stereotyping, moral reasoning, and cultural learning. Recommended preparation: Psychology 101. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 188. Impulse Control Disorders (4)
This course provides an overview of problems of impulse control, which are important features of major psychiatric disorders and also of atypical patterns of behavior including pathological gambling, compulsive sex, eating, exercise, and shopping. Topics include development, major common features, treatment, and neurobiological basis of impulse control disorders. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 189. Brain, Behavior, and Evolution (4)
This course provides a survey of natural behaviors, including birdsong, prey capture, localization, electro-reception and echo-location, and the neural system that controls them, emphasizing broad fundamental relationships between brain and behavior across species. Prerequisites: Psychology 103 and 106; upper-division standing.

PSYC 190. Parenting (4)
This course provides an interdisciplinary overview of theories and scientific research on parenting. Topics may include family structure, parenting styles, attachment, discipline strategies, culture, and media. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 191. Psychology of Sleep (4)
This course provides an overview of the psychology of sleep, including sleep stages and their functions, neurological aspects of sleep, sleep across species and development, dreams and their interpretation, sleep disorders, and the role of sleep in learning and memory. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 192. Senior Seminar in Psychology  (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small setting to explore an intellectual topic in psychology (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

PSYC 193. Topics in Psychology (4)
Selected topics in the field of psychology. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department approval.

PSYC 194A-B-C. Honors Thesis (4-4-4)
Students will take part in a weekly research seminar. In addition, they will plan and carry out a three-quarter research project under the guidance of a faculty member. The project will form the basis of the senior honors thesis. Prerequisites: acceptance to the Honors Program in the junior year (110A-B) (GPA 3.3), in addition one laboratory course (114–127) or two 199s that culminate in a research paper (by petition only) and Psychology 110, 111A-B, and consent of instructor.

PSYC 195. Instruction in Psychology (4)
Introduction to teaching a psychology course. As an undergraduate instructional apprentice, students will attend the lectures of the course, hold weekly meetings with students of the course, hold weekly meetings with course instructor. Responsibilities may include class presentations, designing and leading weekly discussion sections, assisting with homework and exam grading, and monitoring and responding to online discussion posts. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Only four units can be applied toward the psychology minor or major as upper-division psychology elective credit. Prerequisites: eligibility includes all of the following: upper-division standing, a minimum of A- in the course in which the student plans to assist, a 3.0 cumulative UC GPA, instructor and department approval.

PSYC 196A-B-C. Research Seminar (4-4-4)
Weekly research seminar, three quarter research project under faculty guidance which culminates in a thesis. Prerequisites: one laboratory course, 3.3 GPA, and/or consent of instructor.

PSYC 198. Directed Group Study in Psychology (2 or 4)
Group study under the direction of a faculty member in the Department of Psychology. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

PSYC 199. Independent Study (2 or 4)
Independent study or research under direction of a member of the faculty. Prerequisites: GPA 2.5 and ninety units completed. P/NP grades only. Not counted for credit toward the major. See section on 199 information.

PSYC 201A. Quantitative Methods in Psychology I (6)
The first part of a series of intensive courses in statistical methods and the mathematical treatment of data, with special reference to research in psychology. Prerequisites: restricted to graduate students in psychology.

PSYC 201B. Quantitative Methods in Psychology II (6)
The second part of a series of intensive courses in statistical methods and the mathematical treatment of data, with special reference to research in psychology. Prerequisites: Psychology 201A; restricted to graduate students in psychology.

PSYC 201C. Quantitative Methods in Psychology III (6)
The third part of a series of intensive courses in statistical methods and the mathematical treatment of data, with special reference to research in psychology. Prerequisites: Psychology 201B; restricted to graduate students in psychology.

PSYC 202. Writing and Presenting Academic Research Papers (4)
Instruction on organizing, writing, and presenting empirical research papers. Students will learn fundamentals of writing style, data presentation, and time management. This course is intended for psychology graduate students in service of preparation of their first-year papers and talks. Prerequisites: psychology graduate students (major code: PC76 or PC78 or PC79), or consent of instructor.

PSYC 205. Emotion (4)
This seminar provides a selective overview of the scientific study of emotion. We will discuss various theoretical perspectives on emotion and will focus on specific topics such as emotion regulation, affect in social interactions, individual differences, and particular emotions (e.g., embarrassment, envy, and jealousy). Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 206. Mathematical Modeling (4)
This course is designed to teach the basics of mathematical modeling. Topics include when, why, and how to use signal detection theory (an essential theory for anyone interested in attention, perception, memory, or decision making), how to analyze reaction time distributions (instead of simply measuring mean RT), how to engage in the fine art of model comparison, and how to avoid creating models that are more complex than the data they seek to explain.

PSYC 209. Judgment and Decision Making (4)
This seminar examines issues in the psychology of judgment and decision making. Topics include the heuristics and biases approach, over confidence, framing effects, intertemporal choice, and rationality. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 212. Visual Science (4)
Each year a different topic in visual science is selected for in-depth review and discussion based on current readings. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 213. Professional Procedures and Survival in Psychology (4)
This course provides a forum for presentation and discussion of the basic issues associated with surviving in a professional (particularly, academic) psychology environment. It covers such issues as: 1) how to get a job, 2) how to keep a job, 3) general issues and ethics in professional survival. The course will include the presence of a number of the psychology faculty in topic specific areas (e.g., journal editors from our faculty, faculty sitting on grant review panels, etc.).

PSYC 217. Proseminar in Developmental Psychology (5)
The course examines cognitive development through the school-age period and social and personality development from infancy through early adolescence. It begins with an examination of early neurological, sensory, motor, and perceptual functions and then focuses on issues in linguistic and cognitive development. The class will first discuss general developmental theory and methods and then topics such as attachment, temperament, self-concept, aggression, family relations, play, and peers. Students cannot get credit for Psychology 217 if they have already taken Psychology 217A or 217B. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 218. Proseminar in Cognitive Psychology (5)
A survey of basic principles and concepts of cognitive psychology. This course is intended to serve as the basic introduction for first-year students. Basic areas include knowledge, memory, thought, perception, and performance. Students that have taken Psychology 218A or Psychology 218B cannot take Psychology 218 for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PSYC 220. Proseminar in Social Psychology (5)
An introduction to social psychology. Psychology and the law, health psychology, attitudes, emotions, person perception and aggression are some of the topics to be covered.

PSYC 221. Proseminar in Sensation and Perception (5)
Fundamentals of vision, audition, and other senses. Emphasis will be upon psychophysical approaches to the study of these sensory modalities, as well as some essential aspects of their neurophysiological bases.

PSYC 222. Proseminar in Biological Psychology (5)
A survey of the functional neuroanatomical, neurodevelopmental, neurophysiological, and pharmacological correlates of psychological phenomena. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 223. Current Directions in Vision (1)
An in-depth analysis of empirical and theoretical issues in a specialized area of vision or visual perception. Emphasis most likely will be on a topic of ongoing vision research at UC San Diego. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit eighteen times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 224. Current Directions in Cognitive Neural Systems (CNS) (1)
A weekly seminar series focused on understanding recent advances in the relationship between neural systems and behavior using a variety of experimental approaches (single unit recording, comp neuro, evolutionary bio, psychophysics, comparative anatomy, lesion work, psychopharm, fMRI, EEG, TMS, etc.). May be taken for credit twenty-four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing. S/U grades only.

PSYC 229. Happiness (4)
This course will address the psychology of happiness. The discussions and readings, consisting largely of original research articles, will explore such questions as: What is happiness? How do we measure it, and how do we tell who has it? What is the biology of happiness and what is its evolutionary significance? What makes people happy—youth, fortune, marriage, chocolate? Is the pursuit of happiness pointless?

PSYC 231. Data Analysis in Matlab (4)
This course will cover a set of general data analysis methods that are broadly applicable in many different sub-disciplines of psychology/neuroscience. Topics include model fitting, information theory, Fourier analysis, and machine learning. Recommended preparation: Matlab, C, Java, R, or any related language. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 232. Probabilistic Models of Cognition (4)
This seminar introduces computational theories of human cognition focusing on the role of inference and knowledge representation with Bayesian generative models. We will touch on a variety of structured probabilistic models and approaches to integrating probabilistic inference with cognitive limitations. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PSYC 233. Learning and Motivation (4)
Advanced topics in learning and motivation, with special emphasis on current research. May be taken for credit eighteen times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 234. Evolution of Language (4)
This seminar will explore issues related to the evolution of human language, and critically evaluate evidence for the diversity of theories about the topic. Discussions will include the comparative communication and cognition, manual communication, factors surrounding the initial emergence of language, amongst others. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PSYC 235. Semantic Development (4)
This course will explore the development of concepts and linguistic meaning via classic case studies in semantics, including word learning, quantifier acquisition, and the foundations of mathematics. The course will draw on evidence from linguistic, the philosophy of language, and developmental psychology. Cross-listed with LIGN 232. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 236. Substance Abuse (4)
Theory and research on the development, progression, and resolution of substance use and abuse will be reviewed and evaluated. Normal and abnormal patterns of substance involvement will be contrasted across the life span. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 237. Human Rationality (4)
The traditional view of rationality is based upon abstract, content-independent rules for behavior. People sometimes violate these rules in a laboratory setting, but the violations are often systematic and appear to reflect adaptation to the environment outside the laboratory. Such findings raise questions about what it means to be rational. Readings will be empirically oriented and cover the areas of deductive reasoning, inductive reasoning, and choice. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 240. The Primate Brain (4)
This course will explore the neural basis of perception, action and cognition in primate cortex. Drawing on recent findings in neuroscience, we will discuss the role of cortex in a range of topics including decision making, object perception and recognition, memory and communication. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PSYC 241. Programming Web-Based Experiments for Psychology Research (4)
This hands-on programming course focuses on the design, implementation, and analysis of online experiments, particularly using Amazon's Mechanical Turk. Topics include experimental design and counterbalancing, stimulus presentation and timing, response collection using the mouse and keyboard, and debugging experiments written in Javascript and HTML/CSS. Course work will include individual projects. Recommended preparation: Graduate students who have not programmed at all should speak with the professor beforehand. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 242. Current Directions in Developmental Psychology (1)
Advanced seminar concentrating on methods of research and current experimental literature in developmental psychology. May be taken for credit twenty-four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. S/U grades only. 

PSYC 243. Sound and Music Perception (4)
This course will deal with anatomy and physiology of the ear, central auditory pathways, and neurological disorders of sound and music perception.

PSYC 244. Special Topics in Psycholinguistics (4)
Discussion of theories and experiments investigating language production, comprehension, or acquisition. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PSYC 246. Emotion and Cognition (4)
This seminar focuses on the interplay between emotion and cognition. We will consider how emotion influences perception, reasoning, memory, and judgment, and how cognitive processes can have emotional consequences. We will also discuss physiological and neural underpinnings of an affective influence and debate more general issues such as emotion and rationality. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PSYC 247. Learning by Thinking in Children (and Adults) (4)
We often learn through observations or from testimony from others. Occasionally, we learn simply by thinking. How do we generate insights in the absence of new information from the external world? This course examines the cognitive capacities involved in learning by thinking, including thought experiments, deduction, analogy, imagination, and learning by explaining. This discussion-based seminar will take a cognitive science approach, emphasizing cognitive development. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 249A. Advanced Topics in Applied Behavior Analysis I (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in applied behavior analysis. May be taken for credit five times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 249B. Advanced Topics in Applied Behavior Analysis II (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in applied behavior analysis. May be taken for credit five times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 249C. Advanced Topics in Applied Behavior Analysis III (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in applied behavior analysis. May be taken for credit five times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 251. Advanced Topics in Learning and Motivation (1)
Weekly meetings for graduate students actively engaged in research on conditioning. May be taken for credit multiple times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 252. Cognitive Neuroscience (4)
This is a series of weekly seminars on current trends in neuropsychology. The seminars will deal with the concept of “localization” of function in different parts of the brain and the effects of damage to these parts on cognitive functions such as perception, memory and language. Active student participation will be encouraged in preparing these seminars. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 255A. Advanced Topics in Biological Psychology I (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in biological psychology. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 255B. Advanced Topics in Biological Psychology II (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in biological psychology. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 255C. Advanced Topics in Biological Psychology III (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in biological psychology. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 257. Development and Neurobiology of Theory of Mind (4)
Surveys research on people’s everyday attribution of mental states to predict/explain actions, their naïve theory of mind, from developmental and neurocognitive perspectives. Topics include social cognition in infancy and childhood, in autism, and in nonhuman primates, and the brain underpinnings. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PSYC 258. Delay of Gratification (4)
This course will review the research on delay of gratification. We will cover what makes it in general so tough, what situations make it possible, who can do it, and what the implications of this ability are. We will draw from research in social, personality, and animal psychology as well as economics. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 260. Language and Conceptual Development (4)
This class will investigate case studies in conceptual development that interact with language acquisition, including domains such as time, space, number, and theory of mind. The approach of the class will be to explore the chosen case study from the perspective of philosophy, linguistics, psychology, anthropology, and comparative psychology, with a particular focus on how conceptual development is affected by the acquisition of language. Cross-listed with LIGN 283. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 262. Functional Construction of the Vertebrate Brain’s Social Behavior Network (4)
The vertebrate brain contains a network of strongly interconnected structures that play essential roles in the regulation of social behavior. In this seminar we will read and discuss primary literature that details the structure and behavioral functions of this network.

PSYC 263. Science of Mindfulness (4)
This graduate seminar addresses the science behind mindfulness. Topics include the effects of mindfulness practice on neural processing, psychological well-being, and prosocial behavior. A particular emphasis will be placed on the implications of mindfulness practices/effects on society and education. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 264A. Advanced Topics in Language Processes I (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in language processes. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 264C. Advanced Topics in Language Processes III (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in language processes. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 265. Social Psychology and Medicine (4)
Concentrates on what psychology has to contribute to the understanding of illness, its treatment, and the social context in which these processes occur. Topics: psychological factors in the etiology and treatment of illness, doctor-patient roles, and communication. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

PSYC 266. Psychology of Reading (4)
This seminar will cover aspects of reading, emphasizing cognitive processes involved in skilled reading. However, learning to read and methods to teach reading will also be discussed. Other topics include: eye movements and reading, word recognition, inner speech, context effects, discourse processing, sentence parsing, and dyslexia.

PSYC 267A. Advanced Topics in Behavior Medicine I (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in behavior medicine. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 267B. Advanced Topics in Behavior Medicine II (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in behavior medicine. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 267C. Advanced Topics in Behavior Medicine III (1)
Research and discussion on selected topics in behavior medicine. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 270A. Introduction to Laboratory Experimentation I (4)
A basic laboratory course, designed to introduce first-year graduate students to experimental methods in psychology. The student will select a research topic; do a thorough literature review of the area; design and carry out new, original studies of problems in the selected area; and prepare a final formal report of the study at the end of the spring quarter. This course is required of all first-year graduate students in the department. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: first-year psychology graduate students only.

PSYC 270B. Introduction to Laboratory Experimentation II (4)
Continuation of basic laboratory course, designed to introduce first-year graduate students to experimental methods in psychology. The student will select a research topic; do a thorough literature review of the area; design and carry out new, original studies of problems in the selected area; and prepare a final formal report of the study at the end of the spring quarter. This course is required of all first-year graduate students in the department. S/U grades only. Prerequisites: first-year psychology graduate students only.

PSYC 270C. Introduction to Laboratory Experimentation III (4)
Final quarter of basic laboratory course, designed to introduce first-year graduate students to experimental methods in psychology. The student will select a research topic; do a thorough literature review of the area; design and carry out new, original studies of problems in the selected area; and prepare a final formal report of the study at the end of the spring quarter. This course is required of all first-year graduate students in the department. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: first-year psychology graduate students only.

PSYC 271. Neurobiology of Learning and Memory (4)
This seminar will span the study of learning and memory from an interdisciplinary neuroscience perspective: the goal will be to gain a broad perspective on memory. The course will also touch on dysfunctions of learning and memory such as in amnesia, mental retardation, aging, and Alzheimer’s disease. The course will end with exciting developments in the field, including the possibility of genetic and pharmacological enhancement of memory and intelligence.

PSYC 272. Selected Topics in Cognitive Psychology (3)
An in-depth analysis of selected empirical and theoretical topics in cognitive psychology. The course will focus on areas where notable progress appears to be taking place in contemporary research.

PSYC 273. Selected Topics in Quantitative Methods in Psychology (4)
An in-depth analysis and discussion of selected advanced topics in quantitative methods in psychology.

PSYC 274. Current Directions in Social Psychology (1)
A biweekly seminar series focusing on recent advances in both basic and applied research in social psychology including topics such as interpersonal relationships, emotion, health, social cognition, judgment, and decision making. May be taken for credit twenty-four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing. S/U grades only.

PSYC 275. Current Directions in Cognitive Psychology (1)
A weekly seminar series focused on understanding recent advances in any area of cognitive psychology. May be taken for credit twenty-four times. Prerequisites: graduate standing. S/U grades only.

PSYC 280. Seminar in Communication and Information Processing (1)
S/U grades only.

PSYC 282. Auditory Neuroscience (4)
An in-depth analysis of current theoretical and empirical issues in the neurobiological study of auditory perception and cognition. Example topics include auditory stream segregation, localization, natural stimulus coding, pattern recognition and communication in multiple species. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

PSYC 296. Research Practicum (1–12)
Research in psychology under supervision of individual staff members. S/U grades only. (F,W,S)

PSYC 299. Independent Research (1–12)
Independent research and thesis research. S/U grades only. (F,W,S)

PSYC 500. Apprentice Teaching (4)
Teaching practicum for students enrolled in graduate program in psychology. Students who hold appointments as teaching assistants must enroll in this course. Minimum program requirement is for one four-unit course per year for four years. S/U grades only.

RELI 1. Introduction to Religion (4)
An introduction to key topics in the study of religion through the analysis of religious texts, artifacts, and/or practices. The intent is to develop basic strategies of interpretation for undertaking a critical, disciplined study of religion.

RELI 2. Comparative World Religions (4)
An introduction to the comparative study of religion, focusing on religious traditions of global significance. Although historical aspects of these traditions will be studied, emphasis will be placed on religious beliefs and practices as manifested in the contemporary world.

RELI 87. Freshman Seminar in Religion (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic related to the study of religion with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

RELI 101. Tools and Methods in the Study of Religion (4)
This course provides an advanced introduction to assumptions and norms that shape the study of religion as an academic field; to significant debates within the field; and to tools and methods used for professional research within the field.

RELI 134. Topics in American Religion (4)
Topical studies in the history of religion in American society, ranging from the Puritans to the New Age. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 141. Public Sphere and Religion (4)
This interdisciplinary course will explore the historical and theoretical relationship between public sphere and religion, particularly focusing on the manifestation of religious power, public ritual, and sacred theatricality in everyday spaces of life. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 143. Topics in Performing Religion (4)
This course explores religion as a system of bodily practices, rather than one of tenets or beliefs. How do day-to-day activities as well as significant rituals express and inform people’s religious lives? Why is doctrine an insufficient basis for understanding religion? May be taken up to three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 144. Devils and Demons in Christianity (4)
Christianity frequently finds definition in contradistinction to an “Other” characterized as immoral, irrational, and malevolent. This class investigates how devils and demons as constructions of the “Other” have contributed to Christianity’s growth and identity formation throughout history. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 145. Communication, Technology, and Religion (4)
This course will look at the relationship between information communication technologies (ICTs) and religion and how they have intersected or diverged in the course of history. We will look at both older and newer media, such as telegraph, radio, television, cassette tapes, Internet and satellite, and how they have been used by groups like Evangelical, Catholic, or Islamist movements in proliferation and transformation of ideas, rituals, ideologies, values, and diverse forms of sociability. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 146. Topics in the Religions of Antiquity (4)
Topical studies in the religious beliefs, practices, and institutions of pre-Christian Europe and near East. May be repeated for credit up to three times when topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 147. Pagan Europe and Its Christian Aftermath (4)
This course explores the history of how western Europe was converted from its indigenous pagan religions to the imported religion we know as Christianity. We will discuss conversion by choice and by force, partial or blended conversions, and the relationships between belief and culture. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 148. Religion and Women’s Activisms (4)
The course surveys women’s formal and informal roles and activities in a number of faiths, examining how women’s agency and activism may be constrained or fostered by religious ideologies and norms in various historical and political contexts. Examples are drawn from a range of male-centered (Islam, Judaism, Christianity, Buddhism) and woman-centered religions (Sande, Afro-Brazilian, Z-ar Cult), and newly formed theologies (Womanist, Native American, and Mujerista; New Age feminist spiritualities). Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 149. Islam in America (4)
This course introduces the students to historical and social developments of Islam in the United States. Tracing Islam back to the African slaves, the course examines various Muslim communities in the U.S., with a focus on African-American Muslims, especially Malcolm X. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 150. Religion and Cinema (4)
The course is an introductory study of cinema and religion. It explores how cinema depicts religion and spiritual experience. A number of films will be studied to understand how cinematic and religious narratives and practices overlap and, at times, diverge in complex ways. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 151. Deep Ecology: Knowing Place (4)
This course explores intersections between religious discourse and ecological discourse by considering texts from both that treat the human world as irreducibly interconnected with more-than-human worlds of nature and "spirit." Themes include the ambivalence of wildness; the critique of anthropocentrism (human-centeredness); and the question of how religious emphasis on "knowing (one's) place" can create a sense of either human exceptionality, above nature, or embeddedness, within nature. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

RELI 188. Special Topics in Religion (4)
Students in this lecture will investigate important problems in the study of religion or the history of particular religions. May be repeated for credit up to three times when topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

RELI 189. Seminar in Religion (4)
This seminar requires the intensive analysis of critical problems in the study of religion or the history of particular religions. May be repeated for credit up to three times when topics vary. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; RELI 101 or consent of instructor.

RELI 192. Senior Seminar in Religion (1)
The senior seminar is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in religion at the upper-division level. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors.

RELI 196AH. Honors Thesis in Religion (4)
First quarter of a two-quarter sequence of individualized, directed-research courses for majors in which students learn firsthand the processes and practices of scholarly research in the study of religion, culminating in the completion of a thesis and an oral presentation. Students may not receive credit for both RELI 196H and RELI 196AH. Prerequisites: RELI 101 (may be completed concurrently with the honors sequence). Department approval required for entry into the Honors Program.

RELI 196BH. Honors Thesis in Religion (4)
Second quarter of a two-quarter sequence of individualized, directed-research courses for majors in which students learn firsthand the processes and practices of scholarly research in the study of religion, culminating in the completion of a thesis and an oral presentation. Students may not receive credit for both RELI 196H and RELI 196BH. Prerequisites: RELI 196A. Department approval required for continuing participation in the Honors Program.

RELI 197. Directed Advanced Readings (4)
A faculty member will direct a student in advanced readings on a topic not generally included in the Program for the Study of Religion’s curriculum. Students must make arrangements with the program and individual faculty. May be repeated for credit up to three times for credit. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; RELI 110A or 110B; overall GPA of 2.5.

RELI 199. Independent Research Study for Undergraduates (2–4)
Independent research in religion under the supervision of a faculty member affiliated with the Program for the Study of Religion. This course may be repeated three times with program approval. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing, with 2.5 GPA (overall); program stamp.

Revelle 1. First Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to Revelle College freshman students only.

Revelle 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to Revelle College transfer students only.

Revelle 20. Revelle Freshman Honors Program Seminar (0)
Weekly seminars with a faculty member (chosen each year by the provost to match the interests of participating students). This seminar will acquaint students with the scholarship and research being conducted by faculty and instill in students a sense of participation in the scholarly life at UC San Diego. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: by invitation only. (F,W,S)

Revelle 110. Senior Honors Seminar: Thinking about Science (4)
A seminar for honors students concerning the nature of science and its place in our society. The course will consist of readings and discussions concerning a range of historical, philosophical, and sociological perspectives on science. Prerequisites: Revelle College senior honors students.

ERC 1. First Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking, organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to ERC NFRS students only.

ERC 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking, organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to ERC transfer students only.

ERC 20. Freshman Honors Seminar: International Themes (1)
This weekly seminar focuses on a chosen international theme with faculty speakers. The structure of the seminar is informal, giving students the opportunity to participate in interactive discussions. Pass/Not Pass only. May be taken for credit three times as topics vary. Prerequisites: open to students in the Eleanor Roosevelt College Freshman Honors Program only.

ERC 89. Practicum in Math Tutoring (2)
Undergraduate students will be provided with one hour of instruction on pedagogy of tutoring math in a public high school setting and placement in regional public high schools to provide five hours of one-on-one tutoring of math students under supervision of high school math teachers. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: Math 10A or 20A. 

ERC 92. Honors Project (2)
Individual project on a topic chosen by the student, done under direction of a faculty member. Prerequisites: by invitation only. Pass/Not Pass only. Repeatable for credit twice, up to a total of six units over three quarters.

ERC 188. Transfer Seminar: The Research University (1)
This weekly seminar focuses on the skills required to write an upper-division research paper and prepare for a winter quarter internship through Academic Internship Program. The structure of the seminar is informal, giving students the opportunity to participate in interactive discussions based on required reading and faculty speakers. Prerequisites: department stamp.

ERC 192A. Global Service Research Seminar (2)
This is the first course of a two-course elective sequence (ERC 192A and ERC 192B) entitled ERC Global Service and Research. ERC 192A provides an academic introduction to the culture and history of the nation and region selected for this undergraduate academic, practicum, and research experience to prepare students for the subsequent service and research portion (ERC 192B). Note: The course is open to all students. Students must have completed course work in relevant topics, such as regional history, economics, culture. Prerequisites: department stamp.

ERC 192B. Global Service Research Seminar (2)
ERC 192B begins with the service learning practicum component over spring break where students dedicate twenty hours to an on-site service project abroad. Returning to UC San Diego, students begin their research seminar pursuing the project they proposed in MMW 192A. The project culminates with a research paper and presentation. Prerequisites: ERC 192A and department stamp.

ERC 196. Honors Project (4)
Senior thesis research project for students who have been accepted into the Eleanor Roosevelt College Individual Studies major. Project will be carried out under supervision of one or more faculty members. Depending on scope of the project, may be taken for four or eight units of credit in a single quarter, or eight units distributed over two quarters. Prerequisites: admission to Eleanor Roosevelt College Individual Studies major.

ERC 199. ERC Independent Studies (4)
The content of this independent study course, which may not duplicate any existing course on campus, will be determined by a supervising faculty member and tailored to fit specific content needs of students pursuing the Eleanor Roosevelt College Individual Studies major. Prerequisites: admission to Eleanor Roosevelt College Individual Studies major.

ERC 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
A seminar intended for exposing undergraduate students, especially freshmen and sophomores, to exciting research programs conducted by the faculty. Prerequisites: none. Pass/Not Pass only.

COGR 225A, HIGR 238, PHIL 209A, SOCG 255A. Introduction to Science Studies (4)
Study and discussion of classic work in history of science, sociology of science, and philosophy of science, and of work that attempts to develop a unified science studies approach. Required for all students in the Science Studies Program. Prerequisites: enrollment in Science Studies Program.

COGR 225B, HIGR 239, PHIL 209B, SOCG 255B. Seminar in Science Studies (4)
Study and discussion of selected topics in the science studies field. Required for all students in the Science Studies Program. The topic varies from year to year, and students may, therefore, repeat the course for credit. Prerequisites: enrollment in Science Studies Program.

COGR 225C, HIGR 240, PHIL 209C, SOCG 255C. Colloquium in Science Studies (4)
A forum for the presentation and discussion of research in progress in science studies, by graduate students, faculty, and visitors. Required for all students in the Science Studies Program. Prerequisites: enrollment in the Science Studies Program.

COGR 225D, HIGR 241, PHIL 209D, SOCG 255D. Advanced Approaches to Science Studies (4)
Contemporary themes and problems in Science Studies. Focus on recent literature in the history, philosophy and sociology of science, technology, and medicine. Required of all students in the Science Studies Program. Prerequisites: completion of COGR 225A, HIGR 238, Phil 209A, or SOCG 255A; enrollment in Science Studies Program; or instructor’s permission.

HIGR 236A-B. Seminar in History of Science (4-4)
A two-quarter research seminar, comprising intensive study of a specific topic in the history of science. The first quarter will be devoted to readings and discussions; the second chiefly to the writing of individual research papers. The topic varies from year to year, and students may repeat the course for credit. (IP grade to be awarded the first quarter; final grade will be given at the end of the second quarter.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

HIGR 242. Topics in the History of Earth and Life Sciences (4)
Intensive study of specific problems in the history of the life sciences and earth sciences, ranging in period from the Renaissance to the twenty-first century. May be repeated for credit as topics will vary annually. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

HISC 160. Historical Approaches to the Study of Science (4)
This colloquium course will introduce students to the rich variety of ways in which the scientific enterprise is currently being studied historically. Major recent publications on specific topics in the history of science selected to illustrate this diversity will be discussed and analyzed; the topics will range in period from the seventeenth century to the late twentieth, and will deal with all major branches of natural science. Requirements will vary for undergraduate, MA, and PhD students. Graduate students may be expected to submit a more substantial piece of work. Prerequisites: consent of instructor; department stamp required.

HISC 161/261. Seminar in Newton and Newtonianism (4)
This course focuses on the single most important figure of the scientific revolution, Isaac Newton, and on his science and philosophy, which set the frame of reference for physics and general science until the twentieth century. Graduate students are required to submit an additional piece of work. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing and department stamp.

HISC 163/263. History, Science, and Politics of Climate Change (4)
The complex historical development of human understanding of global climate change, including key scientific work, and the cultural dimensions of proof and persuasion. Special emphasis on the differential political acceptance of the scientific evidence in the U.S. and the world. Graduate students are required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division or graduate standing; department stamp required.

HISC 164/264. Topics in the History of the Physical Sciences (4)
Intensive study of specific problems in the physical (including chemical and mathematical) sciences, ranging in period from the Renaissance to the twentieth century. Topics vary from year to year, and students may therefore repeat the course for credit. Requirements will vary for undergraduate, MA, and PhD students. Graduate students may be expected to submit a more substantial piece of work. Prerequisites: consent of instructor; department stamp required.

HISC 165. Topics in Twentieth-Century Science and Culture (4)
This is a seminar open to advanced undergraduate and graduate students that explores topics at the interface of science, technology, and culture, from the late nineteenth century to the present. Topics change yearly; may be repeated for credit with instructor’s consent. Requirements vary for undergraduates, MA, and PhD students. Graduate students are required to submit a more substantial piece of work. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; department stamp required.

HISC 166/266. The Galileo Affair (4)
Galileo’s condemnation by the Catholic Church in 1633 is a well-known but misunderstood episode. Was Galileo punished for holding dangerous scientific views? Personal arrogance? Disobedience? Religious transgressions? Readings in original sources, recent historical interpretations. Graduate students will be expected to submit a more substantial piece of work. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

HISC 167/267. Gender and Science (4)
Why have women been traditionally excluded from science? How has this affected scientific knowledge? How have scientists constructed gendered representations not only of women, but also of science and nature? We will address these questions from perspectives including history, philosophy, and psychoanalytic theory. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

HISC 170/270. Topics in the History of Science and Technology (4)
This seminar explores topics at the interface of science, technology, and society, ranging from the seventeenth century to the twentieth. Requirements will vary for undergraduate, MA, and PhD students. Graduate students are required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; department stamp required.

HISC 172/272. Building America: Technology, Culture, and the Built Environment in the United States (4)
The history of the built environment in the United States, from skyscrapers to suburbs, canals and railroads to factories and department stores. The technological history of structures and infrastructures, and the social and cultural values that have been “built into” our material environment. Graduate students are required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor; department stamp required.

HISC 180/280. Science and Public Policy (4)
This course will explore the evolution of the institutions, ideologies, procedures, standards, and expertise that modern democratic societies have used in applying science to generate and legitimate public policy. In order to obtain the department stamp, please e-mail the professor for the OK to enroll. Once you have that e-mail, please forward it to historyundergrad@ucsd.edu and include your PID number. Graduate students are required to submit an additional paper. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and department stamp required.

PHIL 204A. Core Course in Philosophy of Science (4)
An introduction to one or more central problems in the philosophy of science, or in the philosophy of one of the particular sciences, such as the nature of confirmation and explanation, the nature of scientific knowledge, reductionism, the unity of science, or realism and antirealism. May be taken for credit three times with changed content.

PHIL 245. Philosophy of Science (4)
This seminar will cover current books and theoretical issues in the philosophy of science. May be taken for credit seven times with changed content.

PHIL 247. Philosophy of Biology (4)
Historical and contemporary perspectives on foundational issues about biology. May include questions about the nature of biological explanation, the relation of biology to chemistry and physics, the status of attributions of function, and the relation of biology to the social sciences. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 250A. Philosophy of the Cognitive Sciences (4)
Contemporary debates about the study of the mind-brain as studied in one or more of the empirical cognitive sciences. May include questions about the different strategies of explanation invoked, the conceptions of representation employed, the connections between theoretical models developed. May be taken for credit six times with changed content.

PHIL 280. Philosophy of Science Topics and Methods (1–2)
This course meets weekly to discuss recent books or articles in philosophy of science. The reading is designed both for students doing active research in the field and for those seeking to gain some familiarity with it. Can be taken nine times for credit with changed content. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

SOCG 234. Intellectual Foundation of the Study of Science, Technology, and Medicine (4)
This course focuses on some classic methodological and theoretical resources upon which the sociology of science, technology, and medicine all draw. It gives special attention to relationships between knowledge and social order, and between knowledge and practice, that are common to science, technology, and medicine. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SOCG 247. Madness and Society (4)
An examination of the changing Western responses from the age of Bedlam to the age of Prozac. Topics include: the rise and decline of the total institution; the emergence of psychiatry; changing cultural meanings of madness; and the therapeutics of mental disorder. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SOCG 249. Technology and the Human (4)
This course explores the ethical and political implications of technological interventions into human life. Approaches from science studies, the sociology of the body, and philosophy. Topics include transformations in domains of life such as work, health, childhood, and death. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SOCG 284. Contemporary Biomedicine (4)
Develops central themes in medical sociology in order to understand twentieth- and twenty-first-century medical practice and research. Topics include authority and expertise; health inequalities; managed care; health activism; biomedical knowledge production; and the construction of medical objects and subjects. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SOCG 288. Knowledge Capitalism (4)
This seminar examines the place of scientific knowledge and information and communication technology in the transformation of capitalist economy and society. The class explores new interactions between science studies and the social theory of advanced capitalism. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

SIO 1. The Planets (4)
Space exploration has revealed an astonishing diversity among the planets and moons in our solar system. The planets and their histories will be compared to gain insight and a new perspective on planet Earth. Prerequisites: none. (W)

SIO 3. Life in the Oceans (4)
An introduction to the wide variety of organisms that live in the oceans, the habitats they occupy, and how species interact with each other and their environment. Included will be examinations of adaptations, behavior, ecology, and a discussion of local and global resource management and conservation issues. This course is designed for nonbiology majors. Prerequisites: none.

SIO 10. The Earth (4)
An introduction to structure of the Earth and the processes that form and modify it. Emphasizes material that is useful for understanding geological events as reported in the news and for making intelligent decisions regarding the future of our environment. Prerequisites: none. (W)

SIO 12. History of the Earth and Evolution (4)
Evolution of the Earth from its origin in the early solar system to formation of continents and ocean basins, and how the planet became habitable. It examines the geologic record of evolution, extinction, plate tectonics, and climate changes through time. Prerequisites: none. (F)

SIO 15. Natural Disasters (4)
Introduction to environmental perils and their impact on everyday life. Geological and meteorological processes, including earthquakes, volcanic activity, large storms, global climate change, mass extinctions throughout Earth’s history, and human activity that causes and prevents natural disasters. Prerequisites: none. (F)

SIO 16. Geology of the National Parks (4)
An introduction to fundamental concepts of geology and environmental science through the lens of the national park system. Topics covered include the geologic time scale; plate tectonics; igneous, metamorphic, and sedimentary processes; geomorphology; climate change; and environmental degradation. Prerequisites: none. (S)

SIO 20. The Atmosphere (4)
Descriptive introduction to meteorology and climate studies. Topics include global and wind and precipitation patterns, weather forecasting, present climate and past climate changes (including droughts, El Niño events), greenhouse gas effects, ozone destruction, the “little ice age,” acid rain. Prerequisites: none. (W)

SIO 25. Climate Change and Society (4)
Climate change is one of the most complex and critical issues affecting societies today. This course will present the scientific evidence for climate change and its impacts and consider governmental policy responses and possible adaptation strategies. Prerequisites: none. (W)

SIO 30. The Oceans (4)
Presents modern ideas and descriptions of the physical, chemical, biological, and geological aspects of oceanography, and considers the interactions between these aspects. Intended for students interested in the oceans, but who do not necessarily intend to become professional scientists. Prerequisites: none. (F)

SIO 35. Water (4)
This course will examine the properties of water that make it unique and vital to living things. Origin of water on Earth and neighboring planets will be explored. Socially relevant issues concerning water use and contamination will be covered. Prerequisites: none. (W)

SIO 40. Life and Climate on Earth (4)
Explores life on Earth and its relationship to the environment—past, present, and future. Topics include origins of life, earth history, elemental cycles, global climate variability and human impacts on our environment. Prerequisites: none. (F)

SIO 45. Volcanoes (4)
This class will provide students with an introduction to volcanoes, including the mechanisms, products, and hazards associated with various types of volcanic eruptions. A key area of emphasis will be the impact of volcanism on human societies. Prerequisites: none. (W)

SIO 50. Introduction to Earth and Environmental Sciences (6)
This course is an introduction to how our planet works, focusing on the formation and evolution of the solid earth, and the processes affecting both its surface and interior. Laboratories and substantial field component complement and extend the lecture material. Program and/or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: none. (F,S)

SIO 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide the new students with the opportunity to explore and intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small setting. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. (P/NP grades only). (F,W,S)

SIO 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
Perspectives on ocean sciences. This seminar introduces students to exciting and current research topics in ocean science as presented by faculty and researchers at Scripps Institution of Oceanography. Formerly ERTH 90. Prerequisites: none.

SIO 96. Frontiers in the Earth Sciences (2)
An introduction to current research in the earth sciences. Background in science not required, but may be useful for some topics. Areas covered vary from year to year. Prerequisites: none.

SIO 99. Independent Study (2 or 4)
Independent reading or research on a problem by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: lower-division standing, completion of thirty units of UC San Diego undergraduate study, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0, and a completed and approved Special Studies form, UC San Diego Application for Enrollment Special Studies Courses 97, 98, 99.

SIO 100. Introduction to Field Methods (4)
Mapping and interpretation of geologic units. Field work is done locally and the data are analyzed in the laboratory. There will be one mandatory weekend field trip to Anza Borrego State Park. Program and/or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: SIO 50 or consent of instructor. (F)

SIO 101. California Coastal Oceanography (4)
This course emphasizes oceanographic connections between physical and climate forcing and marine ecosystem responses using examples from and activities in the California coastal environment. The approach is inquiry-based, combining classroom and experiential learning to build critical and quantitative thinking and research insights and abilities. Prerequisites: Chem 6A or consent of instructor. (F)

SIO 102. Introduction to Geochemistry (4)
An introduction to the chemical composition and evolution of the Earth and solar system. Applications of chemical methods to elucidate the origin and geologic history of the Earth and the planets, evolution of oceans and atmosphere, and human environmental impacts. Prerequisites: SIO 50, Chem 6A-B-C, or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 103. Introduction to Geophysics (4)
An introduction to the structure and composition of the solid earth. Topics include seismology, the gravity and magnetic fields, high-pressure geophysics, and concepts in geodynamics. Emphasis is on global geophysics, i.e., on the structure and evolution of the planet. Prerequisites: Math 20A-B-C-D and Physics 2A-B-C, SIO 50, or consent of instructor. SIO 160 recommended. (F)

SIO 104/SIOG 255. Paleobiology and History of Life (6)
An introduction to the major biological transitions in Earth history from the origins of metabolism and cells to the evolution of complex societies. The nature and limitations of the fossil record, patterns of adaptation and diversity, and the tempo and mode of biological evolution. Laboratories and substantial field component complement and extend the lecture material. Program and/or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: undergraduate: BILD 3 or consent of instructor. Graduate: graduate-level standing or consent of instructor. Graduate students, additionally, will give oral presentation or research paper. (F)

SIO 105. Sedimentology and Stratigraphy (4)
This course will examine sedimentary environments from mountain tops to the deep sea across a variety of time scales. The focus is to develop the skills to interpret stratigraphy and read the history of the Earth that it records. Laboratories and substantial field component complement and extend lecture material. Program and/or course material fee may apply. Prerequisites: SIO 50 or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 106. Introduction to Hydrogeology (4)
An introduction to the theory and practice of hydrogeology, emphasizing current concepts of aquifer and water properties and practical considerations related to groundwater quality, groundwater flow, and sustainability of groundwater reservoirs. Prerequisites: SIO 50, Math 20C, Physics 2C, and Chemistry 6C; upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (F)

SIO 108. Introduction to Paleoclimatology (4)
An introduction to basic principles and applications of paleoclimatology, the study of climate and climate changes that occurred prior to the period of instrumental records. A review of processes and archives of climate data will be investigated using examples from Earth history. Prerequisites: ESYS 102 or SIO 50 or SIO 12 or consent of instructor.

SIO 110. Introduction to GIS and GPS for Scientists (4)
A hands-on introduction to science applications of geographic information systems and global positioning system. Students acquire data through GPS field surveys, design and construct GIS using ESRI’s ArcGIS software, analyze spatial data, and present the results in a web-based environment. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 111. Introduction to Ocean Waves (4)
The linear theory of ocean surface waves, including: group velocity, wave dispersion, ray theory, wave measurement and prediction, shoaling waves, giant waves, ship wakes, tsunamis, and the physics of the surf zone. Cross-listed with Physics 111. Prerequisites: Physics 2A–C or Physics 4A–C and Mathematics 20A–E, or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 113. Introduction to Computational Earth Science (4)
Computer models are used in the geosciences to understand complex natural systems. This course includes beginning programming with a user-friendly language (Matlab) and an introduction to writing computer models of Earth processes. Prerequisites: Math 20B and Physics 2A or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 115. Ice and the Climate System (4)
This course examines the Earth’s cryosphere, including glaciers, ice sheets, ice caps, sea ice, lake ice, river ice, snow, and permafrost. We cover the important role of the cryosphere in the climate systems and its response to climate change. Prerequisites: Math 20A–D and Physics 2A–C or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 117. The Physical Basis of Global Warming (4)
Introduction to the processes behind global warming, including the physics of the greenhouse effect, controls on greenhouse gases, atmospheric and oceanic circulation, climate feedbacks, relationship to natural climate variability, and global environmental issues related to global warming. Prerequisites: Math 20D and Physics 2C or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 119. Physics and Chemistry of the Oceans (4)
Basic physical and chemical processes that influence the biology of the oceans, such as ocean circulation, ocean acidification, carbonate chemistry, trace metal chemistry. Prerequisites: Physics 1C or 2C, Chem 6C, or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 120. Introduction to Mineralogy (4)
Application of mineralogical and x-ray crystallographic techniques in earth sciences. Topics include symmetry, crystal structure, chemical, and physical properties of minerals with special emphasis on the common rock-forming minerals. Laboratory component includes polarizing microscope and x-ray powder diffraction methods. Prerequisites: SIO 50, or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 123. Microbial Environmental Systems Biology (4)
Environmental systems biology is the study of the genomic basis for patterns of microbial diversity and adaptation in relation to habitat. This course introduces the microbial genome as a unit of study and surveys introductory principles in microbial genomics and bioinformatics that underlie a range of contemporary research in diverse marine habitats, such as the deep sea and polar regions, as well as studies of biomedical importance, including the human microbiome. Prerequisites: BICD 100 or consent of instructor.

SIO 125. Biomechanics of Marine Life (4)
An introduction to the physical basis of the biological world. This course explores how the physical principles of solids and fluids underlay the functional morphology, ecology, and adaptations of all living things, with emphasis on marine organisms. Prerequisites: BILD 3 and Physics 1C or Physics 2C, or consent of instructor.

SIO 126. Marine Microbiology (4)
The role of microorganisms in the oceans; metabolic diversity; methods in marine microbiology; interactions of microbes with other microbes, plants and animals; biochemical cycling, pollution and water quality; microbe-mineral interactions; extremophiles. (Students may not receive credit for both SIO 126 and BIMM 126.) Prerequisites: BIBC 102 or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 126L. Marine Microbiology Laboratory (4)
Techniques and theory in marine microbiology. Students perform experiments concerning (a) enrichment, enumeration, and identification, and (b) metabolic and physiochemical adaptations, along with an independent project. Students cannot receive credit for both SIO 126L and BIMM 127. Prerequisites: SIO 126 and upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

SIO 127. Marine Molecular Ecology (4)
This course will survey the application of molecular methods to address diverse questions concerning the ecology and evolutionary biology in marine organisms. Focus will be on genetic and genomic approaches that are providing new insights into how marine organisms adapt to their physical and biotic environments. Prerequisites: BILD 3 and BICD 100, or consent of instructor.

SIO 128. Microbial Life in Extreme Environments (4)
Microorganisms turn up in the strangest places. This course examines the exotic and bizarre in the microbial world, including the super-sized, the rock and cloud builders, the survivors, and those present at the limits of life. Prerequisites: SIO 126 or BIMM 120 or BIMM 121 or BIMM 122 or BIMM 124 or BIMM 132, or consent of instructor.

SIO 129. Marine Chemical Ecology (4)
This class explores the chemistry of marine life involved in the chemical adaptations of defense and communication. The class examines all of the marine taxa from microbes to higher plants and animals. Prerequisites: Chem 140C or consent of instructor.

SIO 130. Scientific Diving (4)
This course includes theoretical and practical training to meet Scripps Institution of Oceanography and AAUS standards for scientific diving authorization and involves classroom, field, and ocean skin and scuba diving sessions. Topics include scientific diving programs and policy; physics and physiology of diving; decompression theory; dive planning; navigation; search and recovery; equipment and environmental considerations; subtidal sampling techniques; hazardous marine life; diving first aid; and diver rescue. Please see course preparation requirements here: https://scripps.ucsd.edu/scidive/training. P/NP grades only. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: department approval required.

SIO 132. Introduction to Marine Biology (4)
Overview of marine organisms and their adaptations to sea life. Selected examples of physiological, behavioral, and evolutionary adaptations in response to the unique challenges of a maritime environment. (Students may not receive credit for both SIO 132 and BIEB 132.) Prerequisites: BILD 3 or consent of instructor. (F)

SIO 133. Marine Mammal Biology (4)
Introduction to the biology, ecology, evolution, and conservation status of marine mammals. Description of marine mammal taxa (mysticetes, odontocetes, pinnipeds, sirenians), their anatomy, physiology, ecology, and behavior. Impacts of whaling, fisheries interactions, and other anthropogenic threats. Prerequisites: BILD 3 and upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 134. Introduction to Biological Oceanography (4)
Basics for understanding the ecology of marine communities. The approach is process-oriented, focusing on major functional groups of organisms, their food-web interactions and community response to environmental forcing, and contemporary issues in human and climate influences. (Students may not receive credit for both SIO 134 and BIEB 134.) Prerequisites: BILD 3 and upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 135/SIOG 236. Satellite Remote Sensing (4)
Satellite remote sensing provides global observations of Earth to monitor environmental changes in land, oceans, and ice. Overview, physical principles of remote sensing, including orbits, electromagnetic radiation, diffraction, electro-optical, and microwave systems. Weekly labs explore remote sensing data sets. Graduate students will also be required to write a term paper and do an oral presentation. Prerequisites: undergraduate: Physics 2A-B or Physics 4A-B-C, or consent of instructor. Graduate: graduate-level standing or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 136. Marine Biology Laboratory (6)
Introductory laboratory course in current principles and techniques applicable to research problems in marine biology. Field component includes introduction to intertidal, salt marsh, or other marine ecosystems. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: BILD 3, SIO 132, and SIO 134, or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 138. The Coral Reef Environment (4)
Assessment of the physical, chemical, and biological interactions that define the coral reef system; essential geography and evolutionary history of reefs; natural and human perturbations to the coral reef ecosystem; aspects of reef management and sustainability. Prerequisites: BILD 3, Math 10A, Chem 6B, or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 139. Current Research in Marine Biology Colloquium (1)
Provides an introduction to current research topics and developments in marine biology and biological oceanography. Faculty members from Scripps Institution of Oceanography will offer perspectives in these areas. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 141/CHEM 174. Chemical Principles of Marine Systems (4)
Introduction to the chemistry and distribution of the elements in seawater, emphasizing basic chemical principles such as electron structure, chemical bonding, and group and periodic properties and showing how these affect basic aqueous chemistry in marine systems. Prerequisites: Chem 6C or 6CH, or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 143. Ocean Acidification (4)
This course covers the fundamentals of ocean acidification, including the chemical background; past and future changes in ocean chemistry; biological and biogeochemical consequences, including organism and ecosystem function; biodiversity; biomineralization; carbonate dissolution; and the cycling of carbon and nitrogen in the oceans. Prerequisites: Math 10C, Physics 1C, Chem 6C, or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 144/SIOG 252A. Introduction to Isotope Geochemistry (4)
Radioactive and stable isotope studies in geology and geochemistry, including geochronology, isotopes as tracers of magmatic processes, cosmic-ray produced isotopes as tracers in the crust and weathering cycle, isotopic evolution of the crust and mantle. Prerequisites: undergraduate: SIO 50, 102, and 120 or consent of instructor. Graduate: graduate-level standing or consent of instructor. Graduate level requires student presentation.

SIO 147. Applications of Phylogenetics (6)
Overview of the computer-based methods for constructing phylogenetic trees using morphological and molecular data. Lectures and labs cover evolutionary and ecological transformations, biodiversity measurements, biogeography, systematic and taxonomy. An independent project and presentation are required. (Students may not receive credit for both SIO 147 and BIEB 147.) Prerequisites: BILD 3 or consent of instructor.

SIO 150. Physics and Chemistry of Planetary Interiors (4)
Quantitative study of the physical and chemical processes operating within planetary interiors that control the evolution of planets on geological time scales. Comparative planetology of Earth, Venus, Mars, and other terrestrial planets and satellites will focus on how the formation, differentiation, and evolution of their interiors are expressed as tectonics and volcanism on their surfaces. Prerequisites: Math 20D, Physics 2C, Chemistry 6C or consent of instructor. (F)

SIO 152. Petrology and Petrography (4)
Mineralogic, chemical, textural and structural properties of igneous, metamorphic, and sedimentary rocks; their origin and relations to evolution of the Earth’s crust and mantle. Laboratory emphasizes hand specimens and microscopic studies of rocks in thin sections. Prerequisites: SIO 50 and SIO 120 or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 154. Macroevolution (4)
Tempo and mode of evolution with emphasis on the marine fossil record. Large-scale patterns and trends in diversity, speciation, and extinction. Innovation, disparity, and adaptive radiation. Evolutionary turnover and the role of the environment in macroevolution. Graduate students will also be required to write a term paper and do oral presentation. Prerequisites: undergraduate: SIO 104 or BIEB 150 or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 155. Whole Earth Geochemistry (4)
A geochemical overview of Earth materials and chemical processes involved in the Earth’s evolution. Topics include formation and differentiation of the Earth, linkages between the solid Earth and the atmosphere/hydrosphere, and isotope and trace element composition of igneous and metamorphic rocks. Prerequisites: SIO 102 or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 160. Introduction to Tectonics (4)
The theory of plate tectonics attempts to explain how forces within the Earth give rise to continents, ocean basins, mountain ranges, earthquake belts, and most volcanoes. In this course we will learn how plate tectonics works. Prerequisites: SIO 50 or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 162. Structural Geology (4)
Principles of stratigraphy and structural geology applicable to field geologic studies. Discussion and laboratory exercises. Two to three field trips required. Program and/or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: SIO 100 or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 170. Introduction to Volcanology (4)
This class will introduce students to the fundamentals of the science of volcanology. Topics explored will include the processes and products of various types of volcanism, magma genesis, eruptive mechanisms, in addition to volcanic monitoring, hazards and mitigation. Prerequisites: SIO 100 and Chem 6A, or consent of instructor.  (F)

SIO 170L. Introduction to Volcanology—Field Experience (1-4)
This course teaches fundamental aspects of physical and chemical volcanology through a one- to two-week field study experience prior to the start of the quarter. Subjects are introduced in lectures and reinforced and expanded upon in field exercises. Additional fees may be required for travel expenses. Program or material fee may apply. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: SIO 170 or consent of instructor; department approval required.

SIO 172. Physics of the Atmosphere (4)
This course provides an understanding of the physical principles governing the behavior of the Earth’s atmosphere, with emphasis on the thermal structure and composition of the atmosphere, air masses and fronts, and atmospheric thermodynamics, fluid dynamics, and radiation. Prerequisites: Math 20C and Physics 2C, or consent of instructor.

SIO 173. Dynamics of the Atmosphere and Climate (4)
Introduction to the dynamical principles governing the atmosphere and climate using observations, numerical models, and theory to understand atmospheric circulation, weather systems, severe storms, marine layer, Santa Ana winds, El Niño, climate variability, and other phenomena. Prerequisites: Math 20E and Physics 2C, or consent of instructor.

SIO 180/SIOB 292. Communicating Science to Informal Audiences (4)
Students develop fundamental science communication and instructional skills through the understanding and application of learning theory, interpretive techniques, and pedagogical practices, which occur in the context of communicating ocean science concepts to a diverse audience at Birch Aquarium at Scripps. Graduate science students will develop fundamental communication and instructional skills through the understanding and application of learning theory, interpretive techniques, and pedagogical practices, including the development of an education/outreach plan to support a competitive research proposal. Prerequisites: (graduate) graduate-level standing or consent of instructor; (undergraduate) Chem 6A or SIO 50 or BILD 1 or consent of instructor. (F)

SIO 181. Marine Biochemistry (4)
Biochemical mechanisms of adaptation in organisms to the marine environment. Special emphasis will be on the effects of pressure, temperature, salinity, oxygen, and light on the physiology and biochemistry. (Students may not receive credit for both SIO 181 and BIBC 130.) Prerequisites: BIBC 102 or consent of instructor. (F)

SIO 182. Environmental and Exploration Geophysics (4)
Theory and practice of nonseismic geophysics for groundwater, environmental, and exploration purposes. Lectures are supplemented by collection of gravity, magnetic, and resistivity data; data analysis; and report writing. Includes an introduction to Matlab as a tool for geophysical data interpretation. Prerequisites: Math 20D and Physics 2C, or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 183. Phycology: Marine Plant Biology (5)
Lecture and laboratory course emphasizing the biology, ecology and taxonomy of marine plants and seaweeds. Laboratory work mainly involves examination, slide preparation and dissection of fresh material collected locally. An oral presentation on a current research topic is required. Program or course fee may apply. Prerequisites: BILD 3 or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 184. Marine Invertebrates (6)
Course emphasizing the diversity, evolution and functional morphology of marine invertebrates. Laboratory work involves examination of live and prepared specimens. An oral presentation and a paper on current research topic is required. Program or course fee may apply. Prerequisites: BILD 3 or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 186. Interactions Between Humans and the Natural Environment (4)
As human population and resource usage have increased, the character of human interactions with nonhuman natural systems on Earth’s surface has changed dramatically. This course will survey tools for characterizing this change, its nature, and projections into the future. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (W)

SIO 187. Statistical Methods in Marine Biology (4)
Introduction to statistical inference. Emphasis on constructing statistics for specific problems in marine biology. Topics include probability, distributions, sampling, replication, and experimental design. Students may not receive credit for both SIO 187 and BIEB 100. Prerequisites: BILD 3 or consent of instructor.

SIO 189. Pollution, Environment and Health (4)
The goal is to understand the scope of the pollution problem facing the planet. Students will learn the properties of chemicals in the environment and survey the biological mechanisms that determine their accumulation and toxicity. Prerequisites: Chem 6C and BILD 1 or 3 or consent of instructor. (S)

SIO 190. Special Topics in Earth, Oceans, and Atmosphere (4)
A seminar course designed to treat emerging or topical subjects in the earth, ocean, or atmospheric sciences. Involves lectures, reading from the literature, and student participation in discussion. Topics vary from year to year.  May be taken for credit two times. Enrollment by consent of instructor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, a minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0 or consent of instructor.

SIO 192. Senior Seminar in Scripps Institution of Oceanography (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow Scripps Institution of Oceanography senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in Scripps Oceanography (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors.

SIO 194. Research Seminar in Washington, D.C. (4)
Course attached to a six- to eight-unit internship taken by students participating in the UCDC Program. Involves weekly seminar meetings with faculty and teaching assistant and a substantial research paper. Prerequisites: departmental approval. Participation in the UCDC Program during quarter enrolled in seminar.

SIO 195. Methods of Teaching Earth Sciences (4)
Introduction to teaching earth sciences class section in a lower-division class, hold office hours, assist with examinations. This course counts only once towards the major. Prerequisites: junior or senior earth sciences major with GPA of 3.0 or an A in the course, overall GPA of 3.0 or higher, ninety units or more, and consent of instructor, plus department stamp.

SIO 196. Honors Thesis Research (4)
Course is for student participants in the senior honors thesis research program. Students complete individual research on a problem by special arrangement with, and under the direction of, a Scripps Institution of Oceanography faculty member. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: completed ninety units of courses, including twelve units of SIO courses. Achieved a GPA of 3.3 overall and 3.5 in SIO courses. Submitted to Scripps Steering Committee, and had approved, an honors thesis research proposal. Department stamp.

SIO 197. Earth Science Internship (2 or 4)
The earth science internship program is designed to complement the program’s academic curriculum with practical field experience. Prerequisites: completion of ninety units with a GPA of 2.5, and a completed and approved Special Studies form, UC San Diego Application for Enrollment Special Studies Courses 197, 198, 199, and department stamp.

SIO 198. Directed Group Study (2–4)
This course covers a variety of directed group studies in areas not covered by formal Scripps Oceanography courses. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

SIO 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (4)
Independent reading or research on a problem. By special arrangement with a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.)

SIOG 228. Research Seminar (2)
A three-quarter required sequence for BS/MS earth sciences students to prepare students for thesis writing. Prerequisites: current earth sciences BS/MS student. Department stamp required.

SIOC 200A. Computational Ocean Acoustics and Signal Processing I (4)
Overview of ocean acoustics. Acoustics Wave Equation with some analytic solution techniques. Ray Methods. Introduction to Spectral and Normal Modes methods. Introduction to beamforming, including matched field processing. Computer programs will be constructed on all subjects covered. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Kuperman (F)

SIOC 200B. Computational Ocean Acoustics and Signal Processing II (4)
Continuation of SIOC 200A. Range dependent propagation models, including adiabatic and coupled mode models and parabolic equations. More advanced topics in matched field processing. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOC 200A or SIO 200A or consent of instructor. Kuperman (W)

SIOC 200C. Computational Ocean Acoustics and Signal Processing III (4)
Continuation of SIOC 200B. Modeling interference such as ambient noise. Time domain methods. Matched field tomography, nonlinear optimization methods, and geophysical inversion. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOC 200B or SIO 200B or consent of instructor. Kuperman (S)

SIOC 201. Geological Record of Climate Change (4)
Introduction to geological archives; the tools for paleoclimate reconstruction and a sampling of important issues from the geological record, including the development of “greenhouse” and “icehouse” worlds, the origin and evolution of glacial cycles, and the origin of “millennial scale” climate variability. Prerequisites: chemistry and physics required for graduate admission to SIO, SIO 101 or equivalent, or consent of instructor. Charles (S)

SIOC 202A–B. Fundamentals of Wave Physics (4-4)
This two-quarter sequence is designed to introduce a broad background of students to basic principles of wave physics, including generation, propagation, dispersion, refraction, diffraction, reflection, waveguides, etc. A variety of wave motions of environmental relevance, including acoustic, ocean surface and internal (SIOC 202A), optical and seismic (SIOC 202B) are used to illustrate these principles. In-class experiments, data collection, and analysis exercises are incorporated. Prerequisites: calculus and partial differential equations. Kuperman, Melville, Stramski, Gerstoft (W,S)

SIOC 203A. Introduction to Applied Mathematics I (4)
Review of exact methods for ordinary differential equations. Expansions about regular and irregular singular points. Introduction to asymptotic expansions. Approximate methods for nonlinear differential equations. Regular and singular perturbation theory. Additional topics depending upon the interests of the instructor. Coscheduled with MAE 294BA. Prerequisites: Math 110, Math 120A, or consent of instructor. (F)

SIOC 203B. Introduction to Applied Mathematics II (4)
Asymptotic methods: method of steepest descent (if not covered in I) WKB, method of multiple scales, boundary layer theory. Elements of complex analysis. Coscheduled with MAE 294B. Prerequisites: MAE 294A or SIOC 203A or SIO 203A or consent of instructor. (W)

SIOC 203C. Introduction to Applied Mathematics III (5)
Partial differential equations: characteristics, similarity solutions, Green’s functions, images, wave equation, diffusion equation, Laplace’s equation. Applications to continuum mechanics, potential fields, and transport phenomena such as diffusion, linear and nonlinear waves, Burger’s equation, shocks, and other topics. Other topics according to the interests of the instructor. Coscheduled with MAE 294C. Prerequisites: graduate standing and MAE 294B or SIOC 203B or SIO 203B or SIOC 215B or SIO 215B or consent of instructor. W. Young (S)

SIOC 204. Acoustics (4)
Theory of radiation, transmission, and scattering of sound with special application to ocean acoustics. Students who have taken SIOC 204B for credit may not receive credit for SIO 204. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Buckingham (W)

SIOC 206. Land Surface Hydrology (4)
Advanced introduction to natural processes that govern water occurrence and transport over the land surface. Principles of global hydrologic cycle and land-surface water balance, runoff and fluvial geomorphology, infiltration and subsurface water flow, evaporation and plant transpiration. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S)

SIOC 207A. Fundamentals of Digital Signal Processing (4)
Discussion of discrete-time signals and systems, Discrete-Time Fourier Transform (DFT) and window functions, Fast Fourier Transform (FFT), design of Finite Impulse Response (FIR) and Infinite Impulse Response (IIR) digital filters and their implementations, finite word length effects, applications to data acquisition and analysis. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Hodgkiss (F)

SIOC 207B. Digital Signal Processing I (4)
Discrete random signals; conventional (FFT based) spectral estimation. Coherence and transfer function estimation; model-based spectral estimation; linear prediction and AR modeling, Levinson-Durbin algorithm and lattice filters, minimum variance spectrum estimation. Coscheduled with ECE 251A. (Recommended prerequisites: ECE 153 in addition to either ECE 161 or 161A and SIOC 207A or SIO 207A or equivalent background.) Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Hodgkiss, Rao (W)

SIOC 207C. Digital Signal Processing II (4)
Adaptive filter theory, estimation errors for recursive least squares and gradient algorithms, convergence and tracking analysis of LMS, RLS, and Kalman filtering algorithms, comparative performance of Wiener and adaptive filters, transversal and lattice filter implementations, performance analysis for equalization, noise canceling, and linear prediction applications. Coscheduled  with ECE 251B. (Recommended Prerequisites: ECE 251A or ECE 251AN.) Prerequisites: graduate standing ECE 251A (for ECE 251B); SIOC 207B or SIO 207B (for SIOC 207C). Hodgkiss (S)

SIOC 207D. Array Processing (4)
The coherent processing of data collected from sensors distributed in space for signal enhancement and noise rejection purposes or wavefield directionality estimation. Conventional and adaptive beamforming. Matched field processing. Sparse array design and processing techniques. Applications to acoustics, geophysics, and electromagnetics. Coscheduled with ECE 251D. (Recommended Prerequisites: ECE251A or ECE 251AN.) Prerequisites: graduate standing; ECE 251C (for ECE 251D); SIOC 207C or SIO 207C (for SIOC 207D). Hodgkiss (F)

SIOC 208. Seminar in Applied Ocean Sciences (1)
Topics in applied ocean sciences. One-hour seminar. (S/U grades only). Staff (F,W,S)

SIOC 209. Special Topics (1–4)
Within the next few years, lectures on various special subjects will be offered by members of the staff. The emphasis will be on topics that reveal the interdependence of the biological, chemical, geological, and physical processes operating in the oceans. (S/U grades permitted.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIOC 210. Physical Oceanography (4)
Physical description of the sea; physical properties of seawater, methods and measurements, boundary processes, regional oceanography. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Talley (F)

SIOC 211A. Ocean Waves I (4)
Propagation and dynamics of waves in the ocean, including the effects of stratification, rotation, topography, wind, and nonlinearity. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Hendershott (W)

SIOC 211B. Ocean Waves II (4)
Propagation and dynamics of waves in the ocean, including the effects of stratification, rotation, topography, wind, and nonlinearity. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOC 211A or SIO 211A and SIOC 214A or SIO 214A or consent of instructor. Melville (S)

SIOC 212A. Geophysical Fluid Dynamics I (4)
The equations of motions for rotating stratified flow and their application to the atmospheric and oceanic dynamics; Ekman layer dynamics, potential vorticity dynamics, the quasigeostrophic approximation, theories of the wind-driven oceanic circulation, theories of the atmospheric Hadley circulation, geostrophic adjustment, and baroclinic instability. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. MacKinnon (W)

SIOC 212B. Geophysical Fluid Dynamics II (5)
The equations of motion for rotating stratified flow and their application to the atmospheric and oceanic dynamics; Ekman layer dynamics, potential vorticity dynamics, the quasigeostrophic approximation, theories of the wind-driven oceanic circulation, theories of the atmospheric Hadley circulation, geostrophic adjustment, and baroclinic instability. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOC 212A or SIO 212A and SIOC 214A or SIO 214A or consent of instructor. Cessi (S)

SIOC 213. Turbulence and Mixing (4)
Mixing mechanisms, their identification, description, and modeling. Introduction to turbulence, semi-empirical theories, importance of coherent structures, effects of stratification and rotation on turbulent structure, entrainment and mixing. Coscheduled with MAE 216. (S/U grades permitted.) Armi (S)

SIOC 214A. Introduction to Fluid Mechanics (4)
A survey of classical problems in fluid mechanics and approximate techniques of analysis. Topics include conservation equations, straight laminar flows, low and high Reynolds number laminar flow, stability of laminar flows, turbulent flow. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Hendershott (F)

SIOC 214B. Environmental Fluid Dynamics (4)
Single-layer flows with a free surface; two-layer flows, including exchange flows in harbors, estuaries, seas, and buildings. Continuously stratified flows with meteorological and oceanographic applications. Topographic effects, plumes, jets, and thermals. Planetary boundary layers. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Armi (S)

SIOC 215A. Applied Mathematics for Oceanographers I (4)
Intended for first-year graduate students who seek a quantitative way to describe how the ocean works: vector analysis, complex quantities, Fourier and Laplace transforms, ordinary differential equations, nonhomogeneous ordinary differential equations, initial and boundary value problems, Heat and Laplace equations. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (F)

SIOC 215B. Applied Mathematics for Oceanographers II (4)
An introduction to the mathematical description of waves, beginning with a description of the linear oscillator, and followed by normal modes, the flexible string, membranes, water waves, ray theory, method of characteristics, and basic linear algebra. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOC 215A or SIO 215A or consent of instructor. (W)

SIOC 215C. Applied Mathematics for Oceanographers III (4)
An introduction to Perturbation theory, including regular and singular expansions, Poincare's method, two-scale method, the WKB approximation and boundary layer theory. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOC 215A or SIO 215A and SIOC 215B or SIO 215B or consent of instructor. (S)

SIOC 216. Introduction to the Physics of Complex Systems (4)
Emergent complex behavior in nonlinear, dissipative, open dynamical systems will be investigated by studying fundamental properties and their manifestation in examples drawn from the physical and biological sciences. Topics to include fractals, chaos, self-organization, artificial life, and neural networks. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Werner (W)

SIOC 217A. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences I (4)
Thermodynamics and statics of dry and moist air, atmospheric composition, Earth radiation budget, vertical structure of the atmosphere, global energy balance, thermodynamic feedbacks in the climate system. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Russell (F)

SIOC 217B. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences II (4)
Fluid dynamics of the atmosphere; derivation of governing equations from the laws of physics, scale analysis, conservation principles, theoretical and observed structure of midlatitude synoptic systems; gradient wind and thermal wind approximations, geostrophic and quasigeostrophic approximations; potential vorticity, Rossby waves, climate and weather phenomena such as jet streams and cyclones. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOC 217A or SIO 217A or consent of instructor. Eisenman (W)

SIOC 217C. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences III (4)
Radiative, physical, and dynamical processes that govern the mean state, variability, and change of the atmosphere and climate, including greenhouse gases, clouds and aerosols, convection and precipitation, general circulation, and coupled atmosphere-ocean interactions. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOC 217A or SIO 217A and SIOC 217B or SIO 217B, or consent of instructor. Norris (S)

SIOC 217D. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences IV (4)
Atmospheric chemistry that impacts climate change, including photochemical reactions, ozone chemistry, and aerosol evolution in the troposphere and stratosphere. Atmospheric applications of catalytic cycles, heterogeneous chemistry, and microphysical processes will include the ozone hole, urban smog, and aerosol-cloud interactions. Prerequisites: SIOC 217A or SIO 217A and SIOC 217B or SIO 217B and SIOC 217C or SIO 217C. Russell (S)

SIOC 218. Cloud Dynamics and Climate (4)
Cloud identification, cloud properties, dynamical processes governing formation and dissipation of different cloud types, impact of clouds on radiation flux and climate. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOC 217A or SIO 217A and SIOC 217B or SIO 217B. Nongraduate students may enroll with consent of instructor.

SIOC 218A. Observational Techniques in Oceanography (4)
The course teaches practical knowledge of oceanographic methods, sensors, and platforms, with a focus on physical observations. Uses mixture of lectures, online information, lab demonstrations, practical exercises, student presentations, and manufacturers’ visits. Prerequisites: graduate standing; basic knowledge of physical oceanography and physical principles. For graduate students in an oceanographic discipline, and graduate or third- or fourth-year undergraduate students in physics or engineering with an interest in ocean observations.

SIOC 218B. Observational Techniques in Oceanography: At-Sea Practicum (4)
Practicum focused on preparing for and carrying out on site fieldwork using state-of-the art methods (e.g., executing mooring-based data collection with physical, chemical, biological sensors). Teaches ship/deck skills, sensor and mooring preparation, cruise planning/execution, data analysis, cruise-report preparation. Prerequisites: graduate standing; basic knowledge of oceanography and data analysis. For graduate students in an oceanographic discipline, and graduate students in physics or engineering with an interest in ocean observations.

SIOC 219. Special Topics in Physical Oceanography (1–4)
Example topics are case histories and methods in physical oceanography, theories of the ocean circulation, numerical methods in large-scale ocean and atmospheric models, and natural electromagnetic phenomena in the earth and the oceans. (S/U grades permitted.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIOC 220. Observations of Large-Scale Ocean Circulation (4)
General circulation of the oceans; tropical, subtropical, and high-latitude current systems of the Atlantic, Indian, and Pacific Oceans and marginal seas; ocean heat flux and thermohaline circulations; observational basis of large-scale dynamics. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Roemmich (S)

SIOC 221A. Analysis of Physical Oceanographic Data (A) (4)
Fundamental elements of analysis of geophysical and oceanographic time series, including sampling problems, least squares techniques, spectral analysis, interpretation of series, design of experiments. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. Pinkel (F)

SIOC 221B. Analysis of Physical Oceanographic Data (B) (4)
Techniques for analysis of physical oceanographic data involving many simultaneous processes, including probability densities, sampling errors, spectral analysis, empirical orthogonal functions, correlation, linear estimation, objective mapping. Prerequisites: SIOC 221A or SIO 221A or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Rudnick (W)

SIOC 221C. Data Analysis Laboratory (4)
This course is to give students practical experience with analysis techniques. Students complete three projects. Topics include empirical orthogonal functions, objective mapping, complex demodulation, inference of geostrophic flow, minimization of CTD salinity spiking, isolation of wind-driven currents, wavelets. Prerequisites: SIOC 221A or SIO 221A and SIOC 221B or SIO 221B or consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.) Gille (F)

SIOC 235. Ocean-Atmosphere Interaction and Climate (4)
The class discusses ocean-atmosphere interaction dynamics that cause climate to vary in space and time, and form the physical basis for predicting year-to-year climate variability and projecting future climate change in the face of global warming. Prerequisites: graduate standing, SIO 210 or SIOC 210 and SIO 211A or SIO 211B or SIO 212A or SIO 212B or SIO 217A or SIO 217B or SIOC 211A or SIOC 211B or SIOC 212A or SIOC 212B or SIOC 217A or SIOC 217B or consent of instructor.

SIOC 237A. Introduction to Ocean Optics (4)
Overview of ocean optics. Concepts in radiometry. Inherent and apparent optical properties. Radiative transfer equation. Light absorption and scattering by seawater constituents. Optics of air-water interface. Light fields within and leaving the ocean. Optics of marine particles. Measurement methods and instrumentation. Recommended preparation: basic physics and differential calculus. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Stramski (F)

SIOC 237B. Ocean Color Remote Sensing (4)
Overview of ocean color satellite missions. Concepts in radiometry. Inherent and apparent optical properties. Radiative transfer equation. Solar radiation and elements of atmospheric optics. Propagation of light across the sea surface and within the ocean. Light absorption and scattering by seawater. Water-leaving radiance and remote-sensing reflectance. Ocean color algorithms and applications. Recommended preparation: basic physics and differential calculus. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Stramski (F)

SIOC 237C. Optical-Biological Interactions in the Ocean (4)
A discussion class with emphasis on the interaction of light with marine plankton. Topics will include light absorption, fluorescence, and scattering by phytoplankton and effects of growth conditions on phytoplankton optical properties. Classic and contemporary papers dealing with these topics will be discussed. Recommended preparation: physics and biology. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.) Stramski (F)

SIOC 238. Sensor Networks (4)
Characteristics of chemical, biological, seismic, and other physical sensors; signal processing techniques supporting distributed detection of salient events; wireless communication and networking protocols supporting formation of robust sensor fabrics; current experience with low power, low cost sensor deployments. Conjoined with MAE 149 and ECE 156. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and approval of instructor, or graduate student in science or engineering. (S/U grades permitted.) Hodgkiss (S)

SIOC 250. Advanced Atmospheric Dynamics (4)
Advanced topics in atmospheric dynamics not covered in the SIO 217 sequence, including baroclinic instability, mechanisms driving the general circulation of the troposphere and stratosphere, tropical waves, hurricanes and mesoscale phenomena, teleconnections, and spatially coherent patterns of variability. Prerequisites: SIOC 212A or SIO 212A or SIOC 217B or SIO 217B or consent of instructor.

SIOC 254. Science of Climate Change (4)
This course will provide the scientific basis for understanding climate change. The focus will be on the twentieth century and understanding the various natural and anthropogenic factors and feedback processes that are contributing to the observed climate changes, including extreme events. The students will develop a climate model and explore ways to slow down future changes. Prerequisites: SIOC 217A or SIO 217A or consent of instructor.

SIOC 267. Biogeochemistry (4)
Examines quantitatively the impact of the biota on the chemistry of the atmosphere and ocean. Emphasis given to isotopes as tracers of biogeochemical processes. Attention given to paleoclimatic and paleoatmospheric data from ice cores to reveal mechanisms. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Severinghaus, R. Keeling (S)

SIOG 223A. Geophysical Data Analysis I (4)
Probability and statistics and their application to make inferences from geophysical data: point processes, distributions, maximum likelihood estimation, hypothesis testing and confidence intervals, least squares, density estimation, interpolation and smoothing. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (W)

SIOG 223B. Geophysical Data Analysis II (4)
Analysis of geophysical measurements, especially time series, Fourier theory digital signal processing, and spectral analysis. Prerequisites: graduate standing and SIOG 223A or SIO 223A or consent of instructor. Agnew (S)

SIOG 224. Internal Constitution of the Earth (4)
An examination of current knowledge about the composition and state of the Earth’s interior revealed by geophysical observations. Seismic velocity and mass density distributions; equations of state; phase changes; energy balance and temperatures; constraints on composition from extraterrestrial samples and exposed rocks; spherical and aspherical variations of properties. Recommended preparation: calculus and differential equations, basic chemistry and physics. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Masters, Stegman (S)

SIOG 225. Physics of Earth Materials (4)
Mathematics and physics of continuous media, focusing on geophysical problems. Topics include deformation, stress, conservation laws, elasticity, attenuation, viscoelasticity, fracture mechanics, and porous media. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Agnew, Fialko (F)

SIOG 226. Introduction to Marine Geophysics (4)
Methods of exploration geophysics with emphasis on those useful at sea. Magnetic and gravitational potential field methods, multi-beam echo sounding reflection and refraction seismology will be covered. Recent papers from the literature will also be read and discussed. Recommended preparation: differential equations; at least one geology course. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Dorman, Chadwell (S)

SIOG 227A. Introduction to Seismology (4)
Introduction to seismometers and seismograms; stress and strain; potentials and the wave equation; geometrical ray theory and travel times in layered media; representation of seismic sources; WKBJ and synthetic seismograms; seismic hazards and other applications of seismology. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Shearer (W)

SIOG 227B. Advanced Seismology I (4)
Introduction to low-frequency digital data; continuum mechanics and the equations of motion; free oscillation solutions; construction of Earth models; excitation of free-oscillations and source mechanism retrieval; array processing of long-period data; modelling aspherical structure; surface waves. Prerequisites: SIOG 227A or SIO 227A or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Masters (S)

SIOG 227C. Advanced Seismology II (4)
High-frequency wave propagation; methods for computing synthetic seismograms, including WKBJ, reflectivity and finite differences; body-wave spectra; attenuation of body waves; source physics; reflection and refraction seismology; seismic tomography. Prerequisites: SIOG 227A or SIO 227A and SIOG 227B or SIO 227B or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Staff (S)

SIOG 229. Gravity and Geomagnetism (4)
Introduction to potential theory, with applications to gravity and geomagnetism. Topics include the geoid, spherical harmonics, Laplace’s equation, the Dirichlet problem on a sphere, and Fourier methods. Gravity anomalies and geomagnetic field modeling and sources are discussed; also paleomagnetic observations. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) C. Constable (S)

SIOG 230. Introduction to Inverse Theory (4)
Solution of linear and nonlinear inverse problems in geophysics by optimization techniques such as norm minimization and linear programming. Construction of models by regularization; inference by bounding functionals. Illustrations from gravity, geomagnetism, and seismology. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) C. Constable (W)

SIOG 231. Introduction to EM Methods in Geophysics (4)
Introduction to electromagnetic methods for both global geophysics and applied/exploration methods. Covers history of EM induction, conduction in rocks, binary mixing laws, self potential, induced polarization, DC resistivity, magnetotellurics, geomagnetic depth sounding, elementary inverse methods, global conductivity structure, and marine EM methods. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) S. Constable (F)

SIOG 232. Ethical and Professional Science (2)
Review and group discussion of professional behavior and survival skills in the earth and ocean sciences, including ethics, data management, plagiarism, authorships, preparing proposals, public speaking, conflict of interest, working with industry. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.) C. Constable, S. Constable (S)

SIOG 233. Introduction to Computing at SIO (4)
Introduction to the SIO computing environment and common software tools in geophysics and other disciplines. Topics include UNIX, Matlab, Postscript, GMT, LaTex, HTML, and a scientific programming language such as C or Fortran90. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Shearer, Tauxe (F)

SIOG 234. Geodynamics (4)
A general course on the dynamics and kinematics of the solid earth based on the text of Turcotte and Schubert. Topics include plate tectonics, heat flow, lithospheric cooling, flexure, viscous flow, gravity, crustal dynamics, and other related topics. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Sandwell (W)

SIOG 236. Satellite Remote Sensing (4)
Satellite remote sensing provides global observations of Earth to monitor environmental changes in land, oceans, and ice. Overview physical principles of remote sensing, including orbits, electromagnetic radiation, diffraction, electro-optical, and microwave systems. Weekly labs explore remote sensing data sets. Graduate students will also be required to write a term paper and do an oral presentation. Coscheduled with SIO 135. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Sandwell (S)

SIOG 239. Special Topics in Geophysics (1–4)
Special course offerings by staff and visiting scientists. Example topics are seismic source theory, geophysical prospecting methods, dislocation theory and seismic mechanisms, tectonic interpretation of geodetic data, and dynamo theory. (S/U grades permitted.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIOG 240. Marine Geology (4)
Introduction to the geomorphology, sedimentation, stratigraphy, volcanism, structural geology, tectonics, and geological history of the oceans. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Cande, Castillo, Charles (F)

SIOG 244. Shape and Structure of the Ocean Floor (4)
Description and explanation of the structural geomorphology of oceanic crust, and of the tectonic and volcanic processes responsible for it. Description and interpretation of deep-sea sedimentary landforms (e.g., deep-sea fans, drifts, bedforms) and of the bottom currents that shape them. Offered in alternate years. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Lonsdale (W)

SIOG 245. Marine Sediments-Paleo Proxies (4)
On the chemical and isotopic records of marine sediments and implications for the history of seawater chemistry and paleoceanography. Will concentrate on the isotopic systems: Li, B, C, O, S, Sr, and Nd, in marine phases that reliably preserve the records, and on associated diagenetic problems. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Kastner (S)

SIOG 246. Global Tectonics and Basin Formation (4)
Plate tectonics of the crust and upper mantle, examining a variety of environments from ridge crests to continental margins, including plate interiors, with an emphasis on basin formation in these tectonic settings. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Cande, Driscoll (W)

SIOG 247. Rock Magnetism and Paleomagnetism (4)
Rock magnetism and acquisition of magnetic remanence in geological materials as well as laboratory procedures and data analysis (isolating remanence components and statistical approaches). The paleomagnetic literature will be used to illustrate applications in geological and geophysical problems. Recommended preparation: one year each of college-level physics and geology; mathematics through calculus. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Tauxe (S)

SIOG 249. Special Topics in Marine Geology (1–4)
Special course offerings by staff and visiting scientists. (S/U grades only.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIOG 251. Whole Earth Geochemistry (4)
A geochemical overview of Earth materials and chemical processes involved in the Earth’s evolution. Topics include formation and differentiation of the Earth, linkages between the solid Earth and the atmosphere/ hydrosphere, and isotope and trace element composition of igneous and metamorphic rocks. Graduate students, additionally, must submit a term paper in one aspect of work discussed during the quarter to be presented orally in class. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Hilton (S)

SIOG 252A. Introduction to Isotope Geochemistry (4)
Radioactive and stable isotope studies in geology and geochemistry, including geochronology, isotopes as tracers of magmatic processes, cosmic-ray produced isotopes as tracers in the crust and weathering cycle, isotopic evolution of the crust and mantle. Graduate level requires student presentation. Conjoined with SIO 144. Prerequisites: graduate-level standing or consent of instructor. Castillo, Keeling (W)

SIOG 252B. Advanced Isotope Geochemistry I (4)
An advanced treatment of noble gas and stable isotope geochemistry. Offered in alternate years with SIO 252C. Prerequisites: SIOG 252A or SIO 252A. Castillo, Keeling (S)

SIOG 252C. Advanced Isotope Geochemistry II (4)
An advanced treatment of radiogenic and cosmogenic isotope geochemistry. Offered in alternate years with SIO 252B. Prerequisites: SIOG 252A or SIO 252A and SIOG 252B or SIO 252B. (S)

SIOG 253. Interactions of Oceanic Plates and the California Margin (4)
How the geology of Alta and Baja California has been shaped, especially in the past 30MYR, by changing patterns of ocean plates and microplates that have subducted beneath the North American Margin, slid obliquely past it, and captured continental crust. Prerequisites: graduate standing, or consent of instructor. Lonsdale

SIOG 255. Paleobiology and History of Life (6)
An introduction to the major biological transitions in Earth history from the origins of metabolism and cells to the evolution of complex societies. The nature and limitations of the fossil record, patterns of adaptation and diversity, and the tempo and mode of biological evolution. Laboratories and substantial field component complement and extend lecture material. Program and/or material fee may apply. Graduate students, additionally, will give oral presentation or research paper. Coscheduled with SIO 104. Prerequisites: graduate-level standing or consent of instructor. R. Norris (S)

SIOG 255A. Topics in Paleobiology and History of Life (3)
Lecture topics on the major transitions in the evolutionary history of life, including origin of metabolisms, microbes, major eukaryote radiations, ecosystems, and societies. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. R. Norris (S)

SIOG 257. Seminar in Petrology (4)
Discussion of current research in petrology and mineralogy. (S/U grades permitted.) (W)

SIOG 260. Marine Chemistry (4)
Chemical description of the sea; the distribution of chemical species in the world oceans, and their relationships to physical, biological, and geological processes. Aluwihare, Barbeau, Dickson, Martz (W)

SIOG 261. Introduction to Rheology of Solid Earth (4)
This course provides a framework for understanding the intrinsic properties of rocks (mineralogy, diffusion, deformation). It explores fundamental aspects of geological processes with an emphasis on the interpretation of geophysical data. The course focuses on micro-, rock-, and planet-scale mechanisms. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. A. Pommier (S)

SIOG 263. Aqueous Chemistry (4)
This course emphasizes the chemical principles that control basic aqueous chemistry in marine systems. The focus will be to show that the geochemistry of the various elements in sea water and biological systems can be understood as a consequence of basic general chemical concepts such as electron structure, chemical bonding, and group and periodic properties. Recommended preparation: undergraduate chemistry equivalent to UC San Diego Chemistry 6 sequence. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Dickson (F)

SIOG 268. Seminar in Geochemistry and Marine Chemistry (1)
Student seminars on topics related to geochemistry and the chemistry of the marine environment. (S/U grades only.)

SIOG 269. Special Topics in Marine Chemistry (1–4)
Special course offerings by staff and visiting scientists. (S/U grades permitted.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIOB 242A. Marine Biotechnology I: Tools and Methods (4)
The course will explore cutting-edge techniques as it applies to genomics, transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, and the bioinformatics needed to analyze such data sets. Next generation sequencing, state-of-the-art mass spectrometry, and NMR techniques and bioinformatic challenges. Students may not receive credit for SIO 242A and SIO 242. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Gaasterland, L. Gerwick (W)

SIOB 242B. Marine Biotechnology II: Applications (4)
This course will explore the diverse biotechnological applications of marine science. Topics will include natural product drug discovery, biomaterials, nanotechnology, synthetic biology, aquaculture, and extremophiles. Students may not receive credit for SIO 242B and SIO 242. Prerequisites: SIOB 242A or SIO 242A or consent of instructor. Bartlett, Jensen (S)

SIOB 242C. Marine Biotechnology III: Introduction to Bioinformatics (4)
Introduction to Unix commands and scripting techniques required for command line interaction with open source bioinformatics tools, including installation, configuration, and use for genome and transcriptome sequencing and assembly, gene expression analysis, and DNA- and RNA-binding protein binding site identification through ChIPseq. Emphasis is on how the bioinformatics tools work, how to use them, and their application to DNA and RNA data sets. Recommended preparation: prior programming skills will help the student gain more from the course. Students may not receive credit for SIO 242C if they have previously taken SIO 242. Prerequisites: SIOB 242A or SIO 242A and SIOB 242B or SIO 242B or consent of instructor.

SIOB 262. Marine Chemical Biology Seminar (2)
Students will give seminars on current research topics that span the interface of marine chemistry and marine biology. Topics will include natural products chemistry, biotechnology, biogeochemistry, and biochemistry relating to marine systems. May be taken for credit eighteen times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades only.) Fenical, W. Gerwick, Moore (F,W,S)

SIOB 264. Special Topics in Marine Natural Products Chemistry (4)
This course provides the foundation for advanced study in the field of marine natural products chemistry. Topics vary from the history of natural products to the organic chemistry of terpenes, alkaloids, acetogenins, and other natural product classes. Varying by topic quarterly, this class is given each quarter and may be repeated. Prerequisites: one year general organic chemistry. (S/U grades only.) Fenical, W. Gerwick, Moore (F,W,S)

SIOB 270. Pelagic Ecology (4)
An analysis of the concepts and theories used to explain the biological events observed in the water column. Alternate years. Prerequisites: SIOC 210 or SIO 210 and SIOB 280 or SIO 280 or consent of instructor. Ohman, A. Allen (S)

SIOB 270A. Fisheries Oceanography (4)
Aspects of marine ecology relevant to the reproduction, survival, and distribution of commercially important marine species. Alternate years only. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Checkley (S)

SIOB 271. Marine Zooplankton (5)
Lectures and laboratories treating the morphological, behavioral, and life history variations of the principal phyla of planktonic invertebrates and heterotrophic protists. Constraints of life at low Reynolds numbers; principles of allometry; growth processes of heterotrophic organisms. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Ohman (S)

SIOB 272. Advanced Statistical Techniques (4)
An interactive overview of statistical methods, focusing on approaches common within the life sciences. Emphasis on the conceptual and logical basis of statistical methods. Topics include treatment of controlled experimental data through to model fitting and exploration of observational data. Recommended preparation: SIO 187, BIEB 100, or equivalent introductory statistics/ biostatistics course. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.  Sandin (W)

SIOB 273. Professional Ethics in Science (2–4)
A seminar on the historical and contemporary ethics and ethos of scientific research, based on published documents. Given in alternate years. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of instructor. Department stamp required. Dayton, Leichter (W)

SIOB 274. Natural History Below the Tides (4)
Exposure to local underwater habitats by scuba with basic material to comply with AAUS certification. Lectures and shore dives in local coastal habitats (protected bay and outer coast sites). Aids students in diving research by providing experience with SIO scientists. Prerequisites: department stamp required. Students must qualify to take the SIO dive course. This includes a physical exam as well as swimming and diving proficiency. Dayton, Leichter (F)

SIOB 275A. Benthic Ecology (4)
Evolution and maintenance of benthic communities from the terrestrial margins to the deep sea. Special emphasis will be placed on physical and biological scaling and processes determining patterns of distribution and abundance; interrelationships between community structure and population phenomena, including trophic relationships, reproductive and recruitment patterns, succession, and life history biology. Offered in alternate years with SIOB 275B. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Leichter, Levin (W)

SIOB 275B. Natural History of Coastal Habitats (6)
The purpose of this class is to develop skills in natural history observation, appreciate the origins of natural diversity in the coast, desert, and mountain Southwest, and discuss the preservation and management of natural ecosystems. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Dayton, R. Norris (S)

SIOB 276. Quantitative Theory of Populations and Communities (4)
An introduction to the quantitative tools and conceptual issues underlying the study of the dynamics and structure of ecological systems. Recommended preparation: three quarters of calculus. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Sugihara (F)

SIOB 276L. Quantitative Ecology Project Lab (4)
A laboratory complement to SIOB 276, to apply quantitative tools to conceptual issues underlying the study of the dynamics and structure of ecological systems. Prerequisites: graduate standing, SIOB 276 or SIO 276 and consent of instructor. Department stamp. Sugihara (W)

SIOB 277. Deep-Sea Biology (4)
The ecology, zoogeography, taxonomy, and evolution of deep-sea organisms, with emphasis on the benthos. Course includes one day cruise to the San Diego Trough to examine deep sea organisms (700–1200 meters) (two-hour steam from Point Loma). Offered alternate years. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Levin (W)

SIOB 278. Seminar in Ocean Biosciences (2)
Presentations of reports, review of literature, and discussion of current research in the marine biological and oceanographic sciences. (S/U grades permitted.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIOB 279. Ecology Seminar in Biological Oceanography (1)
Weekly seminar for students in the biological oceanography curricular group. Lectures given by visiting scientists, resident staff, and students. May be taken for credit eighteen times. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (S/U grades only) Staff (F,W,S)

SIOB 280. Biological Oceanography (4)
The biology and ecology of marine plankton, nekton, and benthos. Emphasis will be on processes regulating species, community, and ecosystem patterns and changes, including productivity, trophic relationships and species interactions with the physical, chemical, and geological environment. One or more field trips. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Franks or Checkley, Levin (F)

SIOB 281. Marine Physiology (4)
Biochemical and physiological mechanisms of adaptation of organisms to the marine environment. Special emphasis is on biological responses to temperature, salinity, carbon dioxide, pH and bicarbonate levels. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Tresguerres  

SIOB 282. Phytoplankton Diversity (4)
Molecular, biochemical, ecological, and evolutionary perspectives on the diversity of eukaryotic and prokaryotic phytoplankton. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Palenik (W)

SIOB 283. Phycology: Marine Plant Biology (5)
Lecture and laboratory course emphasizing the biology, ecology and taxonomy of marine plants and seaweeds. Laboratory work mainly involves examination, slide preparation and dissection of fresh material collected locally. An oral presentation on a current research topic is required. Program or course fee may apply. Graduate students, additionally, are required to write a research paper. Offered in alternate years. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. J. Smith (W)

SIOB 284. Marine Invertebrates (6)
Course emphasizing the diversity, evolution and function morphology of marine invertebrates. Laboratory work involves examination of live and prepared specimens. An oral presentation on a current research topic is required. Graduate level additionally requires a research paper with extensive literature review and critical analyses. Program or course fee may apply. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Rouse (W)

SIOB 285. Physical-Biological Interactions (4)
Physical and biological processes affecting growth and patchiness of plankton. Concepts and equations from physical oceanography will be presented and explored in a biological context. Ideas will be treated both theoretically and with examples from the literature. Prerequisites: SIOC 210 or SIO 210 or consent of instructor. Franks (S)

SIOB 286. Marine Science, Economics, and Policy (4)
This course investigates global issues in marine conservation and potential policy solutions. The approach is interdisciplinary, fast-paced, and discussion oriented. Students will become acquainted with sufficient background in marine biology, ecology, marine and conservation economics, international law, and policy as preparation for participation in discussion on real-world issues in marine conservation. Topics and instructors change each quarter. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Staff (F,W)

SIOB 287A. Marine Microbial Ecology (4)
Recent developments in the study of marine bacteria. Emphasis will be on biochemical and physiological adaptations of marine bacteria to the ocean environment. Bacterial metabolism, growth, and death will also be discussed in the context of trophic interactions and flows of material and energy in marine ecosystems. Molecular biology techniques used in the study of bacterial ecology will also be discussed. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S/U grades permitted.) Azam (W)

SIOB 287B. Microbial Physiology (4)
Prokaryotic cell biology will be discussed primarily from physiological and biochemical standpoints with focus on conceptual understanding, integration, and mechanism. Topics will vary from year to year but will include the following themes: bioenergetics, cell polarity, cell adhesion, the molecular basis of morphogenesis and differentiation, prokaryotic motility and behavior, rotary and linear molecular machines, bacterial organelles, pheromones and messengers, circadian rhythms, biological warfare, and bioremediation. Recommended preparation: BIBC 102, Metabolic Biochemistry; BICD 110, Cell Biology; BIMM 100, Molecular Biology, or equivalent background. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (S)

SIOB 289. Pollution, Environment, and Health (4)
The goal is to understand the scope of the pollution problem facing the planet. Students will learn the properties of chemicals in the environment and survey the biological mechanisms that determine their accumulation and toxicity. Graduate students will also be required to write a research paper. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Hamdoun

SIOB 290. Marine Biology (4)
An introduction to the field of marine biology, especially to the diversity of marine organisms at all taxonomic levels and their adaptations to the marine environment. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. N. Holland (W,S)

SIOB 291. Biology Graduate Research Presentations (2)
Graduate students in the biological sciences present research in a seminar or poster format. Class participants provide oral and written feedback on presentations. Required of second through fourth year students in the marine biology curricular group. Open to all SIO graduate students. (S/U grades only.) (S)

SIOB 292. Communicating Science to Informal Audiences (4)
Students develop fundamental science communication and instructional skills through the understanding and application of learning theory, interpretative techniques, and pedagogical practices, which occurs in the context of communicating ocean science concepts to a diverse audience at Birch Aquarium at Scripps. Graduate science students will develop fundamental communication, and instructional skills through the understanding and application of learning theory, interpretive techniques, and pedagogical practices, including the development of an education/outreach plan to support a competitive research proposal. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. (F)

SIOB 293. Applications of Phylogenetics (6)
Overview of the computer-based methods for constructing phylogenetic trees using morphological and molecular data. Lectures and labs cover evolutionary and ecological transformations, biodiversity measurements, biogeography, systematics and taxonomy. An independent project and presentation are required. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Rouse (W)

SIOB 294. Biology of Fishes (5)
The comparative evolution, morphology, physiology, and ecology of fishes. Special emphasis on local and deep-sea and pelagic forms in laboratory. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor. Hastings (S)

SIOB 296. Special Topics in Ocean Biosciences (1–5)
Example topics are reproduction in marine animals, adaptation to marine environments, larval biology, marine fisheries, macromolecular evolution, physical chemical topics in physiology, philosophy of science. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (S/U grades permitted.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIOB 297. Marine Biology Seminar (1)
Lectures given by visiting scientists and resident staff and students. May be taken for credit eighteen times. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (S/U grades only.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIOB 298. Special Studies in Marine Sciences (1–4)
Reading and laboratory study of special topics under the direction of a faculty member. Exact subject matter to be arranged in individual cases. Prerequisites: graduate standing. (S/U grades permitted.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIO 295S. Introduction to Marine Biodiversity and Conservation—Seminar (8)
Lectures on ecological, economic, social, and legal issues related to marine biodiversity and case studies on socioeconomic and legal issues. Students are expected to attend field trips at sea and to various sites around San Diego County as a part of the corequisite course. Students who have taken SIO 295 may not receive credit for SIO 295S. Corequisite: SIO 295LS. Prerequisites: MAS students only; consent of instructor. (Su)

SIO 295LS. Introduction to Marine Biodiversity and Conservation—Lab (8)
Laboratory work on major biological taxa, field trips on biodiversity in situ, computer labs for informatic tools. Students are expected to attend field trips at sea and to various sites around San Diego County as a part of the course. Students who have taken SIO 295L may not receive credit for SIO 295LS. Corequisite: SIO 295S. Prerequisites: MAS students only; consent of instructor. (Su)

SIO 299. Research (1–12)
(S/U grades only.) Staff (F,W,S)

SIO 500. Teaching Apprenticeship (1–4)
This practicum for graduate students provides experience in teaching undergraduate oceanography courses. Prerequisites: department approval. (S/U grades only.) Staff (F,W,S)

SXTH 1. First Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to Sixth College NFRS only.

SXTH 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to Sixth College transfer students only.

SXTH 20. Freshmen Honors Seminar (1)
Weekly seminars with faculty members from a variety of disciplines (chosen by the provost to match the interests of participating students). This seminar provides students with opportunities to learn more about research and scholarly activities being conducted by faculty and instill in students a sense of participation in the scholarly life at UC San Diego. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: by invitation only.

SOCI 1. Introduction to Sociology (4)
An introduction to the organizing themes and ideas, empirical concerns, and analytical approaches of the discipline of sociology. The course focuses on both classical and contemporary views of modern society, on the nature of community, and on inequality, with special attention to class, race, and gender. Materials include both theoretical statements and case studies. Will not receive credit for SOCI 1 and SOCL 1A.

SOCI 2. The Study of Society (4)
A continuation of Sociology/L 1A. The focus here is on socialization processes, culture, social reproduction and social control, and collective action. As in 1A, materials include both theoretical statements and case studies. While 1B may be taken as an independent course, it is recommended that students take 1A and 1B in sequence, as the latter builds on the former. Will not receive credit for SOCI 2 and SOCL 1B.

SOCI 10. American Society: Social Structure and Culture in the U.S. (4)
An introduction to American society in historical, comparative, and contemporary perspectives. Topics will include American cultural traditions; industrialization; class structure; the welfare state; ethnic, racial, and gender relations; the changing position of religion; social movements; and political trends. Will not receive credit for SOCI 10 and SOCL 10.

SOCI 20. Social Change in the Modern World (4)
A survey of the major economic, political, and social forces that have shaped the contemporary world. The course will provide an introduction to theories of social change, as well as prepare the student for upper-division work in comparative-historical sociology. Will not receive credit for SOCI 20 and SOCL 20.

SOCI 30. Science, Technology, and Society (4)
A series of case studies of the relations between society and modern science, technology, and medicine. Global warming, reproductive medicine, AIDS, and other topical cases prompt students to view science-society interactions as problematic and complex. Will not receive credit for SOCI 30 and SOCL 30.

SOCI 40. Sociology of Health-Care Issues (4)
Designed as a broad introduction to medicine as a social institution and its relationship to other institutions as well as its relation to society. It will make use of both micro and macro sociological work in this area and introduce students to sociological perspectives of contemporary health-care issues. Will not receive credit for SOCI 40 and SOCL 40.

SOCI 50. Introduction to Law and Society (4)
Interrelationships between law and society, in the U.S. and other parts of the world. We examine law’s norms, customs, culture, and institutions, and explain the proliferation of lawyers in the U.S. and the expansion of legal “rights” worldwide. Will not receive credit for SOCI 50 and SOCL 50.

SOCI 60. The Practice of Social Research (4)
This course introduces students to the fundamental principles of the design of social research. It examines the key varieties of evidence, sampling methods, logic of comparison, and causal reasoning researchers use in their study of social issues. Will not receive credit for SOCI 60 and SOCL 60.

SOCI 70. General Sociology for Premedical Students (4)
This introductory course is specifically designed for premedical students and will provide them with a broad introduction to sociological concepts and research, particularly as applied to medicine.

SOCI 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminar topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.

SOCI 98. Directed Group Study (4)
Small group study and research under the direction of an interested faculty member in an area not covered in regular sociology courses. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: lower-division standing; completion of thirty units of UC San Diego undergraduate study; minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0; completion and approval of Special Studies form. Consent of instructor and department approval required.

SOCI 99. Independent Study (4)
Individual study and research under the direction of an interested faculty member. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: lower-division standing; completion of thirty units of UC San Diego undergraduate study; minimum UC San Diego GPA of 3.0; completion and approval of Special Studies form. Consent of instructor and department approval required.

SOCI 100. Classical Sociological Theory (4)
Major figures and schools in sociology from the early nineteenth century onwards, including Marx, Tocqueville, Durkheim, and Weber. The objective of the course is to provide students with a background in classical social theory, and to show its relevance to contemporary sociology. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 100 and SOCA 100.

SOCI 102. Network Data and Methods (4)
Social network analysts view society as a web of relationships rather than a mere aggregation of individuals. In this course, students will learn how to collect, analyze, and visualize social network data, as well as utilize these techniques to answer an original sociological research question. Prerequisites: SOCI 60, upper-division standing.

SOCI 103M. Computer Applications to Data Management in Sociology (4)
Develop skills in computer management and analysis of sociological data. Practical experience with data produced by sociological research. Students will develop competency in the analysis of sociological data, by extensive acquaintance with computer software used for data analysis and management (e.g., SPSS). Prerequisites: SOCI 60. Will not receive credit for SOCI 103M and SOCA 103M.

SOCI 104. Field Research: Methods of Participant Observation (4)
Relationship between sociological theory and field research. Strong emphasis on theory and methods of participant observation: consideration of problems of entry into field settings, recording observations, description/analysis of field data, ethical problems in fieldwork. Required paper using field methods. Prerequisites: SOCI 60; majors only. Will not receive credit for SOCI 104 and SOCA 104.

SOCI 104Q. Qualitative Interviewing (4)
This course provides students with tools to conduct original research using qualitative interviews. Students will learn how to prepare, conduct, and analyze qualitative interviews. Special emphasis will be placed on the presentation of research in written form. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 104Q and SOCA 104Q.

SOCI 105. Ethnographic Film: Media Methods (6)
(Conjoined with Soc/G 227.) Ethnographic recording of field data in written and audiovisual formats including film, video, and CD-ROM applications. Critical assessment of ethnographies and audiovisual ethnographic videotape. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor for Soc/G 227 and SOCI for SOCI 105. Will not receive credit for SOCI 105 and SOCA 105.

SOCI 106. Comparative and Historical Methods (4)
A broad-based consideration of the use of historical materials in sociological analysis, especially as this facilitates empirically oriented studies across different societies and through time, and their application in student research projects. Prerequisites: SOCI 60. Will not receive credit for SOCI 106 and SOCA 106.

SOCI 106M. Holocaust Diaries (4)
Methods for interpreting diaries, letters, and testaments written by victims and perpetrators of the Holocaust. Students use these sources for original research about life in hiding, ghettos, and death camps. Includes techniques for making comparisons and for generalizing from evidence. Prerequisites: SOCI 60 and SOCI 178 or the consent of instructor. Will not receive credit for SOCI 106M and SOCA 106M.

SOCI 107. Epidemiological Methods: Statistical Study of Disease (4)
Epidemiology is the statistical study of disease, and epidemiological methods are a powerful tool for understanding the causes of certain diseases, e.g., AIDS, scurvy, cholera, and lung cancer. These fundamental epidemiological methods will be taught. Prerequisites: SOCI 60. Will not receive credit for SOCI 107 and SOCA 107.

SOCI 108. Survey Research Design (4)
Translation of research goals into a research design, including probability sampling, questionnaire construction, data collection (including interviewing techniques), data processing, coding, and preliminary tabulation of data. Statistical methods of analysis will be limited primarily to percentaging. Prerequisites: SOCI 60. Will not receive credit for SOCI 108 and SOCA 108.

SOCI 109. Analysis of Sociological Data (4)
Students test their own sociological research hypotheses using data from recent American and international social surveys and state-of-the-art computer software. Application of classical scientific method, interpretation of statistical results, and clear presentation of research findings. Prerequisites: SOCI 60. Will not receive credit for SOCI 109 and SOCA 109.

SOCI 110. Qualitative Research in Educational Settings (4)
Basic understanding of participant observation, interviewing, and other ethnographic research techniques through field experiences in school and community settings sponsored by CREATE. Students will learn to take field notes, write up interviews, and compose interpretive essays based on their field experiences. Prerequisites: SOCI 60 Will not receive credit for SOCI 110 and SOCA 110A.

SOCI 112. Social Psychology (4)
This course will deal with human behavior and personality development as affected by social group life. Major theories will be compared. The interaction dynamics of such substantive areas as socialization, normative and deviant behavior, learning and achievement, the social construction of the self, and the social identities will be considered. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 112 and SOCB 112.

SOCI 113. Sociology of the AIDS Epidemic (4)
This course considers the social, cultural, political, and economic aspects of HIV/AIDS. Topics include the social context of transmission; the experiences of women living with HIV; AIDS activism; representations of AIDS; and the impact of race and class differences. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 113 and SOCB 113.

SOCI 115. Social Problems (4)
Analyzes selected social problems in the United States, such as those regarding education, race relations, and wealth inequality from various sociological perspectives. The course also examines the various sites of debate discussion, like political institutions, TV and other media, and religious institutions. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 115 and SOCB 115.

SOCI 116. Gender and Language in Society (4)
(Same as LIGN 174.) This course examines how language contributes to the social construction of gender identities, and how gender impacts language use and ideologies. Topics include the ways language and gender interact across the life span (especially childhood and adolescence); within ethnolinguistic minority communities; and across cultures. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 116 and SOCB 118A.

SOCI 117. Language, Culture, and Education (4)
(Same as EDS 117.) The mutual influence of language, culture, and education will be explored; explanations of students’ school successes and failures that employ linguistic and cultural variables will be considered; bilingualism; cultural transmission through education. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 117 and SOCB 117.

SOCI 118. Sociology of Gender (4)
An analysis of the social, biological, and psychological components of becoming a man or a woman. The course will survey a wide range of information in an attempt to specify what is distinctively social about gender roles and identities; i.e., to understand how a most basic part of the “self”—womanhood or manhood—is socially defined and socially learned behavior. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 118 and SOCB 118.

SOCI 118E. Sociology of Language (4)
An examination of how the understanding of language can guide and inform sociological inquiries and a critical evaluation of key sociological approaches to language, including ethnomethodology, frame analysis, sociolinguistics, structuralism and poststructuralism, and others. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 118E and SOCB 118L.

SOCI 119. Sociology of Sexuality and Sexual Identities (4)
Introduction both to the sociological study of sexuality and to sociological perspectives in gay/lesbian studies. Examines the social construction of sexual meanings, identities, movements, and controversies; the relation of sexuality to other institutions; and the intersection of sexuality with gender, class, and race. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 119 and SOCB 119.

SOCI 120T. Special Topics in Culture, Language, and Social Interaction (4)
This course will examine key issues in culture, language, and social interaction. Content will vary from year to year. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 121. Economy and Society (4)
An examination of a central concern of classical social theory: the relationship between economy and society, with special attention (theoretically and empirically) on the problem of the origins of modern capitalism. The course will investigate the role of technology and economic institutions in society; the influence of culture and politics on economic exchange, production, and consumption; the process of rationalization and the social division of labor; contemporary economic problems and the welfare state. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 121 and SOCC 121.

SOCI 122. Social Networks (4)
This course takes a social network approach to the study of society, examining the complex web of relationships— platonic, familial, professional, romantic—in which individual behavior is embedded. Special emphasis is placed on the unprecedented opportunities created by contemporary social media (e.g. Facebook, mobile phones, online dating websites) for answering fundamental sociological questions. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 123 Japanese Culture Inside/Out: A Transnational Perspective (4)
We examine cultural production in Japan and abroad, national and transnational political-economic and social influences, the idea of Japan in the West, and the idea of the West in Japan. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 125. Sociology of Immigration (4)
Immigration from a comparative, historical, and cultural perspective. Topics include: factors influencing amount of immigration and destination of immigrants; varying modes of incorporation of immigrants; immigration policies and rights; the impact of immigration on host economies; refugees; assimilation; and return migration. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 125 and SOCB 125.

SOCI 126. Social Organization of Education (4)
(Same as EDS 126.) The social organization of education in the U.S. and other societies; the functions of education for individuals and society; the structure of schools; educational decision making; educational testing; socialization and education; formal and informal education; cultural transmission. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 126 and SOCC 126.

SOCI 127. Immigration, Race, and Ethnicity (4)
Examination of the role that race and ethnicity play in immigrant group integration. Topics include theories of integration, racial and ethnic identity formation, racial and ethnic change, immigration policy, public opinion, comparisons between contemporary and historical waves of immigration. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 127 and SOCB 127.

SOCI 129. The Family (4)
An examination of historical and social influences on family life. Analyzes contemporary families in the United States, the influences of gender, class, and race, and current issues such as divorce, domestic violence, and the feminization of poverty. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 129 and SOCC 129.

SOCI 130. Population and Society (4)
This course offers insight into why and how populations grow (and decline), and where and under what conditions changes in population size and/or structure change have positive and negative consequences for societies and environment. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 130 and SOCD 130.

SOCI 131. Sociology of Youth (4)
Chronological age and social status; analysis of social processes bearing upon the socialization of children and adolescents. The emergence of “youth cultures,” generational succession as a cultural problem. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 131 and SOCB 131.

SOCI 132. Gender and Work (4)
Examination and analysis of empirical research and theoretical perspectives on gender and work. Special attention to occupational segregation. Other topics include: the interplay between work and family; gender, work and poverty; gender and work in the Third World. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 132 and SOCC 132.

SOCI 133. Immigration in Comparative Perspective (4)
Societies across the world are confronting new immigration. In this course, we will focus on Europe, Asia, and North America, and examine issues of nationalism, cultural diversity and integration, economic impacts, and government policy. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 133 and SOCB 133.

SOCI 134. The Making of Modern Medicine (4)
A study of the social, intellectual, and institutional aspects of the nineteenth-century transformation of clinical medicine, examining both the changing content of medical knowledge and therapeutics, and the organization of the medical profession. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 134 and SOCC 134A.

SOCI 135. Medical Sociology (4)
An inquiry into the roles of culture and social structure in mediating the health and illness experiences of individuals and groups. Topics include the social construction of illness, the relationships between patients and health professionals, and the organization of medical work. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 135 and SOCC 135.

SOCI 136E. Sociology of Mental Illness: A Historical Approach (4)
An examination of the social, cultural, and political factors involved in the identification and treatment of mental illness. This course will emphasize historical material, focusing on the eighteenth, nineteenth, and early twentieth centuries. Developments in England as well as the United States will be examined from an historical perspective. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 136E and SOCC 136A.

SOCI 136F. Sociology of Mental Illness in Contemporary Society (4)
This course will focus on recent developments in the mental illness sector and on the contemporary sociological literature on mental illness. Developments in England as well as the United States will be examined. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 136F and SOCC 136B.

SOCI 137. Sociology of Food (4)
Topics include food as a marker of social differences (e.g., gender, class, ethnicity); the changing character of food production and distribution; food as an object of political conflict; and the symbolic meanings and rituals of food preparation and consumption. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 137 and SOCB 137.

SOCI 138. Genetics and Society (4)
The class will first examine the direct social effects of the “genetic revolution”: eugenics, genetic discrimination, and stratification. Second, the implications of thinking of society in terms of genetics, specifically—sociobiology, social Darwinism, evolutionary psychology, and biology. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 138 and SOCC 138.

SOCI 139. Social Inequality: Class, Race, and Gender (4)
Massive inequality in wealth, power, and prestige is ever-present in industrial societies. In this course, causes and consequences of class, gender, racial, and ethnic inequality (“stratification”) will be considered through examination of classical and modern social science theory and research. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 139 and SOCC 139.

SOCI 140. Sociology of Law (4)
This course analyzes the functions of law in society, the social sources of legal change, social conditions affecting the administration of justice, and the role of social science in jurisprudence. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 140 and SOCC 140.

SOCI 140F. Law and the Workplace (4)
This course examines how the US legal system has responded to workplace inequality and demands for employee rights. Particular attention is given to racial, gender, religious, and disability discrimination, as well as the law’s role in regulating unions, the global economy, and sweatshop labor. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 140F and SOCC 140F.

SOCI 141. Crime and Society (4)
A study of the social origins of criminal law, the administration of justice, causes, and patterns of criminal behavior, and the prevention and control of crime, including individual rehabilitation and institutional change, and the politics of legal, police, and correctional reform. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 141 and SOCC 141.

SOCI 142. Social Deviance (4)
This course studies the major forms of behavior seen as rule violations by large segments of our society and analyzes the major theories trying to explain them, as well as processes of rule making, rule enforcing, techniques of neutralization, stigmatization and status degradation, and rule change. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 142 and SOCB 142.

SOCI 143. Suicide (4)
Traditional and modern theories of suicide will be reviewed and tested. The study of suicide will be treated as one method for investigating the influence of society on the individual. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 143 and SOCB 143.

SOCI 144. Forms of Social Control (4)
The organization, development, and mission of social control agencies in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries, with emphasis on crime and madness; agency occupations (police, psychiatrists, correctional work, etc.); theories of control movements. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 144 and SOCC 144.

SOCI 145. Violence and Society (4)
Focusing on American history, this course explores violence in the light of three major themes: struggles over citizenship and nationhood; the drawing and maintenance of racial, ethnic, and gender boundaries; and the persistence of notions of “masculinity” and its relation to violence. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 145 and SOCB 145.

SOCI 147. Organizations, Society, and Social Justice (4)
Organizations are dynamic forces in society. This course examines how organizations address human health and social justice issues in national and international settings, focusing on the links between internal dynamics of organizations and macro-level political, economic, and cultural factors. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 147 and SOCC 147.

SOCI 148. Political Sociology (4)
Course focuses on the interaction between state and society. It discusses central concepts of political sociology (social cleavages, mobilization, the state, legitimacy), institutional characteristics, causes, and consequences of contemporary political regimes (liberal democracies, authoritarianism, communism), and processes of political change. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 148 and SOCC 148.

SOCI 148E. Inequality and Jobs (4)
Some people do much better than others in the world of work. Causes and consequences of this inequality will be examined: How do characteristics of individuals (e.g., class, gender, race, education, talent) and characteristics of jobs affect market outcomes? Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 148E and SOCC 148L.

SOCI 149. Sociology of the Environment (4)
The environment as a socially and technically shaped milieu in which competing values and interests play out. Relation of humanity to nature, conflicts between preservation and development, environmental pollution and contested illnesses. Will not receive credit for SOCI 149 and SOCC 149.

SOCI 150. Madness and the Movies (4)
Hollywood has had an ongoing obsession with mental illness. This course will examine a number of important or iconic films on this subject. By examining them against a background provided by relevant scholarly materials, we shall develop a critical perspective on these cultural artifacts. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 150 and SOCC 150.

SOCI 152. Social Inequality and Public Policy (4)
(Same as USP 133.) Primary focus on understanding and analyzing poverty and public policy. Analysis of how current debates and public policy initiatives mesh with alternative social scientific explorations of poverty. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 152 and SOCC 152.

SOCI 153. Urban Sociology (4)
(Same as USP 105.) Introduces students to the major approaches in the sociological study of cities and to what a sociological analysis can add to our understanding of urban processes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. Will not receive credit for SOCI 153 and SOCC 153.

SOCI 154. Religious Institutions in America (4)
Examination of sociological theories for why people have religious beliefs. Also examines types of religious organizations, secularization, fundamentalism, religion and immigration, religion and politics, and religiously inspired violence and terrorism. The class will tend to focus on the American context. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 154 and SOCC 154.

SOCI 155. The City of San Diego (4)
A research-oriented course studying a specific city. Students will describe and analyze a local community of San Diego. Additional work on one citywide institution. Guest lecturers from San Diego organizations and government. Readings largely from city reports and news media. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 155 and SOCC 155.

SOCI 156. Sociology of Religion (4)
Diverse sociological explanations of religious ideas and religious behavior. The social consequences of different kinds of religious beliefs and religious organizations. The influence of religion upon concepts of history, the natural world, human nature, and the social order. The significance of such notions as “sacred peoples” and “sacred places.” The religious-like character of certain political movements and certain sociocultural attitudes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 156 and SOCC 156.

SOCI 157. Religion in Contemporary Society (4)
Sacred texts, religious experiences, and ritual settings are explored from the perspective of sociological analysis. The types and dynamic of religious sects and institutions are examined. African and contemporary US religious data provide resources for lecture and comparative analysis. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 157 and SOCC 157.

SOCI 158. Islam in the Modern World (4)
The role of Islam in the society, culture, and politics of the Muslim people during the nineteenth and twentieth centuries; attempts by Muslim thinkers to accommodate or reject rival ideologies (such as nationalism and socialism); and a critical review of the relationship between Islam and the West. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 158 and SOCD 158.

SOCI 159. Special Topics in Social Organizations and Institutions (4)
Readings and discussion of particular substantive issues and research in the sociology of organizations and institutions, including such areas as population, economy, education, family, medicine, law, politics, and religion. Topics will vary from year to year. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 160. Sociology of Culture (4)
This course will examine the concept of culture, its “disintegration” in the twentieth century, and the repercussions on the integration of the individual. We will look at this process from a variety of perspectives, each focusing on one cultural fragment (e.g., knowledge, literature, religion) and all suggesting various means to reunify culture and consequently the individual. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 160 and SOCB 160.

SOCI 160E. Law and Culture (4)
This course examines major formulations of the relationship between law and culture in the sociological literature. Topics include formal law versus embedded law, law and morality, law and the self, legal consciousness, the rule of law, and the construction of legality. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 160E and SOCB 160L.

SOCI 161. Sociology of the Life Course (4)
This course explores concepts, theory and empirical research related to demographic, sociopsychological, and institutional aspects of the different stages of human development. It considers social influences on opportunities and constraints by gender, class, race/ethnicity, and historical period. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 161 and SOCB 161.

SOCI 162. Popular Culture (4)
An overview of the historical development of popular culture from the early modern period to the present. Also a review of major theories explaining how popular culture reflects and/or affects patterns of social behavior. Students may not receive credit for both SOCI 162 and SOCB 162. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 163. Migration and the Law (4)
Provides a global sociological perspective on the development and consequences of laws regulating migration within and across nation-state borders. The ability of the nation-state to control migration using law and its policy instruments. The effects of different legal statuses on political and socioeconomic outcomes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 163 and SOCC 163.

SOCI 165A. American News Media (4)
History, politics, social organization, and ideology of the American news media. This course,165A, surveys the development of the news media as an institution, from earliest newspapers to modern mass news media. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 165A and SOCC 165A.

SOCI 166. Sociology of Knowledge (4)
This course provides a general introduction to the development of the sociology of knowledge, and will explore questions concerning social determination of consciousness as well as theoretical ways to articulate a critique of ideology. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 166 and SOCB 166.

SOCI 167. Science and War (4)
This class examines how science has been mobilized in the development of nuclear weapons and other weapons of mass destruction. The class applies sociological concepts to the analysis of modern technological violence. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 167 and SOCC 167.

SOCI 168E. Sociology of Science (4)
A survey of theoretical and empirical studies concerning the workings of the scientific community and its relations with the wider society. Special attention will be given to the institutionalization of the scientific role and to the social constitution of scientific knowledge. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 168E and SOCC 168E.

SOCI 169. Citizenship, Community, and Culture (4)
Will survey the liberal, communitarian, social-democratic, nationalist, feminist, post-nationalist, and multicultural views on the construction of the modern citizen and good society. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 169 and SOCD 169.

SOCI 170. Gender and Science (4)
Scientific practices have had a tremendous impact on our understandings of gender. Gender relations have also significantly influenced the character of scientific inquiry. The course will consider how and why these two processes intertwine. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 171. Technology and Science (4)
Does improved technology mean progress? Or, are environmental pollution and social alienation signs that technology is out of control? This class uncovers the social problems of key modern technologies such as automobile transport, factory farming, biotechnology, and nuclear power. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 168T and SOCI 171.

SOCI 172. Films and Society (4)
An analysis of films and how they portray various aspects of American society and culture. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 172 and SOCB 172.

SOCI 175. Nationality and Citizenship (4)
Surveys the development of nationality and citizenship law in historical and comparative perspective with an emphasis on the United States, Latin America, and Europe. Examines competing sociological accounts for national variation and convergence; consequences of the law; and local, transnational, and extraterritorial forms of citizenship. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 175 and SOCD 175.

SOCI 177. International Terrorism (4)
(Same as POLI 1420.) This course covers the definitions, history, and internationalization of terrorism; the interrelation of religion, politics and terror; and the representation of terrorism in the media. A number of organizations and their activities in Europe and the Middle East are examined. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 177 and SOCD 177.

SOCI 178. The Holocaust (4)
The study of the unique and universal aspects of the Holocaust. Special attention will be paid to the nature of discrimination and racism, those aspects of modernity that make genocide possible, the relationship among the perpetrators, the victims and the bystanders, and the teaching, memory, and denial of the Holocaust. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 178 and SOCD 178.

SOCI 179. Social Change (4)
Course focuses on the development of capitalism as a worldwide process, with emphasis on its social and political consequences. Topics include: precapitalist societies, the rise of capitalism in the West, and the social and political responses to its expansion elsewhere. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 179 and SOCD 179.

SOCI 180. Social Movements and Social Protest (4)
An examination of the nature of protests and violence, particularly as they occur in the context of larger social movements. The course will further examine those generic facets of social movements having to do with their genesis, characteristic forms of development, relationship to established political configurations, and gradual fading away. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 180 and SOCC 180.

SOCI 181. Modern Western Society (4)
This course examines the nature and dynamics of modern western society in the context of the historical process by which this type of society has emerged over the last several centuries. The aim of the course is to help students think about what kind of society they live in, what makes it the way it is, and how it shapes their lives. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 181 and SOCD 181.

SOCI 182. Ethnicity and Indigenous Peoples in Latin America (4)
Ethnicity and the reassertion of Indian identity in contemporary Latin America. Issues related to these trends are examined in comparative perspective, with attention to changes in global conditions and in the socioeconomic, political, and cultural contexts of Latin American modernization. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 182 and SOCD 182.

SOCI 184. Gender and Film (4)
This class will examine issues of masculinity and femininity through analysis of films. Emphasis is on contemporary American society and will include varying issues such as race, class, and sexualities; worlds of work; romance, marriage, and family. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 184 and SOCC 184.

SOCI 185. Globalization and Social Development (4)
Social development is more than sheer economic growth. It entails improvements in the overall quality of human life, particularly in terms of access to health, education, employment, and income for the poorer sectors of the population. Course examines the impact of globalization on the prospects for attaining these goals in developing countries. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 185 and SOCD 185.

SOCI 187. African Societies through Film (4)
Exploration of contemporary African urbanization and social change via film, including 1) transitional African communities, 2) social change in Africa, 3) Western vs. African filmmakers’ cultural codes. Ideological and ethnographic representations, aesthetics, social relations, and market demand for African films are analyzed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 187 and SOCD 187.

SOCI 187E. The Sixties (4)
A sociological examination of the era of the 1960s in America, its social and political movements, its cultural expressions, and debates over its significance, including those reflected in video documentaries. Comparisons will also be drawn with events in other countries. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 187E and SOCD 187S.

SOCI 188D. Latin America: Society and Politics (4)
Course focuses on the different types of social structures and political systems in Latin America. Topics include positions in the world economy, varieties of class structure and ethnic cleavages, political regimes, mobilization and legitimacy, class alignments, reform and revolution. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 188D and SOCD 188D.

SOCI 188E. Community and Social Change in Africa (4)
The process of social change in African communities, with emphasis on changing ways of seeing the world and the effects of religion and political philosophies of social change. The methods and data used in various village and community studies in Africa will be critically examined. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 188E and SOCD 188A.

SOCI 188F. Modern Jewish Societies and Israeli Society (4)
Contradictory effects of modernization on Jewish society in Western and Eastern Europe and the plethora of Jewish responses: assimilation, fundamentalism, emigration, socialism, diaspora nationalism, and Zionism. Special attention will be paid to issues of discontinuity between Jewish societies and Israeli society. Simultaneously, we will scrutinize the influence of the Palestinian-Israeli conflict on Israeli society, state, and identity. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 188F and SOCD 188F.

SOCI 188G. Chinese Society (4)
The social structure of the People’s Republic of China since 1949, including a consideration of social organization at various levels: the economy, the policy, the community, and kinship institutions. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 188G and SOCD 188B.

SOCI 188I. The Israeli-Palestinian Conflict (4)
In this course we will examine the national and colonial dimensions of this long-lasting conflict and then turn our attention to the legal, governmental/political, and everyday aspects of the Israeli occupation of the West Bank and Gaza following the 1967 war. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 188J. Change in Modern South Africa (4)
Using sociological and historical perspectives, this course examines the origins and demise of apartheid and assesses the progress that has been made since 1994, when apartheid was officially ended. Contrasts of racism in South Africa and the United States. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 188J and SOCD 188J.

SOCI 188K. American Society (4)
Comparative and historical perspectives on US society. The course highlights “American exceptionalism”: Did America follow a special historical path, different from comparable nations in its social relations, politics, and culture? Specific topics include class relations, race, religion, and social policy. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Will not receive credit for SOCI 188K and SOCD 188K.

SOCI 188M. Social Movements in Latin America (4)
Course examines theories of social movements and changing patterns of popular protest and contentious mobilization in Latin America since the mid-twentieth century. Case studies include populism, guerrillas, liberation theology and movements of workers, peasants, women, and indigenous groups. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 188O. Settlements and Peacemaking in Israel (4)
We will examine the social, political, and religious factors that affect the nexus of Israeli settlements and Israeli-Arab and Israeli-Palestinian peace making. Special attention will be paid to the period after the 1967 War when these processes begun as well as to alternative resolutions to the conflict. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 189. Special Topics in Comparative-Historical Sociology (4)
Readings and discussion in selected areas of comparative and historical macrosociology. Topics may include the analysis of a particular research problem, the study of a specific society or of cross-national institutions, and the review of different theoretical perspectives. Contents will vary from year to year. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

SOCI 192. Senior Seminar in Sociology (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in sociology (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: instructor permission or department stamp, upper-division standing.

SOCI 194. Research Seminar in Washington, DC (4)
(Same as PS 194, COGN 194, ERTH 194, HIST 193, USP 194.) Course attached to six-unit internship taken by students participating in the UCDC Program. Involves weekly seminar meetings with faculty and teaching assistant and a substantial research paper. Prerequisites: department approval. Participating in UCDC Program. Will not receive credit for SOCI 194 and SOCE 194.

SOCI 196A. Honors Seminar: Advanced Studies in Sociology (4)
This seminar will permit honors students to explore advanced issues in the field of sociology. It will also provide honors students the opportunity to develop a senior thesis proposal on a topic of their choice and begin preliminary work on the honors thesis under faculty supervision. Prerequisites: acceptance into Department of Sociology Honors Program.

SOCI 196B. Honors Seminar: Supervised Thesis Research (4)
This seminar will provide honors candidates the opportunity to complete research on and preparation of a senior honors thesis under close faculty supervision. Prerequisites: completion of SOCI 196A.

SOCI 198. Directed Group Study (4)
Group study of specific topics under the direction of an interested faculty member. Enrollment will be limited to a small group of students who have developed their topic and secured appropriate approval from the departmental committee on independent and group studies. These studies are to be conducted only in areas not covered in regular sociology courses. Prerequisites: junior standing and departmental approval required.

SOCI 199. Independent Study (4)
Tutorial: individual study under the direction of an interested faculty member in an area not covered by the present course offerings. Approval must be secured from the departmental committee on independent studies. Prerequisites: junior standing and departmental approval required.

Soc/G 201A. Classical Sociological Theory I (4)
A discussion of major themes in the work of Tocqueville and Marx. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 201B. Classical Sociological Theory II (4)
A discussion of major themes in the work of Weber and Durkheim. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 202. Contemporary Sociological Theory (4)
Themes important for social theory at the turn of the twenty-first century: Marxism (Gramsci, Althusser), critical theory (Adorno, Habermas), interpretation (Geertz), social systems (Parsons), post-structuralism (Foucault), postmodernism, and social constructivism (Bourdieu). Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 203. Field Methods (4)
Research will be conducted in field settings. The primary focus will be on mastering the problems and technical skills associated with the conduct of ethnographic and participant observational studies. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 204. Text and Discourse Analysis (4)
Techniques of gathering and analyzing transcripts of naturally occurring conversations, interviews, discourse in institutional settings, public political discourse, and text of historical materials. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 205. Quantitative Methods I (4)
This course covers some of the elementary techniques used 1) to select random samples, 2) to detect statistical patterns in the sample data, and 3) to determine whether any patterns found in sample data are statistically significant. The course also stresses the benefits and drawbacks of survey and aggregate data and some common ways in which these data are used incorrectly. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 206. Quantitative Methods II (4)
The course covers some of the more advanced techniques used 1) to select random samples, 2) to detect statistical patterns in the sample data, and 3) to determine whether any patterns found in sample data are statistically significant. The course also stresses the benefits and drawbacks of survey and aggregate data and some common ways in which these data are used incorrectly. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 207. Comparative-Historical Methods (4)
A broad-based consideration of the use of historical materials in sociological analysis, especially as this facilitates empirically oriented studies across different societies and through time. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 208. Faculty Research Seminar (2)
An introduction for entering graduate students to the range and variety of research and scholarly interest of the department’s faculty. Through this introduction students will be better able to relate their own research interests and professional objectives to the ongoing work of faculty. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology. (S/U grades only.)

Soc/G 209. Social Networks (4)
This course provides an accessible, graduate level introduction to social network analysis as a theoretical and methodological approach—one takes relationships rather than individuals as the fundamental unit of analysis. While the course will focus on concepts and applications rather than statistical models, students will also become acquainted with basic analytic techniques as well as learn how to collect, store, inspect, and visualize original network data. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 211. Introduction to Computational Social Science (4)
This course provides an overview and practical, hands-on introduction to some of the common tools employed in computational approaches to social science research. Students will acquire sufficient skills to use existing tools to conduct computational social science research, such as basic Python language. Recommended preparation: knowledge of or background in statistics. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 212. Social Stratification (4)
The causes and effects of social ranking in various societies. Theories of stratification; the dynamics of informal social grouping; determinants of institutional power, and the nature of struggles for power; the distribution of wealth and its causes; the dynamics of social mobility; the effects of stratification on life-styles, culture, and deviance. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 214 Urban Sociology (4)
A survey of topics in urban sociology, including the city and suburb as social forms, civility among strangers, urbanism and culture, the political economy of metropolitan development, urban poverty, and racial residential segregation. Classical and contemporary approaches will be considered. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 216. Sociology of Culture (4)
The history of the concept of culture; cultural pluralism in advanced industrialized societies; the differentiation of cultural institutions; cultural policy and social structure; culture as a property of social groups; conflict and accommodation over efforts to change and sustain traditional culture.

Soc/G 222. Social Movements (4)
An examination of theories accounting for the causes and consequences of social movements, including a discussion of the strengths and weaknesses of such theories for understanding historically specific revolutions, rebellions, and violent and nonviolent forms of protest in various parts of the world. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 226. Political Sociology (4)
This course discusses the relationship between state and society in a comparative perspective. The focus is on the interaction among states, domestic economic elites, and external economic and political processes in the determination of different developmental paths. Analytically, it includes topics such as characteristics and functions of the state in different types of society throughout history (with an emphasis on the varieties of capitalist and socialist state), the autonomy of the state and its causes in different settings, and developmental and predatory consequences of state activity. Readings will include both theoretical and empirical materials, the latter dealing mostly with nineteenth- and twentieth-century Europe and twentieth-century Latin America. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 227. Ethnographic Film: Media Methods (6)
Ethnographic recording of field data in written and audiovisual formats, including film, video, and CD-ROM applications. Critical assessment of ethnographies and audiovisual data in terms of styles, format, and approaches. Graduate students are required to submit a fifteen-page mid-term paper comparing a written and an audiovisual ethnography and a final video ethnography with a project abstract. Prerequisites: graduate standing; SOCI 1, SOCI 2; or consent of instructor.

Soc/G 232. Advanced Issues in the Sociology of Knowledge (4)
The social construction of knowledge and the social institutions in which these processes take place are examined. Topics include relationships between knowledge and social institutions, foundations of knowledge in society, knowledge and social interactions, and contrasting folk and specialized theories. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 234. Intellectual Foundation of the Study of Science, Technology, and Medicine (4)
This course focuses on some classic methodological and theoretical resources upon which the sociology of science, technology, and medicine all draw. It gives special attention to relationships between knowledge and social order, and between knowledge and practice, that are common to science, technology, and medicine. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 238. Survey of the Sociology of Scientific Knowledge (4)
An introduction to some enduring topics in the sociology of scientific knowledge and to some resources for addressing them. Attention is drawn to problems of accounting for scientific order and change, and to recurrent debates over the proper method for sociological accounts of science. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

Soc/G 243. Sociology of Social Control (4)
An examination of the sociological literature on social control, looking at theoretical developments over time and examining the contemporary literature dealing with social control in historical and comparative perspective. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

Soc/G 244. Sociology of Race and Ethnicity (4)
Analysis of enduring topics in the study of race and ethnicity, including stratification, discrimination conflict, immigration, assimilation, and politics. Other topics include racial and ethnic identity and the social construction of race and ethnic categories. A special focus is on the role of ‘culture’ and ‘structure’ for explaining race/ethnic differentiation. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 245. Gender, Work, and the Economy (4)
This course studies social constructions of gender within economic opportunities and constraints. We read classical sociological theory on this topic; feminist critiques; and newer research on careers, organizations, and markets. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 246. The Welfare State (4)
Surveys major theories of the development and functioning of the welfare state, addressing the roles of economic development, political institutions, stratification, and culture. The course focuses on the development of the US social provision in comparison with other advanced industrial societies.

Soc/G 247. Madness and Society (4)
An examination of changing Western responses from the age of Bedlam to the age of Prozac. Topics include: the rise and decline of the total institution; the emergence of psychiatry; changing cultural meanings of madness; and the therapeutics of mental disorder. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 252. Research Practicum I (4)
In this seminar students work on a research project, which might have originated in a paper written for another course. The goal is to produce the first draft of a paper that will be submitted to an academic journal. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 253. Research Practicum II (4)
In this seminar students revise an existing research paper (usually the one they wrote for Sociology 252) for submission to an academic journal. Emphasis is placed on conceptual development, writing style and structure, and drawing links to the existing theoretical and empirical literature. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 255A. Introduction to Science Studies (4)
(Same as Phil 209A, HIGR 238, and COGR 225A.) Study and discussion of classic work in history of science, sociology of science, and philosophy of science, and of work that attempts to develop a unified science studies approach. Required for all students in the Science Studies Program. Prerequisites: enrollment in Science Studies Program.

Soc/G 255B. Seminar in Science Studies (4)
(Same as Phil 209B, HIGR 239, and COGR 225B.) Study and discussion of selected topics in the science studies field. Required for all students in the Science Studies Program. Prerequisites: enrollment in Science Studies Program.

Soc/G 255C. Colloquium in Science Studies (4)
(Same as Phil 209C, HIGR 240, and COGR 225C.) A forum for the presentation and discussion of research in progress in science studies, by graduate students, faculty, and visitors. Required of all students in the Science Studies Program. Prerequisites: enrollment in the Science Studies Program.

Soc/G 255D. Advanced Approaches to Science Studies (4)
(Same as COGR 225D, HIGR 241, Phil 209D.) Focus on recent literature in the history, philosophy, and sociology of science, technology, and medicine. Required of all students in the Science Studies Program. Prerequisites: Soc/G 255A is a prerequisite for Soc/G 255D; enrollment in Science Studies Program or instructor’s permission.

Soc/G 258. Institutional Change in the Contemporary World; Latin American Societies in a Comparative Perspective (4)
This course explores institutional change in contemporary Latin America, and compares this area with other transitional societies. Issues include social consequences of economic liberalization, changing forms of inequality, dynamics of civil society, conceptions of citizenship, quality and future of democracy. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

Soc/G 263. Graduate Seminar in the Sociology of Art (4)
This seminar explores the production and interpretation of art forms in cross-cultural context. Processes of symbolic and economic exchange in art worlds will be examined from sociological and semiotic perspectives. Contemporary and popular art forms will be analyzed as types of cultural reproduction. Graduate students will be required to submit a project abstract and final research paper of twenty-seven pages. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 264. Economic Sociology (4)
This course provides an overview of the classical and current debates in the economic sociology literature. It presents theories of the rise of industrial economics and addresses how economic activities are constituted and influenced by institutions, culture, and social structure. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 267. Sociology of Gender (4)
Course examines social construction of gender focusing on recent contributions to the field, including micro- and macro-level topics, i.e., social psychological issues in the development of gender, gender stratification in the labor force, gender and social protest, feminist methodologies. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 269. The Citizenship Debates (4)
Will examine the controversies surrounding the construction of the modern citizen and the good society of the liberal outlook, and their alternatives in the communitarian, social-democratic, nationalist, feminist, and multiculturalist perspectives. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 278. Immigration, Assimilation, and Identity (4)
This course focuses on theoretical and empirical approaches to the study of immigration, assimilation, and identity. The course will focus primarily on the post-1965 immigrants, but consideration will also be given to earlier waves of immigration. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 282. Immigration and Citizen (4)
Alternative theories of the relations of immigrants and host societies, and an examination on the debates on, and dynamic of, immigration expansion and restriction. Comparison of the bearing of liberal, communitarian, and ethnic citizenship discourses on the inclusion and exclusion of immigrants and their descendants. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 284. Contemporary Biomedicine (4)
Develops central themes in medical sociology in order to understand twentieth- and twenty-first century medical practice and research. Topics include authority and expertise; health inequalities; managed care; health activism; biomedical knowledge production; and the construction of medical objects and subjects. Prerequisites: graduate standing.

Soc/G 288. Knowledge Capitalism (4)
This seminar examines the place of scientific knowledge and information and communication technology in the transformation of capitalist economy and society. The class explores new interactions between science studies and social theory of advanced capitalism. Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 290. Graduate Seminar (4)
A research seminar in special topics of interest to available staff, provides majors and minors in sociology with research experience in close cooperation with faculty. (S/U grades permitted.) Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 298. Independent Study (1–8)
Tutorial individual guides study and/or independent research in an area not covered by present course offerings. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology; departmental approval.

Soc/G 299. Thesis Research (1–12)
Open to graduate students engaged in thesis research. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology.

Soc/G 500. Apprentice Teaching (2–4)
Supervised teaching in lower-division contact classes, supplemented by seminar on methods in teaching sociology. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing in sociology. Technology done under the direction of a faculty member. College stamp required. Pass/Not Pass grade only.

TDAC 1. Introduction to Acting (4)
A beginning course in the fundamentals of acting: establishing a working vocabulary and acquiring the basic skills of the acting process. Through exercises, compositions, and improvisations, the student actor explores the imagination as the actor’s primary resource, and the basic approach to text through action. Prerequisites: none.

TDAC 101. Acting I (4)
This course focuses on beginning scene study with an emphasis on exploring action/objective and the given circumstances of a selected text. Prerequisites: THAC or TDAC 1 or consent of instructor.

TDAC 102. Acting II (4)
Further study in the application of the given circumstances to a text and the development of characterization. Prerequisites: TDAC 101.

TDAC 103A. Acting Intensive I (4)
An intensive foundation class for students interested in professional actor training. Using Viewpoints, students will train the physical, vocal, and emotional aspects of their actor instrument toward developing character and relationships by using scenes from contemporary and modern plays. Prerequisites: TDAC 102.

TDAC 103B. Acting Intensive II (4)
A continuation of TDAC 103A. Working from Meisner technique, students will learn to deepen and detail their objectives, spontaneous response, and deep listening skills. Focus on the process that will lead to scene work using this technique. Prerequisites: TDAC 103A, department stamp, and consent of instructor.

TDAC 104. Classical Text (4)
Studies in the heightened realities of poetic drama. Verse analysis, research, methods and how to approach a classical dialogue. Prerequisites: THAC or TDAC 102, and department stamp.

TDAC 105. Rehearing Shakespeare (4)
Advanced exploration of Shakespeare’s language through examining and performing scenes from the plays. Admission by audition/interview. Prerequisites: THAC 102 or TDAC 102, department stamp, interview/audition, consent of instructor.

TDAC 106. Chekhov Acting (4)
Practical exercises, discussion, text analysis, and scene work on the writings of Anton Chekhov. Admission by audition/interview. Prerequisites: THAC 101 or TDAC 101, THAC 102 or TDAC 102, interview/audition, and consent of instructor.

TDAC 107. Improvisation for the Theatre (4)
Improvisation for the Theatre explores improvisation techniques as an alternative and unique approach to acting. Students should have a performance background. Prerequisites: THAC or TDAC 1.

TDAC 108. Advanced Topics (4)
Advanced topics in acting, such as avant-garde drama, commedia, or Beckett, for students who possess basic acting techniques. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: TDAC 102.

TDAC 109. Singing for Actors (4)
This course introduces basic skills of breathing, placement, diction, musicianship, harmony, interpretation, and presentation needed by actors for roles requiring singing. Through a combination of group and individual coaching in class, students will prepare a program of short solo and ensemble pieces for a finals-week presentation. Prerequisites: THAC or TDAC 1 and audition; department stamp.

TDAC 110. Acting for the Camera (4)
This course is designed to aid the actor in the transition from stage to film work. Examination of film production and its physical characteristics and the acting style needed for work in film and television. Students will perform in simulated studio setting on camera. Prerequisites: TDAC 102.

TDAC 111. Freeing the Voice (4)
Intensive workshop for actors and directors designed to “free the voice,” with special emphasis on characteristics and vocal flexibility in a wide range of dramatic texts. This proven method combines experimental and didactic learning with selected exercises, texts, tapes, films, and total time commitment. Prerequisites: TDAC 101 and audition/interview required.

TDAC 112. Major Seminar in Acting (4)
An in-depth study seminar focused on special issues in acting as they relate to contemporary theatre. Of particular interest to students who plan to pursue a career in this area of theatre. Prerequisites: department stamp; theatre majors only; upper-division only.

TDAC 115. Movement for Actors (4)
An exploration of the wide array of physical skills necessary for the actor. Using techniques derived from mime, clowning, sports, acrobatics, and improvisation, students will investigate their individual physical potential as well as their sense of creativity and imagination. Prerequisites: THAC or TDAC 101.

TDAC 120. Ensemble (4)
An intensive theatre practicum designed to generate theatre created by an ensemble with particular emphasis upon the analysis of text. Students will explore and analyze the script and its author. Ensemble segments include black theatre, Chicano theatre, feminist theatre, and commedia dell’arte. Audition may be required. A maximum of four units may be used for major credit. (Cross-listed with ETHN 146A.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDAC 122. Ensemble: Undergraduate Production (4)
Participation in a fully staged theatre production directed by an MFA or PhD student for the Department of Theatre and Dance. Admission by audition only. A maximum of four units may be used for major credit. Prerequisites: consent of the instructor; department stamp.

TDAC 123. Advanced Studies in Performance (4)
Participation in a fully staged season production that is directed by a faculty member or guest for the Department of Theatre and Dance. Admission by audition only. A maximum of four units may be used for major credit. Prerequisites: consent of the instructor; department stamp.

TDCH 40. Principles of Choreography (4)
Presents the fundamentals of the concepts, elements, aesthetics, and process of choreographic creation through practical studies, discussions, and examination of theories and major choreographic works. Prerequisites: TDTR 10.

TDCH 140. Improvisation/Composition (4)
The study of compositional and improvisation methods concerning the aesthetic awareness of movement, and organization of elements in time, space, and energy. Both structured and unstructured tasks facilitate development of movement vocabulary, imagination, timing, spontaneity, contact skills, and compositional choices. Prerequisites: TDTR 10.

TDCH 142. Choreographic Workshop (4)
Advanced problem solving through practical and conceptual studies. Choreographic projects enable students to create short works for solo, duet, and small group situations, with options of focus on cross-media collaboration, site specific work, dramatic text, and advanced partner work. Prerequisites: TDTR 10, TDCH 40.

TDCH 143. Choreography and Dramatic Text (4)
Choreographic problems in movement style and purpose will be explored through analysis of both historical and contemporary dramatic text. Emphasis will be places on dance as a complement to verbal communication and a medium for nonverbal communication. Prerequisites: TDTR 10, TDCH 40.

TDCH 147. Choreography: Dance and Society (4)
Explores the dynamic intersections between dance, society, and politics facilitating the creation of authentic choreography. The course focuses on current political issues in society, embodied practices, and choice making for the choreographic process. Prerequisites: TDTR 10 and TDCH 40.

TDCH 190. Major Project in Choreography (4)
Students independently create a significant choreographed dance work that engages in original concepts and aesthetics while developing the skills of dance-making, culminating in a dance concert or performance. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: TDCH 40 and consent of instructor.

TDCH 196A. Senior Honors Focus Choreographic (4)
Selected seniors create a significant choreographic work or media project under faculty mentorship for presentation in the studio theatre, spring dance production, or site-specific alternative location. All courses in the choreography series must be completed or concurrent with the senior honors focus. Individual honors contract for selected senior dance majors. Honors content noted on transcript. Requirements: 3.5 overall GPA, 3.7 major GPA, 90 units completed, and two-quarter commitment. Prerequisites: TDCH 40, TDCH 140, TDCH 142, TDCH 145, consent of instructor, and department stamp. May be taken two times for credit.

TDCH 196B. Senior Honors Focus Choreographic (4)
Continuation of TDCH 196A. Selected seniors present a significant choreographic work or media project under faculty mentorship in the studio theatre, spring dance production, or site-specific alternative location. All courses in the choreography series must be completed or concurrent with the senior honors focus. Individual honors contract for selected senior dance majors. Honors content noted on transcript. Requirements: 3.5 overall GPA, 3.7 major GPA, ninety units completed, and two-quarter commitment. Prerequisites: TDCH 40, TDCH 140, TDCH 142, TDCH 145, TDCH 196A, consent of instructor, and department stamp. May be taken two times for credit.

TDDE 1. Introduction to Design for the Theatre (4)
A survey of contemporary and historical concepts and practices in the visual arts of the theatre; studies in text analysis, studio processes and technical production; elementary work in design criticism, scale model making, and costume design. A course serving as an introduction to theatre design and production.

TDDE 101. Theatre Process—Scenery (4)
A hands-on course develops craft skills and solution-finding process in design including script analysis, concept sketches, research, and scale model making. An exploration of fundamental ways of seeing and understanding visual design. Prerequisites: THDE or TDDE 1 or THPR 1.

TDDE 102. Advanced Scenic Design (4)
An advanced course based on the “practice” of scenic design, dealing with the solution finding process, from text to idea to realized work. Prerequisites: THDE or TDDE 1, THDE or TDDE 101, or consent of instructor.

TDDE 111. Theatre Process—Costume Design (4)
The process of the costume designer from script analysis and research visualization of ideas, through the process of costume design. Lecture and demonstration labs parallel lecture material. This course is intended for those interested in a basic understanding of the costumer’s process. No previous drawing or painting skills required. Prerequisites: THDE or TDDE 1.

TDDE 112. Advanced Costume Design (4)
An advanced course based on the “practice” of costume design, dealing with the solution finding process, from text to idea to realized work. Prerequisites: THDE or TDDE 1, THDE or TDDE 111, or consent of instructor.

TDDE 121. Theatre Process—Lighting Design (4)
One of three classes in theatre process. The course aims to develop basic skills in lighting design through practical projects, lab work and lecture. These emphasize collaborating, manipulating light and color, and developing craft skills. Prerequisites: THDE or TDDE 1 or THPR or TDPR 3 or consent of instructor.

TDDE 130. Assistant Designer (2–6)
A production-oriented course that continues to introduce students to the fundamentals of design assisting. Laboratory format allows the student to work with faculty, graduate, or advanced undergraduate theatre designers, doing research, developing design concepts, and supporting the designer in a number of professional ways. Prerequisites: THDE or TDDE 1, any upper-division undergraduate theatre design class, THPR or TDPR 1, 2, 3, or 5; and consent of instructor; department stamp. May be taken twice for credit.

TDDE 131. Special Topics in Theatre Design (4)
A course designed to expose the theatre design students to a variety of specialized topics that will vary from quarter to quarter. Prerequisites: THDE or TDDE 1 or consent of instructor. May be taken three times for credit.

TDDE 132. Undergraduate Main Stage Production: Design (4)
A course that will guide a student in a design assignment on the undergraduate main stage production. Specialized topics dependent on the design requirements of the production. Prerequisites: THDE or TDDE 1 and THDE or TDDE 101 or THDE or TDDE 121, or THDE or TDDE 131, or consent of instructor. May be taken three times for credit.

TDDE 141. Theatre Process—Sound Design (4)
A hands-on course on the process of sound design from conception to planning and implementation. The course will concentrate equally on the technical and artistic aspects of the sound design process and will include a survey of modern audio technologies. Prerequisites: TDPR 5 or TDPR 6 or TDDE 1 or MUS 173 or consent of instructor.

TDDE 142. Advanced Sound Design (4)
This course focuses on advancing students in their artistic and technical skills in sound design. A large-scale project will be identified with special attention given to text analysis and technical specification of the sound design. Prerequisites: TDDE 1 and TDDE 141 or equivalent, or consent of instructor.

TDDE 151. Digital Video Design (4)
This course will examine the field of projection design for theatre and dance performance. Students will study and produce original works based on the theoretical and aesthetic approaches of animation, film, performance, and installation art that influence contemporary projection design. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDDE 169A. Digital Rendering for Theatre and Performance Design I (4)
Introductory course that explores a variety of digital rendering methods for artistic 2-D, 3-D, and moving graphics visualization in theatre and performance design. Course objective is to synthesize and expand traditional drawing and painting methods with modern digital media-based applications. Prerequisites: none.

TDDE 169B. Digital Rendering for Theatre and Performance Design II (4)
A continuation of TDDE 169A. Studio course explores advanced digital rendering methods for artistic 2-D, 3-D, and moving graphics for theatre and performance design. Focus will be on advanced techniques in the process of visualization from conception to production. Prerequisites: TDDE 169A.

TDDE 190. Major Project in Design/Theatre Production (4)
For the advanced design/production student. Concentration on a particularly challenging design or theatre production assignment, including such areas as assistant designer (scenery, lighting, or costumes), technical director, master cutter, or master electrician. May be repeated one time for credit. A maximum of eight units of major project study, regardless of area (design, directing, or stage management) may be used to fulfill major requirements. Prerequisites: admission by consent of instructor only. See department for application form. May be taken two times for credit.

TDDR 101. Stage Management (4)
Discussion and research into the duties, responsibilities, and roles of a stage manager. Work to include studies in script analysis, communication, rehearsal procedures, performance skills, and style and conceptual approach to theatre. THGE or TDGE 1, THAC or TDAC 1, and THDE or TDDE 1 recommended.

TDDR 108. Text Analysis for Actors and Directors (4)
This is an introductory class in the process of understanding the play script. The class will focus on analyzing the story and the underlying dramatic structure in terms of dramatic action. Objectives, actions, choices, given circumstances, and character will be examined. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDDR 111. Directing-Acting Process (4)
A studio class that investigates the fundamental skills a director needs to work with actors. Working with actors, students learn how to animate the text onstage through status exercises and scene work as they develop their skill in text work, staging, and dramatic storytelling. Prerequisites: THDR or TDDR 108 or THHS or TDHT 10.

TDDR 190. Major Project in Directing (4)
For the advanced student in directing. Intensive concentration on the full realization of a dramatic text from research and analysis through rehearsal and into performance. A maximum of eight units of major project study, regardless of area (design, directing, or stage management) may be used to fulfill major requirements. See department for application. Prerequisites: THDR or TDDR 108, THDR or TDDR 111, consent of instructor, and department stamp. May be taken two times for credit.

TDDR 191. Major Project in Stage Management (4)
For the advanced student in stage management. Intensive concentration on the full realization of a dramatic text, from research and analysis through rehearsal and final performance. A maximum of eight units of major project study regardless of area (design, directing, stage management, or playwriting) may be used to fulfill major requirements. See department for application. Prerequisites: THPR or TDPR 4, THPR or TDPR 104, THDR or TDDR 101, consent of instructor, and department stamp. May be taken two times for credit.

TDGE 1. Introduction to Theatre (4)
An introduction to fundamental concepts in drama and performance. Students will attend performances and learn about how the theatre functions as an art and as an industry in today’s world. Prerequisites: none.

TDGE 3. Cultivating the Creative Mind (4)
This course will use the theatrical context to integrate scientific research about creativity, group dynamics, and related topics. Through a mix of theoretical and experiential classes and assignments, we will explore the intersection of theatre and neuroscience, investigating and expanding the creative mind. Prerequisites: none

TDGE 5. A Glimpse into Acting (4)
An introductory course on acting fundamentals for students without an acting background. Through analysis of acting on film, students will explore the actor’s craft and practice these skills in studio exercises to better understand how an actor approaches a text. Prerequisites: none.

TDGE 10. Theatre and Film (4)
Theatre and Film analyzes the essential differences between theatrical and cinematic approaches to drama. Through selected play/film combinations, the course looks at how the director uses actors and the visual languages of the stage and screen to guide and stimulate the audience’s responses. Prerequisites: none.

TDGE 11. Great Performances on Film (4)
Course examines major accomplishments in screen acting from the work of actors in films or in film genres. Prerequisites: none. May be taken three times for credit.

TDGE 12. Topics in Cinema and Race (4)
This course explores filmed representations of race and diversity and examines works by underrepresented filmmakers. Course topics vary; they include African American film, Latino/a film, Asian American film, films by Spike Lee, stereotypes on film, and other such topics. Students may not enroll in the same topic of TDGE 12 that they have already taken in TDGE 11, Great Performances on Film. This will count as a duplicate of credit for repeating the same film topic. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: none.

TDGE 25. Public Speaking (4)
This course is designed to establish a clear understanding of the fundamentals of effective oral communication. The methodologies explore the integration of relaxation, concentration, organization, and clear voice and diction as applied to various public speaking modes. Prerequisites: none.

TDGE 50. Musical Theatre Chorus (2)
Study and perform selected songs from American musical theatre. Open to all students. No audition required. Attendance at rehearsals and performance are mandatory. P/NP grades only. May be taken six times for credit. Prerequisites: none. 

TDGE 87. Freshman Seminar in Theatre and Dance (1)
Seminar on a topic in theatre or dance on a level appropriate for first-year students, conducted in an informal, small group setting limited to ten to twenty students. Topics will vary. Prerequisites: open to freshmen only.

TDGE 89. Dance Movement Exploration (2)
An introduction to dance movement and understanding your body. A contemporary approach to dancing and its many genres as an expressive medium and form of communication. A movement course but no dance training or background in dance needed. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: none.

TDGE 105. Exploring Acting (4)
An acting course for nonmajors, building on the acting fundamentals developed in TDGE 5. Using analysis of film acting to practice in studio exercises and scene work, student actors learn to approach a text using imagination as their primary tool. Prerequisites: TDGE 5 or consent of instructor.

TDGE 124. Cult Films: Weirdly Dramatic (4)
A select survey of eight to ten exceptional offbeat, frequently low-budget films from the last sixty years that have attained cult status. The mix includes Tod Browning’s Freaks (1932) to John Water’s Pink Flamingos (1973). Aspects of bad taste, cinematic irony, and theatrical invention will be highlighted. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

TDGE 125. Topics in Theatre and Film (4)
Great films and the performance of the actors in them are analyzed in their historical, cinematic, or theatrical contexts. This course examines the actor’s contribution to classic cinema and the social and aesthetic forces at work in film. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDGE 126. Storytelling and Design in Animation (4)
This course will use a broad range of animation styles and genres to examine larger issues in art practice, focusing closely on the relationship between form and content, and how sound/set/costume/character design impacts narrative. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDGE 131. Playing Indian: Native American and First Nations Cinema (4)
This course examines recent movies by Native American/First Nations artists that labor to deconstruct and critique reductive stereotypes about America's First Peoples in Hollywood cinema. Carving spaces of “visual sovereignty” (Raheja), these films propose complex narratives and characterizations of indigeneity. Students may not receive credit for both TDGE 131 and ETHN 163F. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDGE 133. Visual Ideas (4)
An exploration of fundamental ways of seeing and thinking about the performance space. A look at the design process as it reflects styles and attitudes through an examination of text/image/meaning/message in theatre, dance, opera, and visual arts. With a special emphasis on the “solution-finding process” in design, as a leap from text to context, to finalized design. Prerequisites: TDDE 1 or consent of instructor.

TDGE 134. Disability and Performative Exploration: Struggle for Inclusion (4)
This class examines disability in the performative context, exploring the representation of people with disabilities and the struggle for access and inclusion. The frame of advocacy, understanding, and creative collaboration will deepen the historical perspective on disability. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDGE 192. Senior Seminar in Theatre and Dance (1)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in theatre and dance (at the upper-division level). Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and permission of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. Prerequisites: senior standing; department stamp and/or consent of instructor.

TDGE 196A. Honors Study in Theatre (4)
Theatre honors students undertake research for a scholarly thesis or a creative project in playwriting or in directing under the guidance of a faculty mentor. Creative projects will culminate in a written thesis that is either a full-length play or a dramaturgical discussion of the directing project. Prerequisites: upper-division course work in the area of thesis, department stamp, 3.5 GPA in major, approval of faculty member.

TDGE 196B. Honors Study in Theatre (4)
Theatre honors students complete the thesis, play, or dramaturgical analysis of a directing project under the close supervision of a faculty mentor. Prerequisites: upper-division course work in the area of thesis, TDGE 196A, 3.5 GPA in major, approval of faculty member.

TDGE 198. Directed Group Studies (0-2-4)
Group studies, readings, projects, and discussions in theatre history, problems of production and performance, and similarly appropriate subjects. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, 2.5 GPA, consent of instructor, and department stamp. May be repeated for a total of 12 units.

TDGE 199. Special Projects (0-2-4)
Qualified students will pursue a special project in theatre history, problems of production and performance, and similarly appropriate topics. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, 2.5 GPA, consent of instructor, and department stamp.

TDHD 171. Dance History I (Ancient to 1900) (4)
The study of the history of dance from antiquity to the early twentieth century. An analysis and understanding of the social, political, and cultural forces on the development of early dance theories and practices. Prerequisites: TDTR 10. Not equivalent to THDA 151, Dance History–Ballet.

TDHD 172. Dance History II (1900 to 1960) (4)
The study of the history of dance from the early twentieth century to the 1960s. An analysis and understanding of the social, political, and cultural forces on the development of dance theories and practices. Prerequisites: TDTR 10. Not equivalent to THDA 152, Dance History–Modern.

TDHD 173. Dance History III (1960 to Present) (4)
The study of the history of dance from the 1960s to the present. An analysis and understanding of social, political, and cultural forces on the development of current dance theories and practices. Prerequisites: TDTR 10. Not equivalent to THDA 151, Dance History–Jazz Dance and Related Ethnic Studies.

TDHD 174. Dance Aesthetics and Criticism (4)
An historical overview of the aesthetic concepts that form the foundation for the creation, performance, and critical analysis of dance. Critical and aesthetic theory in related arts will be discussed and contrasted. Prerequisites: TDTR 10 or consent of instructor.

TDHD 175. Cultural Perspectives on World Dance (4)
The study of world dance forms from a global perspective. An analysis and understanding of ethnic dance traditions and their connections to religion, ritual, folklore, custom, festive celebration, popular culture, and political movements. Prerequisites: TDTR 10 or consent of instructor.

TDHD 176. Dance History—Special Topics (4)
An in-depth exposure to an important topic in dance history, theory, aesthetics, and criticism. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. Prerequisites: TDTR 10, upper-division standing.

TDHT 10. Introduction to Play Analysis (4)
An introduction to the fundamental techniques of analyzing dramatic texts. Focus is on the student’s ability to describe textual elements and their relationships to each other as well as on strategies for writing critically about drama. Prerequisites: none.

TDHT 21. Ancient and Medieval Theatre (4)
Ancient and medieval theatre. Explores the roots of contemporary theatre in world performance traditions of ancient history with a focus on humans’ gravitation toward ritual and play. Examples come from Egypt, Greece, Rome, Mesoamerica, Japan, China, India, Indonesia, Persia, and England. Prerequisites: none.

TDHT 22. Theatre 1500–1900 (4)
Explores varieties of drama in professional theatre from 1500 to 1900 in Europe, Japan, and China, and their interconnections both formal and historical. Prerequisites: none.

TDHT 23. Twentieth-Century Theatre (4)
Twentieth-century theatre: a survey of drama from 1900 to 1990, with attention also paid to the development of avant-garde performance forms. Plays discussed reflect developments in Europe and the United States, but also transnational, postcolonial perspectives. Prerequisites: none.

TDHT 101. Topics in Dramatic Literature and Theatre History (4)
An in-depth exposure to an important individual writer or subject in dramatic literature and/or theatre history. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. Recent courses have included Modern French Drama, and the History of Russian Theatre. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

TDHT 103. Asian American Theatre (4)
This course examines pivotal dramatic works in the history of professional Asian American theatre in the United States (1960s to the present). Issues include interculturalism, the crossover between minority theatres and mainstream venues, and the performance of identity. TDHT 103 is an approved Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI) course. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDHT 104. Italian Comedy (4)
Continuities and changes in Italian comedy from the Romans through the Renaissance and commedia dell’arte to modern comedy. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDHT 105. French Comedy (4)
Masterpieces of French farce and comedy from the seventeenth century to the twentieth century studied French theatrical and cultural contexts. Readings include plays by Moliere, Marivauz, Beaumarchais, and Feydeau. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

TDHT 107. American Theatre (4)
In this course we will examine representative plays and playwrights who write about the “American” experience from a variety of historical periods and diverse cultural communities. Playwrights will include Glaspell, O’Neill, Williams, Hansberry, Valdez, Yamauchi, Parks, Kushner, Mamet, Greenberg, Hwang, Letts, and Cruz. Theatre companies will include The Group, Provincetown Players, San Francisco Mime Troupe, East/West Players, Teatro Campesino, Spiderwoman, and Cornerstone. TDHT 107 is an approved Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI) course. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDHT 108. Luis Valdez (4)
This course examines the works of Luis Valdez, playwright, director, screenwriter, film director, and founder of the Teatro Campesino. Readings include plays and essays by Valdez and critical books and articles about this important American theatre artist. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.  

TDHT 109. African American Theatre (4)
This course provides a survey of the contributions to the theatre arts made by African Americans. Analytic criteria will include the historical context in which the piece was crafted; thematic and stylistic issues; aesthetic theories and reception. TDHT 109 is an approved Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI) course. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

TDHT 110. Chicano Dramatic Literature (4)
Focusing on the contemporary evolution of Chicano dramatic literature, this course will analyze playwrights and theatre groups that express the Chicano experience in the United States, examining relevant “actors,” plays, and documentaries for their contributions to the developing Chicano theatre movement. (Cross-listed with Ethnic Studies 132.) No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

TDHT 111. Hispanic American Dramatic Literature (4)
Course examines the plays of leading Cuban American, Puerto Rican, and Chicano playwrights in an effort to understand the experience of these Hispanic American groups in the United States. (Cross-listed with Ethnic Studies 133.) No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

TDHT 114. American Musical Theatre (4)
The class will explore the musical’s origins, evolution, components, and innovators, with emphasis on adaptation and the roles of the director and choreographer. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

TDHT 115. History and Theory of Directing (4)
Evolution of directing theory from 1850 to the present with reference to the work of internationally influential directors such as Saxe-Meiningen, Antoine, Stanislavski, Meyerhold, Brecht, and Brook, among others. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

TDHT 119. Production Dramaturgy (4)
Introduces theatre and dance students to the practice of contemporary production dramaturgy. Students learn strategies for applying the results of textual analysis and cultural research to the production process. Prerequisites: interview required.

TDHT 120. Indigenous Theatre and Performance (4)
This theoretical and embodied course examines a selection of indigenous plays and performances (dance, hip-hop) and helps students develop the critical vocabulary and contextual knowledge necessary to productively engage with the political and artistic interventions performed by these works. No prior knowledge in theatre history is needed. Students may not receive credit for both TDHT 120 and ETHN 163G. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. 

TDHT 190. The New York Theatre and Dance Scene (4)
Experience firsthand New York history as a performing arts cultural capital. In addition to studying New York performance history and literature, attend performances accompanied by lecture/discussion. Get backstage tours, meet important players, and learn how productions go from vision to reality. Program or material fee may apply. Contact the Department of Theatre and Dance for application for TDHT 190. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: Students must submit an application to enroll in the course to confirm they are aware course is in New York and will accrue additional fees.

TDMV 1. Beginning Ballet (2)
An introduction to classical ballet principles, technique, and terminology. Develops the body for strength, flexibility, and artistic interpretation. Emphasis on developing a foundation in classical movement for continuation of ballet training. Historical origin of ballet will be discussed. Prerequisites: none. May be taken six times for credit.

TDMV 2. Beginning Contemporary Dance (2)
Introduction to contemporary dance as an expressive medium, building technical skills at the beginning level. Pattern variations analyzed in time, space, design, and kinetic sense. Movement exploration includes improvisation and composition. Prerequisites: none. May be taken six times for credit.

TDMV 3. Beginning Jazz (2)
Introduction to the technique of jazz dance, while placing the art form in its historical context as an American vernacular form. Builds a beginning technical jazz vocabulary with a focus on rhythmic exercises, isolations, turns, and locomotor combinations. Prerequisites: none. May be taken six times for credit.

TDMV 11. Theatrical Tap (2)
The study of theatrical tap dance. Various styles of tap— such as classical, rhythm, and musical theatre—will be introduced. Emphasis on rhythm, coordination, timing, and theatrical style. Includes basic through intermediate tap movement. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: none.

TDMV 110. Intermediate Ballet (4)
Continued studio work in ballet technique at the intermediate level and terminology. Emphasis on increasing strength, flexibility, and balance, and the interpretation of classical musical phrasing. Includes proper alignment training and artistic philosophy of classical ballet. Prerequisites: six units of THDA or TDMV 1 or consent of instructor. May be taken six times for credit.

TDMV 111. Advanced Ballet (4)
Further emphasis on advanced ballet technique, performance, terminology, and an introduction to pointe work. Introduces historical ballet choreographic variations. Individual and group composition will be examined and aesthetic criticism applied. Prerequisites: twelve units of THDA 101A-B-C or TDMV 110 or consent of instructor. May be taken six times for credit.

TDMV 112. Advanced Ballet for Contemporary Dance (4)
Designed for students with advanced training in contemporary modern dance and intermediate to advanced training in ballet. Emphasis is on increasing composition and performance skills in ballet through contemporary modern dance aesthetics. Prerequisites: twelve units of THDA 101A-B-C or TDMV 111 or consent of instructor. May be taken six times for credit.

TDMV 120. Intermediate Contemporary Dance (4)
The development of contemporary dance as an expressive medium, with emphasis on technical skills at the intermediate level. Includes the principles, elements, and historical context of contemporary modern postmodern dance. May be taken for credit six times. Prerequisites: TDMV 2 or consent of instructor.

TDMV 122. Advanced Contemporary Dance (4)
The development of contemporary dance as an expressive medium, with emphasis on advanced technical skills, expressive style, and performance elements. Choreography and aesthetic concepts will be explored. Incorporates applied physiological principles of human movement. Prerequisites: twelve units of THDA 110A-B-C or TDHA 111A-B-C, or TDMV 112, or TDMV 120 or consent of instructor. May be taken six times for credit.

TDMV 123. Contact Improvisation (4)
Students will study the practice of improvisational dancing with a partner. Students will develop skills in giving and supporting body weight, lifting, balancing, falling, rolling, and recovering fluidly together. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: TDMV 2 or consent of instructor.

TDMV 130. Intermediate Jazz (2)
Designed to provide training in the technique of jazz dance, while placing the art form in its historical context as an American vernacular form. Builds an intermediate technical jazz level with a focus on style, musicality, dynamics, and performance. Prerequisites: six units of THDA 3 or TDMV 3 or consent of instructor. May be taken six times for credit.

TDMV 133. Advanced Jazz Dance (4)
Further development in the technique of jazz dance, while placing the art form in its historical context as an American vernacular form. Builds an advanced technical jazz level with a focus on style, musicality, dynamics, and performance. Prerequisites: six units of THDA 120A-B-C or THDA 121A-B-C or TDMV 130 or consent of instructor. May be taken six times for credit.

TDMV 138. Beginning Hip-Hop (2)
An introduction to the basic technique of hip-hop, studied to enhance an understanding of the historical cultural content of the American form hip-hop and street dances in current choreography. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

TDMV 140. Beginning Dances of the World (4)
Courses designed for the in-depth study of the dances and historical context of a particular culture or ethnic form: Afro-Cuban, Spanish, Balinese, Japanese, Latin, etc. Specific topic will vary from quarter to quarter. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

TDMV 141. Advanced Dances of the World (4)
Courses designed for the advanced continuing study of the dances and historical context of a particular culture or ethnic form: Afro-Cuban, Spanish, Balinese, Japanese, Latin, etc. Specific topic will vary from quarter to quarter. Prerequisites: THDA 132 or TDMV 136 or TDMV 142 or TDMV 143 or TDMV 144, or consent of instructor.

TDMV 142. Latin Dance of the World (4)
To develop an appreciation and understanding of the various Latin dances. Emphasis on learning basic social dance movement vocabulary, history of Latin cultures, and use of each dance as a means of social and economic expression. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. 

TDMV 143. West African Dance (4)
An introductory course that explores the history of West African cultures and diasporas through student research, oral presentation, dance movement, and performance. Contemporary African dances influenced by drum masters and performing artists from around the world are also covered. Course materials and services fees may apply. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

TDMV 144. Asian Dance (4)
To develop an appreciation and understanding of the dances from various Asian cultures. Emphasis on learning the basic forms and movement vocabularies, their historical context, and the use of each dance as a means of cultural and artistic expression. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

TDMV 146. Intermediate Latin Dances of the World (4)
To develop an appreciation and understanding of the various Latin dances. Emphasis on learning intermediate social dance movement vocabulary, history of Latin cultures, and use of each dance as a means of social and economic expression. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: TDMV 142.

TDMV 148. Intermediate Hip-Hop (2)
This course is designed to build on the skills developed in TDMV 138, Hip-Hop, also deepening students' understanding of the social, political, and economic forces at work within hip-hop culture. More complex rhythms and sequencing will be introduced, and musicality will be honed through an added emphasis on freestyle expression. May be taken for credit four times. Prerequisites: TDMV 138.

TDMV 190. Major Project as Performer (4)
An in-depth investigation of the role and aesthetics of performer/dancer in a fully staged independent project resulting in a dance performance choreographed by faculty or students. May be taken for credit two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor.

TDPF 160. Studies in Performance—Fall Production (2–4)
The in-depth study of a major dance production in a fall dance cabaret led by faculty. Admission by audition only. Prerequisites: audition; department stamp; concurrent enrollment in TDMV 110, 111, 112, 120, 122, 130, or 133.

TDPF 161. Studies in Performance—Winter Production (2–4)
The in-depth study for a fully staged dance production in various venues, including a fall dance cabaret led by faculty, a winter faculty concert with guest choreographers, and a spring student choreographed concert directed by faculty. Admission by audition only. Prerequisites: audition, department stamp, concurrent enrollment in TDMV 163, TDMV 110 or TDMV 111 or TDMV 112 or TDMV 120 or TDMV 122 or TDMV 130 or TDMV 133. May be taken four times for credit.

TDPF 162. Studies in Performance Spring Production (2–4)
The in-depth study for a fully staged dance production in various venues, including a fall dance cabaret led by faculty, a winter faculty concert with guest choreographers, and a spring student choreographed concert directed by faculty. Admission by audition only. Prerequisites: audition, department stamp, concurrent enrollment in TDMV 163, TDMV 110 or TDMV 111 or TDMV 112 or TDMV 120 or TDMV 122 or TDMV 130 or TDMV 133. May be taken four times for credit.

TDPF 163. Dance Repertory (1–4)
The study and aesthetic examination of major choreographic works by dance faculty or distinguished guest artists. Students will experience the creative process, staging, production, and performance of a complete dance work in conjunction with a conceptual study of its form and content. Audition is required. Prerequisites: concurrent enrollment in TDPF 160 or TDPF 161 or TDPF 162. May be taken four times for credit.

TDPF 190. Major Project/Dance Production (4)
Students develop skills in directing and producing an independent staged dance concert/production in various settings. May be taken two times for credit. Prerequisites: TDCH 40, upper-division standing, and consent of instructor.

TDPR 6. Theatre Practicum (4–6)
A production oriented course that introduces the student to technical fundamentals of costumes, scenery, lighting, and sound for the theatre. Students will be assigned to participate on a crew for a fully mounted theatrical production supported by the department. Prerequisites: must have department stamp.

TDPR 102. Advanced Theatre Practicum (4–6)
A production performance-oriented course that continues the development of costume, lighting, scenery, or sound production and introduces greater responsibilities in the laboratory format. Students serve as crew heads on major departmental productions or creative projects. Prerequisites: THPR or TDPR 1, 2, 3, or 5; permission of instructor; department stamp required. May be taken for credit two times.

TDPR 104. Advanced Practicum in Stage Management (4–6)
A production performance oriented course that continues the development of stage management skills and introduces greater responsibilities in the laboratory format. Students serve as either assistant stage managers on main-stage productions or stage managers on studio projects. Prerequisites: THDR or TDDR 101 and consent of instructor. May be taken two times for credit.

TDPW 1. Introduction to Playwriting (4)
Beginning workshop in the fundamentals of playwriting. Students discuss material from a workbook that elucidates the basic principles of playwriting, do exercises designed to help them put those principles into creative practice, and are guided through the various stages of the playwriting process that culminate with in-class readings of the short plays they have completed. Prerequisites: none.

TDPW 101. Playwriting Workshop (4)
A workshop where students present their plays at various stages of development for group analysis and discussion. Students write a thirty-minute play that culminates in a reading. Also includes writing exercises designed to stimulate imagination and develop writing techniques. Prerequisites: THPW or TDPW 1 or consent of instructor. May be taken two times for credit.

TDPW 102. Playwriting Workshop II (4)
Advanced workshop where students study the full-length play structure and begin work on a long play. Students present their work at various stags of development for group discussion and analysis. Prerequisites: THPW or TDPW 101 or consent of the instructor. May be taken for credit two times.

TDPW 104. Screenwriting (4)
Basic principles of screenwriting using scenario composition, plot points, character study, story conflict, with emphasis on visual action and strong dramatic movement. Prerequisites: THPW or TDPW 1. May be taken twice for credit.

TDPW 190. Major Project in Playwriting/Screenwriting (4)
For the advanced student in playwriting/screenwriting. This intensive concentration in the study of playwriting and/or screenwriting will culminate in the creation of a substantial length play. A maximum of eight units of major project study, regardless of area (design, directing, stage management, playwriting) may be used to fulfill major requirements. Applicants must have completed the playwriting sequence, THPW or TDPW 1, 101, and/or consent of instructor. See department for application form. Prerequisites: THPW or TDPW 1 and THPW or TDPW 101.

TDTR 10. Introduction to Dance (4)
An overview of dance, examining its social and cultural history and its evolution as an art form. Focus is on dance and its many genres as an expressive medium and form of communication. Prerequisites: none.

TDTR 101. Dance Movement Analysis (4)
An overview and analysis of movement theory systems that offer approaches to improve movement quality, prevent injuries, aid in rehabilitation, develop mental focus and kinesthetic control, establish a positive body language, and develop vocabulary for creative research. Prerequisites: TDTR 10.

TDTR 103. Dance and Technology (4)
This course introduces the theoretical and practical understanding of both available and developing computer-assisted media for the design and production of choreography. Prerequisites: TDTR 10, TDCH 40; or consent of instructor.

TDTR 104. Dance Theory and Pedagogy (4)
The study of the theoretical aspects of dance education, including an analysis of movement concepts for all ages. Development of basic technique training in all forms, curriculum planning, social awareness, and problem solving. Fundamental elements of cognitive and kinetic learning skills. Prerequisites: TDTR 10, TDMV 110, 120, 130 or THDA 101A-B-C, or THDA 110A-B-C, or THDA 120A-B-C; consent of instructor, department stamp.

TDGR 200. Dynamics (1)
A daily program of physical, vocal, and speech exercises designed to prepare the student to move in a focused way into specific class areas with minimum amount of warm-up time. The exercises work on development of flexibility, strength, and coordination throughout the body. Strong emphasis is placed on physical and mental centering within a structured and disciplined approach to preparation. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 201. Stage Combat (2)
A study of the dramatic elements of stage violence, and practical work in developing the physical skills necessary to fully realize violent moments on the stage. At the core of the study is the process from text to convincing theatrical action. Physical work revolves around basic principles of energy, focus, and center inherent in unarmed and weapons combat. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 204A. Text Analysis (4)
Topics to be covered will include (1) concept of poetic language; lexical and syntactic analysis of dialogue; (2) the semantic context of dialogue; (3) thematic structure, from motive to themes; (4) the concept of dramatic character or hero; (5) dramatic narrative; (6) the material of drama; the relationship of myth and ritual to drama; (7) analysis versus interpretation; (8) practical applications. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 204B. Contemporary Theories of Theatre (4)
An investigation of contemporary theories of theatre with an emphasis on structural and poststructural perspectives on text and textuality. The seminar will focus on adapting contemporary techniques of close reading to the interpretive and creative process in the theatre. Prerequisites: TDGR 204A; admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 204C. Collective Creation (4)
The culmination of the TDGR 204 sequence, in which students in all disciplines create and perform publicly presented original theatre pieces. Prerequisites: TDGR 204B; admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 206. Faculty Directed Production (4)
Faculty directed production, from the rehearsal process through public performance. All participants will enroll in the same section, the number of units depending upon degree of involvement. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 207. Production (4)
The collaborative process from the rehearsal process through public performance. All participants will enroll in the same section, the same number of units. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 208. Dance Making Processes (4)
This course serves as a laboratory for experimentation in the choreographic strategies and structures of contemporary dance making. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit eight times. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 210A. Process I—Part I (4)
The actors focus on the nature of the acting process, using various exercises to stimulate imagination and to inspire instinctual choices. Later work includes improvisational and imaginative experiences to explore character and text. The class culminates in intensive scene work chosen for the particular actor to meld the improvisational approach with scripted material. The class is a combination of both actors and directors so that a common language is developed. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 210B. Process I—Part II (4)
Intensive studio examination of realistic texts using improvisational and imaginative techniques to realistically based texts commonly from American theatre. Second course in a three-course sequence. Prerequisites: TDGR 210A and admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 210C. Process I—Part III (4)
The intensive study of the dramatic and fictional work of Anton Chekhov and an actor’s approach to that work. This course includes many of the techniques begun in earlier classes and applies them to this material. Also included is a study of Chekhov’s short stories and plays, and involves adapting and staging these works. Third course of a three-course sequence. Prerequisites: TDGR 210B and admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 211. Choreography Seminar (4)
The study and practice of aesthetic concepts, history, and methodology for choreographic creation of dance theatre; and expanding the choreographers’ ability to establish innovative creative processes with performers and craft their material, both independently and in conjunction with other theatrical and technological elements. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 211B. Speech for the Actor (2–4)
Continued introduction of the principle of phonetics and articulation. Constant study and drill to prepare the actor for standard speech and flexibility. Second course in a three-course series. Prerequisites: TDGR 211A and admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 211C. Speech for the Actor (2–4)
Continued introduction of the principle of phonetics and articulation. Constant study and drill to prepare the actor for standard speech and flexibility. Third course in a three-course series. Prerequisites: TDGR 211B and admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 212. Acting Practicum (2)
One-on-one laboratory workshop that examines practical applications of accents, speech and voice work, dialect, movement and combat work specific and ancillary to the productions in which the students have been cast. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 213A-B-C. Movement for Theatre I (2-2-2)
An intensive studio course in the art of movement as a basis for theatre performance. Theory and practice of energy flow, weight, spatial focus, time consumption, and the shape factor. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: THGR or TDGR 213A for B, THGR or TDGR 213B for C; admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 214. Dance Theatre Topics: Collaborative Processes (2)
This seminar examines the nature of collaborative creative processes and artistic relationships between choreographers and other primary artists in the creation of interdisciplinary dance theatre, from the initial concepts, themes, and inspiration through the research, rehearsal and final presentation. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 214A. Voice for Theatre I—Part I (3)
Voice exercises designed to “free the voice” with emphasis on diaphragmatic breathing, articulation exercises, and singing exercises. Course designed to broaden pitch, range, projection, and to expand the full range of potential characterizations. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 214B. Voice for Theatre II—Part I (3)
Voice exercises designed to “free the voice” with emphasis on diaphragmatic breathing, articulation exercises, and singing exercises. Course designed to broaden pitch, range, projection, and to expand the full range of potential characterizations. Second course in a three-course sequence. Prerequisites: TDGR 214Aand admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 214C. Voice for Theatre I—Part III (3)
Voice exercises designed to “free the voice” with emphasis on diaphragmatic breathing, articulation exercises, and singing exercises. Course designed to broaden pitch, range, projection, and to expand the full range of potential characterizations. Third course in a three-course series. Prerequisites: TDGR 214B and admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 215. Dance Theatre Seminar (2)
This seminar focuses on the aesthetic concepts that form the foundation for the creation, performance, research, and critical analysis of dance theatre. Students will discuss critical theory in related arts and develop individualized projects that advance their creative and intellectual goals. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of the instructor.

TDGR 216. Principles of Curriculum Theory (2)
This comprehensive seminar provides an assessment of the field of curriculum theory as preparation for teaching general dance education courses. Conceptual thinking, problem solving, current publications, methods of inquiry, assessment, and a range of practical teaching issues will be discussed. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 217. New Media and Technology (2)
This seminar explores the interaction of new media and technologies for collaboration, research, and creation in performance. Students will pursue diverse and innovative research in technology as a medium for new forms of expression in dance theatre. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 218. Dance Theatre: Professional Practice (2)
This seminar focuses on the skills and tools needed for the professional practice of self-production in performance. Areas introduced include grant writing, press kits, media relations, marketing, websites, documentation, budgets, artistic management, and nonprofit organization administration. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 219. Directing Process Studio (4)
Preparation, presentation, and discussion of representative scenes from various periods of dramatic literature. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 220A. Process II: Classical Text I (4)
An intensive studio examination of problems and potentials associated with the theatrical realization of the classical text. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 220B. Process II: Classical Text II (4)
An intensive studio examination of problems and potentials associated with the theatrical realization of the classical text. This course is a continuation of TDGR 220A. Prerequisites: TDGR 220A and admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 220C. Process II: Classical Text III (4)
An intensive studio examination of problems and potentials associated with the theatrical realization of the classical text. This course is a continuation of TDGR 220B. Prerequisites: TDGR 220B and admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 221. Graduate Studio: Contemporary Movement Practices (2)
Designed for development of a movement practice in various modalities including contemporary dance, yoga, Pilates, and Alexander. Emphasis on advanced technical skills, expressive style, and performance elements. Aesthetic concepts will be explored. Incorporates applied physiological principles of human movement. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 221A-B. Speech for the Actor II (3-3)
Advanced work in phonetics and articulation. Intensive study of stage dialects to prepare actor for variety of roles. Prerequisites: graduate standing; THGR or TDGR 221A prerequisite for THGR or TDGR 221B; admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 223. Improvisation Ensemble (2)
A course for dance theatre practitioners to exchange ideas, work with scores, text, expository writing, contact improvisation, in a supportive and focused environment. Students will participate as group leaders allowing participants to explore new areas of their artistic practice. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 223A-B. Movement for Theatre II (3-3)
An advanced course in the art of movement for the theatre, building on the knowledge gained in Theatre 213. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: THGR or TDGR 223A for B; admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 224A-B. Voice for Theatre II (3-3)
Advanced voice training designed to help the actor fuse voice, emotion, and body into a fully realized reflection of the text. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: THGR or TDGR 224A for B; admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 225A-B. Singing for the Actor II (1-1)
Continuing vocal technique for the musical theatre. More complicated musical material investigated and prepared. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 226. Stage Managing Assistantship (4–12)
Assisting faculty with productions off-campus. Perform research necessary for project. Assist with preproduction meetings and other work. Observe and participate in any or all phases of the production process from preproduction through closing. Prerequisites: MFA students or consent of instructor.

TDGR 227. Dance Practicum (4)
This course covers the artistic, aesthetic, and practical aspects of the dancers' work as they develop and execute the performance/choreography towards a fully realized production. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit twelve times. Prerequisites: admittance to the MFA dance program required.

TDGR 229. Theatre Externship (6–12)
Selected professional opportunities in repertory and commercial theatre, designed to engage the student in particular creative responsibilities under the guidance of master artist-teachers. Student is expected to give biweekly reports detailing his/her experience with the professional company. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program, or consent of instructor.

TDGR 230. Acting Process III: Actors’ Studio (4)
An advanced studio for graduate actors and directors, this work will explore a single text from the modern theatre under the direction of a master teacher-artist. Concentration will be on multiple possible modes of encountering a text, varieties of interpretation and performance realization, and the development of a theatre ensemble. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 231A. Professional Preparation for the Actor (4)
A twice-weekly seminar focusing on the actor’s confrontation with the industry, including in-depth preparation for auditions; cold readings; and meetings/interviews with producers, casting directors, agents, and managers. Actors will also begin to create material that could be crafted into solo performances. Prerequisites: admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 233. Acting for the Camera (1)
This course is designed to aid the actor in the transition from stage to film work. Examination of film production and its physical characteristics and the acting style needed for work in film and television. Students will rehearse and perform in simulated studio setting. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 235. Singing for the Actor III (1)
Continuing vocal technique for the musical theatre. More complicated musical material investigated and prepared. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 239. Skills (4)
A unifying approach to acting skills (voice, movement, and speech) designed to result in providing the graduating actor with a daily regimen appropriate for professional work. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 240. Directing Seminar (1–6)
A seminar focusing on the current directing projects of all graduate directing students. Depending upon individual student needs, the work may include play selection, historical or sociological research, and discussion of emerging directorial concepts, the rehearsal process, and post-production evaluation. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 243. Director/Playwright/Choreographer Lab (4)
Collaborative process between directing and playwriting students providing a focused exploration of a broad range of directing and writing methodologies. Students work in teams to develop and create pieces based on the methodology of guest directors. Prerequisites: admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 244. New Plays Workshop (2)
A course where playwrights and actors work together to develop new plays-in-progress. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 245. Directing Practicum (4)
Students enrolled in this course will work on productions in the function of a director. This will include staging, creative interpretation, blocking, etc. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 250. Playwriting Seminar (4)
A seminar focusing on the current playwriting project of all graduate playwriting students. Work for each quarter is individually determined according to student needs, but may include exploration of an inceptive idea, development of a scenario or other structural work, and writing dialogue. Students present work to be discussed in class. May include group or individual playwriting exercises. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 251. Playwriting Practicum (2)
Creative writing project developing original scripts from outline to the final play. Plays may vary depending on the quarter, but will include writing of a realistic one-act, a nonrealistic one-act, a one-act documentary or dramatization of fiction, a full-length play. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 252. Dramaturgy Seminar (4)
The seminar will deal with all dramaturgical issues pertaining to departmental productions: production research, textual and analysis, translation, adaptation, rehearsal process, and critique. Concurrently with the dramaturgy issues of the given year, the seminar will discuss possible choices of plays for future production seasons. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 253. Dramaturgy Practicum (1–6)
Students enrolled in this course will work on productions in the function of a dramaturg. This will entail preparation of texts, research, participation at rehearsals, etc. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 254. Television Writing (4)
A one-quarter course covering the hour-long format (five weeks) and situation comedies (five weeks). Includes study and discussion of television script format and structure. Students will create the concept and structure for spec scripts in each genre. Prerequisites: admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 256. Contemporary Plays (1–4)
A guided reading course focusing exclusively on very recent plays in an attempt to become aware of what is being written now. Course may be repeated for credit. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 257A-B. Screenwriting (4-4)
Students will develop the concept for an original piece for television or film and will write the screenplay. Student work will be discussed in seminar at each phase of the development. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program and THGR or TDGR 250.

TDGR 258A. Dramatization and Adaptation (4)
Seminar will deal with dramatization and adaptation of literary texts for the purpose of theatrical production. The class will study some significant examples of such practice from the past and, subsequently, students will develop their own projects of dramatization, adaptation, or modernization of texts. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 260. New-Play Festival (4)
The collaborative process of new-play development through readings, rehearsals, and public performance. MFA actors, designers, directors, playwrights, and stage managers enroll in one section and collaborate in creating the annual festival of full-length and one-act plays. Prerequisites: admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 262. Crossing Boundaries: Design Improvisations (4)
Conceiving interactive designs. A project/performance-based course, concentrating on the conception of designs adaptable to improvisatory contexts, in which technological strategies such as real-time processing and control of sound and light are encouraged and discussed. Prerequisites: admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 268. Storyboarding (4)
Course will cover multiple applications of storyboarding as a tool of communication and expression; comic books, theatre, opera, film, TV, and commercial applications will be explored. Individual and team assignments will be given to develop the basic vocabulary and techniques. Prerequisites: admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 269A. Photoshop I (4)
Course will introduce the basic functions and applications of Photoshop as they may be applied to theatrical design. Emphasis on using Photoshop as an artistic tool. Prerequisites: admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 269B. Photoshop II (4)
Advanced Photoshop techniques will be explored and applied to the creation of multimedia projects. Prerequisites: admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 270A. Design Studio I (4)
This course will focus on beginning-level problems in theatre design, including text analysis, research, conceptualization, and visual expression. Students will work on individual projects in lighting, costume, and scenic design. The course will include group critiques of completed designs and works in progress. 270A, Scenic Design (fall); 270B, Costume Design (winter); 270C, Lighting Design (spring). Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 270B. Design Studio I: Costume Design (4)
This course will focus on beginning-level problems in theatre design, including text analysis, research, conceptualization, and visual expression. Students will work on individual projects in lighting, costume, and scenic design. The course will include group critiques of completed design and works in progress. 270A, Scenic Design (fall); 270B, Costume Design (winter); 270C, Lighting Design (spring). Prerequisites: THGR 270A, graduate standing, consent of instructor.

TDGR 270C. Design Studio I: Lighting Design (4)
This course will focus on beginning-level problems in theatre design, including text analysis, research, conceptualization, and visual expression. Students will work on individual projects in lighting, costume, and scenic design. The course will include group critiques of completed design and works in progress. 270A, Scenic Design (fall); 270B, Costume Design (winter); 270C, Lighting Design (spring). Prerequisites: THGR 270A or TDGR 270A, THGR 270B or TDGR 270B, graduate standing, and consent of instructor.

TDGR 270D. Design Studio I: Sound Design (4)
This course will focus on beginning-level problems in theatre design, including text analysis, research, conceptualization, and visual/auditory expression. Students will work on individual projects in sound, lighting, costume, and scenic design. This course will include group critiques of completed design and works in progress. 270A, Scenic Design (fall); 270B, Costume Design (winter); 270C, Lighting Design (spring). Prerequisites: THGR 270A, THGR 270B, graduate standing, consent of instructor.

TDGR 271. Design Seminar (2)
A seminar focusing on all aspects of the design profession, including current projects of graduate design students. The work may also include portfolio presentations, research presentations, and guest lecturers. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 273. Fashioning the Body (4)
A survey/history of artistic and cultural stylistic change as embodied in clothing from early Western civilization to the contemporary period. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 274. Advanced Scenic Design (4)
This course explores advanced problems in scenic design through development and critique of creative class projects and production works-in-progress. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 275. Advanced Lighting Design (4)
Creative projects and topics in lighting design to develop the student’s techniques and professional practices. Work to include studies in design research, concepts, psychophysical considerations, collaboration, professional procedures and systems, paperwork, and organization. Various scales of production projects will be addressed by the student for presentation and critique, and may be theoretical or productions in the departmental calendar. Prerequisites: second- or third-year design students only; admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 276. Advanced Costume Design (4)
Projects in costume design, emphasizing script analysis, research, conceptualization, and visual expression. Studio work includes costume rendering in various media for specific plays. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 278. Special Topics in Theatre Design (1–6)
A course designed to expose the theatre design student to a variety of specialized topics, including millinery, pattern drafting and draping, scenic painting, model making, figure drawing, drafting, fitting, rendering. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 279. Design Practicum (4)
This course covers the artistic, aesthetic, and practical aspects of the designers’ work as they develop and execute the design toward a fully realized production. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 280A. Stage Management 1 (4)
Discussion and research into the duties, responsibilities, and roles of a stage manager. Work to include studies in script analysis, communication, conflict resolution, rehearsal procedures, performance skills, style, and conceptual approach to stage management. Prerequisites: admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 280B. Stage Management 2 (4)
The second of the three-part introductory stage management series, this course further explores the stage manager’s process, focusing on the technical rehearsal period through the opening of a production. Prerequisites: TDGR 280A; admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 280C. Stage Management 3 (4)
The final course in the three-part introductory stage management series focuses on the stage manager’s role once a production has opened. The course will also address topics such as new plays, touring, dance, multimedia productions, and music. Prerequisites: TDGR 280A and TDGR 280B; admission to MFA theatre program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 282. Advanced Sound Design (4)
Creative projects to develop student’s techniques and professional practices. Studies include research, concepts, collaboration, professional procedures, systems and organization. Various scales of projects will be addressed for presentation and critique; may be theoretical or productions in the Department calendar. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA program or consent of instructor.

TDGR 286. Special Topics in Stage Management (1–6)
A course for MFA students in stage management. Topics will focus on various aspects of theatre administration, and advanced stage management, including nonprofit theatre, commercial theatre, advanced problems, venues, musicals/dance, production management, theatre development, business problems, and theatre marketing. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 288. Stage Management Seminar (4)
A weekly seminar in which all graduate stage managers participate. Includes discussions of problems encountered on current productions, paperwork, methodology, and production approaches. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 289. Introduction to Doctoral Studies (4)
Seminar acquaints doctoral students of all levels with research methods, theoretical models, publishing protocol, professional preparation, and pedagogical approaches particular to theatre and performance studies. Course assignments are tailored to students’ scholarly interests and progress toward degree. Prerequisites: admission to PhD program in theatre or consent of instructor.

TDGR 290. Dramatic Literature and Theatre History Prior to 1900 (4)
Selected material from following topics: Classical Drama, Asian Drama, Medieval and Early Modern Drama, Shakespeare, European Drama 1600–1900. May be taken eight times as content varies. Prerequisites: admission to PhD program in theatre.

TDGR 291. Dramatic Literature and Theatre History 1900 to the Present (4)
Selected material from following topics: European Theatre 1900–Present, American Theatre 1900–Present, Contemporary Theatre and Performance. May be taken eight times as content varies. Prerequisites: admission to PhD program in theatre.

TDGR 292. Cultural and Critical Theory (4)
Selected material from following topics: Performance Theory, Dramatic Theory, Critical Theory, Cultural Studies. May be taken eight times as content varies. Prerequisites: admission to PhD program in theatre.

TDGR 293. Directed Studies (4–12)
Individual or small group directed study.

TDGR 294. Dissertation Research (4–12)
Research and preparation of doctoral dissertation.

TDGR 295. Acting Practicum (2)
This course covers the artistic, aesthetic, and practical aspects of the actors’ work as they develop and execute the character/role toward a fully realized production. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 296. Stage Management Practicum (4)
Taken each term by all graduate stage management students. The class focuses on the development of knowledge and skills necessary for the contemporary stage manager. Seminar format is augmented by lab work that may include departmental productions. Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 297. Thesis Research (2–12)
Thesis research for MFA. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 299. Thesis Project (2–12)
Specific projects in theatre individually determined to meet the developing needs, interests, and abilities of MFA candidates. (S/U grades only.) Prerequisites: admission to the MFA theatre program.

TDGR 500. Introduction to Apprentice Teaching (4)
This course, designed to meet the needs of the graduate students who serve as teaching assistants, includes analysis of texts and materials, discussion of teaching techniques, conducting discussion sections, formulation of topics and questions for papers, and examinations and grading. Two units = 25 percent TAship. Four units = 50 percent TAship. Prerequisites: graduate standing and consent of the instructor.

TWS 21-22-23-24-25-26. Third World Literatures (4-4-4-4-4-4)
An introduction to the cultures of various Third World countries through close reading of selected literary texts. TWS 21 focuses on African literature, TWS 22 deals with Latin American literature, TWS 23 examines Chinese literature, TWS 24 examines Caribbean literature, TWS 25 focuses on Middle Eastern literature, and TWS 26 treats literature of the Indian Subcontinent. Topics will vary each quarter. (F,W,S)

TWS 132. Literature and Third World Societies (4)
This course will investigate novelistic and dramatic treatments of European society in the era of nineteenth-century imperialism, Third World societies under the impact of colonialism, and the position of national minorities inside the United States to the present day. Attention will center on the interplay between the aesthetic merits and social-historical-philosophical content of the works read.

TWS 190. Undergraduate Seminars (4)
Seminars will be organized on the basis of topics with readings, discussions, and papers. Specific subjects to be covered will change each quarter depending on particular interest of instructors or students. May be repeated for credit.

TWS 197. Fieldwork (4)
In an attempt to explore and study some unique processes and aspects of community life, students will engage in research in field settings. Topics to be researched may vary, but in each case the course will provide skills for carrying out these studies.

TWS 198. Directed Group Studies (2 or 4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular department curriculum, by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

TWS 199. Independent Study (2 or 4)
Tutorial, individual guided reading and research projects (to be arranged between student and instructor) in an area not normally covered in courses currently being offered in the department. (P/NP grades only.) Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor. (F,W,S)

USP 1. History of US Urban Communities (4)
This course charts the development of urban communities across the United States both temporally and geographically. It examines the patterns of cleavage, conflict, convergence of interest, and consensus that have structured urban life. Social, cultural, and economic forces will be analyzed for the roles they have played in shaping the diverse communities of America’s cities.

USP 2. Urban World System (4)
Examines cities and the environment in a global context. Emphasizes how the world’s economy and the earth’s ecology are increasingly interdependent. Focuses on biophysical and ethicosocial concerns rooted in the contemporary division of labor among cities, Third World industrialization, and the post-industrial transformation of US cities.

USP 3. The City and Social Theory (4)
An introduction to the sociological study of cities, focusing on urban society in the United States. Students in the course will examine theoretical approaches to the study of urban life; social stratification in the city; urban social and cultural systems–ethnic communities, suburbia, family life in the city, religion, art, and leisure.

USP 100. Introduction to Urban Planning (4)
This course is designed to provide an introduction to the fundamentals of urban planning. It surveys important topics in urban planning, including economic development, urban design, transportation, environmental planning, housing, and the history of urban planning. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 101. Introduction to Policy Analysis (4)
(Same as Political Science 160AA.) This course will explore the process by which the preferences of individuals are converted into public policy. Also included will be an examination of the complexity of policy problems, methods for designing better policies, and a review of tools used by analysts and policy makers. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 102. Urban Economics (4)
(Same as Economics 135.) Economic analysis of why and where cities develop, problems they cause, and public policies to deal with these problems. Determination of urban land rent/use, reasons for suburbanization. Transportation and congestion in cities, zoning, poverty and housing, urban local government. Prerequisites: Economics 1A-B or 1-2 and Mathematics 10A or 20A.

USP 104. Ethnic Diversity and the City (4)
(Same as ETHN 105.) This course will examine the city as a crucible of ethnic identity exploring both the racial and ethnic dimensions of urban life in the U.S. from the Civil War to the present. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 105. Urban Sociology (4)
(Same as Sociology 153.) Introduces students to the major approaches in the sociological study of cities and to what a sociological analysis can add to our understanding of urban processes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 106. The History of Race and Ethnicity in American Cities (4)
(Same as HIUS 129.) This class examines the history of racial and ethnic groups in American cities. It looks at major forces of change such as immigration to cities, political empowerment, and social movements, as well as urban policies such as housing segregation. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 107. Urban Politics (4)
(Same as POLI 102E.) This survey course focuses upon the following six topics: the evolution of urban politics since the mid-nineteenth century; the urban fiscal crisis; federal/urban relationships; the “new” politics; urban power structure and leadership; and selected contemporary policy issues such as downtown redevelopment, poverty, and race.

USP 109. California Government and Politics (4)
(Same as POLI 103A.) This survey course explores six topics: 1) the state’s political history; 2) campaigning, the mass media, and elections; 3) actors and institutions in the making of state policy; 4) local government; 5) contemporary policy issues; e.g., Proposition 13, school desegregation, crime, housing and land use, transportation, water; 6) California’s role in national politics. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 110. Advanced Topics in Urban Politics (4)
(Same as POLI 102J.) Building upon the introductory urban politics course, the advanced topics course explores issues such as community power, minority empowerment, and the politics of growth. A research paper is required. Students wishing to fulfill the paper requirement with field research should enroll in the subsequent Political Science 102JJ course offered Summer Session II. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, consent of instructor.

USP 111. Field Research in Urban Politics (4)
(Same as POLI 102JJ.) To be taken with the approval of the Political Science 102J instructor, this course allows students to do original field research on topics in urban politics. This course is offered in Summer Session II subsequent to a spring 102J course. May not be used to fulfill any major or minor requirements in politics science or urban studies and planning. Prerequisites: USP 110/Political Science 102J and consent of instructor.

USP 113. Politics and Policymaking in Los Angeles (4)
(Same as POLI 103B.) This course examines politics and policymaking in the five-county Los Angeles region. It explores the historical development of the city, suburbs, and region; politics, power, and governance; and major policy challenges facing the city and metropolitan area. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 115. Politics and Policymaking in San Diego (4)
(Same as POLI 103C.) This course examines how major policy decisions are made in San Diego. In analyses the region’s power structure (including the roles of nongovernmental organizations and the media), governance systems and reform efforts, and the politics of major infrastructure projects. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 116. California Local Government: Finance and Administration (4)
This course surveys public finance and administration. It focuses upon California local governments—cities, counties, and special districts—and also examines state and federal relationships. Topics explored include revenue, expenditure, indebtedness, policy responsibilities, and administrative organization and processes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 120. Urban Planning, Infrastructure, and Real Estate (4)
This course will explore the interrelationships of urban planning, public infrastructure, and real estate development. These three issues are critical to an examination of the major challenges facing California’s and America’s major metropolitan centers. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 121. Real Estate Law and Regulation (4)
Examination of regulation of real estate development, as it affects landowners, developers and others private sector actors. Includes underlying public policies, establishment and enforcement of laws and regulations, application of regulations to individual projects, and political considerations in implementing regulations. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 122. Redevelopment Planning, Policymaking, and Law (4)
This course examines key elements of land use, planning, and law as related to urban redevelopment. It focuses on San Diego case studies, including the Petco Park/East Village redevelopment project and the Naval Training Center (NTC) Redevelopment Area (Liberty Station). Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 123. Law, Planning, and Public Policy (4)
Examination of the intersection of law and policy, in the form of processes and institutions, as they affect decision-making and program implementation in urban planning and design. Opportunities and constraints in making law and policy. Application to specific case examples. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 124. Land Use Planning (4)
Introduction to land use planning in the United States: zoning and subdivision, regulation, growth management, farmland preservation, environmental protection, and comprehensive planning. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 125. The Design of Social Research (4)
Research methods are tools for improving knowledge. Beginning with a research question, students will learn to select appropriate methods for sampling, collecting, and analyzing data to improve their research activities and research results. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 126. Comparative Land Use and Resource Management (4)
This course evaluates alternative land use, regulatory, and land transfer approaches to the US regime. Considered are overseas reform models for comprehensive land use and resource management and their effects on environmental justice, resource sustainability, and management efficiency and innovation. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 129. Research Methods: Studying Racial and Ethnic Communities (4)
(Same as ETHN 190.) The course offers students the basic research methods with which to study ethnic and racial communities. The various topics to be explored include human and physical geography, transportation, employment, economic structure, cultural values, housing, health, education, and intergroup relations. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 130. Fieldwork in Racial and Ethnic Communities (4)
(Same as ETHN 107.) This is a research course examining social, economic, and political issues in ethnic and racial communities through fieldwork. Topics are examined through a variety of research methods that may include interviews and archival, library, and historical research. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 132. African Americans, Religion, and the City (4)
(Same as ETHN 188.) This course details the history of African American migration to urban areas after World War I and World War II and explores the role of religion in their lives as well as the impact that their religious experiences had upon the cities in which they lived. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 133. Social Inequality and Public Policy (4)
(Same as SOCI 152.) Primary focus on understanding and analyzing poverty and public policy. Analysis of how current debates and public policy initiatives mesh with alternative social scientific explanations of poverty. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 134. Community Youth Development (4)
This course examines the integration of youth development and community development in theory and practice as a strategy for addressing adultism. Analyze cases through a cultural lens where local, national, and international youth movements have helped make community development more responsive, inclusive, and culturally sensitive. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 135. Asian and Latina Immigrant Workers in the Global Economy (4)
(Same as ETHN 129.) This course will explore the social, political, and economic implications of global economic restructuring, immigration policies, and welfare reform on Asian and Latina immigrant women in the United States. We will critically examine these larger social forces from the perspectives of Latina and Asian immigrant women workers, incorporating theories of race, class, and gender to provide a careful reading of the experiences of immigrant women on the global assembly line. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 136. Collaborative Community Leadership (4)
Provides an overview of collaborative leadership and considers consensus organizing as both a tactical and strategic approach to effective community building and development. Examines how various communities have approached collaborative leadership, consensus organizing, and community building. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 137. Housing and Community Development Policy and Practice (4)
History, theory, and practice of US housing and community development. Public, private, and nonprofit sectors shape and implement planning and policy decisions at the federal, state, local and neighborhood levels. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 138. Urban Economic Development (4)
This course focuses on strategies that policy makers and planners use in their efforts to foster healthy economies. Topics include theories of urban economic development, analytical techniques for describing urban economies, and the politics and planning of economic development. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 139. Urban Design and Economic Development (4)
This course explores emerging trends in urban design and economic development and their interrelationship. The course focuses on selected community projects and also considers urban governance structures. Various research methods will be applied to urban problems. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 143. The US Health-Care System (4)
This course will provide an overview of the organization of health care within the context of the community with emphasis on the political, social, and cultural influences. It is concerned with the structure, objectives, and trends of major health and health-related programs in the United States to include sponsorship, financing, training and utilization of health personnel. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Offered winter quarter.)

USP 144. Environmental and Preventive Health Issues (4)
This course will analyze needs of populations, highlighting current major public health problems such as chronic and communicable diseases, environmental hazards of diseases, psychiatric problems and additional diseases, new social mores affecting health maintenance, consumer health awareness and health practices, special needs of economically and socially disadvantaged populations. The focus is on selected areas of public and environmental health, namely: epidemiology, preventive services in family health, communicable and chronic disease control, and occupational health. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Offered fall quarter.)

USP 145. Aging—Social and Health Policy Issues (4)
This course will provide a brief introduction to the nature and problems of aging, with emphasis on socioeconomic and health status; determinants of priorities of social and health policies will be examined through analysis of the structure and organization of selected programs for the elderly. Field visits will constitute part of the course. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 146. Research Methods for Built Environment and Active Living (4)
This course examines urban design's effects on physical activity. In field experience settings, students will learn about survey, accelerometer, observation, and GIS methods. Quality control, use of protocols, relevance to all ages, and international applications will also be emphasized. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 147. Case Studies in Health-Care Programs/Poor and Underserved Population (4)
The purpose of this course is to identify the special health needs of low income and underserved populations and to review their status of care, factors influencing the incidence of disease and health problems, and political and legislative measures related to access and the provision of care. Selected current programs and policies that address the health-care needs of selected underserved populations such as working poor, inner city populations, recent immigrants, and persons with severe disabling mental illnesses will be studied. Offered in alternate years. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Offered spring quarter.)

USP 149. Madness and Urbanization (4)
This course will provide a historical and theoretical orientation for contemporary studies of the experience of mental illness and mental health-care policy in the American city, with critical attention to racial and ethnic disparities in diagnosis, treatment, and outcomes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 154. Global Justice in Theory and Action (4)
(Same as Political Science 111B.) Discuss the idea of justice from multiple perspectives: theory, philosophy, institutions, markets, social mobilization, politics, environment. Examine the assets and capabilities of diverse justice-seeking organizations and movements aimed at improving quality of life and place locally, regionally, and globally. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 168. History of Los Angeles (4)
(Same as HIUS 117.) This course examines the history of Los Angeles from the early nineteenth century to the present. Particular issues to be addressed include urbanization, ethnicity, politics, technological change, and cultural diversification. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 170. Sustainable Planning (4)
This course will explore the different factors and processes that shape a sustainable city. Contemporary green planning techniques and values will be evaluated. The course will also discuss planning, designing, and implementation of sustainable facilities that will reduce sprawl. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 171. Sustainable Development (4)
Sustainable development is a concept invoked by an increasingly wide range of scholars, activists, and organizations dedicated to promoting environmentally sound approaches to economic development. This course critically examines the diverse, often contradictory, interests in sustainability. It provides a transdisciplinary overview of emergent theories and practices. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 173. History of Urban Planning and Design (4)
The analysis of the evolution of city designs over time; study of the forces that influence the form and content of a city: why cities change; comparison of urban planning and architecture in Europe and the United States. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 174. Regional Governance and Planning Reconsidered (4)
Regional planning and local governance in California, focusing on San Diego. Current system, the state/local relationship, and the incentives and disincentives for restructuring regional and local governance and planning. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 175. Site Analysis: Opportunities and Constraints (4)
Introduction to the theory and practice of context-sensitive site analysis, including site selection and programming, site inventory and analysis, and conceptual design. Demonstrates uses of GIS-based sketch planning tools for suitability analysis and project visualization in real world settings. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 176. Binational Regional Governance (4)
This course explores governance and planning challenges in the California/Baja California binational region. What are the roles of federal, state, and local governments in addressing issues of transportation, land use, water/wastewater management, and safety and security? Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 177. Urban Design Practicum (4)
This course is designed to introduce the student to the theory and practice of urban design, the form of the built environment, and how it is created. There is an emphasis on the development within a larger urban context. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor.

USP 179. Urban Design, Theory, and Practice (4)
Roles of the urban designer, preparing schematic proposals and performance statements, identifying opportunities for and constraints on designers. Each student will prepare a practical exercise in urban design using various urban design methods. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 180. Transportation Planning (4)
Introduction to the history and current state of urban transportation planning, including the relationship between transportation and urban form; role of automotive, mass transit, and alternative modes; methods for transportation systems analysis; decision-making, regulatory, and financing mechanisms; and public attitudes. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 186. Senior Sequence Research Proposal (6)
Introduces students to the theory and practice of social research including the challenges of writing a scholarly proposal. Students are required to complete one hundred hours of an internship experience while critically examining the relations between social science and society. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, USP major.

USP 187. Senior Sequence Research Project (6)
An intensive research, internship, and writing experience that culminates in an original senior research project. Students learn about the theoretical, ethical, and technical challenges of scholarly research and publication. Prerequisites: USP 186.

USP 189. Special Topics in Urban Planning (4)
An undergraduate course designed to cover various aspects of Urban Planning. May be taken for credit up to two times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 190. Senior Honors Seminar (4)
Each student enrolled will be required to write an honors essay, a substantial research paper on a current urban policy issue, under the supervision of a member of the faculty. Most often the essay will be based on their previous fieldwork courses and internship. This essay and other written exercises, as well as class participation, will be the basis of the final grade for the course. The seminar will rotate from year to year among the faculty in urban studies and planning. Prerequisites: USP 186, USP 187, major GPA 3.5, and permission of instructor.

USP 191. GIS for Urban and Community Planning (4)
Introduction to Geographic Information Systems and using GIS to make decisions: acquiring data and organizing data in useful formats, demographic mapping, geocoding. Selected exercises examine crime data, political campaigns, banking and environmental planning, patterns of bank lending and finance. Prerequisites: upper-division standing, USP major.

USP 193. San Diego Community Research (4)
Using the San Diego region as a case study, students will be introduced to the process of collecting, evaluating, and presenting urban and regional data using a variety of methods, including aggregate data analysis, historical research, and ethnography. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

USP 194. Research Seminar in Washington, DC (4)
(Same as Cognitive Science 194, Communication 194, Earth Science 194, History 193, Political Science 194, Sociology E/194.) Course attached to six-unit internship taken by students participating in the UCDC Program. Involves weekly seminar meetings with faculty and teaching assistant and a substantial research paper. Prerequisites: department approval and participating in UCDC Program.

USP 195. Teaching Apprentice—Undergraduate (2–4)
Introduction to teaching activities associated with course. Responsibilities include preparing reading materials assigned by the instructor, attending course lectures, meeting at least one hour per week with the instructor, assisting instructor in grading, and preparing a summary report to the instructor. Prerequisites: consent of instructor and an A in the course in which the student plans to assist.

USP 198. Directed Group Study (2–4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular departmental curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor.

USP 199. Independent Study (2–4)
Reading and research programs and field-study projects to be arranged between student and instructor, depending on the student’s needs and the instructor’s advice in terms of these needs. Prerequisites: upper-division standing and consent of instructor.

VIS 1. Introduction to Art Making: Two-Dimensional Practices (4)
An introduction to the concepts and techniques of art making with specific reference to the artists and issues of the twentieth century. Lectures and studio classes will examine the nature of images in relation to various themes. Drawing, painting, found objects, and texts will be employed. Prerequisites: none. This course is offered only one time each year.

VIS 2. Introduction to Art Making: Motion and Time Based Art (4)
An introduction to the process of art making utilizing the transaction between people, objects, and situations. Includes both critical reflection on relevant aspects of avant-garde art of the last two decades (Duchamp, Cage, Rauschenberg, Gertrude Stein, conceptual art, happenings, etc.) and practical experience in a variety of artistic exercises. Prerequisites: none. This course is offered only one time each year.

VIS 3. Introduction to Art Making: Three-Dimensional Practices (4)
An introduction to art making that uses as its base the idea of the “conceptual.” The lecture exists as a bank of knowledge about various art world and nonart world conceptual plays. The studio section attempts to incorporate these ideas into individual and group projects using any “material.” Prerequisites: none. This course is offered only one time each year.

VIS 20. Introduction to Art History (4)
This course examines history of Western art and architecture through such defining issues as the respective roles of tradition and innovation in the production and appreciation of art; the relation of art to its broader intellectual and historical contexts; and the changing concepts of the monument, the artist, meaning, style, and “art” itself. Representative examples will be selected from different periods, ranging from Antiquity to Modern. Content will vary with the instructor. Prerequisites: none.

VIS 21A. Introduction to the Art of the Americas or Africa and Oceania (4)
Course offers a comparative and thematic approach to the artistic achievements of societies with widely divergent structures and political organizations from the ancient Americas to Africa and the Pacific Islands. Topics vary with the interests and expertise of instructor. Prerequisites: none. Student may not receive credit for VIS 21 and VIS 21A.

VIS 21B. Introduction to Asian Art (4)
Survey of the major artistic trends of India, China, and Japan, taking a topical approach to important developments in artistic style and subject matter to highlight the art of specific cultures and religions. Prerequisites: none. Student may not receive credit for VIS 21 and VIS 21B.

VIS 22. Formations of Modern Art (4)
Wide-ranging survey introducing the key aspects of modern art and criticism in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries, including neoclassicism, romanticism, realism, impressionism, postimpressionism, symbolism, fauvism, cubism, Dadaism and surrealism, abstract expressionism, minimalism, earth art, and conceptual art. Prerequisites: none.

VIS 23. Information Technologies in Art History (4)
This seminar introduces fundamentals of art historical practice such as descriptive and analytical writing, compiling annotated bibliographies with traditional and online resources, defining research topics, and writing project proposals. Prerequisites: none. Art history majors only.

VIS 30. Introduction to Speculative Design (4)
Speculative design uses design methods to question and investigate material culture with critical creative purpose. This course provides a historical, theoretical, and methodological introduction to speculative design as a distinct program. Emphasis is tracing the integration of interdisciplinary intellectual and technical problems toward creative, unexpected propositions and prototypes. Prerequisites: none.

VIS 40. Introduction to Computing in the Arts (4)
An introduction to the conceptual uses and historical precedents for the use of computers in art making. Preparation for further study in the computer arts area by providing overview of theoretical issues related to the use of computers by artists. Introduces the students to the program’s computer facilities and teaches them basic computer skills. Prerequisites: none. Materials fee required.

VIS 41. Design Communication (4)
This course provides a strong foundation in contemporary techniques of design communication, including: digital image editing, typography, vector-based illustration and diagramming, document layout, as well as basic digital video editing tools, and web-production formats. Emphasis is on mastery of craft through iteration and presentation of multiple projects. Students may not receive credit for VIS 140 or ICAM 101 and VIS 41. Prerequisites: none.

VIS 60. Introduction to Digital Photography (4)
An in-depth exploration of the camera and image utilizing photographic digital technology. Emphasis is placed on developing fundamental control of the processes and materials through lectures, field, and lab experience. Basic discussion of image making included. Prerequisites: none. Materials fee required.

VIS 70N. Introduction to Media (6)
Operating as both a lecture and production course, this introductory class provides a technical foundation and theoretical context for all subsequent production-oriented film and video studies. In the laboratory, the student will learn the basic skills necessary to initiate video production. Completion of Visual Arts 70N is necessary to obtain a media card. Prerequisites: none. Materials fee required.

VIS 80. Introduction to the Studio Major (4)
A practical introduction to the studio art major and a conceptual introduction to how diverse strategies of art-making are produced, analyzed, and critiqued. Introduces historical and contemporary topics in painting, drawing, sculpture, installation, and performance art and field-based practices. Required for all studio majors and minors including transfer students. Must be taken in residence at UC San Diego. Prerequisites: none.

VIS 84. History of Film (4)
A survey of the history and the art of the cinema. The course will stress the origins of cinema and the contributions of the earliest filmmakers, including those of Europe, Russia, and the United States. Prerequisites: none. Materials fee required. This course is offered only one time each year.

VIS 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students with preference given to entering freshmen. Prerequisites: none.

VIS 100. Introduction to Public Culture (4)
This course is about the expansion of contemporary visual arts practice into a field of environmental, architectural, and urban sites. It foregrounds public engagement and political inquiry, explores new forms of research and community-based knowledge production, and develops strategies for visualizing the dynamics of contemporary urban life. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 100A. Design of Public Culture (4)
This course will explore design strategies that engage today’s shifting public domain structures, situating the problematic of “the public” and the politics of public sphere as sites of investigation, and speculating new interfaces between individuals, collectives, and institutions in coproducing more critical and inclusive forms of public space and culture. Prerequisites: VIS 30, 41, and 100.

VIS 101. Introduction to Urban Ecologies (4)
This course examines expanded meanings of the urban and the ecological into new conceptual zones for artistic practice and research, introducing urbanization as complex and transformative processes of interrelated cultural, socioeconomic, political, and environmental conditions, whose material and informational flows are generative of new interpretations of ecology. Prerequisites: VIS 30 and 41.

VIS 101A. Designing Urban Ecologies (4)
This course will explore design strategies that engage peoples' shifting geopolitical boundaries, bioregional and ecosystems, urban structures and landscapes, and recontextualize the city as a site of investigation by developing new ways of intervening into expanded notions of urban space, including virtual communities and new speculations of urbanity. Prerequisites: VIS 30, VIS 100, and VIS 101.

VIS 102. Cross-Border Urbanizations (4)
Introduction to urban inequality across the Tijuana-San Diego region, and the border flows that make the marginalized neighborhoods within this geography of conflict into sites of socioeconomic and cultural productivity, laboratories to rethink the gap between wealth and poverty. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 105A. Drawing: Representing the Subject (4)
A studio course in beginning drawing covering basic drawing and composition. These concepts will be introduced by the use of models, still life, landscapes, and conceptual projects. Prerequisites: two from VIS 1, 2, 3 and 111.

VIS 105B. Drawing: Practices and Genre (4)
A continuation of VIS 105A. A studio course in which the student will investigate a wider variety of technical and conceptual issues involved in contemporary art practice related to drawing. Prerequisites: VIS 105A.

VIS 105C. Drawing: Portfolio Projects (4)
A studio course in drawing, emphasizing individual creative problems. Class projects, discussions, and critiques will focus on issues related to intention, subject matter, and context. Prerequisites: VIS 105B.

VIS 105D. Art Forms and Chinese Calligraphy (4)
This course treats Chinese calligraphy as a multidimensional point of departure for aesthetic, cultural, and political concerns. This conceptually based course combines fundamental studio exercises with unconventional explorations. Students are exposed to both traditional and experimental forms of this unique art and encouraged to learn basic aesthetic grammars. There are no Chinese language requirements for this course. Prerequisites: VIS 105A.

VIS 105E. Chinese Calligraphy as Installation (4)
This course concerns East–West aesthetic interactions. What are the conceptual possibilities when calligraphy, an ancient form of Chinese art, is combined with installation, a contemporary artistic Western practice? Emphasis is placed on such issues as cultural hybridity, globalization, multiculturalism, and commercialization. Prerequisites: VIS 105D.

VIS 106A. Painting: Image Making (4)
A studio course focusing on problems inherent in painting—transferring information and ideas onto a two-dimensional surface, color, composition, as well as manual and technical procedures. These concepts will be explored through the use of models, still life, and landscapes. Prerequisites: two from VIS 1, 2, 3 and 111.

VIS 106B. Painting: Practices and Genre (4)
A continuation of VIS 106A. A studio course in which the student will investigate a wider variety of technical and conceptual issues involved in contemporary art practice related to painting. Prerequisites: VIS 106A.

VIS 106C. Painting: Portfolio Projects (4)
A studio course in painting emphasizing individual creative problems. Class projects, discussions, and critiques will focus on issues related to intention, subject matter, and context. Prerequisites: VIS 106B.

VIS 107A. Sculpture: Making the Object (4)
A studio course focusing on the problems involved in transferring ideas and information into three-dimensions. Course will explore materials and construction as dictated by the intended object. Specific problems to be investigated will be determined by the individual professor. Prerequisites: two from VIS 1, 2, 3 and 111.

VIS 107B. Sculpture: Practices and Genre (4)
A studio course in which the student will investigate a wider variety of technical and conceptual issues as well as materials involved in contemporary art practice related to sculpture. Prerequisites: VIS 107A.

VIS 107C. Sculpture: Portfolio Projects (4)
A studio course in sculpture emphasizing individual creative problems. Class projects, discussions, and critiques will focus on issues related to intention, subject matter, and context. Students may not receive credit for both VIS 107C and VIS 107CN. Prerequisites: VIS 107B.

VIS 108. Advanced Projects in Art (4)
A studio course for serious art students at the advanced level. Stress will be placed on individual creative problems. Specific orientation of this course will vary with the instructor. Topics may include film, video, photography, painting, performance, etc. May be repeated twice for credit. Prerequisites: consent of instructor, department stamp required.

VIS 109. Advanced Projects in Media (4)
Individual or group projects over one or two quarters. Specific project organized by the student(s) will be realized during this course with instructor acting as a close adviser/critic. Concept papers/scripts must be completed by the instructor prior to enrollment. Prerequisites: VIS 180A and VIS 180B for media majors, or consent of instructor for ICAM majors. Open to media and ICAM majors only. Two production-course limitation.

VIS 110A. Contemporary Issues and Practices (4)
An examination of contemporary studio art practice. The course is divided among research, discussion, and projects. Field trips to galleries and discussions with artists will combine with the students moving their work into a dialogue with the issues raised. Prerequisites: two from VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN and 147B.

VIS 110C. Proposals, Plans, Presentations (4)
Explores the use of the maquette, or sketch, in the process of developing, proposing and planning visual works in various media for public projects, site specific works, grants, exhibition proposals, etc. The student will work on synthesizing ideas and representing them in alternate forms that deal with conception, fabrication and presentation. Prerequisites: two from VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN and 147B.

VIS 110D. Visual Narrative/Tableau (4)
Examination and use of multimedia in exploring narrative issues in art making. The identification of subject leads to the determination of choice or mix of media and construction of narrative. Traditional studio practice surrounding narrative painting and sculpture, forms such as comic drawing or story boards, and the use of photo, video, and computing. Prerequisites: two from VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN, or 147B, or consent of instructor

VIS 110E. Art in Public Space/Site-Specific Art (4)
Course takes painting, sculpture, and related media out of the studio/gallery and into the public sphere by examining the contemporary history of public artworks with traditional and nontraditional site-specific work, focusing on production, critical discussion, and writing. Prerequisites: two from VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN, or 147B, or consent of instructor.

VIS 110F. Installation: Cross-Disciplinary Projects (4)
Attempts to expand the idea contained in a singular work, or object, into the use of multiple objects, images, and media that redefines the idea as well as the space for which it is intended. Examination of historic, modern, and contemporary works would be brought into discussion of project development and execution. Prerequisites: two from VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN and 147B.

VIS 110G. The Natural and Altered Environment (4)
Explores the natural and altered environment as a basis for subject as well as placement of work pertaining to the environment. Prerequisites: two from VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN and 147B.

VIS 110J. Ritual Performance (4)
The course will explore forms of art making that use dream and myth, body art, dance, social drama, happenings, story telling, and enactments of contemporary and traditional forms of performance art that involve a crossing of the lines between different arts and genres. Prerequisites: two from VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN and 147B.

VIS 110M. Studio Honors I (4)
An advanced studio course intended for the productive, motivated, and self-disciplined student with a clear and unified body of work. The intent is to help refine and expand the student’s work and ideas towards an exhibition and verbal written position. Prerequisites: consent of the instructor, department stamp required. Note: The Studio Honors I and the attached Studio Honors II count as one course toward the fulfillment of a Group IV requirement.

VIS 110N. Studio Honors II (4)
The second advanced studio course in the Honors Program in Studio, the successful completion of which will lead towards an honors degree in the studio major. The course builds on the critical and technical issues raised in Studio Honors I. Prerequisites: VIS 110M.

VIS 111. The Structure of Art (4)
This course examines the significant topics in art practice, theory, and history that are shaping contemporary art thinking. A wide range of media, ranging across studio art practice, digital media, performative practices, and public culture will be considered as interrelated components. This course is required for visual arts transfer students. This course is offered during winter quarter only. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 112. Art Historical Methods (4)
A critical review of the principal strategies of investigation in past and present art-historical practice, a scrutiny of their contexts and underlying assumptions, and a look at alternative possibilities. The various traditions for formal and iconographic analysis as well as the categories of historical description will be studied. Required for all art history and criticism majors. Prerequisites: VIS 23 and one upper-division art history course; two recommended.

VIS 113AN. History of Criticism I: Early Modern (4)
Using a wide range of nineteenth-century texts, this course will offer close discussions of romantic criticism and aesthetic philosophy (ideas of originality, genius, and nature); the conditions of "modern life"; realism and naturalism; science and photography; and questions of form, expression, symbolism, and history. This is a seminar course. Recommended preparation: two upper-division art history courses. Prerequisites: VIS 112.

VIS 113BN. History of Criticism II: Early Twentieth Century (1900–1950) (4)
The principal theories of art and criticism from symbolism until 1945: formalism and modernism, abstraction, surrealism, Marxism, and social art histories, phenomenology, existentialism. Prerequisites: none; VIS 112 or two upper-division courses in art history strongly recommended.

VIS 113CN. History of Criticism III: Contemporary (1950–Present) (4)
Recent approaches to the image in art history and visual culture: structuralism, semiotics, psychoanalysis, poststructuralism, postmodernism, feminism, postcolonialism, cultural studies. Prerequisites: none; VIS 112 or two upper-division courses in art history strongly recommended.

VIS 114A. Landscape and Memory (4)
This seminar treats landscape as site, image, symbol, and ideal through a historical examination of the major themes and issues in the forms and functions of landscape and its representation in the European and, to a certain extent, the American tradition from antiquity to the present day. These historical discussions will also form a framework for observations on and analyses of contemporary landscape, both as experienced and as an idea. This course presumes no prior knowledge of the field. This course fulfills the theory requirement and seminar requirement in the art history program. Recommended preparation: VIS 20. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 114B. The Fragment: Uses and Theories (4)
This seminar focuses on the dynamic and at times contentious relationship between antiquity and the Middle Ages as it played out in various environments—physical, social, cultural, and intellectual—from Rome to Constantinople to Venice, Pisa, and Florence. After considering classic and contemporary formulations of the problem, it turns to in-depth examination of the architecture, images, objects, and techniques at sites in the history of art, where fragments were deployed and displayed. This course fulfills the theory requirement and seminar requirement in the art history program. Recommended preparation: VIS 20 or VIS 112. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 114GS. Arts and Visual Culture in China (4)
This course studies important developments in the arts of China in the context of contemporary cultural phenomena. The factors behind the making of art will be brought to bear on selected objects or monuments from China's great artistic eras. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor and departmental approval.

VIS 117E. Problems in Ethnoaesthetics (4)
This seminar will address and critique various approaches to studying the art of non-Western societies with respect to their own aesthetic and cultural systems. Students are encouraged to explore comparative philosophies of art and test paradigms of Western aesthetic scholarship. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; VIS 21A or 21B or 112 or two upper-division courses in art history strongly recommended.

VIS 117F. Theorizing the Americas (4)
Examines the philosophical debates that locate the Americas in relation to the modern world. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 117I. Western and Non-Western Rituals and Ceremonies (4)
This course will examine the process of image-making within specific ceremonies and/or rituals. Selected ceremonies from West Africa, Melanesia, Nepal, and the United States, including both Christian and non-Christian imagery, will be considered. Performance art and masquerade will be analyzed within a non-Western framework. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21A recommended. Student may not receive credit for VIS 126F and VIS 117I.

VIS 120A. Greek Art (4)
Greek classical civilization was a turning point in the history of humanity. Within a new kind of society, the idea of the individual as free and responsible was forged, and with it the invention of history, philosophy, tragedy, and science. The arts that expressed this cultural explosion were no less revolutionary. The achievements of Greek art in architecture, sculpture, and painting will be examined from their beginnings in the archaic period, to their epoch-making fulfillment in the classical decades of the fifth century BC, to their diffusion over the entire ancient world in the age of Alexander and his successors. Prerequisites: none; VIS 20 recommended.

VIS 120B. Roman Art (4)
Roman art was the “modern art” of antiquity. Out of their Italic tradition and the great inheritance of Greek classic and Hellenistic art, the Romans forged a new language of form to meet the needs of a vast empire, a complex and tumultuous society, and a sophisticated, intellectually diverse culture. An unprecedented architecture of shaped space used new materials and revolutionary engineering techniques in boldly functional ways for purposes of psychological control and symbolic assertion. Sculpture in the round and in relief was pictorialized to gain spatial effects and immediacy of presence, and an extraordinary art of portraiture investigated the psychology while asserting the status claims of the individual. Extreme shifts of style, from the classicism of the age of Augustus to the expressionism of the third century AD, are characteristic of this period. The new modes of architecture, sculpture, and painting, whether in the service of the rhetoric of state power or of the individual quest for meaning, were passed on to the medieval and ultimately to the modern West. Prerequisites: none; VIS 20 recommended.

VIS 120C. Late Antique Art (4)
During the later centuries of the Roman Empire, the ancient world underwent a profound crisis. Beset by barbarian invasions, torn by internal conflict and drastic social change, inflamed with religious passion that was to lead to a transformed vision of the individual, the world, and the divine, this momentous age saw the conversion of the Roman world to Christianity, the transfer of power from Rome to Constantinople, and the creation of a new society and culture. Out of this ferment, during the centuries from Constantine to Justinian, there emerged new art forms fit to represent the new vision of an otherworldly reality: a vaulted architecture of diaphanous space, a new art of mosaic, which dissolved surfaces in light, a figural language both abstractly symbolic and urgently expressive. The great creative epoch transformed the heritage of classical Greco-Roman art and laid the foundations of the art of the Christian West and Muslim East for the next thousand years. Prerequisites: none; VIS 20 or 120B recommended.

VIS 121AN. Art and Experience in the Middle Ages (4)
This survey course follows the parallel tracks of the sacred and secular in art and architecture from Constantine to the Crusades. Highlights include the emergence of Christian art, visual culture of the courts, development of monasteries, fall and rise of towns and cities, and arts of ritual. The thematic juxtaposition of different media and medieval people speaking in their own voices yields a multidimensional image of society in which the medieval experience is made as concrete as possible. Recommended preparation: VIS 20. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 121B. Church and Mosque: Medieval Art and Architecture between Christianity and Islam (4)
This course surveys the changes in art and architecture caused by the rise of new religions after the ancient world demise, a period of upheaval and contention often known as the “Clash of Gods.” How did Christianity come to dominate Europe with its churches and monasteries and then Islam with its mosques in the Middle East and North Africa? Studying the role of religion in the formation of artistic styles will show a dynamic interaction between the visual cultures of Christianity and Islam. Recommended preparation: VIS 20. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 122AN. Renaissance Art (4)
Italian artists and critics of the fourteenth through sixteenth centuries were convinced that they were participating in a revival of the arts unparalleled since antiquity. Focusing primarily on Italy, this course traces the emergence in painting, sculpture and architecture, of an art based on natural philosophy, optical principles, and humanist values, which embodied the highest intellectual achievement and deepest spiritual beliefs of the age. Artists treated include Giotto, Donatello, Masaccio, Brunelleschi, Jan van Eyck, Mantegna, Botticelli, Leonardo da Vinci, Michelangelo, Raphael, Bramante, Durer, and Titian. Prerequisites: none; VIS 20 recommended.

VIS 122CN. Leonardo da Vinci in Context (4)
An in depth look at the art of Leonardo da Vinci with special emphasis on his training in Florence, interactions with Bramante, and the response to his work by Raphael. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 122D. Michelangelo (4)
This course offers new approaches to understanding Michelangelo’s greatest creations. By considering how each work relates to the setting for which it was intended, by regarding critical literature and artistic borrowings as evidence about the works, and by studying the thought of the spiritual reformers who counseled Michelangelo, new interpretations emerge which show the artist to be a deeply religious man who invested his works with both public and private meanings. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; or one of the following courses: VIS 20, 21, 22 or 23; or any upper-division course in art history and criticism or in European history.

VIS 122F. Leonardo’s La Gioconda (4)
A critical, art historical look at the world’s most famous painting and its interpretations. Prerequisites: VIS 23. One upper-division course in art history (113AN–129F) is recommended.

VIS 122GS. The City in Italy (4)
(Cross-listed with HIEU 124GS.) Language and culture study in Italy. Course considers the social, political, economic, and religious aspects of civic life that gave rise to the unique civic art, the architecture of public buildings, and the design of the urban environment of such cities as Florence, Venice, or Rome. Course materials fee may be required. Students may not receive credit for both VIS 122E and VIS 122GS or both HIEU 124 and HIEU 124GS. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor and departmental approval.

VIS 124BN. Art and the Enlightenment (4)
Eighteenth century artists and critics were convinced that art could be a force to improve society. This course places Roccoco and neoclassical artists such as Watteau, Fragonard, Tiepolo, Hogarth, Reynolds, Vigee Lebrun, Blake, and David, within the context of art academies, colonialism, the Grand Tour, Enlightenment conceptualizations of history and nature, and the American and French Revolutions. Prerequisites: none; VIS 20 or 22 recommended.

VIS 124CN. Nineteenth-Century Art (4)
A critical survey discussing the crisis of the Enlightenment, romanticism, realism and naturalism, academic art and history painting, representations of the New World, the Pre-Raphaelites, impressionism, international symbolism, postimpressionism, and the beginnings of modernism. Prerequisites: none; VIS 20 or 22 recommended.

VIS 125A. Twentieth-Century Art (4)
A critical survey outlining the major avant-gardes after 1900: fauvism, cubism, metaphysical painting, futurism, Dadaism, surrealism, neoplasticism, purism, the Soviet avant-garde, socialist realism, and American art before abstract expressionism. Prerequisites: none; VIS 20 or 22 recommended.

VIS 125BN. Contemporary Art (4)
Art after abstract expressionism: happenings, postpainterly abstraction, minimalism, performance, earth art, conceptual art, neoexpressionism, postconceptualism and development in the 1990s, including non-Western contexts. We also explore the relation of these tendencies to postmodernism, feminism, and ideas of postcoloniality. Prerequisites: none; VIS 20 or 22 recommended.

VIS 125DN. Marcel Duchamp (4)
A critical examination of the work of one of the most radical twentieth-century artists. In Duchamp’s four dimensional perspective, the ideas of art-object, artist, and art itself are deconstructed. The Large Glass and Etant Donnees are the twin foci of an oeuvre without boundaries in which many twentieth-century avant-garde devices such as chance techniques, conceptual art, and the fashioning of fictive identities, are invented. Prerequisites: none.

VIS 126AN. Pre-Columbian Art of Ancient Mexico and Central America (4)
An introduction to the cities and monuments of the ancient civilizations that flourished in Mexico and Central America before the Spanish Conquest. This course will cover the major cultures of Mesoamerica, including the Olmec, Aztec, and neighboring groups. Prerequisites: none; VIS 21 recommended.

VIS 126BN. The Art and Civilization of the Ancient Maya (4)
This course offers a history of Maya society from its formative stages to the eve of the Spanish Conquest through an investigation of its art and archeology. Special attention is given to its unique calendar and writing systems. Prerequisites: none; VIS 21 recommended.

VIS 126C. Problems in Mesoamerican Art History (4)
Topics of this seminar will address special problems or areas of research related to the major civilizations of ancient Mexico and Central America. Course offerings will vary to focus upon particular themes, subjects, or interpretive problems. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21A recommended. Student may not receive credit for VIS 126B and VIS 126C.

VIS 126D. Problems in Ancient Maya Iconography and Inscriptions (4)
This seminar focuses upon the art, architecture, and inscriptions of the ancient Maya. Topics will vary within a range of problems that concern hieroglyphic writing, architecture, and visual symbols the Maya elite used to mediate their social, political, and spiritual words. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21A recommended.

VIS 126HN. Pacific Coast American Indian Art (4)
Explores the art and expressive culture of American Indians of far western United States, including California and Pacific Northwest. Social and cultural contexts of artistic traditions and their relations to the lifeways, ceremonialism, beliefs, and creative visions of their makers. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21A recommended. Student may not receive credit for VIS 126CN and VIS 126HN.

VIS 126I. Southwest American Indian Art (4)
Examines the history, art, and architecture of Navajo, Hopi, Zuni, and other Native American communities of New Mexico and Arizona; the origins of their civilization; and how their arts survived, adapted, and changed in response to Euro-American influences. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21A recommended. Student may not receive credit for VIS 126D and VIS 126I.

VIS 126K. Oceanic Art (4)
An examination of the relation of art to ritual life, mythology, and social organization in the native Polynesian and Melanesian cultures of Hawaii, New Guinea, the Solomon Islands, and Australia. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21A recommended. Student may not receive credit for VIS 126E and VIS 126K.

VIS 126P. Latin American Art: Modern to Postmodern, 1890–1950 (4)
A survey of major figures and movements in Latin American art from the late-nineteenth century to the mid-twentieth century. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 126Q. Latin American Art: Modern to Postmodern, 1950–Present (4)
A survey of major figures and movements in Latin American art from the mid-twentieth century to the present. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 127A. Contemporary Arts in South Korea (4)
The course will examine the theories and practices of contemporary art in South Korea, and its systems of cultural productions and disseminations. Highlighting the work of representative artists, institutions, and events, focuses will be on the predominance of governmental and corporate sponsorships, and how its cultural system is positioned for national and global presence, as well as the emergence alternative art spaces that promote the decentralization of cultural programs. Course is part of Korean studies minor program. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 127B. Arts of China (4)
Course will survey major trends in the arts of China from a thematic point of view, explore factors behind the making of works of art, including political and religious meanings, and examine contexts for art in contemporary cultural phenomena. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21B recommended.

VIS 127C. Arts of Modern China (4)
Course will explore Chinese art of the twentieth century. By examining artworks in different media, we will investigate the most compelling of the multiple realities that Chinese artists have constructed for themselves. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21B recommended.

VIS 127GS. Issues in Modern and Contemporary Chinese Art (4)
This course investigates the multiple realities of art and visual culture in twentieth-century China, and explores the ways in which Chinese artists have defined modernity and their tradition against the complex background of China’s history. Prerequisites: upper-division standing or consent of instructor and departmental approval.

VIS 127N. Twentieth-Century Art in China and Japan (4)
Surveys the key works and developments in the modern art and visual culture of Japan from Edo and Meiji to the present and of China from the early twentieth century to contemporary video, performance, and installation art. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21B recommended.

VIS 127P. Arts of Japan (4)
Course is a survey of the visual arts of Japan, considering how the arts developed in the context of Japan’s history and discussing how art and architecture were used for philosophical, religious, and material ends. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. VIS 21B recommended.

VIS 128A–E. Topics in Art History and Theory (4)
These lecture courses are on topics of special interest to visiting and permanent faculty. Topics vary from term to term and with instructor and many will not be repeated. These courses fulfill upper-division distribution requirements. As the courses under this heading will be offered less frequently than those of the regular curriculum, students are urged to check with the visual arts department academic advising office for availability and descriptions of these supplementary courses. Like the courses listed under VIS 129, below, the letters following the course number designate the general area in which the courses fall. Students may take courses with the same number but of different content, for a total of three times for credit. Prerequisites: none; courses in art history recommended.

VIS 128A. Topics in Premodern Art History (4)
A lecture course on a topic of special interest in ancient or medieval art. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; courses in art history (VIS 113AN–129F) are recommended.

VIS 128C. Topics in Modern Art History (4)
A lecture course on a topic of special interest on modern or contemporary art. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: upper-division standing; courses in art history (VIS 113AN–129F) are recommended.

VIS 128D. Topics in Art History of the Americas (4)
A lecture course on the topic of special interest in the art of Latin America, the Ancient Americas, or Africa and the Pacific Islands. Students may not receive credit for VIS 128D and VIS 128DN. Recommended preparation: courses in art history (VIS 113AN–129F). May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 128E. Topics in Art History of Asia (4)
A lecture course on the topic of special interest in India, China, and Japan. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Courses in art history (VIS 113AN–129F) are recommended.

VIS 129A–F. Seminar in Art Criticism and Theory (4)
These seminar courses provide the opportunity for in-depth study of a particular work, artist, subject, period, or issue. Courses offered under this heading may reflect the current research interests of the instructor or treat a controversial theme in the field of art history and criticism. Active student research and classroom participation are expected. Enrollment is limited and preference will be given to majors. The letters following 129 in the course number designate the particular area of art history or theory concerned. Students may take courses with the same number but of different content more than once for credit, with consent of the instructor and/or the program adviser. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: VIS 112 or two upper-division courses in art history.

VIS 129A. Seminar in Premodern Art History (4)
A seminar on an advanced topic of special interest in ancient or medieval art. Prerequisites: VIS 112 or two upper-division courses in art history (VIS 113AN–129F).

VIS 129C. Seminar in Modern Art History (4)
A seminar on an advanced topic of special interest in modern or contemporary art. Prerequisites: VIS 112 or two upper-division courses in art history (VIS 113AN–129F).

VIS 129D. Seminar in Art History of the Americas (4)
A seminar on an advanced topic of special interest in the Ancient Americas to Africa and the Pacific Islands. Prerequisites: VIS 112 or two upper-division courses in art history (VIS 113AN–129F).

VIS 129E. Seminar in Art History of Asia (4)
A seminar on an advanced topic of special interest in India, China, and Japan. Prerequisites: VIS 112 or two upper-division courses in art history (VIS 113AN–129F).

VIS 129F. Seminar in Art Theory and Criticism (4)
A seminar on an advanced topic of special interest in art theory, art criticism, or the history of literature on art. Prerequisites: VIS 112 or two upper-division courses in art history (VIS 113AN–129F).

VIS 129G. Art History Honors Seminar (4)
This research seminar, centered on a series of critical, thematic, theoretical, and/or historical issues that cut across subdisciplinary specializations, provides outstanding advanced students with the opportunity to undertake graduate-level research. The first part of a two-part sequence completed by Art History Honors Directed Group Study (VIS 129H). Prerequisites: consent of instructor or art history faculty adviser, department stamp required. Note: The Art History Honors Seminar and the attached Art History Honors Directed Group Study counts as one course toward the fulfillment of the Group III requirement.

VIS 129H. Art History Honors Directed Group Study (4)
The second part of the honors program sequence, this course provides a forum for students engaged in research and writing to develop their ideas with the help of a faculty adviser and in conjunction with similarly engaged students. Prerequisites: consent of instructor or art history faculty adviser, department stamp required.

VIS 130. Special Projects in Visual Arts (4)
Specific content will vary each quarter. Areas will cover expertise of visiting faculty. May be repeated twice for credit. Prerequisites: two from (VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN, and 147B) or one from (VIS 180A, 180B, 183A, and 183B) or consent of instructor/department stamp required. Visual arts/media, studio, ICAM majors only.

VIS 131. Special Projects in Media (4)
Specific content will vary each quarter. Areas will cover expertise of visiting faculty. May be repeated twice for credit. Prerequisites: two from (VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN, or 147B) or one from (VIS 180A, 180B, 183A, and 183B) or consent of instructor. Open to studio, visual arts/media, and ICAM majors only.

VIS 132. Installation Production and Studio (4)
Through discussions and readings, the class will examine the issues and aesthetics of installation art making. Using media familiar to them, students will produce several projects. May be repeated once for credit. Studio and visual arts/media majors only. Prerequisites: two from (VIS 104CN, 105C, 106C, 107CN, or 147B) or one from (VIS 180A, 180B, 183A, and 183B) or consent of instructor. Open to studio, media majors only.

VIS 140. Digital Imaging: Image and Interactivity (4)
Introduction to digital image involving images, texts, and interactive display and operates both within computer-mediated space (i.e., website) and in physical space (i.e., artist book). Interactive narrative and computer programming are explored. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: VIS 40 or ICAM 40. Open to media, ICAM, and studio majors; computing and ICAM minors only. Two production-course limitation.

VIS 141A. Computer Programming for the Arts I (4)
Introduces external API’s currently of interest in the arts (example: OpenGL, J2ME, Servlet/JSP, Java3D) extending a common programming language such as C++ or Java. Students gain API fluency through planning and coding software or software mediated art projects. Materials fee required. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 40 or ICAM 40 and CSE 11 or CSE 8B. Open to ICAM majors and minors only.

VIS 141B. Computer Programming for the Arts II (4)
Students extend their programming capabilities to include the creation of reusable software libraries, packages, database API’s, tools, utilities, and applications intended to be publishable and useful to other practicing artists, or as preparatory work for the student’s senior thesis sequence. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: VIS 141A. Open to ICAM majors and minors only. Two production-course limitation.

VIS 145A. Time- and Process-Based Digital Media I (4)
Introduces time- and process-based digital media art making. Contemporary and historical works across time- and process-based media will be studied and projects produced. Topics may include software art, software and hardware interfacing, interaction, and installation in an art context. Recommended preparation: CSE 5A or equivalent programming experience. Materials fee required. May not receive credit for VIS 145A and ICAM 102. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 40 or ICAM 40. Open to media and ICAM majors and ICAM minors only.

VIS 145B.Time- and Process-Based Digital Media II (4)
Students will implement time- and process-based projects under direction of faculty. Projects such as software and hardware interfacing, computer mediated performance, software art, installation, interactive environments, data visualization and sonification will be produced as advanced study and portfolio project. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: VIS 145A or ICAM 102. Open to media and ICAM majors; ICAM minors only. Two production-course limitation.

VIS 147A. Electronic Technologies for Art I (4)
Develop artworks and installations that utilize digital electronics. Techniques in digital electronic construction and computer interfacing for interactive control of sound, lighting, and electromechanics. Construction of devices that responsively adapt artworks to conditions involving viewer participation, space activation, machine intelligence. Program or material fee may apply. Purchase of components kit required. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 40 or ICAM 40. Open to media, studio, and ICAM majors; ICAM minors only.

VIS 147B. Electronic Technologies for Art II (4)
Continuation of the electronics curriculum. Design of programmable microcontroller systems for creating artworks that are able to respond to complex sets of input conditions, perform algorithmic and procedural processing, and generate real time output. Purchase of components kit required. Prerequisites: VIS 147A. Open to media, studio, and ICAM majors; computing and ICAM minors only. Two production-course limitation.

VIS 149. Seminar in Contemporary Computer Topics (4)
Topics relevant to computer-based art- and music-making, such as computer methods for making art/music, design of interactive systems, spatialization of visual/musical elements, critical studies. Topics will vary. May be taken for credit three times. Recommended preparation: VIS 145A or ICAM 102 and MUS 170 or ICAM 103. Materials fee required. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 140 or ICAM 101. Open to media and ICAM majors; ICAM minors only.

VIS 151. History of the Experimental Film (4)
An inquiry into a specialized alternative history of film, consisting of experimental works made outside the conventions of the movie industry and, which in their style and nature, are closer to modernist painting, poetry, etc., than to the mainstream theatrical cinema. Works by such film artists as Man Ray, Salvador Dali, Maya Deren, Stan Brakhage, and Michael Snow will be examined in depth. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: VIS 84 or consent of instructor.

VIS 152. Film in Social Context (4)
This collection of courses gathers, under one cover, films that are strongly marked by period, geography, and the culture within which they received their dominating local quality. These courses pay particular attention to the stamp of place—climate, dress, habitation, language, music, politics—as well as the filmic moves that helped color such works as environmental. The series takes in the following subjects: Third World films, the Munich films (the new wave of Germans who made their first features in Munich following 1967), Japanese movies, films of the American thirties and their relationship to current thought, American Westerns, ethnographic film, Brazil’s Cinema Novo, etc. Specific topics to be covered will vary with the instructor. May be repeated twice for credit. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: VIS 84 or consent of instructor.

VIS 152D. Identity through Transnational Cinemas (4)
Transnational Cinemas examine how US identities and film cultures have been forged through stories of exile, diaspora, and racial and sexual discrimination as well as cultural conflicts that have resonated here and abroad in the global film and media culture of the last century. Program or material fee may apply. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 154. Hard Look at the Movies (4)
Examines a choice of films, selected along different lines of analysis, coherent within the particular premise of the course. Films are selected from different periods and genres among Hollywood, European, and Third World films. May be repeated once for credit. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: VIS 84 or consent of instructor.

VIS 155. The Director Series (4)
A course that describes the experiences, looks, and structure of director-dominated films. A different director will be studied each quarter. The student will be required to attend the lecture in the course and to meet with the instructor at least once each week. May be repeated three times for credit. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: VIS 84 or consent of instructor.

VIS 156. Latino American Cinema (4)
This course introduces students to the developing history of cinema in the Latin American region. It explores the multiple authors and film movements that engage cinema as an art form in relation to issues of modernization, development, and political and social crisis. It will regard the history of cinema in the subcontinent as a force generating important cultural transformations within the complex, conflictual processes of modernization. Students may not receive credit for both COGS 156 and VIS 125F. Prerequisites: none.

VIS 158. Histories of Photography (4)
Photography is so ubiquitous a part of our culture that it seems to defy any simple historical definition. Accordingly, this course presents a doubled account of the medium; it explores both the historical and cultural specificity of a singular photography as well as some of the multitude of photographies that inhabit our world. Will examine a number of the most important photographic themes from the past two hundred years. Prerequisites: none.

VIS 159. History of Art and Technology (4)
Aims to provide historical context for computer arts by examining the interaction between the arts, media technologies, and sciences in different historical periods. Topics vary (e.g., Renaissance perspective, futurism and technology, and computer art of the 1950s and 1960s). Material fee required. Prerequisites: upper-division standing.

VIS 161. Systems and Networks at Scale (4)
This course introduces students to the study and design of complex systems and networks at diverse scales, from the nanometric to the planetary (and perhaps beyond). Systems and networks are understood as both physical and conceptual organizations of tangible and intangible actors. These include: architectural and urban systems, information and interactive systems, diagrammatic and performative systems, and political and geopolitical systems. Prerequisites: VIS 30, VIS 41, and VIS 100.

VIS 162. Speculative Science and Design Invention (4)
The course seeks to bring the scientific laboratory into the artist and designers' studio, and vice versa. It explores intersections of advanced research in art/ design and science/technology. The course will focus on a specific laboratory innovation or a longer-term enduring challenge, and will conceive and prototype possible applications, scenarios, structures, and interventions. Course will be conducted in direct collaborations with other campus laboratories and research units. Prerequisites: VIS 161.

VIS 164. Photographic Strategies: Art or Evidence (4)
An intermediate course that expands the possibility of photography as an art practice. The students will learn to use and think of photography as a means of expression. Using the languages of contemporary art and photography the student will develop a body of work to be presented and critiqued. The construction of sequences, series, and the art of editing will be an important part of this critique-based course, Program or material fee may apply. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 60. Open to media and studio majors and photography minors only.

VIS 165. Camera Techniques: Analog Futures (4)
Course explores both material and conceptual analog photography practices. Course will introduce the students to the history of chemical and ocular processes since the nineteenth century and their impact on image making. Students will learn basic black-and-white darkroom techniques, processing film, proofing, and printing. Course will conclude with a primer in the new photographic hybridity, bringing analog into the digital terrain. Students will be required to create a small portfolio of work. Program or material fee may apply. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 60. Open to media and studio majors and photography minors only.

VIS 167. Social Engagement and Photography (4)
The photograph is an empirical object. This course will explore the use of photography as a tool to both understand and represent the world. Students will learn the history of the use of photography as evidence and as a tool of empirical knowledge. In a world where subjectivity is performed the students will be required to make a medium-sized work that engages the social in a creative way. Program or material fee may apply. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 60 and one from VIS 164 or VIS 165.

VIS 168. Pictorialism and Constructed Reality (4)
This course will explore photography as art and its long and complicated relationship with painting. Students will learn and be encouraged to experiment with the medium formally and conceptually. From studio and lighting techniques to collage, montage, constructed realities, installations, and projections. Program or material fee may apply. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 60 and one from VIS 164 or VIS 165.

VIS 171. Digital Cinema—Theory and Production (4)
A digital image is not a film image, and this reality and its technological and conceptual implications are what this course will attempt to map out, exploring its possibilities and the massive overhaul of media aesthetics it implies. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174. Open to media majors only.

VIS 174. Media Sketchbook (4)
Video medium used both as production technology and as device to explore the fundamental character of filmmaking and time-based computer art practices. Students perform all aspects of production with attention to developing ideas and building analytical/critical skills. Prerequisites: VIS 70N. Open to media and ICAM majors only. Two production-course limitation.

VIS 175. Editing—Theory and Production (4)
The evolving aims and grammars of editing practice in film and digital media will be examined. These histories will create a context for exploring contemporary editing strategies. The production projects will be centered on digital editing practice. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174. Open to media majors only.

VIS 176. 16mm Filmmaking (4)
A technical foundation and creative theoretical context for film production will be provided. Students will produce a short film with post-synchronized sounds and final mixed-track. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174. Open to media majors only.

VIS 177. Scripting Strategies (4)
Script writing, reading, and analysis of traditional and experimental media productions. The emphasis will be on the structural character of the scripting process and its language. Students will write several short scripts along with analytical papers. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174. Open to media majors only.

VIS 178. Sound—Theory and Production (4)
Sound design plays an increasing role in media production and has opened up new structural possibilities for narrative strategies. A critical and historical review of sound design and a production methodology component. Critical papers and soundtracks for short film projects will be required. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174. Open to media majors only.

VIS 180A. Documentary Evidence and the Construction of Authenticity in Current Media Practices (4)
Exploration of concepts in representational artworks by critically examining “found” vs. “made” recorded material. Advanced film/video, photography, computing work. Issues of narrative and structure; attention to formal aspects of media work emphasized. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174 and two from VIS 140, 145A, 147A, 164, 165, 171, 175, 176, 177, 178. Open to media majors only.

VIS 180B. Fiction and Allegory in Current Media Practices (4)
Exploration of choices in invention, emphasizing “made” over “found.” Advanced film/video, photography, and computing. Issues of narrative and structure, and formal aspects of media work emphasized. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174 and two from VIS 140, 145A, 147A, 164, 165, 171, 175, 176, 177, 178. Open to media majors only.

VIS 181. Sound and Lighting (4)
Advanced course to gain sophisticated control of lighting and sound recording techniques with understanding of theoretical implications and interrelation between production values and subject matter. Interactions between sound and image in various works in film, video, or installation. Recommended preparation: VIS 171 Digital Cinema strongly recommended. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174, and two from VIS 140, 145A, 147A, 164, 165, 171, 175, 176, 177, 178. Open to media majors only.

VIS 182. Advanced Editing (4)
Film/video editing and problems of editing from theoretical and practical points-of-view. Films and tapes analyzed on a frame-by-frame, shot-by-shot basis. Edit stock material and generate own materials for editing final project. Aesthetic and technical similarities/differences of film/video. Recommended preparation: VIS 175 Editing-Theory and Production strongly recommended. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174 and two from VIS 140, 145A, 147A, 164, 165, 171, 175, 176, 177, 178. Open to media majors only.

VIS 183A. Strategies of Self (4)
Looks at the way that self-identity is reflected and produced through various media practices. Focus is on rhetorical strategies of biography and autobiography in media, comparing and contrasting these strategies with those drawn from related cultural forms. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174 and two from VIS 140, 145A, 147A, 164, 165, 171, 175, 176, 177, 178. Open to media majors only.

VIS 183B. Strategies of Alterity (4)
Looks at difference as it is reflected and constructed in various media practices. Course will examine a wide range of forms and genres such as ethnography, science fiction, crime narratives, documentary film, political drama, and animated shorts. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174 and two from VIS 140, 145A, 147A, 164, 165, 171, 175, 176, 177, 178. Open to media majors only.

VIS 184. Advanced Scripting (4)
Film/video production will be framed through the script writing process, focusing on the problems of longer duration, density, and adaptation from other media. Students will both read and analyze both historical and contemporary scripts and produce a thirty- to sixty-minute script. Recommended preparation: VIS 177 Scripting Strategies. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: VIS 174 and two from VIS 140, 145A, 147A, 164, 165, 171, 175, 176, 177, 178. Open to media majors only.

VIS 185. Senior Media Projects (4)
Through instruction and discussion, the class will focus on guiding students through advanced production on a senior project. Students will be expected to initiate and complete production on at least one portfolio-level project. May be taken for credit two times. Two production-course limitation. Prerequisites: two from VIS 171, 175, 177, 178 and one from VIS 180A, 180B, 181, 182, 183A, 183B, 184. Open to media majors only with senior standing.

VIS 194S. Fantasy in Film (4)
This course will explore the path of the deliberately “unreal” in movies. Fantasy in film will be considered both in terms of its psychological manifestations and also in terms of imaginary worlds created in such willfully antirealistic genres as science fiction, horror, and musical films. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: upper-division standing. Offered in Summer Session only.

VIS 197. Media Honors Thesis (4)
This advanced-level sequence coordinates three consecutive independent research courses to culminate in a completed thesis project in the third quarter of study. After the project’s public presentation, the faculty involved in the project will determine whether the student will graduate with departmental honors. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. Note: Requires a written proposal, 3.5 GPA in the major, prior consent from all involved, and approvals by the department chair and provost.

VIS 198. Directed Group Study (2–4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a group field not included in regular department curriculum, by special arrangement with a faculty member. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. Note: Open only to upper-division students. Requires instructor’s, department chair’s, and provost’s approval. Pass/Not Pass grades only.

VIS 199. Special Studies in the Visual Arts (4)
Independent reading, research, or creative work under direction of a faculty member. Prerequisites: consent of instructor. Note: Open only to upper-division students. Requires instructor’s, department chair’s, and provost’s approval. Pass/Not Pass grades only.

ICAM 103. Musical Acoustics (4)
(Cross-listed with MUS 170.) An introduction to the acoustics of music with particular emphasis on contemporary digital techniques for understanding and manipulating sound. Prerequisites: MUS 1A, 2A, or 4.

ICAM 110. Computing in the Arts: Current Practice (4)
Designed around the presentations by visiting artists, critics, and scientists involved with contemporary issues related to computer arts. Lectures by the instructor and contextual readings provide background material for the visitor presentations. Prerequisites: none. Note: Materials fee required.

ICAM 120. Virtual Environments (4)
Students create virtual reality artworks. Projects may be done individually or in groups. Exploration of theoretical issues involved will underlie acquisition of techniques utilized in the construction of virtual realities. Materials fee required. Prerequisites: VIS 145A or ICAM 102; CSE 11 recommended. Open to ICAM majors and minors only. Two production-course limitation.

ICAM 160A. Senior Project in Computer Arts I (4)
Students pursue projects of their own design over two quarters with support from faculty in a seminar environment. Project proposals are developed, informed by project development guidelines from real-world examples. Collaborations are possible. Portfolio required for admission. Prerequisites: VIS 141B or VIS 145B or VIS 147B or MUS 172. Open to ICAM majors only. Department stamp required.

ICAM 160B. Senior Project in Computer Arts II (4)
Continuation of ICAM 160A. Completion and presentation of independent projects along with documentation. Prerequisites: ICAM 160A. Open to ICAM majors only. Department stamp required.

VIS 201. Contemporary Critical Issues (4)
An exploration of a range of issues important on the contemporary critical scene through readings and writing assignments. Topics will vary from year to year. (Required, MFA)

VIS 202. Art Practice (4)
A workshop/seminar devoted to a particular materials practice (e.g., media, painting, digital media, etc.) that engages with critical questions arising within that discipline. Content will vary from quarter to quarter. May be repeated once for credit. (Required, MFA)

VIS 203. Working Critique (4)
Workshop in which students engage in an extensive evaluation of each others’ ongoing work in preparation for either the First Year Review or MFA Review. Offered every winter. May be repeated once for credit. (Required, MFA)

VIS 204. Rethinking Art History (4)
Critical evaluation of the methods, practices, and disciplinary commitments of art history, encompassing both revisionist interventions of the late twentieth century and earlier paradigms, in order to envision new discipline-specific and interdisciplinary directions for the future of art history and visual culture. (Required, PhD)

VIS 205. Introduction to Graduate Studies in Art Practice (4)
This seminar introduces art practice students to the graduate program in a workshop environment. Emphasis is on the production of new work and on situating that work in relation to a larger art context. (Required, MFA) Offered every fall and required of all first-year MFA students.

VIS 206. Seminar in Art Practice Research (4)
Seminar examines the interrelationship between theory and practice and the nature of artistic production as a form of research. Prerequisites: none. (Required for PhD in art practice concentration.)

VIS 207. Working Practice for Art Practice PhDs (4)
Workshop for PhD in Art Practice concentration students cotaught by PhD and MFA faculty offering extensive evaluation and critique of work. Intended to explore issues associated with artistic practice as a form of research in a university setting. Course is only applicable to VA76 and VA77 PhD programs. PhD students with a concentration in Art Practice my take VIS 207 each year until they qualify for candidacy.

VIS 211. Fact and Fiction (4)
This seminar addresses the space between narrative work generated from a factual base and that generated from a fictional one. Special attention will be given to discussing work that confounds the assumed gap between the two.

VIS 212. History and Memory (4)
This seminar will engage the space between personal and larger histories. How is one’s own past both intertwined with and determined by larger social histories?

VIS 213. Public Space (4)
An exploration of what public space is and how it operates, with a view toward an expanded context for considering how public artwork can operate within it. Included are areas such as mass media, activism, community action, computer networks, ecology, and alternative forums.

VIS 215. Human Interface (4)
Examines human interface as it informs or transforms how we read and participate in culture at large. Concepts such as subject/author/object relationships, abstraction, metaphor, analogy, visualization, and complexity are discussed to establish context.

VIS 216. The Object (4)
An investigation of the world of artifacts (“works of art” and others) and how they function as agents of communication and modifiers of consciousness. Contemporary perspectives drawn from the fields of art theory, anthropology, contemporary art, and semiotics will be utilized.

VIS 217. Communities and Subcultures (4)
A critical examination of the practices of self-defined communities (e.g., Bauhaus, Shaker, surrealists), which have attempted to change the social and spiritual quality of life by aesthetic means and of communities and subcultures defined by other means.

VIS 219. Special Topics in Art Practice/Theory (4)
Examines a topic of special interest to permanent and visiting faculty that is not addressed in the regular curriculum. As in other Art Practice/Theory seminars, students will both produce work and read and write critically about the topic. Topics will vary.

VIS 234N. Frames of View (4)
Critical and historical analysis of the institutions, social networks, and communicative media through which art is presented to its audiences. May also address theories of vision and visuality, spectatorship, public space, originality and reproduction, and public space.

VIS 242. Theories of Media and New Media (4)
Critical study of the ways in which media (film, video, photography) and new media have been theorized. May be taught from a historical or comparative perspective or focus on a single topic or theorist.

VIS 243. Aesthetic Theory (4)
Study of the philosophical concepts of the function of art and visual culture and the criteria for its evaluation in diverse epochs and cultures. May be taught as an historical overview or comparative study or focus a single topic or theorist.

VIS 244. Studies in the Relationship of Theory and Practice (4)
Investigations of one or more artist-theorists or movements, contemporary or historical, that put in issue the interface between theory and practice. May also focus on a topic such as perspective, color, or narrative, or genre such as film or new media.

VIS 251. Seminar in Medieval Art (4)
European art from late antiquity through the fourteenth century and the historical processes by which "medieval" art has been constructed as a category. Topics may include devotional vision and the sacred image; medieval comic genres; neomedievalism, fifteenth century to today. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

VIS 252. Seminar in Renaissance Art (4)
Concentrates on the art of the Renaissance in Italy and the North through a changing series of topics, e.g., Vision and Composition in Perspective; The Sistine Chapel; Envisioning Jan Van Eyck; Renaissance Print Making; Leonardo da Vinci’s La Gioconda. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

VIS 254. Seminar in Modern Art (4)
European and American Art, ca. 1850 to 1960. Questions in Impressionism and Postimpressionism; The Cubist Revolution: Marcel Duchamp and the Anti-Formalist Tradition; American Modernism; Reckoning with Abstract Art; Issues of Dada and Surrealism; Soviet Avant-Gardes. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

VIS 255. Seminar in Contemporary Art (4)
Thematic and critical discussions of recent US and international art, 1960s to the present. Art/Text; Mixed Media Practices; Conceptual Art; Art After Appropriation; Global Art at the Millennium; New Genres of Public Art; Mike Kelly and the Conceptual Vernacular: Art and Activism. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

VIS 256. Seminar in Media and New Media (4)
Topics in media (photography, film, video) and new media, contemporary or historical. Coverage may be broad or addressed to a particular topic such as Film Remakes; Silent Cinema; Photography and Social Movements; The Language of New Media. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

VIS 257. Seminar in Meso-American Art (4)
Topics relating to the art and civilizations of Pre-Columbian Mexico and Central America, either specifically art historical (such as iconographic, formal, and stylistic analysis) or encompassing a spectrum of interdisciplinary and cultural/historical problems. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

VIS 258. Seminar in Chinese Art (4)
Advanced studies in the secular and religious art traditions of China. From year to year, the seminar may focus on early China (neolithic to the end of the T’ang dynasty), on later dynasties (Sung, Yuan, Ming) or on art of the People’s Republic. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

VIS 259. Seminar in Latin American Art (4)
Historical and theoretical problems in the art of Mexico, Central, and South America art from the colonial period to today, as well as from the Hispanic traditions of the American Southwest. May be taken three times for credit. Prerequisites: graduate standing or consent of instructor.

VIS 260. Seminar in North American Indian Art (4)
Topics for this seminar concern Native American art history from ancient to contemporary times. Seminars may focus on archaeological and art historical approaches, philosophy and aesthetics, archaeoastronomy, and cultural contexts. Issues of globalization and transculturation may be examined as well.

VIS 280. Workshop in Critical Writing (4)
Practice in writing about art (both one’s own and others) accompanied by analysis of selected contemporary critical writings.

VIS 281. Curatorial Practice (4)
Methodological investigation of and training in the practices of art museums, galleries, film and digital environments, public arts organizations, and the like. Instruction by museum and gallery curators and opportunities for participation in ongoing programs at local art institutions.

VIS 295. Individual Studies for Graduate Students (1–12)
Individual research with the student’s individual faculty adviser in preparation for their comprehensive exhibitions for the MFA degree or qualifying exam for the PhD. These units are intended to be with the chair of the student’s review committee. For the MFA degree, these units can only be taken after completing the First Year Review. (Required, MFA, PhD)

VIS 298. Directed Group Study (1–12)
Directed group study on specific topics not covered at present in the normal curriculum. Used as an experimental testing of courses that may be given regular course numbers if proved successful. Special arrangement with faculty member. Prerequisites: consent of department.

VIS 299. Graduate Research (1–4)
Graduate-level research under the direct guidance of a faculty member. Prerequisites: consent of instructor.

VIS 500. Apprentice Teaching (1–4)
Apprentice teaching in undergraduate courses given by the Department of Visual Arts. Graduate students are required to teach a minimum of one quarter (four units) within the department to fulfill degree requirements.

WARR 1. First Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to Warren NFRS students only.

WARR 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
This course facilitates academic success at a leading research university by helping students understand and embrace academic and curricular expectations, engage and map cocurricular opportunities, and strengthen critical thinking and organizational, interpersonal, and wellness skills. P/NP grades only. Prerequisites: open to Warren College transfer students only.

WCWP 10A. The Writing Course A (4)
A seminar-style course in reading and writing required of all Warren College students. The course emphasizes argumentation and critical writing based on sources. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: satisfaction of the UC Entry Level Writing Requirement and must be a Warren College student. Junior/senior standing students need department approval prior to registering.

WCWP 10B. The Writing Course B (4)
A seminar-style course in reading and writing required of all Warren College students who have completed WCWP 10A. The course continues the emphasis on argumentation and critical writing based on sources. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: satisfaction of WCWP 10A and must be a Warren College student. Junior/senior standing students need departmental approval prior to registering.

WARR 11A. Warren Scholars Seminar A (4)
Warren Scholars Seminar A allows students to develop and refine their expressive and analytical skills by exploring a topic from the perspective of a wide range of disciplines. The seminar emphasizes critical thinking, reading, and writing. The topic will vary each year. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: limited to first-year Warren College Honors Society students.

WARR 11B. Warren Scholars Seminar B (4)
Warren Scholars Seminar B allows students to further develop and refine their expressive and analytical skills by exploring a topic from the perspective of a wide range of disciplines. The seminar emphasizes analytical thinking and argumentative writing. The topic will vary each year. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: WARR 11A; limited to first-year Warren College Honors Society students.

WCWP 100. Academic Writing (4)
An upper-division workshop course in argumentation and research with particular attention to analyzing and constructing academic arguments. A course specially designed for and required of transfer students who enter Warren College through the TAG, IGETC, or another articulation agreement. The course must be taken for a letter grade to fulfill this requirement. Letter grades only. Prerequisites: must be a Warren College student.

WARR 189. Academic Mentoring and the Writing Process (2)
Students will gain a fundamental understanding of all stages of the writing process and will develop the necessary skills to serve as productive mentors for their peers. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Prerequisites: permission of instructor is required to enroll.

WCWP 500. Apprentice Teaching in WCWP (2 or 4)
Consideration of pedagogical methods appropriate to undergraduate teaching in Warren College Writing courses, under the supervision of the program director. (S/U grade only.) Prerequisites: graduate standing.

